Brexit: UK position paper opposes Irish border posts  
if the referendum was tommorow and you know now what you do about the eu would you vote to stay or leave or walk away now 
I turned off my phone. Woke up to BrexitI turned off my phone. Woke up to President TtumpTurning off my phone tonight 
Worth reiterating: those able should contribute to orgs like @swingleft. The 2018 midterm is a referendum on Rs complicit with POTUS. 
Is it appropriate to ask 'did you vote leave or remain in the referendum' as your first question on a dating website?  
.. Brexit is obviously going down the pan, hand in hand with this risible government, where they all belong. 
No return to Irish border posts, UK insists in Brexit plan  
Things we know today Trump is a facist, Theresa May is scared to come back from her holidays and brexit is as useful as a chocolate teapot 
The wednesday dads are already moaning that he's not a Hard-Brexit God-Fearing Englishman 
If we  have to brexit, the tories should pack up and let Kier Starmer talk to the E.U. He's the only one that will dig us out #JC4PM 
Magical #brexit "technology" will replace customs posts. Somehow. via @FT 
Brexit customs plan threatens to increase obstacles to trade  via @FT 
Any chance @jameschappers you'd lent your voice to @The3Million who are fighting for EU nationals #citizensrights in UK post Brexit?  
Not some most. @jameschappers tweets today reveal from insider the very close relationship between Brexit right wing politicians and @BBC. 
The UK's plan for the Irish border is basically, "sure it'll be grand". This is a complete joke. #Brexit  
Gove got a chlorine soaKKKed chicKKKen Brexit trade deal thanKKKs to Trump AmeriKKKa  
About that ridiculous customs union proposal..... A Brexit Fantasy From The UK Government  #brexit #projectfantasy 
It's better to #Support #Biafrans by referendum in democratic process bcos no amount of physical or spiritual power can Stop #Biafra coming, 
'Untested'. So it'll be bad. Has the BBC put forward any positive comment about Brexit yet? Any at all? Impartial?  
Brexit savaged by former David Davis aide - our story plus a round up of the day's tweets from @jameschappers 
Britain is now seeking a Brexit without borders for Northern Ireland  
Brexit: UK position paper opposes Irish border posts  
Consequences of Brexit, no 101 (of a near infinite series). And again, this was predicted  
@Lawrence The inherent weakness of the 25th Amendment is its reliance on Congress to enforce.  It should be a national referendum.  #Trump 
Actually, the crisis is for the quarter of the population who used to support "brexit" - but that fraction is now also falling very fast ... 
Lmao y'all gonna fk around & let this b actually win Miss Jamaica. Y'all said the SAME thing about Trump/Brexit, and look where we are now 
UK govt ministers arguing about length of post- #Brexit transition w/o knowing what’ll still to be solved. So how can you know time reqd.? 
I think UK govt ministers haven’t understood #Brexit transition. It’s to give time for the complex stuff. If they know what that even is?  
" will launch the {Democrats} party at the People’s March for Europe rally on 9 September."#BRExit @theresa_may @BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP  
Scotland knows that @BBC @BBCScotland stole the referendum result for No.  
No return to Irish border posts, UK insists in Brexit plan  
Train fares are about to get more expensive because of Brexit  
This is now the most dangerous era since the 1930s. Brexit and Trump are empowering fascists  
Iranians pressured PUK 2reinstate d Parliament w/ the KDP & postpone the referendum. PUK has completely ignored all its agreements w/ Gorran 
Big business benefits from protected national markets where it can profit from the lack of foreign competition.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Iranians have suggested to reinstate the Kurdistan Parliament through the PUK so that the Parliament decides on postponing the referendum. 
KDP agrees to postpone referendum but they have told Iranians Masoud Barzani would be embarrassed if he decides to postpone it by himself. 
We need to walk away now for immediate Brexit. I didn't vote for two years of bad faith EU talks followed by a nonsense transitional deal. 
Dave Brown on the UK's Brexit negotiations – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
David Davis isn't negotiating he's buying time clearly unable to commit to anything.#Brexit team should be made of a cross party #bbcpapers 
Britain is balking at the notion of a hard border with Ireland after Brexit  
Christian Adams captures the government's latest position on Brexit - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
How mighty Britain has fallen and will continue to fall because of Brexit. The one way to reverse the trend is to #StopBrexit 
Steve Bell on the UK's Brexit negotiations – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Parting Thought. Brexit means Exit. If they keep us IN the EU for one day longer than March 2019 we will remove them from power. G'night 
This despicable fraud has been busy today telling us why people voted for Brexit. Of course he didn't mention this!  
Brexit Crackpot at work.Stop Brexit before it's  too late...  
How a plot to stop #Brexit is being hatched on a Greek island. Interesting story about @jameschappers. I'm a fan. 
*Brexit Explained*  
David Davis's ex-aide James Chapman to launch anti-Brexit party  
The Lib Dems are now just one metaphor away from saying no Brexit.  
Government trying to swindle us out of Brexit. Brexit means no Brexit. Hope @Jacob_Rees_Mogg launches leadership bid 
I know I bang on a lot about Brexit but honestly how bad is all of this? It just beggars belief!  
Rumour has it that Larry the Cat is now running the show - he's rather smart, so will stop "brexit" soon ... 
Poor America. Poor UK. Poor World. #Trump #Brexit #SmallFuckedPlanet But let's battle on. 
They say the EU is corrupt: UK faces €2bn fine over Chinese imports scam, say EU investigators#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Our own prime minister will not criticise Trump, because half of us voted for a dim Brexit that makes us weak and vulnerable. Shame on us.  
Turns out David Davis is partial to a glass or two of red wine. Guess we're going to do really well with our Brexit negotiations.. 
And the reason for this is the same - to generate the nationalist fear and hysteria which drives reason and facts out of politics.#Brexit 
The same alliance of right-wing press & far-right extremists is operating against Muslims as it was against EU immigrants. #Brexit #Remain 
Excl: Fresh Cabinet Brexit row - Boris and Liam Fox dig in to insist transition must be no longer than 12 months;  
Brexit saboteurs keep telling us that Britain is in a weak negotiating position, they're wrong, says @JLongworthLML 
#DavidDavis says #Brexit going "incredibly well" & lack of clarity of govt position is "constructive ambiguity" Eh?! 
How are we supposed to organise Brexit in 18 months when it takes us 4 years to fix a clock #BigBen 
David Davis’s aide in extraordinary attack on ‘drunk, bullying' Brexit chief  
BBC News leads Ten 0'Clock bulletin with 'Life after Brexit' & David Davis blather.No word on Trump's outburst. Mustn't annoy Brexiteers. 
'We voted to leave!' Farage slates EU chiefs telling UK Brexit team to stop giving in  
Superb from @IanDunt on the Govt's hapless position paper on frictionless trade for a Brexit transition period. 
The Brexit customs union plan reveals the government is in fantasy land, writes @ChrisLeslieMP  
FT View: The UK government has shown destructive ambivalence, not creative ambiguity during Brexit talks  
Over recent decades non-EU net migration has been considerably higher than EU net migration. #LeaveLies #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexit:UK: This is the planEU: It's fantasyTomorrow's Guardian  
"Barely qualified to speak"? Considering he is one of few politicians to back #Brexit & @realDonaldTrump I think he is very qualified. 
1. There are some advantages to a no-deal #Brexit scenario I feel have been overlooked. 
Brexit and Trump. I think this now qualifies as an emergency, literally. We all have to act. 
Brexit is still a live political issue and hasn't happened yet. Why does the BBC keep saying things like, "Now Brexit is a reality, ..." 
Everyday someone tells me I tweet too much about Trump and/or Brexit. Think I don't do it enough: this is majorly defining catastrophic shit 
There can be only one reason for UK govt’s fantasy Brexit wish list: so that, when EU inevitably says no, govt can save face by BLAMING EU. 
Good news is when Brexit is stopped the UK will be the best place in the EU to invest bc the UK will be the least likely of th EU28 to leave 
Everyone's dumping the pound, and they're only just getting started  
Brexit could cause gridlock in south-east England, with lorries queueing in Kent for up to 30 miles   
Guess what they aren't telling us? You can bet it's bad news about the effects of Brexit on the economy. #StopBrexit 
Sadly, it's become clear this week that the Government is making it up as it goes along with #Brexit | Independent  
Brexit's only hope was that sterling's weakness would boost exports. And even that failed. #bendoverBrexit  
The government is threatening to blame the EU for it shooting the hostages (us) if the EU doesn't give into its demands.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
*Brexit Explained*  
No doubt @jameschappers could've written sensational lucrative book on Brexit,but,to his credit,he tweets best lines as time is running out 
Nationalists, of course, see no contradiction btwn their Brexit bad/indy amazeballs pitch, largely because of internalised moral superiority 
Farage said his friendship with Trump is probably why a Hollywood studio is interested in making TV series on Brexit  
The thing is, the SNP's critique of Brexit nonsense is often spot on, just fatally undermined by their similarly rosy view of independence 
Do they all say Brexit is f***ing stupid?  
Britain threatens to impose VAT and customs duties on EU imports if there is no Brexit deal #Premium 
Who is James Chapman – and why should we care what he thinks about Brexit? 
Steve Bell on the UK's Brexit negotiations – cartoon  
State pension isn't welfare 
optimism on Brexit in typically brilliant column from @mattwridley especially good on real nature/agenda of EU: 
David Davis' CONSTRUCTIVE AMBIGUITY translates into 'Divided Tories postpones  BREXIT for 3 more years until everyone hates it'. 
Clueless, deluded and making it up as they go along. The Tory hard Brexit team deal with the customs union.  
If #Brexit we're a private sector project, funding would have been pulled by now & everyone involved from May/Davis down to interns sacked! 
David Davis' former chief of staff claims to have witnessed the Brexit boss being "drunk, bullying & inappropriate".  
David Davis tells LBC that the EU is not a fan of Britain’s Brexit negotiating method  
So the democrats is really happening? FFS,don't play with me!! Fight,fight this bloody Brexit mess,before it's too late  
@Nigel_Farage With dither and delay this is NOT the Brexit we voted for. Nigel Farage will be back to front line soon  
Tonight's topics.  1. Brexit means Remain? 2. Period poverty 3. Europe's barren leaders.  
Just been on @SkyNews with @faisalislam where I pointed out that fanciful Tory Brexit Customs Union replacement is "Davis in Wonderland ". 
On today's #Brexit madness @theSNP position is clear: the UK government should commit to staying in the Single Market and the Customs Union 
Out of 50 Czech nationals I know who have lived and worked in Liverpool before referendum there are 2 still in UK - and they married Brits 
Two-stage Brexit strategy derided by UK and EU politicians  
Walk away just go.  No Brexit bill!' David Davis refuses to bow down to EU deadline on divorce settlement.     
10 of the 38 countries seeking bilateral post-Brexit free trade agreements with the UK are members of the Commonwealth. 74% are not. 
Brexit: fantasy island - Government's position paper offers non-attainable scenarios ... pure fantasy.  #Brexit.  
Could Fisheries revival scupper Scottish #ref2 dream? #SNP #brexit @NicolaSturgeon @RuthDavidsonMSP @ScotToriesRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
.@Nigel_Farage: The political class are trying to use the complexities of Brexit to delay our departure  #FarageOnLBC 
From the German magazine Der Spiegel: The British want a bit of everything with Brexit  
'We voted to leave!' #Farage slates EU chiefs telling UK #Brexit team to stop giving in 
."Brexit & the upsurge of English nationalism that drives it have created a deep existential crisis for the UK" 
JOIN US LIVE ON RBL NEWSONE NIGERIAN IS A CRIMEAGAINT HUMANITY BIAFRANSDEMAND FOR REFERENDUM@realDonaldTrump @VP  
Vince Cable @LibDems leader tells @Channel4News we have a very good cake in the EU and we should keep eating it. #Brexit 
EU customs deal is a betrayal of Brexit! Pod One with @GrahamEardley from @BrugesGroup#FreeSpeech 
Tory MPs are turning a blind eye because keeping their party together is more important to them than a proper Brexit.  
Newspapers such as @TheSun were wrong to claim that most #Britons back a hard #Brexit. Share our guest report. Link:  
The Government is making it up as it goes along with Brexit  
Who knew that Brexit would result in a Walnut Whip without the walnut. They didn't put that on the bus.  
.@Nigel_Farage thinks the government’s “Great Brexit Betrayal” has officially begun. Agree?  #FarageOnLBC 
My response on Govt plan for post-Brexit trade. A collision with reality & a position paper that sounds the loudest of alarm bells. #Brexit  
A man runs towards the cliff edge shrieking "They're punishing me!", while 27 others watch with bemusement.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
'No Brexit bill!' @DavidDavisMP refuses to bow down to EU deadline on divorce settlement  
BREXIT WAR: Britain to slap import taxes on all EU goods if UK can't agree Brussels deal  @DavidDavisMP 
ICYMI Tory former minister Anna Soubry warns she could quit party over hard Brexit  
huge respect for @jameschappers exposing truth about govt incompetence & looming brexit disaster. Slandering critics as mad is a low tactic 
Buried deep inside the gut of the South Yorkshire Leaver is a firm belief that Brexit is right for them  
David Davis "So be under no doubt: we can do deals with our trading partners, and we can do them quickly. "#Brexit 
I'm a #Labour voter and I can't tell you what the Party's' policy is re: #Brexit.Out. Kinda Out.  Sorta In. ? 
Jacob, May has betrayed us! The UK is calling on U to step up in a supreme act of selflessness and serve as our new PM. Delay Brexit? Never!  
Brexit Britain is slipping behind France in the economic stakes in more ways than one  
Theresa May: The mandate to leave the EU was clear. Leave the single market and take back control. ...  via @UKChange 
For gods sake walk away &stop playing games cowtowing 2 this lot! You were voted in for Brexit means Brexit! LIARS 
#KurdistanReferandum delegation in Baghdad reiterated in all meetings that Referendum for independence is irreversible. 
If you care about the catastrophe that is Brexit, you must follow @jameschappers. Please retweet. 
The chaos continuesTheresa May's plan for Brexit has been blasted by the EU as 'a fantasy' 
Labour endorse "constructive ambiguity" on Brexit  
With every passing day our Dead Ringers 'Brexit Bulldog' looking less satire & more documentary  
Exactly so - also do bear in mind that brexit bulldog Davis is now  "negotiating" with the EU without any mandate  
BREXIT BETRAYAL?Have your say on our livestream at 18:10 here:  
Western Kenya should do a referendum to secede. If Uthamakis think only them can lead, we have no business in Central @Asamoh_ @RailaOdinga 
Fare rises are soaring above wage increases - people are losing out from higher inflation since the referendum.  
Labour in new Brexit shambles as bungling shadow minister repeatedly fails to answer customs union question then c…  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Business needs certainty then step into WTO while negotiating ?? Withholding Brexit benefits until General Election is a Backdoor left open. 
Labour is nowhere sensible to be seen on Brexit, and the Tories are in full-on cave-in mode. Brexiteers should be very concerned indeed. 
Thanks to inflation 2.5% higher due to Brexit, real wages are only getting worse even than this 
 Brexit briefing: the UK government's "fantasy" Customs Union proposal.  
We asked @Nigel_Farage​ who'd play him in #Brexit: The Movie. Turn up your sound to hear his thoughts on the latest plans and negotiations  
Labour's Brexit position is nothing short of a betrayal. Our greatest diplomatic undertaking in decades & they don't know where they stand.  
This is 100% as incompetent as the Brexit government. In fact, it's a Tory incompetence tribute act.  
The great Usain Bolt didn't decide not to run because he might not win. And Brits should not fear Brexit because there are challenges ahead. 
Lol. Pithy trolling of the Brexit Dept.  
Our review of the Brexit position paper on 'future customs arrangements' 
Nick Clegg book will reveal How to Stop Brexit | Books | The Guardian  
.@ChrisLeslieMP tops today's 5@5: 'The Brexit customs union plan reveals the government is in fantasy land' |  
Guess who will really be paying the extra VAT and trade tariffs. Clue it won't be the importer. Brexit will cost us all dearly. #StopBrexit 
Nigel Farage - "Two years should have been plenty. Today what the Government has done is to show the most enormous weakness." #Brexit  
'Even after Trump and Brexit, we cling to the idea that humans are naturally good - but we're not'  
"Through it all, one question sticks with you: Why the hell are we doing this?" ..now the key #Brexit issue   
Labour think they can ride two horses at once on Brexit and not take a proper position. The truth is, they have no plan.  
Nadine, perhaps you could explain to your constituents just how damaging brexit will be to the UK & why you support it? 
The Conservatives have a plan for Brexit and will make the most of the opportunities it brings. Labour still have no idea what they think  
Nick Clegg book will reveal How to Stop Brexit  
Former UKIP leader Nigel Farage has attacked David Davis for comments about a transitional deal during the negotiation period of #Brexit  
Totally unacceptable.  I'm sure the EU have put a hold on any trade talks they're having during Brexit.  
Brexit legend @Nigel_Farage is right as always. We voted to LEAVE THE EU, not for a transition that locks us out of global trade. 
It's emerged that among the programmes Brussels expects British taxpayers to pay for is their propaganda war against Brexit, incredible!! 
The Brexit Club. #makeafilmtotallybritish 
Twitter is a struggle on days like this. Too many people who know too little about Brexit saying too many things that are too inaccurate. 
Thunderbird puppet with condom over his head to play Michael Gove in Brexit Movie 
Brexit fell apart today, the proposal is the ultimate stupidity, a Free United Kingdom with Independent Trading Status. #FUKWITS #Brexit  
The government’s Brexit plans have degenerated into magical unrealism. My @IndyVoices column:  
Opposition to Brexit is now evidence of mental breakdown is it? Tory doublethink really is getting out of hand... 
If a referendum is won on a lie, is it still democratic or is it electoral fraud. 
Please can @IanDunt be a guest interviewer on @BBCr4today every time the Government produce a Brexit position paper?  
Asia’s key financial centres are committed to UK as City looks to strengthen post-Brexit ties #GlobalBritain  
Brexit transition deal that keeps us in the Customs Union thus unable to strike our own Trade Deals is totally unacceptable to Leave voters. 
Marco Carola reckons that bird who worked the doors at 338 voted for Brexit. 
I'd like to hear just ONE MP, of any stripe, who sounds like they know what they're talking about on Brexit  
Looking forward to responding to UK BREXIT paper on Ireland tomorrow - we'll work with EU partners to negotiate best deal possible with UK 
James doing brilliantly in drawing out the really ugly side of the Tory right. #brexit  
Nigel Farage is not the only Brexiter under investigation by FBI & others. #Brexit  
.@Nick_Clegg’s book will reveal How to Stop Brexit... destined to fill Remoaners’ Christmas stockings#OwnTheRemoan 
UK BREXIT paper welcome 4 clarity but ask on customs facilitation will b difficult given UK proposal to negotiate separate FTAs at same time 
There you have it. The Tories cluelessness and self delusion over Brexit is becoming embarrassing.  
It's just become clear that the Government is making it up as it goes along with Brexit  
This is a Brexit rag that also openly demonises migrants + employs a hack who has gone out to STOP Save The Children charity rescue boats. 
Working together in a strong European partnership - Minister @Paschald meeting today with Minister Schäuble for talks on the #EU and #Brexit  
This is the most Brexit story ever. Pure Blimp. Extra points for shoehorning in a reference to the Luftwaffe  
Indeed.I choose the party that after #brexit ref sent me a letter assuring me that to them I'm still worthy and welcome. Y'know,the @theSNP 
Brexit: presented to public & voted on without any idea of whether it wld work in practice #idiotnation #idiotMPs  
Nick Clegg book will reveal How to Stop Brexit  
A perceptive look at the government latest twists and turns on  #brexit   :  
JOBS: Looking for an opportunity at the coal-face of idiocy, racism and fevered Brexit nationalism? Apply now.  
It is vital Parliament has its say on all of this, argue both @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry #Brexit #CustomsUnion 
Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference  
Top 10 challenges/opportunities for #FinancialServices in 2017 {#ai #blockchain #brexit #cybersecurity #regtech #fintech} @MikeQuindazzi 
Man who deserted family on a whim demands full access to house, kids, contents of the fridge and family car #brexit  
When Brexit inevitably fails it will be because: 
2. The Telegraph has splashed that the UK is threatening to impose VAT on imports from EU27 if there is no Brexit deal. 
1. Looking at HMG's paper on future customs arrangements, there's some interesting hints about what UK VAT looks like after Brexit. 
Today's UK Gov #brexit paper largely a restatement of opening, unrealistic, brexiteer positions.  
If the govt had any respect for the people & democracy they would ensure the people had that right to decide whether to #StopBrexit.#Brexit 
Irrespective of one’s position on #Brexit @jameschappers may well right now be the most important person in UK politics. Or not. #twitter 
How commuters and graduates are paying the price for Brexit  
Brexit keeps throwing up the same fundamental question: Is it better if they're lying or if they're idiots?  
UK govt slammed over fantasy Brexit transitional plans, accused of still believing UK can have its cake and eat it 
Wow - this #LoveIsland dude is really ahead of the curve on #Brexit   
Bizzare, isn't it? Corbyn's party supports the Tories on Brexit & immigration: The Times is closer to being a "genuine left alternative".  
The government's customs union plan is an absolute dog's breakfast. By @IanDunt #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
FTSE 350 profits rise at fastest rate since 2012, more evidence the UK economy is strong as Brexit talks continue  
EU dismisses Britain’s post-Brexit customs plan—withdrawal terms must be settled first 
We cannot have all our Regulations set by being in the internal market [Single Market] #MoggMentum#Brexit  
 Me, @EmilyRDinsmore @LyonsIzzy & @AdamR2312 on Brexit for @bbcthree 
I live in deepest darkest Manchester & wouldn't know Quinoa from an iMac - but I know #Brexit is shite. 
A referendum on Kurdish independence from Iraq carries grave risks  
In answer to Q about a 2nd Indy referendum John Bercow advises that people should never give up on a cause #salmondunleashed 
We think all too often when we win freedoms they're won forever.Trump & Brexit have brought many into doubt:this is no time for complacency. 
France outpaced UK in venture capital fundraising after Brexit with €1.7 billion raised during the 1st half of 2017  
"You can be young and vote for Brexit" - Beeb meets young Leave voters:  
The only good Brexit would be a reverse Brexit, and given where we are after 14 months, a reverse Brexit is now favourite.  
Quinoa dodging, Metropolitan Elite Essex pensioner Juliet Says Brexit is Robbery!  
With more evidence of the cluelessness of the project Lab's support for a Tory hard Brexit is baffling. Last plug.  
Farage also told me he plans to audition to play himself in new $60m Hollywood "Bad Boys of Brexit" film  
Goldman Sachs and big business lost the referendum. UK Government should get on and enact to the will of the people.  
David Davis on @BBCRadio4 spouting more #Brexit nonsense. So for balance the BBC invites a response to his comments. From Nigel Farage. 
For genuine Tory implosion + whistle blowing on the bs that is #Brexit see @jameschappers timeline, dishing some serious insider dirt #EU 
Reading Govt's 'proposals', words 'cake', eat it' & 'delusional' come to mind. I’d like some of whatever Ministers are on, please #Brexit  
BREXIT: Government announce transition plan."Hellooooo. My name is Unite D Kingdom. What a nice Customs Union you have here. May I join?"  
The Fight Brexit War Chest fund is growing and supporting some major influential players. Please support it further  
Your occasional reminder: Brexit = Red Tape. 
Now is the time for the 17.4 million voters to fight back. Farage: Brexit betrayal is now government policy  
Same delusions are peddled by Labour. Don't vote for a #Brexit & then argue you can have easy economic relationship with #EU 
#EUCustoms paper is fantasy, ‘cake and eat it’ will never be accepted. If you're putting forward plans make sure they'll work #Brexit 
We MUST be clear. Brexit is not a dispute of the UK & EU. It's a UK Tory party coup d'état, under false mandate. The EU want to help us free 
Tory Brexit customs plan branded a 'fantasy' as firms face a surge in red tape 
Just called the Dept for exiting EU press office and got recorded message saying it's currently closed - seriously ? #Brexit 
Staying in customs union & single market is best way to protect environment, jobs & future, not Govt's arrogant pick & mix approach #Brexit 
Customs union paper raises more questions than it answers. We do need to avoid cliff edge but 3 Brexiteers still heading for cliff #Brexit 
More delusion. More cake and eat it.  Brexit is Barmy, this is plainly a none starter.They have not been listening.#ExitFromBrexit 
Employers and employees now talking about ‘when’ they leave London #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Brexit is doomed to fail whether it goes ahead or not.What's so wrong with coming out & saying it?Mental health slurs?Wow. Desperate! 
The self-proclaimed guard dog of Brexit, @nigel_farage, repeatedly asked what his plan is. He can't answer. #Shyster#wato 
Brexit is AMAZING and the racist/stupid stereotypes are way off the mark. @FraserMyers @LyonsIzzy @AdamR2312 my fellow positive Leavers.  
Remoaners openly talking of reversing Brexit. Politicians want to betray the people - we want clean Brexit in 2019!  
“Chaps, Brexit’s trickier than we thought. How can we solve this?”“Make it reliant on a major government IT procurement project?” “YES!” 
Farage, Redwood, Mogg. The BBC is obsessed with the views of the clueless and the powerless Brexit zealots.#wato 
Brexit Minister David Davis accused of links with Far Right, being a drunk, abuses EU PM, works 3 days a week, bullying+leering towards MP  
That's fine, we Brexit supporting deplorables will happily leave you to it. Ps - sadly I've never been to Belize!  
‘Brexit Betrayal Is Now Government Policy’: Britain to Be Blocked from New Trade Deals for Years to Come  
Thunderbird puppet with condom over his head set to play Michael Gove in "Brexit: The Movie" 
This is not #Brexit and is not what we voted for?  
Ignore the naysayers. Brexit is taking shape.  
Most of the current Government's Brexit & post-Brexit ideas are fantasy. Problem for UK is that the same applies to Labour's leadership.  
Brexit:Davis: this is our Customs Union plan-Verhofstadt: Fantasy-Sturgeon: Daft-EU: got to pay bill first 
Top Brexit priorities in... Immigration, anti-terror, free trade+ Exit bill, anti-terror, no "cake & eat it" 
Fellow Kenyans, DO NOT remove your names from voter register. There shall be a referendum to butcher the Constitution. It must be resisted. 
Remainer: "You're just a racist"Brexiteer: "17.4 million people are not racist"Things not to say to people who voted Brexit.  
Nigel Farage tells @SkyNews that if a Brexit film is made he will audition to play himself. 
EU's chief negotiator stresses UK will have to stick to EU's Brexit timetable in response to customs paper.  
% of people in each country saying Britain has the upper hand in Brexit negotiations 27% 24% 14% 
The domestic media spin exercise now complete, government condecends to allow the public to see Brexit position paper.  
BREAKING Britain threatens to impose VAT and customs duties on EU imports if there is no Brexit deal   via @telegraph 
Stick firm.  We don't want their toxic Brexit in any shape or form.Let Brexit fall apart all on its own. 
“Today, we are publishing unachievable nonsense on Brexit to make it appear we know what we are doing, when clearly we don’t.” 
Leave.EU launch deselection bid in hope of dumping soft Brexit ministers out of their jobs  
Man in charge of brexit so inept can't save a phone number without assistance...  
When we joined the common market it was nothing to do with 'citizens rights' it was for trade.Stop the posturing & delaying nonsense.#brexit 
Scottish Labour need to stop being afraid of a second referendum on independence.  
"And remember, our target market for this cereal is people who like cartoon rhinos and Brexit"  
I need to lie down. This is Brexit  
Tories attempt to hijack powerful decision-making committee to ram through new post-Brexit laws  
Yes , Cameron and co were very keen which is why we legitimately brought it up as a concern in the referendum  
EU negotiating Brexit transparently & factually with UK Govt.UK Govt negotiating Brexit opaquely & spin-based with tabloid barons.  
Next time a politician tells you it's important for people to vote remind them of their betrayal over #Brexit and ask what's the point? 
'We'll be EU's BIGGEST export market,' Leave Means Leave board member @DavidJonesMP on UK's 'powerful' Brexit stance  
Labour needs to get in there. Make the case austerity is killing you and Brexit means more of it. Remain and invest in our people.  
Boris Johnson has gone quiet over Brexit  
David Davis’s former chief of staff launches extraordinary tirade against ‘drunk and inappropriate’ Brexit chief 
Don’t get hung up on the ‘meaning’ of Brexit. Think of it like jazz. It’s fluid, it’s unpredictable, and the British are no good at it. 
#Brexit betrayal as govt. to keep Britain in Customs Union. This is wrong - UK must be free to pursue trade deals.  
David Davis says Brexit negotiations are going "incredibly well"  
More evidence that Britain is booming since the Brexit vote...  
If May wants a Brexit Transition Period she needs a deal. Otherwise it's cliff-edge-WTO. Suddenly "A bad deal looks better than no deal". 
Actually I don't know anyone who thinks Everything Was Fine before Brexit. Only people who know it's going to get a whole lot worse after it 
Wrote about something which isn't Brexit yday & have noticed a noticeable improvement in my emotional temperament  
Banks deleted this tweet to Robbie Gibbs & Times within 15 mins. Refers to Farage meeting w/ Wikileaks which was poss. espionage. #Brexit  
See also: Brexit.  
"@EmekaGift: @UN,#Biafra deserve #referendum to determine their future,call for referendum is not a call for war.… " 
BREXIT: Government confirm plans to create a temporary Customs Union with the EU that will run indefinitely and be called a Customs Union. 
Clear to most long term BBC supporters: on #Brexit, key staff in political coverage were heavily biased. Hence no scrutiny of fake claims  
'@JLongworthLML: Chancellor Hammond and civil service steering Brexit in very negative direction.  
Reality check: never has a Brexit opinion poll been so badly misreported (see my pinned tweet)  
And there it is. The UK will remain the EU in practise for years after Brexit occurs. A total and absolute betrayal of the will of the ppl.  
There should not be embargo on Brexit position papers, with advance disclosure to select media.Should just be openly published, as EU does. 
Rail fares to rise by up to 3.6%, due to Brexit inflation.#Brexit working hard to make Britain poorer.#StopBrexit 
Indicates who UK government is really negotiating with on Brexit.Not with the EU.  But with the media, and its own backbenchers. 
Pound falls to lowest in a month against dollar after inflation is weaker than forecast  
Just seeing the Pound at 1.10 Euros. #Brexit, working hard to make Britons poorer.#StopBrexit 
The Government has a duty to protect my constituents livelihoods. Their handling of Brexit is verging on negligence.  
The Scots Tories have fought consecutive elections on being a 'strong opposition' then the referendum. Will be almost funny to see policies. 
So now it's a 'free & frictionless' #Brexit? Sounds like the strap line for #KYJelly, but then we are getting shafted! @EUflagmafia 
It's the Brexit trilemma: UK cannot fully deliver frictionless Irish border, immigration controls & 3rd party trade deals.  
I know we're all enjoying David Brent Does Brexit, but isn't it time he did the dance, then had the finale moment of self-awareness?  
Our vital mission now in @UKIP is to ensure a total and clean Brexit in 2019. No 'transitions'  No slow betrayals.It's up to us. 
"The Chancellor and the civil service seem to be steering Brexit in a very negative direction," says @JLongworthLML 
Lee Rigbys Killer has been moved 
David Davis "Brexit negotiations are going incredibly well" The rest of us....  
The first part of the Brexit plan has been published today  
REFERENDUM: Constitution without provision for referendum is illegitimate - Col Nyiam (rtd) drops BOMBSHELL  
That it has taken the courage of @jameschappers to start actual Brexit opposition shows our politicians for the spineless bunch they are  
Brexit Betrayal Plan: make continual concessions in negotiations, delay exit, make final Agreement so weak its not like leaving. Don't leave 
Well after a year on from the advisory Referendum and the UK Govt is still failing to grasp EU is not going to give it a special deal 
'What do we want'? "A policy on anything other than opposition to a 2nd referendum" 'When do we want it'? "As soon as we think of something" 
.@ChukaUmunna – Inflation figures show Brexit is still squeezing household incomes  
A delusional 'workshy, inept liar' leading #Brexit negotiations - What could possibly go wrong?  # via @HuffPostUKPol 
Impossible to square with notion that Brexit in any *specific* form has to occur due to will of people. Yet more having & eating of cake.  
Newsflash: EU Commission makes clear that UK Govt hope for 'frictionless trade' not possible outside single market and customs union #Brexit  
Brexit Secretary David Davis is lazy and inept claims ex-chief of staff  via @HuffPostUKPol @jameschappers 
City 'haemorrhaging' talent because of Brexit, says headhunter  
Heading into Belfast 4 number of Brexit meetings: 1st with @UFUHQ - Brexit disaster for farmers every farm will lose £10,000 #SpecialStatus 
UK is one billion, nine hundred twenty-four million, £ a WEEK better off in the EU than if we suffer a Hard (WTO) #Brexit. #bendoverBrexit 
Parliament should never have gone on holiday during this Brexit 'state' of emergency, would Churchill have gone away for 6 weeks in 39-45?  
The economy should stop trying to sabotage Brexit by talking Britain down.  
It's a statement of the obvious, but has to keep being said since the brexit govt still hasn't grasped this very basic fact.  
David Davis's former chief of staff lets rip at old boss, claims he works 'three day week' + hasn't clue on Brexit.  
EU set to block UK's temporary customs union plea to stop #Brexit border chaos. EU seeks punishment, not partnership 
Ireland willing to veto UK plans over brexit. Time for a Guinness to thank our wonderful Irish friends. #notinmyname  
Listening to David Davis #r4Today he seems as CONFUSED as me r#BrexitDifference isI'm just a twitter hackHe's the  Brexit Secretary  ! 
For some reason, I'm not entirely convinced by David Davis' insistence that slick new technology can solve Brexit  
Brexit Secretary David Davis says the government aims to have a new customs union arrangement with the EU in place by the first half of 2019 
Government slammed over ‘fantasy’ #Brexit transitional plans >>  
DD would never prep for @bbcradio4 as he knew Humphrys would do Brexit chums act then hector and interrupt @labour spokespeople #byebyejohn 
Ok. I get it. People who've agitated for a second referendum are bad losers who should respect democracy. Let's let the 1975 result stand. 
SHARE: It's time for Govt to drop 'cake & eat it' approach to post-Brexit customs checks & start being honest with the British people  
Let's be clear a transitional agreement after #Brexit is welcome but slows down UK economy falling over a cliff- it does not avoid it. 
Brexit now retreating so fast you can't see it for the dust they're busy kicking up. Mogg, Farage, fundamentalist Brexiters, are livid.  
Brexit is like a farmer with empty fields cancelling his contract with Tesco to spend the next few years negotiating a new one with Lidl. 
Remoaners at @TheNewEuropean aren't too happy about our huge campaign to get Brexit saboteurs deselected. Perfect! 
Why would anyone want to live in a country that has no future? ☞ City 'haemorrhaging' talent because of Brexit  
Big straws in the wind: Brexit in retreat.  
And 'Vote Leave' promised, week before voting, that Britain would start negotiating big trade deals day after referendum! How's that going?! 
If I'm a business considering my future in Britain, am I going to be reassured by DD's 'constructive ambiguity' around #Brexit? #r4today 
Brexit update: David Davis is crystal clear that we're leaving the customs union in order to join a union of customs 
And more cases of people leaving the country over Brexit. Maybe at @Scientists4EU we shld collect testimonials of scientists who have left?  
Davis trying to sneak old Ford Fiesta he can’t shift into Brexit deal   
FFS shut up Brexit Trump bashing morning noon & night BBC SkyNews LBC 17 million voted leave get it were leaving got Gold  get away from it 
We've been saying this for a year. Finally they're catching on. "Soft Brexit" is nothing but a "Business Brexit". Remain is for us ALL   
The Art Of The Deal, Brexit edition  
Seems UK gov is back to its daft 'have cake and eat it' approach to #Brexit. They should commit to staying in single market and CU, period. 
Our existing free trade deals with 57 other countries expire after Brexit - because they're made via EU, not with UK directly. Total mess. 
Theresa May still on holiday after nearly 4 weeksdespite Brexit chaos.It seems like she’s given up on governing. 
David Davis insists Brexit negotiations going "incredibly well" #r4today 
I do not understand what is going on with Brexit and I have a feeling I am in very similar territory to David Davis. 
'@Arron_banks: Fox and Davis "should hang their heads in shame" over Brexit transition period.  
Anyone any the wiser after hearing #Brexit Secretary on @BBCr4today? Still "cake & eat it" delusion shrouded in bluff & bluster. 
Trapping the UK into EU custom tariffs rates after Brexit under a pretence of us making our own deals? is not control, or what was voted for 
The government is still pursuing its 'having its cake' Brexit strategy. Ministers can unite over this...only problem is that it's a fantasy. 
The left-wing argument for Brexit is embarrassingly flimsy  
The higher the bill, the greater the likelihood that Brexit is stopped.  
I hate David Davis is being flippant with the Brexit negotiations. A lot of people are greatly concerns what's going on #r4today #bbcr4today 
David Davis says if people not aware of what they want for Brexit that's on purpose. He says "constructive ambiguity" vital for negotiations 
David Davis Brexit position = "I am breaking up with you,  but I want to keep sleeping with you until I find a new lover " 
Maybe you shouldn't have campaigned for it then? Don't recall you saying that brexit would be a distraction harmful to Wales last year.  
No ScotTories available for chat about Brexit on #bbcgms not even our newly appointed Lord @IanDuncanHMG. Unbelievable 
"This may have been a reaction to fears that Brexit will end freedom of movement for EU nationals."  
Can we begrudge our politicians 8 weeks electioneering, then 6 weeks holidays - not as though Brexit is a mess or needing their attention?  
City 'haemorrhaging' talent because of Brexit, says headhunter  
Interesting that no @ScotTories were available to discuss the latest #Brexit mess on #bbcgms this morning. They're so vocal on other matters 
'@Nigel_Farage: Brexit betrayal is now government policy.  
Best description of #Brexit I've heard.#StopBrexit #marchwithus 
UK 'deluded' over plan for Brexit transitional period, warns Hogan - Independent.ie  
Gradually MPs are beginning to voice the previously unsayable - that Brexit can (and should) be stopped. This time it's @ChrisLeslieMP 
James Chapman. Showing us the way out of the mess Brexit has become. Please follow him now. @jameschappers #thedemocrats #StopBrexit 
UK: no to temporary membership of *the* Customs Union after Brexit, yes to membership of *a* temporary customs union  
I've not been paying a huge amount of attention but it strikes me that the govt's Brexit plans might need a little more work 
U.K. says a forthcoming paper will set out two long-term options for post-Brexit customs arrangements with the EU 
"Brexit debate in the future not going to be about people coming here but can 'we' leave here!" @carolinejmolloy 
Corbyn a new era that could potentially spread to Europe if we can overcome the establishment, Brexit enormous challenge  @carolinejmolloy 
As a repentant former life long Tory voter I can tell you, you can "come out" and change your mind. Admitting Brexit was wrong is OK. >>2 
A "temporary customs union"? What a stupid, pointless waste of time #Brexit is. Just #remain in the EU, it's the best deal for everyone! 
Fourteen months after the Referendum. And our so-called leaders are still at the 'have your cake and eat it" stage.  
Government is hiding the effects of #brexit - in secret reports - until it's too late.HOW is that democracy? 
Chancellor Hammond team say he won Brexit transition deal of up to 3 years. No. Hammond wanted 'indefinite' transition to kill Brexit 
People's anger at Brexit enablers has barely even started.  
If the Conservatives think that Philip Hammond can contort Brexit out of all shape without severe political consequences they are fools. 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on @GMB on the Govt's post-Brexit Customs plans: "we are very much back into cake & eat it territory". Please RT:  
Government refusing to publish 50 'secret' studies on #Brexit impact  
On Sunday we were told we will leave the customs unions come Brexit. Today we are told there will be a new customs union. Appalling. 
Labour Brexit spokesman @Keir_Starmer says Govt stance incoherentt. Rich from Labour who change position on Brexit by the hour 
Brave @Anna_Soubry standing up for Britain & calling out #Brexit lies.  Right to put country before party.#R4today 
City 'haemorrhaging' talent because of Brexit, says headhunter  
British Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson has gone silent over Brexit  
Theresa May was right to THREATEN the EU as leaving without a deal would be fine, says MP  #Brexit  
When Britain and France almost merged into one country—and how it helps explain Brexit, by Dominic Tierney  
Most media, especially #theirABC, doing their best for a No vote. All their misreading on climate, borders, Brexit, Trump taught them zip. 
Every crisis is  a 1 day event for stocks.BrexitTrump electedNorth KoreaDudley says it's because the econ is so strongWhy are rates 1%? 
BREXIT BACKLASH: @theresa_may faces revolt after asking EU if Britain can REMAIN in customs union 
We r approaching a public referendum on the role of public education in an age where 'living w/difference' has become dangerous #keeptalking 
He's a spindly little fence sitter who'll back whichever horse will suit his self promotion best See :Corbyn See :Venezuela See :Brexit  
who the fuck sanctioned this vote that has put Prawn Cocktail Walkers at risk, Brexit has went too fucking far. The Brits can't be trusted. 
CM Withers, discussing stadium, brings up looming transit funding referendum the mayor is also pushing. "This is an aggressive timeline." 
Board passes resolution for 11/7 referendum, thx to @PLSEA719 members for support!5 yeas 1 nay(Mellissa) 1 abstaining??(Mary) #WeArePLSAS 
Britain asks for interim customs deal with EU, new trade deals post-Brexit  
Top 10 challenges for #FinancialServices in 2017. {#ai #blockchain #brexit #cybersecurity #regtech #fintech #insurtech} @MikeQuindazzi 
Brexit Boost: Hiring and Salaries Rise as Supply of Cheap Foreign Workers Falls  via @BreitbartNews @JackBMontgomery 
The Confederacy claimed the lower part of Arizona (before it was Arizona). The state voted against the MLK holiday in a 1990 referendum. 
Keir, we love you but could u please tell your boss to stop being such a wobble about the #EU and help us #StopBrexit? @Keir_Starmer #Brexit  
I honestly believe we have gone as far as we can with this brexit bullshit. We are being conned & must get off our arses before all is lost! 
Theresa May's Brexit plans are allegedly being 'rushed through' without proper scrutiny  via @BIUK_Politics 
The longer Trump and Steve Bannon stay in power, the less likely Brexit looks. We can't assume there will be a country left to trade with 
Govt refuse 2 publish 50 'secret' studies on #Brexit impact. I bet they R. Wld undermine it & make a case 4 #Remain 
I'd like to get behind Brexit and kick it into a skip. 
Insanity of a rare kind.Gov won't publish 50 'secret' Brexit studies for fear of undermining negotiating position  
No longer any sensible arguments for Brexit, if indeed there ever were. The only remaining argument is "respect", and it isn't sensible. 
Reality of reckless Tory Brexit hitting home – @JohnODowdSF  
Government refusing to publish 50 'secret' studies on Brexit impact  
I need to understand the difference between right & authentic left wing pro hard Brexit dogma please Mr Starker @Keir_Starmer, can you help? 
Ohio Supreme Court rules that Dan Gilbert's proposed arena renovations deserve a referendum:  
@OwenJones84 : Jobs-first Brexit good, Tory Brexit bad. Left-wing Brexit good, right-wing Brexit bad. Who but an utter idiot, believes this? 
Miliband's charity pay revealed to be £425,000. I don't want this guy preaching to me about Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Gov consults on tiny change in regulation. Impact assessments, cost benefit analysis etc. Yet on Brexit no analysis. Just wishlists 
Theresa May seeks interim EU deal to avoid Brexit trade chaos  
A sample of #Kurdistan independence referendum ballot.#TwitterKurds #KurdistanReferendum 
Ah! More retreat. Brexit on the run.  
Rupert Murdoch has told Trump to fire Bannon @nytimes. There's a thing. Maybe the things Murdoch wants - eg Brexit - he no longer gets. 
This is basically Brexit in a nutshell.@Resourceful1942 
We are clear: we will leave the customs union post Brexit while seeking to remain in the customs union.We'll just call it something else. 
Nonsense, what government studies would show is that #brexitwontwork and help to END BREXIT#stopbrexit #brexit 
I wish #TheDemocrats well: if it breaks the massive all-party log jam of fury and frustration over Brexit, that has to be a good thing. 
Brexit Government attempting to hide that they know what we all think-Brexit is, and will continue to be, an unmitigated disaster.  
... and consequently, given that Brexit will affect them more than anyone else, we should have a new referendum to include them. Why not? 
Whereas 16-18 yr olds were able to vote in the Scottish referendum, surely they should have been able to do the same in the Brexit one ... 
I'm old enough to remember when we were supposed to negotiate raft of new FTAs alongside Brexit with them coming into effect in March 2019 
Newsnight: John Redwood on Brexit, Ann Coulter on Trump. Next: Nigel Lawson on climate change? NO. This is bullshit, @BBCNewsnight 
When will politicos  start being honest about #Brexit?#HOC should have thanked electorate for voting in advisory ref...and moved on. 
@ChrisLeslieMP (Labour) states on @BBCNewsnight that a "reversal of the whole Brexit process is possible": timely and necessary 
EU setting UK tariffs after #Brexit is completely unacceptable on all levels. The EU really is just protectionism of its internal market. 
#newsnight Government policy on #brexit and the customs union is as confused as ever. Here's why it matters :  
"The UK wants to continue its current customs arrangements with the EU for several years after #Brexit"-@FTApparently this story is true.  
my only three moods related to Brexit news are "bored", "dismayed" and "sceptical" and it's honestly getting tiring 
I warned of the great Brexit betrayal two weeks ago. It is now official government policy.  
Hammond & Fox's pledge to leave customs union in 2019 overturned after *one day*. In other news, Govt still at war & don't understand Brexit  
I have no respect for those who maintain that the EU referendum result has to be respected. 
Neither our Gov nor our Opposition have the slightest clue how to implement a successful Brexit because is no successful Brexit. 
I'm supporting  Chest/ #Fight Brexit #StopBrexit  @_Britain4Europe @crowdfunderuk. Are you? 
@jameschappers On behalf of my children thank you for standing up & speaking out against Brexit folly. You have given us a glimmer of hope. 
This really needs explaining: why does Corbyn ally himself on #Brexit with the Tories, Farage, Trump and the far right? Doesn't make sense. 
John Major is right a Referendum won on a pack of lies is not one a right minded person would regard as binding& its legitimacy is debatable  
The Remoaners are dead and buried now Philip Hammond is on board with Brexit, says Dominic Lawson  
Great to host Mr #Brexit #Nigelfarage at #RHC celebration of India's independence at our company #AVG headquarters in Chicago. @Nigel_Farage 
UK government suggests 'temporary customs union' with EU after #Brexit  
As these Brexit position papers come out important to remember that UK wants does not equal UK gets. 
Are we? We're working full time on Brexit & science and finding it hard to keep up with the clusterfuckery. Euratom was something special...  
‘Democrat’ party may be launched in the UK to fight Brexit  
.@Emmabarnett is making her debut in the presenter’s chair tonight – tune in at 22:30 for the latest on Brexit, Charlottesville and more  
Labour's @ChrisLeslieMP did NOT vote against triggering A50. However, he's now tweeting some very good questions about Brexit. Worth a read! 
Why Britain's dithering over Brexit is inexcusable  
Americans are asked where North Korea is. The results are both funny and shocking#korea #brexit #pmht 
If you oppose an extreme, hard Brexit, then work with us to stop it - Lib Dem Leader Vince Cable on BBC Radio 4....  
Brilliant @pollytoynbee take down of Jacob Rees-Mogg: his only 'authenticy' is right wing pro hard-Brexit Tory dogma  
Government refusing to publish 50 'secret' studies on Brexit impact  
It is. But not as ridiculous as actually voting for Brexit and then spending the rest of your time pointing out how ridiculous Brexit is.  
Absolutely right @julie4nw, well said. Labour must be honest about Brexit: 
Netanyahu on Kurdish independence referendum:  the Kurds are a “brave, pro-Western people who share our values.” 
"The EU is punishing me!" cried Mr #Brexit as he hit himself on the head with a hammer. #StopBrexit #Remain 
Two banks think £1 will fall to €1 for the first time in the coming months  
So far we've had Brexit wishlists and fantasy. When Gov recognises reality must be honest with British ppl. Hard Brexit= disaster 
the irony of worrying about *Scottish* nationalism in the middle of brexit  
Corbyn's bubble burst: Tories SURGE ahead of Labour in polls as support for Jeremy plunges 
Some people say Labour should wait before turning against #Brexit. But Labour is not waiting, it's peddling pro-Brexit propaganda.#Remain 
Want an exit from Brexit? Sign up here  
Remember British Nazis supported Gove during #Brexit coz he was their sort of racist!  
"We have a government Brexit position that has not even been cleared with the Brexit Secretary." @acarmichael4mp  
A excellent idea from @jameschappers for a Public Inquiry into EU referendum issues  
Listening to a distant, braying donkey here in Estonia. A tragic, desperate sound. Sounds like the UK. #brexit 
When Britain and France almost merged into one country—and how it helps explain Brexit, by Dominic Tierney  
So gov & media say #Brexit is Irelands biggest challenge & crisis in decades? No-it's low wages, child poverty, housing crisis, healthcare 
Mate, I've only just got free texts and calls abroad. You best pray Brexit doesn't fuck that up.  
."Brexit has left Scots feeling like mere onlookers in a political drama conducted elsewhere" 
#Brexit is a project built on a mountain of right-wing press hate and lies. A real @UKLabour party would have nothing to do with it.#Remain 
17 years in the Royal Navy and currently serves as a teacher & Councillor in Glasgow: @FeargalDalton deserves more than Brexit politicking.  
Wait, the British think they can organise the whole of Brexit in 18 months when it takes them 4 years just to fix a clock?  
Oh another fuck up to add to the great list of Brexit fuckups  
Education Education Education by @WardrobEnsemble is terrific. Schools as the seeds of the future; Cool Britannia the beginnings of Brexit. 
> anyone can be Scottish. When we held our referendum we gave the vote to people who live here whether they were citizens or not. We > 
What is happening in US it is similar to #Brexit. Hard right bigots and xenophobes exploiting disenfranchised ignorants for power grab. 
Global warming, trump, Brexit, Titanic, Hiroshima, Venezuela socialist crisis all Blades fans fault Luv  being hated but rated #overthetop 
PhilipHammond was right to warn on hard Brexit. Gov needs to urgently recognise huge disaster it'd be. But it's so scary to speak out 
Congrats to @jameschappers for highlighting Brexit danger. He shd know - hope Gov will follow more sensible path soon #thedemocrats 
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit—reverse decades of progress and wipe out small suppliers 
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
Wow, the Fight Brexit war chest is now at £35k and rising fast. Lets fight this and save our country.  
The British and the policy of divide and rule used to colonise countries.#SelfDetermination #Referendum the...  
Alex Salmond dismisses Brexit as "an enormous act of self-harm".As the architect of currency union in IndyRef. hardly the best judge 
A useful reminder that #brexit was sold on false promises that they're now trying to wriggle out of:   
"Brexit debate in the future is not going to be about people coming here but can 'we' leave here!" @carolinejmolloy 
When you couldn't spend an hour on a debate during the election because you're too busy with Brexit and then you extend your 3 week holiday  
The study claiming 70% of Brits support hard Brexit... is based on data from April - and also flawed.  
British Nationalism is good while promoting inequality & xenophobic BrexitScottish Nationalism is bad while promoting diversity & equality 
."Brexit could cause a shortage of more than 40,000 nurses by 2026"No you didn't read that wrongForty Thousand!. 
Calls for Philip Hammond to step down as Chancellor over 'lengthy' Brexit transition  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit | Barry Eichengreen  
Government refusing to publish 50 'secret' studies on Brexit impact  
You won the referendum with lies. If Brexit made sense you wouldn't need to carry on lying. It doesn't. So you do. 
This is what May thought in April when this study (not poll) was done- that country is uniting behind hard Brexit. GE2017 tested that theory  
Don't worry, be happy about Brexit. Lots of positive economic news! Watch our stream here:  
And proceeds from the utterly batty predicate that we can prioritise our choice of Brexit without any personal financial cost. 
Unfortunately:1) Not a poll2) not 20K people, 3K3) date: 26-27 AprIt coincided with May's peak popularity & Brexit landslide predictions  
#Brexit campaign group seeks deselection of Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK and Home Secretary @AmberRuddHR 
'Pro-European Brits should put their heart into stopping #Brexit rather than campaigning for a soft one' @Hugodixon 
Wish list: Defeat Brexit; Electoral/Constitutional Reform incl. Written Constitution; Massive Investment in Education/Green Energy. A start! 
Following last week's news about mandatory CCTV in abattoirs, we reflect on what #Brexit could bring for animals  
The voices of Brexit-backing entrepreneurs must be heard over the din of rent-seeking Remainers, writes Jon Moynihan  
Opinion: The EU should welcome the UK back from Brexit like the prodigal son  
The idea we should all get behind Brexit to shape the outcome is ridiculous and a crude attempt to pretend we're all converts. We're not. 
The EU won't agree to Philip Hammond and Liam Fox’s Brexit transition plan, I argue in the @guardian 
Cross party group of pro-European MPs pile the pressure on Government over Hard Brexit (£)  
Once again MSM insists that we are UNEDUCATED MORONSBrexit traced to low levels of education according to report 
Pro-EU MPs plot to defeat UK government over hard Brexit  via @FT 
Philip Hammond's political suicide means even Brexiteers like me now need to back a second referendum  
If you oppose an extreme, hard Brexit, then work with us to stop it - @VinceCable @BBCWestminHour Add your name:  
Kurdistan's referendum delegation has arrived in Baghdad, reportedly scheduled to meet PM Abadi at 7pm.  
My piece in today's Guardian about the winds of war I hear through the summer breeze. #DonaldTrump #Brexit  
MUST READ: excellent debunk of poll last week - polling done before #GE2017, when UK voted against hard Brexit  
Only just over a quarter of Brits think our country is on the right track. Puts the 'overwhelming acceptance of Brexit' into perspective  
Rees-Mogg's views are “poison” says @MatthewParris3. He also says white people “look inbred” and 17m Brexit voters are “deep down, racists”.  
The most original independence message I have seen today! #brexit #UnitedWeCelebrate #PakistanZindabad #PakistanTurns70 
Hi all the Very Angry People yelling at me over Brexit! Any chance you could give this a read? Cheers!  
The latest study shows that public opinion is swinging behind the Government's Brexit vision, says @ChristianJMay  
First look at Anna Soubry jumping ship from hard Brexit Tory party.  
Britain's #Brexit voters sense betrayal. Via @ReutersTV  Read more:  
Remainers have spent a year saying there's "no plan" 4 Brexit; govt too slow etc. Now they say it's all 2 rushed  
David Miliband is right – there is a growing democratic vacuum at the heart of Brexit, writes @Conorpope  
Gonna put this out there. I think some people are losing perspective here, all because I've never backed ignoring the referendum result.   
Neutered: Hammond gets into bed with the Brexit headbangers  
brexitwontwork "the claims that Brexit would not hurt the economy were just plain wrong"   
.@BenChu_ takes apart the 'everyone supports hard Brexit' LSE survey.   
There's a whiff of betrayal in the air across Britain's #Brexit heartlands:  @WJames_Reuters @kyliemaclellan 
Clearly not racist  brexit, farage and trump are the same movement. #notinmyname 
I don’t blame the Scots if Brexit leads them to want another shot at independence, says @MitchBenn 
I'm someone who stood for Parliament and won once or twice. And helped trigger and win a referendum too. Good luck standing for Parliament  
A must read superb debunking of reports on the new LSE Brexit study - which does *not* show support for hard Brexit or EU citizen expulsion  
Brexit campaign group seeks deselection of Hammond and Rudd  
It's not really any more that Brexit won't happen. Practicalities &  the laziness & ignorance of its principal drivers mean it can't happen. 
The Tories are responsible for the Brexit mess - and they have to own it.  
'Philip Hammond's political suicide means even Brexiteers like me now need to back a second referendum'  
Anna Soubry hints she could quit Tories over Brexit. Do us a favour and take the other Remoaners with you please!  
Means major recent Brexit policy announcements have come in a job advert and at a comedy festival. Not sure this is how to run a country tbh 
#brexit explained in one minute.  
TORY MPs demand new broadcasting watchdog to crack down on the BBC’s Brexit 'bias'  
Alex Salmond's prediction of indy in 4 years may pan out as tectonic plates underpinning the Union shift with Brexit  
This says it all. And it's why Brexit won't happen.  
Already is for Brexit. The fact that it's still moving its legs is just the headless chicken thing.(Which is what it's been from the start.)  
Superb debunking by Ben Chu.Also note study date: Apr 26-27: 1 wk after May called snap election & hard Brexit landslide seemed inevitable  
Brexit campaigners launch bid to oust pro-EU finance minister  
Brexit is your Iraq War, Owen. You're a good man, but you've made a strategic and tactical error on this. Please rethink. 
Brexit. Don't buy Dyson.  
Conservative MP vows to betray Theresa May and vote AGAINST Brexit  
Post-referendum, EU defence policy was a minor part of Brexit…but then it expanded, web-like, with the UK involved:  
it's early days but worth paying attention to @jameschappers Democrats and what they have to say re brexit.. they have london rally 9 sept 
Every time I look at @jameschappers timeline now a little voice inside me says...Brexit is fucked.#wemarch 
Kurdish insistence on the referendum and independence, will lose the rights of the Kurds in Iraq, Turkey and Iran 
David Miliband has called for a second referendum on the EU. Is a slow Brexit a fair compromise?  
A good #Brexit is unachievableA bad Brexit is highly achievable#NoBrexit is still an option Don't let Govt #Brexiters tell U otherwise! 
#gardenbridge plans officially scrapped... now they just need to take the lessons they've learnt there and do the same to #Brexit. 
My article on the GOP primary in AL tomorrow. Could Alabama GOP Primary Be a Referendum on McConnell? -  
Garden Bridge was a less damaging & costly version of Brexit. Endorsed by Boris bcos he liked the sound of it; without planning or costing 
Besties...#kipper #Brexit  
had completely forgotten about this highlight from the referendum campaign:  
#honestpoll Is @theresa_may shortcutting democracy on #brexit to appear stronger? Pls RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome. 
Guardian article on what does Brexit mean for people with disabilities? 
Fact: even if a new anti-Brexit 'centrist' party somehow won every single Remain seat, they would only win 229 seats.It's doomed to fail. 
Opinion: Pro-European Brits should put their heart into stopping Brexit rather than campaigning for a soft one  
Amazing how many public affairs practitioners have been selling their clients Brexit bull. Clients starting to see through it. 
All the Brexit-related skull-fuckery would make so much more sense if there was a Lovecraftian elder god calling the shots in Downing Street 
Theresa May is still on holiday after nearly four weeks, despite Brexit chaos  
Absolute must-read correcting shockingly poor reporting of the @sarahobolt @thosjleeper LSE/Oxford Brexit preferences study. Kudos @BenChu_ 
A transition deal that involves leaving the Single Market & Customs Union is not a transition, it is the very definition of Hard Brexit 
Thank you, Malcolm - most helpful. @JolyonMaugham what can we do to expose the lies which have unleashed #Brexit?  
Civil servants have been crying out for some, or indeed any, political direction on Brexit for months.  
Problem for unionism is Brexit forces nationalists in N Ireland to ask the same question of their rights as irish/eu citz  
If we don´t get out of the EU soon those opposed to brexit will be able to push the pound through the floor. Its sinking rapidly now. 
A £60 million film about Brexit is reportedly coming next year  via @BIUK 
Top 10 challenges/opportunities for #FinancialServices in 2017. {#ai #blockchain #brexit #cybersecurity #regtech #fintech #insurtech} 
Brussels ‘Propaganda’ War Chest Spending €3 Million to Kill Euroscepticism, Brexit 
Pro-EU Plaid Cymru vow to reject government's Repeal Bill. They still want to hold up the Brexit process!  
Labour has some outstanding spokesmen and women who could destroy the Brexit argument if allowed off the Corbyn leash. But he's a Brexiteer! 
Brexit: David Davis to set out hoped-for EU customs deal  
Never thought I'd see a Labour leader backing hard right anti-NHS Tory policy like Brexit which involves hobnobbing with white supremacists. 
This is also why the Scottish Independence Referendum should be re-run. The 'better together' campaign was also based on lying to the public  
Voters sense betrayal in Britain's Brexit heartlands  
Britain's car makers and their suppliers facing an even bigger down-side to #Brexit than initially thought: 
In between cancelling the #GardenBridge & all that #Brexit money I am looking forward to full funding being restored to public #libraries 
No, a second referendum would not be more democratic  
#NigelFarage to #VinceCable: "We had a #referendum, you lost! Get over it!" Will #Remoaners ever respect #democracy? 
Switches on twitter: Brexit, Trump, Corbyn and May. Switches off twitter. No wonder Big Ben is fucking off for a few years. 
Corbyn is proving very useful to Murdoch on Brexit.  
Your daily reminder that Brexit means choices, UK must follow rules like everyone else, and if we leave a club we also lose its benefits  
Kurdistan election commission ratified and approved the referendum to be held on 25/9, Parliament & Presidential elections on 1/11. Big step 
EDITO | Sombres nuages sur le #Brexit  
ESTO ES BRUTAL: The great British Brexit robbery: how our democracy was hijacked  
"Brexit"@topsecretcomedy#brexitshambles #brexit #Comedy #standupcomedy #satire 
Brexit #worst #idea #ever ! @zoesqwilliams 
David Davies avoids Brexit scrutiny meeting for mnths. Next time attends, 4 more rnds of Brexit negs will have taken place. #BrexitShambles 
Quite amusing that a party called "The Democrats" are formed with the goal of overturning a democratic referendum.  
Draft speech for Cameron by @CraigOliver100 with 10 days to referendum, worried about Leave poll leads & immigration – DC decided against  
"Brexit will require thousands of pages of secondary legislation" Prof Douglas-Scott on the EU (Withdrawal) Bill:  
Brexit repeal bill will remove UK citizens' EU right to sue Government over policies #Brexit - robbing us of rights 
Loss of #EU funding used to help poorer parts of the UK has had far less attention than other ill effects of #Brexit  
Wales joins Scotland in opposing the U.K. government over Brexit  
BREXIT MEANS BREXIT  
Meanwhile... Brexit.  
What impact will #Brexit have on UK devolution? Read EU Cmttee’s report:  
David Miliband joins #Brexit debate, calling Brexit 'an unparalleled act of economic self-harm' @DMiliband 
‘Big Ben to be silenced for 4 years’A bit like anti-Brexit MPs in the Conservative and Labour parties.  
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on @GMB today - it's alarming that when the Cabinet *actually* agree on Brexit, it makes big news. Please RT:  
Discussed #KRG - #Japan bilateral relations,political &humanitarian development.Baghdad&Erbil ties& referendum with Minister Counsellor Jiro  
Surely British people have option of stopping this process if they want? Public have a right to think again & reverse #Brexit if they choose 
Everyone buying Crash Bandicoot voted for Brexit, guaranteed. 
Superb demolition of the hard left's pro Brexit arguments from the Independent's @BenChu_ 
I'm moving to France in 7weeks due to Brexit.Using my EU passport while it still is one!The May/Corbyn alliance has destroyed this country 
Phew, the guy who was in charge of Northern Rock thinks Brexit will be fine. And I was worried!  
Theresa May's gvmnt have no idea how many civil servants & how much cash is being devoted to Brexit.Incompetence! #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Nigel Farage - teenage Nazi.#Brexit is pasted all over with his name. #StopBrexit 
Where is the contingency plan if 40% of our food (we import) is hit by tariffs or customs delays in event of hard #Brexit? @NFUDC are asking 
If EU chemicals regulations ('Reach') expire in March 2019, how will those trades continue? #Brexit 
They’re upgrading it so it can start striking thirteen on the bright cold April days post Brexit.  
With a handful of exceptions the Tory Remainer MPs are a bunch of cringing cowards unfit to sit in Parliament.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Time for Scottish MPs & MSPs to defend EU membership not single market. Stopping Brexit needs political leadership  
THREAT: Anna Soubry hints she could leave Tories, join new anti-Brexit Remoaner Party. Let's see how they get on...  
One of the biggest crimes of Corbyn's Brexit policy is that it prevents Labour's best MPs from destroying top Leavers in the Brexit debate. 
More chaos. But Scotland doesn't have to follow the chaotic Brexiteers off the Brexit cliff. We have a parachute. Let's use it.  
Brussels plans Brexit reversal. The bullying dictatorship has a long track record of refusing to accept democracy.  
The nirvana of a Left-wing Brexit: a ‘combination of wilful ignorance and ideologically-induced blindness’  
Uk and Ireland now on a collision course, seems. Uk says technology can solve irish border post #brexit. Dublin has said explicitly it can't  
Would love to see you looking for the best possible path to a revote so we can judge the value of Brexit & this deal for ourselves.  
BOOST: Hilton planning to open 30 new hotels in Brexit Britain over next few years. Huge vote of confidence!  
I haven't changed my view on getting the best possible Brexit deal since the referendum. I wrote this last year  
The Culture industry - including tourism - will be one of the sectors hardest hit by Brexit. But Scotland has a choice....  
MEDIA RELEASE | Gov rules out referendum to guarantee protections against child marriages and polygamy #auspolLINK:  
Home from France and was sadly disappointed to find they too now serve sugary vinegarette. Sooner we Brexit the better. #FirstWorldFascist 
That joint #Brexit statement from Hammond & Fox trots out the "will of the people" myth. Not my will. Please RT if not yours either. 
I'd never considered the EU prior to Brexit. It was just a quietly helpful thing. But now I'm a convert. We should reform and remain.  
6) Brexit, Trump, white supremacy are all attacks on Liberal democracy.  Instead of fighting that Owen joins in on the attacks 
We should fight Brexit not campaign for a soft one. My @FT column now in print  
5) Brexit is an attack on liberal values and a triumph for neo-fascist tendencies, the kind that @OwenJones84 has supposedly fought 
BREXITEERS! Share this post ...Now is the time to turn "I Support Brexit" into a social media beast and tell the world we mean business  
Even Remainers are getting behind Brexit - now 68% of Britons support the result!  
"nobody with the competence to do it (#Brexit) has any enthusiasm for it, and nobody with the enthusiasm has any competence." 
People starting to face real economic hardship under Brexit solely because @Theresa_may feels it awkward to say anything that'd annoy IDS. 
Given proximity of Tories & Labour on Brexit, little to lose in starting a new party. And as @ProfTimBale  notes here, upside could be big. 
So UK leaves the Customs Union but should retain identical customs arrangements? It is Brexit that is 'destructive and stupid', Mr Jenkin.  
...and we cannot lose all our 'Trading Opportunities' by being in the Customs Union. #MoggMentum #Brexit  
Fox & Hammond say we'll have a transition deal outside the SM & CU. That isn't a transition deal, that's jumping off the cliff.#Brexit. 
Foreign investment in U.K :2015 : £33b2016 :  £197bBrexit is brilliant  
"The Muslim Problem". This is simply sickening from Trevor Kavanagh in today's Sun (in a column supposedly about Brexit).  
I've always been anti-EU, but I never avoid the subject of #Brexit with Labour remainers. Can we talk about sales of my home-made jam now? 
All Corbyn has is rallies. He's failed numerous times to hold the government to account over Brexit because he wants Brexit.  
"But now the Brexit referendum and its associated uncertainty has seen a marked decline in EU applications" 
Brexit may still be 18 months away. But British venture capitalists are already feeling it directly in the wallet  
Hi @jameschappers am currently a member of @UKLabour but if party's Brexit policy hasn't shifted by conference I'll be joining the Democrats 
Pro-Europeans should campaign to stop #Brexit rather than for a soft one - InFacts' chairman @Hugodixon in @FT. 
Iraq's Kurds say they will hold an independence referendum in Sept. Can Iraq's Kurdish region gain independence?  
The EU is working to stop corporate tax dodgers. Hence Brexit.  
Jenkins is a key Hard Brexit zealot. He can see his dream slipping away as it collides with reality. 
More Pythonesque rantings from Tory refusing to accept responsibility for consequences of #Brexit he campaigned for #r4today #BrexitShambles 
The left-wing argument for Brexit is embarrassingly flimsy | The Independent  
The Brexit camp get another free ride @BBCr4today where is the balance to Bernard Jenkin? #BrexitBias 
Politicians steering Brexit in "essay crisis mode". Never let it be said that Westminster is, for some, an extension of student politics.  
Mafia expert names UK 'most corrupt country in the world' & says 'this is about your life.. your govt.. &.. #Brexit'  
Tories attempt to hijack powerful decision-making committee to ram through new post-Brexit laws  
I am more confident than ever about Brexit 
Brexit: 'no one with competence to do it has any enthusiasm for it & no one with the enthusiasm has any competence' 
Hard Brexit or soft Brexit it will all be rushed Brexit, Whitehall warns  
Moderate leavers increasingly isolated by brexiteers love affair with Trump, Farage & destructive hard Brexit. Remain gives hope #StopBrexit 
British pensioners rushing to settle in EU countries ahead of Brexit  
Brexit-backing entrepreneurs must be heard over rent-seeking Remainers says Jon Moynihan  
Actually it was age and education that were the predominant determinants of Brexit support, not exposure to "austerity". 
Irish citizens to get right to live and work in UK as part of British Isles 'Schengen deal' after Brexit #Premium 
Theresa May accused of secretly breaking Parliamentary rules to push through controversial law changes after Brexit  
May faces backlash over rushed Brexit plans: trying to force Brexit through with undemocratic tactics #StopBrexit 
Brexit: The undoing of the @Conservatives. Zoe Williams @guardian 
The Fight Brexit War Chest crowd finder was so successful - there's a new target of £60,000.You know what to do! 
Got to love @jameschappers weighing in Two cabinet ministers 'interested in new anti-Brexit party idea'  
Former minister becomes first Tory MP to threaten to leave party if Theresa May goes ahead with hard Brexit  
EU should welcome the UK back from Brexit like the prodigal son  via @FT 
David Miliband urges politicians to fight for second EU referendum to stop UK being 'driven off a cliff'  
David Miliband calls for second EU referendum and praises 'valiant' Philip Hammond #premium 
But what about the post-#Brexit export boom driven by all those new factories Brits were promised?    
America is a deeply racist country. The UK's vote for #Brexit was mostly racist. We live in an extremely unhealthy, racist world. #fact 
The best way to prepare for life after Brexit is to teach kids a second language  
I don't blame Corbyn for Brexit, I think he's been surreptitiously supporting it all along and should be called out  
Don't worry! The Tories won't be forgiven for Brexit anyway.  
Leaving the EU after 40 years is equivalent of complex and delicate brain surgery.We've sent a blind man armed with a rusty nail. #brexit 
We aren't being told the truth about Brexit. The Brexit Extremists in Westminster are still lying to the people. #StopBrexit 
And, if there is an election, there must be a Lab/LibDem/SNP/Plaid/Green alliance against Brexit 56/ 
Mail Online: #Brexit is an abomination...  
Choices: 1. May's hard Brexit2. Corbyn's hard BrexitBoth of which enable Nazism3. #IndyWalesWish Wales had the #SNP to fight for us 
Ha! Even better. He's got your book @arron_banks! The Bad Boys of Brexit. To double check he did no work on Brexit, I suppose..  
Leave Director admitted the #Brexit referendum was won by lying to the public.  
Even the Mail admits #Brexit was sold on a false prospectus...  
5. Public pressure for a referendum, on the deal, or preferably much sooner, may get to the point that it cannot be ignored 39/ 
One way or another there will be a 2nd referendum on #Brexit. Now we know Britain will be poorer & weaker, a supermajority will be needed.  
What do we have to do to get Corbyn to see sense on #Brexit?Support the @UKLabour Brexit rebels.  
#brexitwontworkThe Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
.@JuliaHB1 Brexit: The economy is tanking, you lost too. #SkyPapers@FleetStreetFox 
So you think Brexit is a bad thing. OK. So why are you still supporting it?  
#brexitcollapse Former minister..first Tory MP to threaten to leave party if Theresa May goes..with hard Brexit  
IPOB SOKOTO/JOS LIVE ON AIR LETTING THE WORLD KNOW THE REASON FOR BIAFRA TO DECIDES THROUGH REFERENDUM TO AVOID ANOTHER #BiafraGenocide @UN 
The left-wing argument for Brexit is embarrassingly flimsy  
"@DExEUgov is in essay crisis mode...proof they weren't ready for Brexit" says Govt official. It's almost as though they never had a plan...  
The Tory right wants Britain to be like Singapore. Singapore has the longest working hours in the world#Brexit 
.@vincecable - we are working with people in other parties to oppose an extreme, hard Brexit. 
David Miliband says Brexit 'unparalleled act of self-harm'  
I don't believe in relationship breaks. You're either together or broken up. Brexit means Brexit. 
.@vincecable : I want to bring together people across parties, not just my own, who are opposed to hard Brexit 
Brilliant destruction of that poll on Brexit. Turns out the questions were fixed so that there was no remain option.  
THE TIMES: May faces backlash over rushed Brexit plans #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Jacob Rees-Mogg was a working class urchin until he drank magic Brexit potion - it can work for you too. #AwfullyBritishFakeFacts 
An accurate representation of Brexit.  
Iraq's #Turkmen areas become battlefield in Kurdish referendum debate - Al-Monitor: the Pulse of the Middle East  
I just blocked someone for praising Rees Mogg. It's got to that stage with me now. You praise a Brexit tosser, you ARE a Brexit tosser. 
Donald Tusk threatens to kick Poland out of the EU amid democracy row GO AHEAD I DARE YOU 
Theresa May accused of secretly breaking Parliamentary rules to push through controversial law changes after Brexit  
The left-wing argument for Brexit is built on wilful ignorance & ideologically-induced blindness  #Brexit #CorbynOut 
Brexit deniers should end their fantasy and help shape the future says  @DiaChakravarty 
Jacob Rees Mogg reveals his revolutionary new post Brexit Britain.  
Fascinating on Trump but v weird omission for @BBC to leave out fact company is subject of two investigations for its role in Brexit... 
An estimated 90% of British citizens would support a referendum on what to officially call these  #AwfullyBritishFakeFacts 
(Looking fwd to headlines in tomorrows papers...) Leave Director admitted the Brexit ref won by lying to the public.  
MAY-DAY! PM warned to BOOT OUT Euro wets and get project Brexit back on course. Get rid of the wets PM  
David Miliband urges politicians to fight for second EU referendum to stop UK being 'driven off a cliff'  
I’m all for close co-operation with Ireland but Brexit means EXIT from the EU. May is compromising,  
Our parliament has remained sovereign throughout our membership of the European Union.another Brexit lie exposed. - @HealthierIn 
British businesses are particularly worried about losing access to EU talent after Brexit  
Instead, my view is we have to reconcile the referendum result with avoiding a Brexit which is catastrophically damaging. 
If I could wave a wand to make Brexit go away, then sure, I'd wave it. But I don't think a referendum can be overturned like that. 
LRT: I suspect Southern secession would look a lot like Brexit, with the people who clamor to leave then expecting to keep all the benefits. 
A Brexit "transition" that doesn't involve leaving the single market and the customs union isn't worthy of the name "Brexit".  
How austerity helped make Brexit happen - here's some reading:    
The referendum was based on lies, deceit, distortion of the truth, utter political skulduggery & complete manipulation of the electorate!! 
My point is that those who identify as "centrists" (a pointless word in practice) are wedded to the kind of policies that made Brexit happen 
Tory austerity a defining factor, but Brexit fight is not over. It's disingenuous to accept Brexit and reject austerity, Brexit = Austerity. 
Stagnating wages and economic dislocation played a significant role in the Brexit result. It's pointless pretending otherwise. 
Poor old Julia Hartley Brexiter, getting an absolute Twitter pasting today. Just imagine how bad it'll be for her when Brexit goes t*ts up  
Nashville’s Kurds launch campaign supporting Kurdistan referendum  
If the Brexit Elite shove Brexit through their first deal is with this lot. On the whole I prefer FOM with a smiley Spanish barista.  
Sir Andre Geim, discoverer of graphene is considering leaving UK because of Brexit.  
If you say Brexit three times, Nigel Farage will appear on tv #AwfullyBritishFakeFacts 
Latest Remainer meme is people across EU telling them on holiday Brits gone mad. Is this after they've bored locals in bar with Brexit talk? 
Message to those Remoaners Sovereignty is owned by the people if you didn't like the result of the referendum You can always RESIGN AS MP 
Only 11% of Leave voters believed Brexit would make them worse off. What happens to democracy if 'Project Fear' is unveiled as all too true? 
I think a Hard Brexit - delivering further falls in standards of living, quality/availability of healthcare as being very real risk factors. 
ICYMGove now says opposite of what he said in Referendum: EU boats will still be #fishing in UKwaters after #Brexit 
Anna Soubry Tells May: ‘I’ll Quit Tories Over Hard Brexit’  SOONER U QUIT THE BETTER 
This is my genuine worry for Brexit.  All those angry people who don't find the promised land there will look for someone else to blame.  
#Brexit thread...1. Sorry remainers, but you don't own centrism. Dogma is dogma whatever you call it. 
Bishop,Honestly don't know why you people are still talking of restructuring.It will not solve the quagmire.Referendum is the only way out  
It is particularly distressing that the isolationist UK government is in no position to endorse this sentiment. #Brexit  
Tory Brexit policy is chaotic. The fightback must begin at once | David Miliband  
I didn't vote Brexit or anything but that thing where the French hoot as they go round corners, that is some shitcunty antisocial behaviour. 
Brexit was never about 'taking back control'. It was a coup d'etat by the hard right. They wanted unaccountable power.  
MAY-DAY! PM warned to BOOT OUT Euro wets and get project Brexit back on course  
Anyone watching film Dunkirk will understand why  older generation voted Brexit, we fought for FREEDOM & a lot of people died for Britain. 
The ties between right-wing extemists in the United States/Western Europe  and Putin are extensive. Brexit/Nigel Farage are Putin creations. 
The #Brexit con.This is why #May dare not have a 2nd Referendum or let MP's have a vote any deal. #Brexit is not 'the will of the people' !  
Never forget the #Brexit majority came via a gerrymandered electorate and after a torrent of anti-EU & anti-migrant press hate & lies.  
Excellent blog on the toxicity of #brexit  #StopBrexitHour @ThinkAgainForEU @Bregretears @BrexitBin @prutske_uk 
And that's an hour.Stop brexit please.I don't want to have to do this every week, it's so depressing. 
Why would skilled EU workers come to a #Brexit Britain where they would have far lower status and rights than in the EU?#StopBrexitHour 
In 1956 the Suez crisis brought a Britain with an inflated sense of its power crashing to earth. #Brexit will be the same. #StopBrexitHour 
I've come to the conclusion that brexit is a cult, they continue to believe despite any amount of reality that is presented to them 
Already the OBR has said that #Brexit will cost £15bn a year. Imagine if that money were used for something useful.#StopBrexitHour 
Without reckless gambler Cameron and poor Labour leadership. But Brexit hasn't happened yet.  With Labour leadership it can be stopped.  
14 months later and we're still being sold dodgy Brexit promises.Time for an Exit from Brexit. #StopBrexitHour 
Churchill was a passionate advocate of a US of Europe & in the early 1960s wanted Britain to join the Common Market#StopBrexitHour #Brexit  
City of London's top Brexit envoy slams Brussels’ approach to negotiating with the UK as “bewildering” & “reckless”.  
All British cars made with 90% U.K. Components should be VAT free post #Brexit  - that'll keep the market positive  
Chelsea fans in meltdown cause Matic dropped a 9/10 and they got pumped at home to Brexit voters  
Now Leavers in cabinet want a transitional arrangement after #Brexit day, it's an out and out admission that #brexit IS going to damage UK 
"In which we pretend the choices the Government makes about Brexit are irrelevant to your standard of living and ask you what you'd prefer."  
Not before time, and only because we voted for Brexit, the UK economy is rebalancing away from over-dependence on services to manufacturing. 
#StopBrexitHourPM's muddle on #Brexit due to thinking she works for the Party, rather than us?@Anna_Soubry understands #CountryBeforeParty 
Absolutely.The Brexit boys did fine job at scapegoating immigrants/refugees&tragedy of Jo Cox's murder indicates domestic terrorism on rise.  
With Corbyn agreeing with the Tories on a hard Brexit it will be hard for him to bring down their Gov't. My blog  
Scotland's Salmond and UK Brexit Minister Davis in Surprise Fringe Double Act -   
Former minister becomes first Tory MP to threaten to leave party if Theresa May goes ahead with hard Brexit  
So For #StopBrexitHour  today, I shall be attempting to find as many job losses, shortfalls, or none-jobs created due to brexit. 
So UK is heading for a hard Brexit. Not much of a transition either. Bad for everyone - except anti-EU Taliban's.  
Theresa May’s Brexit plans go from bad to worse. And it could lead to an international court case 
They are Bannonites, empowered by Trump and Putin. Putin armed the white nationalists in Western Europe with propaganda for Brexit.  
Herne Hill festival today. Thx to the @No10Vigil group for bombarding it with bollocks to brexit stickers. celeb support too, v. Popular.  
3 simple #conservative truths 1) Austerity stole from poor 2) NHS meddling is to ensure privatisation 3) #brexit is 2 keep them wealthy 
Alex Salmond has Brexit minister David Davis as his first Fringe show guest  
Three simple #brexit truths.1) Ref was advisory 2) 37.5% is not a nation majority 3) 2nd ref on terms is democratic and sovereign RT 
Profoundly stupid for Hammond to have agreed to this. It basically guarantees a cliff edge hard Brexit.  
A referendum won on the back of lies and misinformation, with a narrow margin and having excluded those most affected isn't democratic.  
But then David Davis didn't seem to know Republic of Ireland was a seperately country when he became Brexit sec, so anything's possible. 
The "left-wing" case for Brexit is embarrassing: @BenChu_ @IndyVoices 
This is v.interesting and far more complex than the 'everyone supports hard Brexit' spin put on it on Friday.  
Great banter with @AlexSalmond & the #Brexit bulldog @DavidDavisMP at @AlexUnleashed17 first show. Well done to all involved 
Brexit Secretary David Davis 'dodging scrutiny' after not facing parliamentary EU committee for TWO months  
Incredible to think Alex Salmond had better access to the Brexit minister than Sturgeon. 
Tory Brexit policy is chaotic. The fightback must begin at once | David Miliband  
Hard Brexit means #BrexitSoft Brexit means #BrexitAll Brexits mean nationalismAll Brexits mean xenophobiaNo Brexit can be tolerated 
David Miliband demands second Brexit vote to halt 'act of self-harm'  
Leave Director admits the #Brexit referendum was won only by lying to the public.  
WATCH - @benpbradshaw is clear: any transitional deal must include Single Market & Customs Union to avoid hard Brexit cliff-edge. Please RT:  
Why the left-wing argument for Brexit is so embarrassingly flimsy  
.@DMiliband says #Brexit is an "unparalleled act of economic self-harm", calling for a second referendum on any deal  
At long last, we've found the one upside of Brexit!  
OMG MP threatens to quit party if PM goes ahead with a hard Brexit - oh no, she'll spend another billion of our cash  
Remoaner Soubry threatens to quit party if Theresa May presses ahead with hard #Brexit. Do it & good riddance.  
Brexit could leave Britain with an energy problem  
Brexit: UK retirees rushing to settle in Europe, say financial advisers  
Those bored with my Brexit obsession will enjoy new film on front of website I hope  ps new book details also there 
If this is main concrete proposal in Uk government's #brexit position paper on the irish border we're in trouble....  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit | Barry Eichengreen — the guardian  
Britain pushes ahead with Brexit negotiations 
Far-right: Brexit will cause EU to fall!Far-left: There’ll be revolutions across EU!Centrist France & Germany: 
Brexit #EMA: Assolombarda launched #EMA2Milano social campaign in 27 languages to support #Milan  candidacy     
Hammond and Fox confirm UK will lose access to FTAs with 60 non-EU countries in 2019. 'Free trade Brexit' my a***  
I see @guardian has organised an event with Gina Miller and Alastair Campbell - a 'Brexit discussion.' Wow, that will be a bust up. 
The left-wing argument for Brexit is embarrassingly flimsy  
Daily Mail now coming out against #brexit.Finally the rank stupidity of it is sinking in, even in the R/W press 
David Miliband says Brexit 'unparalleled act of self-harm'  
Free movement for Irish citizens not for UK Government to "offer".Is existing treaty obligation!More evidence UK has no cards.#Brexit 
No surprise here• Blair’s Brexit bashing friend and their links to a dictator  via @MailOnline @georgegalloway 
The underlying cause of Brexit was the xenophobia, racism and bigotry whipped up by the RW. Not 'neoliberalism'. Do have some shame eh.  
Reaction to news Anna Soubry will put country before party in event of Hard Brexit.  
First guest at @AlexSalmond Edinbugh chat show is "his pal" and Brexit minister @DavidDavisMP 
Only 3 interviewed in a year! Why???Riddle deepens over Ruth Davidson and allegations of referendum election fraud  
Hard Brexit could split Tory party, says Anna Soubry  
#OTD 1961 E.Germany closes its border in Berlin.  Want to go back to the Brexiteers good old days. Stop #brexit pic.twitter.com/vv9Tz4SYNs 
Bring the Government in front of a Judge before T May apologise to @conservatives & uses #Brexit to undo our rights  
And some are happy to legitimise an extremist Brexit and limit our freedoms by appeasing right-wing sentiment.  
I hope for the sake of the rUK that WM’s brexit folly fails, but Scotland is moving on. #ScotRef will be the beginning of a new world. 
A new blog post explaining the recent LSE study on Brexit public opinion that many press stories misunderstood last week  
Brexit is like those movies where people go to a party to have a few drinks and 3 hours later they're behind a warehouse burying a body. 
I'd have more respect for David Miliband's opinion on Brexit if he didn't represent the underlying cause of Brexit: unbridled neoliberalism. 
Tory Brexit policy is chaotic. The fightback must begin at once | David Miliband  
We haven't had a 1st vote on #brexit deal. We had unnecessary referendum when senior politicians misrepresented EU  
The one thing I am looking forward to concerning Brexit, it's autopsy. #StopBrexit 
Brexit has harmed the UK economically, socially, politically & culturally. It's a collective madness that must be challenged  
'Global Britain' is a way for some English to hang onto the feeling of empire rather than accepting England is just another country.#Brexit 
Leave Director admitted the Brexit referendum was won by lying to the public.  
"There is a sense of resignation among most people who voted Remain".NO! I'm womanning up & will not accept Brexit damaging the UK. 
The British are indifferent about many aspects of Brexit, but Leave and Remain voters are…  
Thats 1% of Poole's population. Huge local impact thanks to Brexit, says Rupert Myers #NotInMyName  
Leave Director admitted the Brexit referendum was won by lying to the public.  
EU should welcome the UK back from Brexit like the prodigal son  
I have family who voted Leave & believe 'hard' Brexit a price worth paying.I profoundly disagree. Yet we're still family & I still love 'em 
112 years ago today, Norway had a referendum and voted for independence from Sweden.  
Opinion: Pro-European Brits should put their heart into stopping Brexit rather than campaigning for a soft one.  
I will now immediately block anyone who uses “remoaners” to describe opponents of brexit. Except you, Nigel, got to keep an eye on you. 
“Tell me who you walk with and I’ll tell you who you are” - Mexican proverb.These are the friends Brexit Britain is choosing.  
Brexit shows that the BBC is not fit for purpose.  
Welcome .@DavidMilliband support for vote on final #Brexit settlement.  But EEA option without #customs union not a workable compromise. 
But if we vote for Brexit a second time, @DMiliband and his Remoaner buddies *still* won't accept the outcome of a democratic vote. 
When the Fail starts publishing articles like this. LETS GET READY FOR BREXIT TO CRUMBLE!!! #StopBrexit  
I say to my Kurdish brothers to postpone the referendum would be an HISTORICAL FAULT @Gorran_Change @KosretRasoulAli @KDPinfo #twitterkurds 
David Miliband demands second Brexit vote to halt 'act of self-harm'  
Privileged multi millionaire Jacob Rees-Mogg is not fit to lead the Tory party let alone lead Brexit negotiations. 
Rarely has a policy been so vacuous, incoherent and politically inept than Lab's Brexit policy. Brand new on my blog  
The Tories would split over Brexit. But, so long as Labour's leadership backs Hard Lexit, what's the point?  
Ex-Sainsbury's CEO: Brexit means 'higher prices, less choice, and poorer quality' at supermarkets  
David Miliband: we need a second vote on #Brexit deal  
We helped save Europe: now Europe could save us from Brexit  
I don't buy or read The S*n but seen this today. Putting politicians in crosshairs... this is where we are with #Brexit  
Mutiny: Anna Soubry has threatened to quit the Tory party if Theresa May refuses to soften her stance on Brexit.  
My country must come before my party if Theresa May sides with the hardliners, writes @Anna_Soubry #Brexit #Remain 
Hammond/Fox letter @dailytelegraph shows the need to form #Brexit consensus which Hammond is leading 
Irish citizens to get right to live and work in UK as part of British Isles 'Schengen deal' after Brexit 
First Conservative MP threatens to quit party if Theresa May presses ahead with hard Brexit  
Say goodbye to achievements of Good Friday Agreement May 'to insist on Northern Ireland border checks post-Brexit'  
Irish citizens to get right to live and work in UK after Brexit. Good start.But what about the other EU26 ctzens? 
Theresa May is flying home to Tory chaos as an MP threatens to quit over Brexit 
David Miliband - the only person Ed ever beat in politics - is calling for a second referendum. 
CABINET CONFIRM- Out of single market - Leaving customs union - 'Interim period' til full Brexit  
The Corbyn supporters trying to dismiss David Milibands Brexit comments show that loyalty to Corbyn is more important than stopping Brexit 
Blair’s Brexit bashing friend, the smell of corruption, and their links to a dictator  v 
Bored of 'I hate Tories & Brexit' so 'I want Labour & will conveniently forget they also back Brexit.' System is bust. We need a new party. 
Anna Soubrey threatens to quit if PM seeks hard brexitThat's what I'd call win-win#soubrey #Brexit 
Anna Soubry threatens to leave Tory party if Theresa May goes ahead with a hard Brexit  
Why an anti-Brexit party wouldn't work | my piece for @theipaper 
#TORY #VOTERS SAY Anti-#BREXIT #SCUMBAG #PhilipHammond MUST be SACKED! #BBC #SKY @theresa_may @PhilipHammondUK #NEWS #EU #UK #RT #MP #PM 
If Soubry truly believed her #Brexit view is one shared by her constituents she would resign & fight byelection on them She knows she'd lose  
I got an extra 1800 votes almost 26k voted Tory highest no. in 25 years & I made my #Brexit views v clear @sekotser_ @onewendy @StevieBee12 
61% of people surveyed disapprove of Theresa May's handling of #brexit negotiations    
All our energies should go on making Brexit a success [2/2] 
Hello @Anna_Soubry - have you considered joining the @libdems? We are the only pro-remain party not only against hard Brexit, but Brexit.  
Lush moves production base to Germany due to Brexit. It's 1.4k staff spent c4.6 mill in Poole...  
David Miliband backs referendum on the deal and argues for social and political benefits of EU - …  by @caronmlindsay 
Second referendum "impossible" says ex-EU chief  
Deeply hypocritical that those on the left & right are "shocked" at Fascism in the US without making the connection with fascism in Brexit pic.twitter.com/fh3NYGnbkn 
You know when we get warned about buying cheap & dangerous foreign imports? Well, that'll be us if we don't accept EU standards post Brexit. 
Cannot believe we saw Nazi propaganda in the 2016 Brexit campaign.  
Former minister becomes first Tory MP to threaten to leave party if Theresa May goes ahead with hard Brexit  
Very good thread. As ever, ministers are either ignorant of or untruthful about the difficulties of Brexit.  
This is utterly ridiculous - you can't have a meaningful transition if you rule out staying in the Single Market &the Customs Union #Brexit  
Ex-minister Anna Soubry says she could quit CON over hard Brexit thus making Commons maths even tighter  
That Brexit argument in full.1. Projict Feer wuz rong 2. We haven't left yet3. Glowble Bwittun4. You lost5. Get over it6. Libtards 
"Brexit is an act of economic suicide" Sir Tom Devine. Scotland MUST URGENTLY seek a solution with Brussels & 27 members to stay with EU 
Philip Hammond and Liam Fox discussing strategy at a #Brexit planning away day  
DELUDED: Remoaner Miliband wants another Brexit vote. These guys are increasingly deluded - country has moved on!  
David Miliband has a warning about the 'worst consequences' of Brexit  
.@DMiliband: "a transition postpones a rupture rather than avoids it. Slow Brexit does not mean soft Brexit"  
You know Brexit is lost when even the Mail are recognising its absurdity...... 
Inside Brexit's big threat to British science  
NEW Tory MP and former minister says 'not impossible' she could quit party over hard Brexit 
David Miliband urges politicians to fight for second EU referendum to stop UK being 'driven off a cliff'  
Brexit is not inevitable. It's been built on: exaggeration, fear, xenophobia,  dogma, but not on reality or fact.   
This is a great old article about Blackpool & Lancashire's EU funding. All of which will be lost because of Brexit.  
Interesting how the Brexiters/Corbynista have again united against a politician who questions the validity of Brexit  
The Government has 'no idea' how much time and money is being spent on Brexit  
Vince Cable's hateful attack on the over-70s over Brexit is a lazy attempt to curry favour with the young - The Sun  
We helped save Europe: now Europe could save us from Brexit  
Boost for Brexit Britain. Hilton plans to open 30 more hotels in the UK.  
Place this article in the timeline of your favourite Brexit propagandist  via @ThisIsMoney 
My country must come before my party if TM sides with #Brexit hardliners  
The Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
The man who used nazi-style propaganda for Brexit is surprised nazis still exist   
#Brexit fiddles while the #economy burns, says @mauricesmithtvi 
David Miliband demands second Brexit vote to halt 'act of self-harm'  
Friends! A proviso!If a second vote is also for Brexit, then democracy requires that we keep voting until the correct result is obtained.  
Theresa May to insist on post-Brexit border between Northern Ireland and the Republic  
David Miliband: we need a second vote on Brexit deal  
"It [the EU] is not just a market. It is a vision of the good society" This is why we reject all versions of #Brexit  
Labour’s foreign secretary from 2007-2010, @DMiliband, has called for a second EU referendum. 
The Brexit Party - I refuse to call it the Tory Party any more - is now officially beyond a joke.... (Sunday Times)  
Since the Brexit result hate crime in England has increased by 100% and Islamophobic attacks by 300%. All racist crime is down in Scotland. 
David Milliband, who pockets £530,000 p.a. Overseas aid  latest to call for 2nd Brexit vote.  
"Cameron’s handling of the referendum ranks him as most disastrous British prime minister since Lord North, who lost the American colonies" 
David Miliband is dead right, the fight against Brexit isn't just an economic argument. It's about who we are as a country.  
Brexit an 'unparalleled act of economic self-harm' David Miliband  
Could Europe save us from Brexit?  Today's Observer column 
Former Labour minister David Miliband calls for SECOND Brexit vote in highly sensible pro-EU article in the Observer  
What all this shows is that Brexit is too complex - way, way too complex - for any non-specialist to grasp. Hence, 2nd ref very dangerous.  
May (or is that really the DUP) to insist on post-Brexit border between N I & Republic.A giant step backwards!  
Whole point of transition is to ease the Brexit process, not to repeat it. 
Wales joins Scotland in opposing the U.K. government over Brexit  
It would require bespoke deal to be negotiated just for transition. Afterwards you'd basically have to start negotiating Brexit from scratch 
Bravo David Miliband. We need more public figures to stick their heads above the parapet and fight Brexit  
We will no longer be able to sue the government for breaking the law after Brexit. No compensation or damages. #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
If you were hoping after 5 months of A50 & desperate Brexit headlines, Govt wd finally know what it was doing, Telegraph has some bad news. 
May 'to insist on NI border checks post-Brexit' in move likely to anger the Republic.She really doesn't get it!!! 
Estonia's e-residency offers Brexit Brits a backdoor to Europe  
Another failed lefty politician denying will of the people. David Miliband: we need a second vote on Brexit deal   
The Government is using #Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
David Miliband: we need a second vote on #Brexit deal  
Ever wonder how Germany could have allowed Hitler's rise to power in the first place?Look around.#Charlottesville #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn is "the one person who's going to decide Brexit," says Alvine Capital's Stephen Isaacs  
Estonia's 'e-residency' offers Brexit Brits EU loophole  
Phillip Hammond and Liam Fox in post-Brexit deal call  
Putin has backed "white nationalists" in Western Europe. Brexit passed because of Nigel Farage, who is cut from the same cloth as David Duke 
British government is fighting back against criticism it is divided and unprepared for Brexit talks.  
There is no similarity between @jeremycorbyn's attitude to #Brexit and Theresa May's or Nigel Farage's. The left must recognise that. #JC4PM 
Remember that 96% drop in EU nurses registering to work in the UK since the Brexit vote? (). 
Donald Trump: Brexit "is a blessing for the world."  
#BBC are reporting that there's a new species of #snake in the #UK. I've got an early picture #PhilipHammond! @PhilipHammondUK #Brexit #SKY 
Dey there we don pass restructuring juncture.We dey referendum bus stop.  
Papa you are far off the track.We're talking of referendum.Restructuring is a charade.Wake up & smell the coffee,please.  
The #TRAITOR & Anti-#BREXIT #SCUMBAG #PhilipHammond MUST be SACKED! #BBC #SKY @theresa_may @PhilipHammondUK! #NEWS #EU #UK #RT #TORY #MP #PM 
Cut the WAFFLE!  #Brexit is barmy - Abandon it now.  
“The #TRAITOR #PhilipHammond a #Political #WORM trying to DESTROY #BREXIT!”  #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS #RT #TORY #UK #EU 
Britons should be given second Brexit vote - David Miliband  
To my friends. Alex salmond has threatened to have another referendum. Whatever your politics, join a unionist party and fight this. I have.  
Top UK ministers: Brexit transition cannot be back door to staying in EU  
#RETWEET: #Conservative #voters demand that @theresa_may Sack the #TRAITOR @PhilipHammondUK! #BBC #SKY #NEWS #TORY #PHILIPHAMMOND #BREXIT  
America first eh? 
1/ In addition to surprisingly vast number of Leavers who seem to believe that they fought in one or both world wars, the Brexit debate.. 
The Government has 'no idea' how much time and money is being spent on Brexit  
I’ve been wrong a lot about electoral politics, but I’m quite certain the GOP doesn’t want 2018 to be a referendum on Nazi sympathy. 
As for Cat Boyd you don't vote for an anti-indy, pro-Trident, pro-Brexit party & get a pass that you're pro-indy, anti-Trident, anti-Brexit  
#JC4PM, no ifs, no buts, no blairite  tory copies. It's not just about Brexit but homeless, NHS, austerity etc. Corbyn is not a 1 trick pony  
My friend @DMiliband wants to get the UK out of Brexit. Absolutely worth a try.  
At last, somebody talking sense on how to get Britain out of the Brexit lunacy. There must be a 2nd vote to kill it.  
And this news will surprise 0% of people living here. #NorthernIreland#Brexit  
Well if this is the special relationship we now have with America, you can stick it along with brexit.  
America's descent into God knows what leaves a vacuum. Europe, not China needs to fill most of it. U.K. must help lead, not Brexit. 
David Miliband: we need a second vote on Brexit deal  
Language of Trump and Brexit and Le Pen are all interwoven. You can say they haven't enabled the Nazis at #charlottsville but you'd be wrong 
David Davis backed dodgy City trader who paid him £34,000 for 6 days work a year #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
EXCLUSIVE Irish citizens to get right to live and work in UK as part of British Isles 'Schengen deal' after Brexit  
Labour ex-minister described outcome of EU referendum as “unparalleled act of economic self-harm”.Stop Brexit now!  
The dirty little secret is appeasement.The underbelly of Brexit. She's no Thatcher. She's Chamberlain.  
The Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations   
David Miliband: we need a second vote on Brexit deal  
Erudite as ever- well said @DMiliband. Democracy must be exercised not shut down by Referendum outcome  
Hammond confirms Brexit will mean out of single market and customs union. 
Together we can stop Brexit and stop the damage it is doing to Britain. It's time to take back control from the Extremists. #StopBriexit. 
Remainstream media going to work double hard creating "Cabinet Brexit Split" headlines. Hyper-reality popped by joint Hammond-Fox article. 
Top UK ministers: Brexit transition cannot be back door to staying in EU  
Scotland's leading historian Sir Tom Devine writes for us tomorrow and says 'Brexit is an act of economic suicide, but it is not inevitable' 
Trump and Brexit are the same movement. Here's the result. Fascists, who we both fought in ww2 back, on our streets.  
The Brexit position hasn't changed: UK will exit the EU, Single Market and Customs Union. Everything else has been white noise.#SkyPapers 
This hatred unleashed by Trump in US & Farage's vision of Brexit here is sickening, hatred is a terrible thing, it never ends well. 
Tory Brexit policy is chaotic: the fightback against this stitch-up must begin at once  
Our front pageState of the Nation special:Scotland will be independent in four years, and Brexit is not inevitable #scotpapers #buyapaper 
Meanwhile @DMiliband fully endorses Liberal Democrat policy in calling for a second vote on the Brexit deal.  
UK must QUIT Brexit talks because ‘only way to win game is not to play’ says think tank  
All those MP's who know Brexit is a national disaster but do not fully stand up against it- shame on you. You are no better than Brexiters. 
Brexit -  in 593 days, 2 hours, 34 minutes and 36 seconds! #EventCountdown  
UK must QUIT Brexit talks because ‘only way to win game is not to play’ says think tank  
Says the guy who said there could be violence on the streets if Brexit wasn't "delivered" to his liking.  
Mr Brexit doing a better job of this than Trump  
Brexit hasn't happened at all. A lot of people who should know better pretend it has, but A50 trigger is not valid. They may be outed soon. 
OBSERVER: David Miliband: We need a second vote on Brexit deal #tomorrowspaperstoday 
'Kurds will not be given their rights, they must take it,' said an Iranian Kurd supporter of the referendum.  
First Brexit. Now this. You're on a roll!  
*Brexit Explained*  
The Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
You surely have seen him standing in front of a NAZI propaganda replica during the referendum? This is the tip of the iceberg mind.  
Hearing whispers of a big anti-Brexit rally in Parliament Square on Sep 9. Is this #thedemocrats? Who will be there? 
."Brexit: the latest in a long line of disservices our largest island has casually inflicted on its neighbour.". 
All-round idiot Digby Jones hopes there'll be a Brexit benefit in "100 years time"  
Brexit going wrong cos UK has no formulated position, is unprepared, has no credible fall back, and no authoritative leadership. 
In terms of opposing Brexit, seldom, if ever, have I been so certain I am on the side of right. 
Hard or soft, Brexit will hit every British city—and pro-Leave areas will find it hardest to recoverV @prospect_uk pic.twitter.com/DITVJlSl2z 
Hundreds of Basques turned out on the streets in support of Catalonia and its planned independence referendum  
Probably The Thickest 
Rally today in #Germany in support of the upcoming #Kurdistan referendum and in support of the Kurdish city of #Afrin attacked by #Turkey. pic.twitter.com/yhZpw7hUbV 
John Harris is clever, doesn't live in London, talks a lot to "ordinary" voters beyond M25. Brexit scares him too   
So far from giving Britain more sovereignty #Brexit deprives us of the sovereign control we obtain via our say in EU decision making. 
#Brexit means that Britain simply becomes a rule-taker conforming to rules set elsewhere in order to trade with its main partners. 
MEP slams government for hiding over 50 secret studies on impacts of Brexit | Molly Scott Cato MEP  
It's one thing to denounce hatred and violence, another to say "we welcome you and value you" as @NicolaSturgeon did the day after #Brexit 
.@repealeight worried how Brexit might affect travel for abortion. One of the many reasons we must #repealthe8th 
You don’t need the words ‘after Brexit’ here.  
The Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
Because only countries inside the EU do science. Or something. More Bloomberg Brexit BS  
'I'll ALWAYS bet on this country!' Tory MP hails Brexit & blasts those aiming to THWART it  
Macron had...Socialist collapse + centre right scandal + Le Pen as alternative.A new anti-Brexit party would have ... none of those  
The Premier League going full Brexit by taking us back sixty years with the league table:  
.@thatginamiller calls for extension for Brexit negotiations. Surely this makes sense, regardless of Brexit choice  
We never lost sovereignty - our own Brexit government says so.  
Blair REFUSES to change mind on Brexit as British people stand by referendum vote.  In Jail, he wouldn't have vote!  
UK must QUIT Brexit talks because ‘only way to win game is not to play’ says think tank  
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
Thousands march in San Sebastián (Basque Country) to support Catalonia and the October 1 referendum! #DemokraziarekinBat 
BAIT: Officials deny century-old fruitcake found in Antarctica will take over from David Davis as chief Brexit negotiator. 
Want an exit from Brexit?Want an Open, Tolerant and United Britain?Then join the Lib Dems today   
Brexit pain for holidaymakers as pound expected to fall further against euro  
Brexit happens, and now Burnley and Huddersfield lead the top division. We are officially back in the 1950s 
Fucking Greeks coming over here making our club better and scoring all the goals..... I blame Brexit!! #nffc 
‘Bewildering and reckless!’ EU wants to HURT London during Brexit talks, says City chief  
Yet they were fit for office when they laid waste to Britain with austerity impoverishing millions -Beware of who you make a #Brexit saviour  
May must bring those pushing for a 'soft Brexit' to heel  
Post brexit, UKIP need a new identity. Adapt or die. @AMDWaters offers the only route forwards. 
#brexit is BACK with a vengance, we won't settle for 3rd this year no we won't  
Venezuela, Encryption, Period Poverty, Brexit. Catch up on our week  “The Week in Politics, 4th - 11th August” 
Brexit:Not in my nameNot with my consentNot with my taxes#StopBrexit #ThatIsMyWill #exitbrexit #notinmyname 
On this basis I would argue that the press assertion that the new LSE survey "shows that voters prefer hard Brexit" is misconceived.  
Yeah yeah yeah you remoaners told us that before the referendum. We didn't believe your lies then and we don't believe your lies now either.  
Oh FFS this gets better & better.A survey being used to say "remainers accept Brexit"...Didn't actually include a non-#brexit option  
The Government is using Brexit to take control away from citizens and give it to corporations  
Not surprising when it's led by lying #Brexit Taliban inductee #LiamFox, a corrupt mediocrity who should've been deselected as an MP. 
Cat Boyd has sent a clear message that she doesn't want another divisive referendum. 
Spaniards given Brexit perspective on CFP. Free lunch should be over and GB will independently manage our own waters  
The Brexit deniers should end their fantasy and help shape the future  
We remain in the EU. #Brexit will destroy our public services through lack of funding by wrecking the economy. 
Any doubt about my position on Brexit? No acceptance or resignation here. Respect Brexshit? No fucking way! #StopBrexit #notinmyname 
There's a pattern to this.It's when there is a lot of bad news for the Brexit brigade.  
Lower pound is fantastic news for UK: more tourists, more exports, more UK manufacturing & more UK food production #Brexit  
Extremely good point on Brexit from @AllieRenison 
WTFF - Express runs this?! 'Brexit can be STOPPED' Lord Heseltine claims Remainers have opportunity to CHANGE agenda  
#Kurdish official @HoshyarZebari says independence referendum date will not be changed, despite U.S. request to postpone it.  
This is good: how the beat-up over British Airways tail fin designs predicted the Brexit dividing lines 
."Brexit has forced the North’s deep divisions back to the surface.". 
We have written to Yorkshire's MPs with our #Brexit red lines. Please feel free to adapt the letter, use & share.  
If #EU is so wonderful, why were British people denied a referendum on Maastricht, Nice & Lisbon treaties? What were they afraid of?#Brexit 
President Erdogan: We have noticed that Holland strained our relationship because of the referendum.  
“Don’t let Brexit wreck the lead the UK has in Tech” by @surangac 
Head of Europe and Trade Policy @The_IoD @AllieRenison on #Brexit #bbcaq @BBCRadio4 
It's a fatally flawed survey, already thoroughly discredited. Please ignore it. #Remain voters do not want ANY #Brexit.  
Our Great Nation is united behind Brexit. Our Supreme Leaders will deliver Great Brexit making Global Britain Great Again!  
The more I read this the more I like it. @sanglesey @TheNewEuropean #brexit.  
This is the best definition of #Brexit I have ever read #brexitreality 
.So that's it then.....People are going to die in Ireland because of Brexit . 
Spot-on thread why many #Remainers are realists not #EU-fanatics "Brexit isn't really about the EU. It's about Britain and its self-image'"  
Gina Miller is wrong. We only need more time to negotiate if Brexit is the desired end. It isn't.  
Britain could be taken to an international tribunal over quitting the #EU Single Market #Brexit  
BREXIT FREEDOM: EU exit could make Britain 'self-sufficient' again - farming boss  @theresa_may @AMDWaters 
Brexit negotiators didn't bother preparing any notes...  
Govt hides 50+ secret studies on impacts of Brexit -These must be published!!  
Watch as the media now try to spin Brexit into a "not so bad, let's get on with it" narrativeDon't put up with it 
#brexit means.....  
He supports Hard Brexit, but not independence & his best policies are already implemented by the SNP in Scotland. So no, I'm NOT with Corbyn 
*Nails the rediculous lie everyone voted Tory & Labour for Hard Brexit*  
According to the @Telegraph most Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no #Brexit divorce bill 
"Can't even talk now without committing a PC-gone-mad groupthink BBC-enforced thoughtcrime""Fuck Brexit""YOU CAN'T SAY THAT TRAITOR!!" 
"Was Brexit right/wrong decision?" or "If new EUref held tomorrow, how would you vote?" Polls that ask these Qs mostly show shift to Remain. 
1. My acceptance of Brexit has zero effect on negotiations2. Even if it did, that wouldn't magically make Brexit a good idea 
No amount of sexy narration on advantages of oneness of this fraudulent 1914 contraption will change my mind on the need for a referendum. 
Carry On Brexit. The Brexit deluded fools just carry on telling lies and carry on telling half truths. #StopBrexit 
I'm starting to be impressed by Owen Jones's current willingness to allow himself to be taken apart like this in Brexit debates.  
I really hate when the rhetoric around a referendum is "We need people to tell their stories". Once it's out there it's there forever 
MEP slams government for hiding over 50 secret studies on impacts of Brexit  
Ministers are preparing to rebuff the Irish government and insist on a customs border after Brexit  
Check the facts! Change your minds! There's still time. Lets do the #BestForBritain #NO #brexit 
Ironically, people who support Brexit are undermining the UK and being manipulated by foreigners. Very unpatriotic. 
Farage said that if voting didn't deliver the desired result then violence would be the 'next step'. So much for democracy.#Brexit #Remain 
Becoming clearer by the day what "take back control" actually means. Govt, removing your ability to hold Govt to account! #Brexit  
The Irish countryside is more popular than ever, thanks to Brexit  
Pro-tip for Remainers: Imaginary Brexit chicken is HUGE NEWS; thousands of real, contaminated EU eggs are NOT NEWS  
50 days until the independence referendum in #Catalonia. Most of preparations are done in secret 
The referendum in #Kurdistan will be held one week before #Catalan referendum on independence  
I'm bloody scandalised is what I am. This is an abomination. First Brexit and now this. 
Spain & ROI must cease using Brexit to advance claims to UK territory if they wish to be considered allies & friends 
As each day passes #Brexit seems less likely to happen. Wear your EU colours with pride and keep saying #StopBrexit - we will win for UK! 
Simon Grayson going full pelt Brexit.  
A Tory MP said: Opposing Brexit will destroy Tories. Supporting Brexit will destroy UK.Time the Tories put our country before themselves. 
UK must QUIT Brexit talks because ‘only way to win game is not to play’ says think tank  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
Well worth another read: #Brexit is about the rich Rees-Moggs of Britain, not anyone else  
£38 billion for a massivley reduced pound, higher inflation, jobs going abroad... The Tories certainly know how to do a great deal. #Brexit 
Govt already knows Brexit will not happen. Brexit would require vast investment, recruitment, infrastructure - none of which is in evidence. 
29% of Remain voters would accept expulsion of all EU nationals after Brexit, study suggests BULLSHIT! 
Wish advocates of new "stop Brexit" party would stop talking about it and get on with it. Would be significantly helpful for us Brexiteers. 
Britain must ask for more time to negotiate Brexit | Gina Miller  
Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no Brexit divorce bill  
BREXIT didn't come about because of logical economic rationale. No. It was driven by xenophobic rhetoric. 
Crowdfund the #StopBrexit March on Conservative Party Conference! #Brexit #Remain #brexitshambles 
#US, #Iran & other countries that oppose the referendum didn't make serious efforts to solve issues between #Baghdad & #Erbil in the past. 
If #Brexit is such a good idea, why has sterling become toxic, the trade gap widened, academics leaving and BoE still indulging in QE 
Seven out of ten Remain voters now back a clean Brexit and control of our borders, study shows.  
Westminster urges the SNP to get over themselves and get behind Brexit  
U.S. asks Iraq Kurds to postpone referendum: Kurdistan Presidency  
Brexit repeal bill will remove UK citizens' right to sue Government over policies  
Ironic Brexit supposedly delivers better UK whilst clearly is dismantling our  financial sector, weakening our economy and devaluing the £  
We need a realignment to unite the Remain majority in Parliament to stop the debacle of Brexit. They could return to tribalism afterwards.  
Has Brexit changed your plans to live outside the UK? Share your story with us  
Tories with Labour are bringing chaos and uncertainty to the UK with their relentless unforgiving love for Brexit.   
Most Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no Brexit divorce bill  
Why did you apply for German citizenship the day after the #brexit result, @Nigel_Farage?You've played your part in screwing this country! 
BOMBSHELL POLL: Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey  
"We won't ask Brussels for permission to have our #referendum," says member of the @Europarl_EN​, @jordisolef ​   
Switzerland "is quite negative" about the EU and "sees opportunities in #Brexit". 
My cartoon - the (not so great) repeal bill#Brexit#r4PM 
Brexit won't happen. The UK needs EU free trade. The UK needs EU migrants. The UK is already sovereign. Brexit is a sham to appease racists. 
Britain must ask for more time to negotiate Brexit | Gina Miller  
Brexit Boost: Hiring and Salaries Rise as Supply of Cheap Foreign Workers Falls  
Not every person who voted for #Brexit is a racist but every #Brexit vote helps racists think they're 'right'. 
Theresa May MP: Sack Philip Hammond - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
A Canberra mum is shouted down by  protestors as she explains what her kids were taught. Plebiscite a referendum on free speech, SS.  
Brexit boost as holiday exports hit £302m: Demand surges worldwide for British goods  @AmberRuddHR @JustineGreening 
I do wonder if, within a decade or two, #Brexit will be called the Second Glorious Revolution for invigorating global democracy & free trade 
SB1431 supporters want @arizona_sos referendum effort disqualified for description of legislative session in which it was passed. @azcentral 
@nlitvin,the time is fast approaching and remember FREEDOM is not GIVEN,it is TAKEN. #BIAFRA#REFERENDUM  
The UK has no legitimate negotiating position. The EU knows Brexit's a deceit & will fall apart.You lot can roast yourselves to extinction. 
Only a matter of time before a "Three Way Brexit" becomes a new move in the porn industry   
a song that mentions democracy, capitalism, brexit, gentrification and the dehumanisation of homeless people? @RATBOY ... really did that 
It takes 499 secs for light to travel from the Sun to the Earth. This is a fact. Brexit will devastate the UK economy. This is also a fact. 
#Brexit will do more damage to NHS than any govt the last 50 years. So why not start by opposing that?  
Look at this Mayor.Not such a darling of the media.Just getting on with the job.Looking to ensure a good future for the WM, post-Brexit   
Remember when you told everyone that Corbyn knew what he was doing, and that Brexit would be fine ...  
How economists are being proved right on Brexit  
Labour has lost its way, leadership is in denial if it believes that as a Brexit party it can govern the UK.Labour should be anti-Brexit.  
Y'what? Brexit's a huge opportunity to doodle on your knee! Haven't put pen to knee yet? Well now that we've voted Brexit, you can!  
On many things, Corbyn is 100% right. On Brexit he is, well, he's Nigel Farage. 
.YesIt's Full-BrexitIt's Tory-BrexitIt's Left-BrexitIt's Hard-BrexitThey're ALL the SAME thing100% Brexit!. 
No, Robert. We are not undermining your Brexit position. It is collapsing because it was built on sand.  
Brexit: UK risks an international court case over Theresa May's plans for leaving EU single market, say experts  
You can say NO to Brexit and end the madness that making us all poorer and damaging Britain. #StopBrexit 
A recent study suggests #Remain voters are drifting towards accepting Hard #BrexitWhat's your view, right now?RT for good sample 
"Tag that one mate who voted Brexit"  
Il Padrino ordered 6,500 EU flags today leavers. We are going to have soooo much fun. See, Brexit IS boosting trade  #brexitnotinmyname 
When we refer to Brexit we should describe it as a 'Tory and Corbyn' hard Brexit. Both want the an end to the single market & free movement. 
*Brexit will not happen*  
Gut wrenching game but on the plus side I walloped ten Gooners & my Hard Brexit favourite Maguire had a good game. On way home cheers bob 
Imagine Chappers and Dunty in the same party. Pro Brexit when it was good for their careers, now anti it because it's good for their careers 
#tbt when James Chapman wasn't the woke messiah of the remoaners and wanted to do Brexit  
When your Brexit-voting Da hacks your Twitter account.  
Yes I'm a Centrist DadCentristEnlightenedNot stupidTim FRighteous RationalIce coolStop brexitTim FarronDadAlways An AtheistDad 
That awkward moment when support for Brexit is back to around1/3 where it was before the 4 month EU ref campain.  
Neatly sums up the EU referendum  
The people back Brexit.  
Everyone just waits. Because, and this is the heart of it, Labour's leadership wants Brexit. 
Absolutely, categorically, 100% not. No way do I want Brexit of any kind to go ahead. My only wish is to #StopBrexit, it is #notinmyname. 
Remainers are becoming more potty by the day. It's bizarre. The opportunities presented by Brexit are immense, and they simply ignore them. 
Brexit Boost: Hiring and Salaries Rise as Supply of Cheap Foreign Workers Falls 
Told you Brexit would never happen #LastTweetB4BeingNuked 
The money (state pension)  is not sitting anywhere, that's  my point.We need a thriving GDP.And it takes youth.#Immigration#BrexitI  
Jeremy Corbyn and Labour should be opposing leaving the single market and have the guts to oppose Brexit. @UKLabour #StopBrexit 
I've heard many say referendum shld never have been called. I disagree. Only 8% of UK pop knew how EU worked 2y ago. We needed a shake-up. 
Most Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no Brexit divorce bill  
Most of our politicians lack a survival instinct No balls or Brains Nigel Farage shows them all up for what they are 
Swiss plan MAJOR financial alliance including UK but NOT EU after Brexit  
Throw me to the wolves 
But Ms Mogg thinks because LnC got 80% of the votes that means 80% want Brexit. The Latin for that is Loda Bollacus.  
Remoaners losing their battle to derail Brexit as the public overwhelmingly backs a full exit from the EU  
Pound will be worth less than a euro by early 2018, Morgan Stanley predicts | The Independent #Brexit  
Most Europeans judge #Brexit as bad for EU and UK  
Remoaners Lose as Voters Strongly Back ‘Hard’ Brexit  
WATCH: Nigel Farage SLAMS Muslim grooming gangs and calls attacks RACIST  via @Your Brexit 
Seven in 10 Britons now support HARD BREXIT according to major survey:  
20,000-person poll shows Leave and Remain voters united on proper Brexit  
Morgan Stanley:“The UK economic outlook looks bleak”Brexit: making our country poorer, each and every day.  
Brexit repeal bill will remove UK citizens' right to sue Government over policies  
Eurosceptic MPs didn't stop demanding that we leave the EU after 1975, & I won't stop fighting this disastrous Brexit.#bbcaq 
To get a US trade deal Britain needs an independent trade policy from day one of Brexit says @ShankerASingham  
Scottish labour campaigned on No to a second independence referendum and if you vote for them they will say you support that view 
Had a phone conversation with US Sec. of State, Rex Tillerson, we spoke of the Kurdistan independence referendum 
And whilst Farage claims Brexit as his victory the official leave campaign judged him too racist to be part of them. 
Most Brits back a hard Brexit new survey finds via @MailOnline 
Better to repent now, join the ever growing ranks of #Remain to #StopBrexit, than be a complete twat and continue to support Brexit. 
Boris Johnson should be prosecuted for Brexit lies  via @LondonEconomic 
An anti-Brexit party has the sharp focus to appeal  @jameschappers 
Our letter is available for download from .Please feel free to use it & adapt it for use with your own MPs #Brexit /4 
BOMBSHELL POLL: Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey  
Since Scottish Labour is resolutely against a 2nd Indy referendum, a vote for Labour would seem to rule out any chance of independence. 
31) Trump has one play left, long-term: to convince Republicans that the 2018 mid-terms should be the referendum on him, not an impeachment. 
Brexit is not going to happen. Even the 'soft-fudge call-it-Brexit-to-appease-the-fundamentalist-Leavers' version of Brexit is now unlikely. 
Brexit WM plea to devolved parlys:Let us take over the powers we gave you for a wee while because you know you can trust us to return them. 
The far greater damage being done by Brexit is, yet again, not worth commenting on. Perhaps Corbyn will wake up tomorrow.  
"The Conservative Party brand has been damaged to such an extent that the party won't be elected again," says Brexit secretary's former aide  
This Huge New Study Reveals What The British Public Really Wants From Brexit  via @jamesrbuk 
Labour has a dilemma. If Brexit happens they'll be blamed for the mess as well. If it get's stopped, Corbyn must resign. Bad planning Labour 
A hard task. With Brexit included..impossible but gargantuan.  
Petition to form infinite new centrist parties in between each other, each more intricately anti-Brexit than the last. 
."The “disaster” of Brexit will destroy the Conservative Party’s chances of ever again winning power". 
Voters strongly back Hard Brexit, ie Brexit.  
.Broke-Brexit-Britain"Morgan Stanley predicts £1 will be worth LESS than €1 for the first time in its history". 
Leave and Remain Voters United, Back 'Hard' Brexit  
Ambitious freelancer in Britain? The lobby is much too obsequious to ask ministers tough questions about Brexit. Go on and fill that gap. 
We need indyref before Brexit, otherwise we risk losing a) our EU national friends and families b) Holyrood c) chance to have indyref. 
Scientist with one of the century's most important discoveries planning to leave UK because of Brexit  
Lots of stick out there for @jameschappers. But his insider tweets on Brexit reflect precisely what I hear from German officials.  
T May accused the Article 50 campaigners of trying to subvert democracy. She wouldn't have lasted 5 minutes in Thatcher's cabinet#Brexit  
I recall Osborne said Brexit would damage the economy& others that we had no real cards to play in negotiations. So far they've been correct 
At least 50 secret studies into impacts of hard #Brexit. Time for govt to come clean and tell us all what's in them.  
Problem is those who call us remoaners don't care if Brexit's a calamity.They're irrational obsessives blaming EU for all ills affecting UK  
Corbyn continues to deceive the electorate. He continued to pretend his Brexit strategy isn't the same as the Tories. It is-Exactly the same  
14) that's also why a referendum is barely "democracy" - it has no checks, no nuance & no protections for minorities 
Brexit will destroy Tory party chances of ever winning again, former chief of staff to Brexit Secretary warns #JC4PM 
How dare people call us "Remoaners"? I've seen it from the inside and Brexit is going to the worst calamity for UK since WW2 #notinmyname 
BOMBSHELL POLL: Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey. So now let´s get on with it.  
James Chapman has seen #brexit from the inside, and knows it's a disaster @jameschappers #chaos 
Independence referendum is against independence but anti-independence campaigners are for independence. Go figure.  
#DavidDavis own former aide describes #brexit as a "calamity" for #Britain - and he's seen it from the inside... 
If you're interested in #Catalonia's October referendum, here's a series of articles & interviews I did last year 
How will Brexit in 2019 cut immigration?We have 7,723 miles of coast.It takes 3 years to train a customs officer.We are training none. 
Huge study reveals even Remainers now want a ‘hard Brexit’ as Brits united over taking back control  
Tell me about it. Leaver liars who fibbed that Brexit would be quick, easy and great owe this holidaymaker a small fortune  
Most Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no Brexit divorce bill 
612,000 out of work EU migrants in UK claim a huge £886m a yr in benefits.This will continue AFTER #Brexit#Madness 
Every journalist writing for Brexit supporting papers is part of the calamity about to befall the UK. Time to stand up and be counted 
Friends! Dreadful news!People have been LIED to by the Hard-Right, anti-EU media, e.g. Our BBC!I blame Brexit. 
#Brexit=A tale of 2 major parties driving their people to economic-social suicide to serve the interests of some 'elite' #StopBrexit #Remain 
British exports up 11.4% since Brexit vote  
Good and important piece. The treatment of @thatginamiller an outrage and everyone, whatever their position on Brexit, should condemn it.  
Would you support an anti-Brexit political party?- RT for larger sample size - 
Brexit bill will remove citizens their right to sue government for breaking the lawTaking back control means this 
Jacob Rees-Mogg SAVAGES has-been Blair's 'dangerous' efforts to reverse Brexit        BLAIR SHOULD BE IN PRISON. 
Oxford University Study: Leave and Remain Voters United, Back ‘Hard’ Brexit  
Yep! Alex Salmond calls for second independence referendum after Brexit 'humiliation'  
Will Donald or Kim care Jeremy tells them to calm down? Will they know who he is? They hardly know who May is. Brexit making us irrelevant.  
WALK AWAY JUST GO    BOMBSHELL POLL: Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey.     
It's deeply cynical that both Tory & Lab believe a post Brexit election leaves us no choice but to pick one of them for Government. 
If DUP continues to stand with Tories on Brexit other parties north and south must stand together and demand special status - @M_AndersonSF 
Marvellous, as predicted, you have moved onto your third definition of what Brexit means:  
Securing special status within the North is achievable - @M_AndersonSF tells Brexit event at @GasyardFeile 
Irish MEP says UK not brave enough to hold second Brexit referendum - Independent.ie  
Interesting new Brexit views study - but it doesnt actually deal with the likely trade-offs between control & access  
You know this is nonsense, Zac. The entire thrust of Brexit is to deregulate. There is no opportunity. There will be no boost in standards. 
24) Owen, you're a journalist - please, look deeper.  No-one is asking the public the real question on Brexit. Both parties selling fantasy 
If we're to have a country worth fighting over, we have to block Brexit. Time is running out. A cross-party alignment/new party only answer.  
We will fight, every step of the way to stop Brexit from being used to water down individual rights.Read more   
Most Remain voters now back taking control of borders, leaving ECJ and paying no Brexit divorce bill  
Brexit is "going to make Black Wednesday look like a picnic", says the Brexit secretary's former aide, calling for a new pro-EU party.  
Corbyn has to oppose Brexit to prevent the creation of a new centre party 
Brexit -  in 594 days, 9 hours, 8 minutes and 20 seconds! #EventCountdown  
Bitcoin Spikes To New Record High Over $3500 - Best Week Since Brexit Amid "Netscape Moment"  
The Tories know #Brexit is their 'Waterloo'! The People will ensure they never form a Government again! Art 50 N will be nullified! #Remain 
By my brilliant friend @janemerrick23 The plot to stop Brexit being hatched on a Greek island  
Brexit... it's hardly "power to the people", hey? The Repeal Bill removes our European rights to sue Govt.  
BOMBSHELL POLL: Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey  
Remoaners Lose as Voters Strongly Back 'Hard' Brexit  
Acceptance is supposed to be a virtue. But there is no virtue in accepting abuse. #Brexit is an abuse of democracy. #Remain #StopBrexit. 
Most people have yet to grasp that the govt's poor handling of #Brexit is what happens when you try to do the impossible. #StopBrexit. 
Most politicians have turned into frightened herd animals following rather than trying to sway public opinion. @UKLabour#Brexit #StopBrexit 
The question is no longer 'will #Brexit be a disaster', but 'how big a disaster?'.#StopBrexit #NotInMyName @jameschappers @terrychristian 
Fall in number of EU workers followed by increase in hiring + salary rises. Bosses predictably distraught. #Brexit  
Replace jug eared slob Rooney with Crouch & that's a nice Hard Brexit team  
Lush, a great UK success story, is helping its workers leave Brexit Britain—and keep their jobs  via @qz 
So Jeremy: stop Brexit - you can do it - and fund the NHS with the Brexit divorce bill money. That's a promise that could actually be kept.  
Seven in 10 Britons now support hard Brexit according to major survey  
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
A guide to the Catalan independence referendum.  
Another Remoaner myth busted - chocolate shrinkage has been caused by Public Health England, not Brexit  
Exactly right. Brexit is a huge  opportunity to boost standards. Need to make sure we do.  
Brexit exposing the anti-Irish underbelly of English nationalism. May as well be Punch Magazine from 1801.   
Lord Heseltine interview: There's now a window of opportunity to stop Brexit  via @BIUK_Politics 
BOOST: UK exports up 11.4% since the country voted for Brexit.  
According to internal AKP polls only 35% of AKP youth voted Yes in referendum; 76% of pop don't trust justice sys. 
It's not clear what a new party does to grapple with the real obstacles to stopping or softening Brexit:  
That huge chasm between what Leave & Remain voters want from Brexit turns out not to be so big after all.  
Boris Johnson should be prosecuted for Brexit lies says David Davis' former chief of staff:  #Remain #Brexit #leaveEU 
.@VinceCable: We will provide a home for those unhappy with Brexit and the paths the other parties are taking  
Trolls and bots are not here to win arguments with reasons. They're here to shout you down or exhaust you in stupid conversations.#Brexit 
Kudos to @BuzzFeedUK for the lack of spin on their reporting of this poll - to be fair, it's a slam dunk for Brexit.  
Daily message to Leavers: In a democracy you can campaign against any policy, majority or government, and that includes #Brexit. 
Bank of England policy maker says Britain will feel the effects of Brexit for a long time  
Anyone care to estimate cost of @BorisJohnson to taxpayer? Factor inGarden Bridge, estuary airport, &, most expensive of all, Brexit. 
This applies to Brexit, too.BBC must not allow itself to be bullied by obsessives, liars and propagandists, no matter how angry they get.  
BOOM! 20,000 LSE/Oxford Uni poll67% back "No Deal" over soft Brexit69% back leaving CUThe country is uniting!  
I'm setting up this account to support @jameschappers and his bid to set up an new anti-Brexit party. Let's go! 
BOOM: Poll of 20,000 people shows country united behind proper Brexit. Let's get on with it!  
#BREAKING: Kurds in diaspora may register between September 1 and 7 for #KurdistanReferendum, according to the Referendum Commission  
By supporting Corbyn's hard Brexit you are willingly complicit in the scapegoating of immigrants & driving down of conditions for the poor. 
We are the home for all those who are unhappy with Brexit:  
If the fact I'm a Remain voter who accepts the referendum and wants a soft Brexit angers you so much, just unfollow, get on with your life. 
67% of respondents would prefer "no deal" to soft Brexit, while 68% would opt for a clean over soft Brexit  
I don't think tweeting at me that I'm a "traitor", an "appeaser", and a "dangerous man" is going to stop Brexit. Just a hunch. 
People on Twitter do realise I'm not actually in charge of Brexit, don't they? 
I see lots of RW/LW brexiters getting defensive in response.They fear revitalised liberal centre will stop Brexit.For once they're right!  
All predictions, from experts that Michael Gove pilloried during referendum, are coming to pass. 20% decline in bus. invest #BrexitShambles 
Brexit repeal bill will remove UK citizens' right to sue Government over policies  
This is how new anti-Brexit party will be framed from day 1. Not as exciting centrist alternative but elite-led effort to thwart majority  
Major new research from LSE and Oxford University reveals what the British public *really* want from Brexit:  
EXCL: Major new study finds Remain And Leave voters surprisingly united on backing a harder Brexit  via @jamesrbuk 
#Brexit voting coincides strongly with support for the death penalty. It's about people craving safety & security  
How do you solve a problem like Brexit?  Our new podcast is out now! Brexit, centrism, nuclear war   #Agitpod 
Many Leavers have authoritarian personalities which means they naturally see the EU in terms of domination by Brussels or Germany.#Brexit 
13 months after the EU referendum, it's telling that people are still talking about a new party, rather than creating one. 
Britain needs an anti-Brexit centrist party, says politician studiously ignoring the…  
Bristol for Europe supporters out today to remind #JeremyCorbyn of the futility of #Brexit.  
The Brexit bill wants to remove the right to sue the government over pollution and workers’ rights   
The Conservative Party is entirely corrupt. It used a referendum to solve a private problem, and now it's created a crisis. 
For the first time ever I am defending banks. Here’s why (yes, Brexit)  
Eh, your currency collapsed because of the referendum and made all your stuff really cheap.  
‘Bewildering and reckless!’ EU wants to HURT London during Brexit talks, says City chief  
As the realities of Brexit become clearer, alarming generational splits are emerging, says @AbiWilks  
A privileged elite: EU staff and MEPs pay as little as 12% income tax   #Brexit 
Spot the difference in the post referendum exchange rate. That's right, none. Except my business is suffering and my holiday cost more.  
Simple Question Think that answer would be a NO 
oppps, I went to buy the brexit supporting Sun 'newspaper' and I honestly thought this was the checkout. Silly me. #dontbuythesun 
Some Brexit context to EU poison eggs scandal. Whatever systems failures on continent, UK's FSA is v v unhappy about losing them.  
Two cabinet ministers 'interested in new anti-Brexit party idea' | Politics | The Guardian  
I've just realised one of the upsides of #Brexit - we'll get loads more stamps in our passports! 
No more profiting from Brexit must be allowed. Murdoch must not be allowed to take over Sky with weak £ v $. Nor must he benefit from this.  
A Very good question Share if you Agree 
Welcome, but long overdue. Pitch as post-Brexit reform opportunistic nonsense, EU never prevented UK from doing this  
Yeah I mean Brexit, Cameron and Theresa May. All successes so far...  
My 88 yr old dad sees spectre of 1930's too. Many in that age group were remainers i believe Shame they get tarred with brexit oldies brush. 
Last word on #r4today: Humphrys is a great man but should do no more Brexit interviews. Too many back issues of @dailymailuk at home in  
In the last quarter, trade with non-EU countries has fallen, so how does Brexit create a fantastic global opportunity for the UK? 
Every country has circa 20% hardcore racists in its population. The trick is to never let them dictate agendas. Britain forgot that. #Brexit  
The man that invented Graphene: leaving the UK because of #Brexit.  
Top scientist considers leaving UK over #Brexit - Government needs to wake up & listen- science needs collaboration   
What was that about jailing referendum liars???  
Farage and chums pensions make up a massive chunk of "the Brexit bill". Maybe we should negotiate not to pay his £72k pa for doing nought  
And yet, I have noticed that the Scottish media have all but ignored how hard Brexit will impact on Scotland.  
Much Leaver comment is abusive. Remember many of these people are authoritarians for whom argument is about dominance, not reasons.#Brexit 
Am exhausted by the #Brexit drama. Hard, off the clff, Tory vs Labour, blah blah, blah.....frankly no longer matters (yes this is a thread) 
.@BBCr4today John Humphrys U may not have 'time nor inclination to debate intricacies of #Brexit' w @jameschappers but WE need to hear him. 
What type of Brexit do you, the British people, want?RT for a large sample. Our government needs to know the will of the people. 
What's the purpose of @BBCr4today if not to debate the intricacies of Brexit? My mistake, I thought you were trusted journalists not yes men  
Odd how the attacks on Mr Chapman are so personal and not about his views on brexit.The real problem,there's no valid argument for Brexit 
Pissed off with austerity? You ain't seen nothing yet. Brexit will bring about austerity that will make these days like "the good old days". 
#Brexit is a policy which, in effect, is giving the deciding say over our lives to the most vile and hate-filled bigots in the land. 
Two cabinet ministers 'interested in new anti-Brexit party idea'  
Brexit will destroy Tory party chances of ever winning again, former chief of staff to Brexit Secretary warns  
Brilliantly written and clearly expresses some of the problems with Labour's Brexit.  
Piss-up in a brewery CANCELLED after Britain’s Brexit negotiators put in charge #FridayFeeling 
Brexit opponent says two senior UK ministers sympathetic to his plans  
The Great Repeal Bill: preparing for Hard Brexit and the great leap to Sweatshop Britain. (Clip from Times.)  
The clock's ticking on Brexit, and time's running out for IndyRef2, before the UK leaves the EU.LET'S GET THIS SORTED!#ScotRef #VoteYES 
This attacking of Welsh is classic bully behaviour.The Brits know they're pathetic compared to the EU so they pick on the little guy #Brexit 
Yes, we are. But if we don't grab the opportunity with both hands we deserve all that hard Brexit will bring.  
SNP’s Brexit minister launches outspoken attack on David Mundell  
Ministers "have started to come to grips with the scale of the Brexit task". It's been 14 months.  
Rising prices, rising xenophobia, falling £, widening trade gap, closing doors, growing authoritarianism #Brexit#notinmyname 
There's less money for the NHS & less staff available to work in it directly due to Brexit which you support. #Clown 
You can't trust the Brexit Extremists that lied in the referendum. It's time they were removed from the cabinet. #StopBrexit 
Islay Branch of @theSNP consulting passers by at the Islay Show yesterday about #Brexit .  Most wanted all three..  
Lush, a great UK success story, is helping its workers leave Brexit Britain—and keep their jobs  
Scientist who made one of the most important discoveries of the century planning to leave UK because of Brexit  
The "glorious ignorance" of xenophobic populism - Trump, Brexit and others  
#brexitwontworkThe experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit | Barry Eichengreen  
Alex Salmond says Scotland should hold second referendum after Brexit 'humiliation'Jog on tubby you're finished   
Whatever one's 'side' on Brexit, we shd ask J Rees-Mogg's views on the Mytilene Debate (Athenian Democracy changes its mind!) @BBCr4today 
Heseltine's right, there's now a possibility of stopping Brexit.Do pro-EU Lab & Tory MPs have the nerve to do so? 
Alex Salmond calls for second independence referendum after Brexit 'humiliation'  
Convenient for Corbyn's Hard Brexit apologists to pretend there's no alternative to Labour. But @jameschappers just exploded that thesis. 
Latest from me. Last in a Brexit series of 5...A defence of the City of London. Needed doing.  
Actually @JohnHumphrysr4 I do have the time and inclination to debate #Brexit and just wish our parliament did too #ExitfrBrexit #BBCR4 
This Govt does not represent the real UK. A new party is needed &  #brexit must be stopped #notinmyname #thedemocrats #euref19  
No idea whether he's helping the cause or not, but Bravo to @jameschappers for refusing to be cowed by the bully Brexiteers. #NotInMyName 
The egg scandal is a stark reminder of the grotesque conditions on factory farms. Brexit must not lower farm animal welfare standards @ciwf 
John Humphrys: 'We have neither the time nor the inclination to debate the intricacies of Brexit'. The reason we are this mess. Thanks BBC 
My cartoon - #Brexit in a nutshell #ReesMogg#JamesChapman#r4Today 
Comedy slot on #r4today just now with Jacob Rees Mogg asserting Tory party is "broadly united" about Brexit. 
James Chapman is smashing it on #R4Today. Jacob Rees-Mogg is a horror. I don't want Brexit to be delivered, I want it to be derailed. 
Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit mistruths, says former chief of staff to David Davis  
Brexit bill will remove right to sue government | News | The Times & The Sunday Times  
Read this and weep. Nobel prize winning physicist predicts Brexit disaster for UK science. He's leaving (+ his team)  
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory on why he finds it 'staggering' how the Govt have been in Brexit negotiations this far on @GMB today. Please RT: 
Is it good or bad that struggling families are getting deeper into debt because Brexit means their incomes are falling, @SteveBakerHW? 
Stages of a Brexit DebateSPOT YOUR FAMILY MEMBERS  
Excellent summary - Brexit and customs union — what’s at stake for Britain  via @FT 
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit 
A tangible benefit of Brexit... anybody? 
Approaching a cliff edge? British business begs for clarity after Brexit maelstrom - When will MPs stop this?  
BREXIT BOOM: UK top of the league in sports exports amid record sales  
Brexit means... the right to destroy your children's health with impunity.  
May's Brexit government plans to remove our right to sue them. A right given to us following a 1991 European Court ruling. @thetimes 
Turkey, day by day, is becoming more critical of KRG independence referendum.Why? Explained it here in detail  
Gove said: "People....have had enough of experts", before spouting his #Brexit bollox.Next:The experts strike back! 
Love the way that @jameschappers is running around shouting out uncomfortable Brexit truths like he has been released from a Daily Mail box. 
UK students ‘may be barred from Erasmus after Brexit’  via @timeshighered 
@HeadUKCivServ  It is just surprising that the whole Civil Service has not yet stopped "brexit" - they would be justified in so doing 
'Brexit can be STOPPED’ Lord Heseltine claims Remainers have opportunity to CHANGE agenda.He's so right.  
Volumes fell 4.9 per cent in June, biggest monthly fall since immediately after Brexit vote.It's not looking good? 
Scientist with one of the century's most important discoveries planning to leave UK because of Brexit  
I'm sure a lot of people would love to see @BorisJohnson in prison for his Brexit lies. The Leave campaign was electoral fraud. #StopBrexit 
If you thought you knew the stances of UK government ministers on Brexit, think again  
Tories called ref,  Tories lost ref, Tories in power, Tories carrying out Brexit negotiations.  But Corbyn is to blame. Got that? 
#Brexit most likely in 2 years NO FTANO passporting rightsNO agreement on landing rights for British aircraft!  
Brought a good zoom mic to Spain to record noise.Just got a piece called "posh Brits discuss Brexit to the sound of me eating a burger" 
Anyone who reads this Petition statement will understand that tax dodging by the rich friends of the Tory Government created #Brexit.  
*Brexit Explained*  
We ALL have a duty to join the anti-Brexit march in London on 9 Sept. It's not just about Brexit, it's about decency and tolerance.  
Petition: Tax dodging The reason for #Brexit. (A good intro with links to this topic) #StopBrexit #Remain 
What the hell did she and her government expect? Brexit isn't a cornfield, it's a bloody minefield she's blundering through.  
I really, REALLY don't want to be fighting Brexit Bullshit. I want my old life back. But to quote Luther ~ "Here I stand. I cannot change." 
#Brexit staff shortage pushing up starting salaries The risk is it reduces Britain's attractiveness for business. 
Brexit becomes much less of a surprise when you watch #Eden 
Immigration and ending freedom of movement is the cold beating heart of the case for Brexit. All 'representations' will be dismissed.  
Accor. to Treaty of Sevres @Kurdistan has right 2 hold referendum for independence @KrgEuro @CharlesTannock @DCBMEP @eu_eeas @EP_ForeignAff 
Everyone is leaving the UK before Brexit hits hard. I reckon Scotland should do the same 
Taking back control! After Brexit you'll lose the right to sue your government — tomorrow's @thetimes #StopBrexit 
Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit mistruths, says former chief of staff to David Davis  
Some Brexit soft cock just added me to his list of traitors. It pretty well curated. I'm now a subscriber. Feel free to join me. pic.twitter.com/ihDMCf7HLw 
*How Remain could have won the referendum*  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit  
It takes a special kind of pious twat to proclaim "angry movements persuade no-one" in the wake of Brexit and President Donald Trump. 
MEMO to David DavisA  positional report on #Brexit talks would be goodAn ACCURATE one please.Come on Tell the TRUTH & shame the devil ! 
Do you want to #ExitBrexit? Join our campaign today:  #brexit #stopbrexit 
Bank of England deputy governor issues starkest warning yet over dangers of cliff-edge #Brexit  
I thought that Effie Deans piece was craziest thing I'd ever read on #brexit and Ireland. How, how wrong I was. Nuts  
Soaring trade deficit shows Brexit export boom has failed to materialise  
Brexit is already a cock-up of monumental proportions.In the future people will say "Brexit victory" to mean "Pyrrhic with farce sprinkles" 
I would prefer Wilshere to Carvalho. With him, Hart and Noble we could start Britain First rallies at Rush Green. Proper Hard Brexit team 
Dictionary definition of Brexit#Brexitisjustticketyboo 
Brexit leader @Nigel_Farage wants YOU to get your copy of 'No Go Zones' now! >>  Already ordered? Give it a RT... 
Brexit is putting centuries of great British innovation at risk  via @business 
Alex Salmond calls for second independence referendum after Brexit 'humiliation'  
That's why it wasn't a binding referendum some things are too complex for the public to understand that's why we've elected representatives  
The Secret Civil Servant: In Brexit negotiations, there is such a thing as a stupid question  
Brexit is dead. At some point the 1970s/80s generation will, to coin a phrase, take back control".  
Actually Remainers want NO brexit. Not soft or hard. NONE. Incidentally, economy doesn't need brexit either, unless you wish it to collapse. 
You’re supporting hard Brexit. You’re supporting our NHS becoming even worse. 
Sadiq Khan Takes On Brexit and Terror | The New Yorker  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on #Brexit. Yet the government crashes on regardless.  
Remainiac manages to make comment about Cornish beaches about Brexit.  Obsessives  
BREXIT that special gift from Dictator Teresa, Back stabbing Boris and Messiah Jeremy. That just keeps giving, giving, giving and giving  
"Gina Miller afraid to leave her home after threats of acid attacks"What a place the UK has become. #Brexit 
Brexit survey by Nature found of 907 UK researchers polled, ~83% believed UK should remain in the EU.They're right  
Autumn of discontent brewing. Will speak in London, Leeds and Brighton. #Brexit  
WATCH: Nigel Farage SLAMS Vince Cable – We had a referendum, you lost, GET OVER IT!  via @Your Brexit 
It's interesting the number of commentators who think people in Scotland have adjusted to brexit. I just don't think that's true. 
Let's be clear, if Remain had won the referendum we wouldn't be having this Soft or Hard terms of membership debate, they'd be no-way back. 
Since the EU referendum, UK goods & services exports have increased by 11.4%, confirms the UK Department for International Trade. One year! 
The same question millions of others have been asking. What are the measurable social & economic benefits of Brexit.  
#Brexit, a disorderly flight of a frightened, confused and ignorant country from its place at the heart of European affairs. #StopBrexit 
Sterling's fall has massively increased manufacturers production costs, leading to lack of competitiveness for worldwide exporters. #Brexit 
The selfishness of brexit can be summed up in one sentence.We don't want to share, we used to be bigger than you. 
.Brexit "sent a clear message to many across the globe that Britain no longer welcomes them or their work". 
ShamefulThe UK is now a world leader in one god-awful trade and it confirms our biggest fear about Brexit 
Ex-David Davis adviser says Boris Johnson should be prosecuted for Brexit claims  
Haha! I have been told: "fuck off back to Krautland, we voted out" rounded off with a Nazi salute. That IS Brexit, folks.  
Real patriots do not harm our international alliances, weaken our economy, risk our union & help an enemy such as Putin #Brexit #StopBrexit 
If Brexit was a mortgage...  
. "The only surprise is that the experts’ predicted economic consequences of Brexit took so long to materialise". 
Job vacancies for Britons soar as Brexit moves closer, says hotel owner  @theresa_may @AmberRuddHR 
Money spent in first division is disgusting, like bloody wacky races. Hard Brexit needed then develop British players called Smith. 
“Brexit is 100% happening. Us wealthy people, who will feel no ill-effects, insist that it does. Too late to change your minds now, plebs!”  
I want independence because we can have a referendum on whether we should become a republic or remain a monarchy  
A couple more British trends surprising me:1. Just how swiftly London, in favour of Paris, become irrelevant to Washington after Brexit. 
Boris Johnson should be jailed over Brexit claims, says ex-David Davis aide  
Arron Banks rants out overthrowing the elite, but he uses the elite privilege of threatening to sue over and over again. #Brexit #Remain 
The public voted for Brexit, for David Cameron, and let Theresa May to return as PM. Don't trust them @walkers_crisps  
The transatlantic climate denier network linked to #Brexit politicians.#Remain #StopBrexit @CarolineLucas 
Labour want exactly the same Brexit as the Tories - a crippling Hard Brexit that costs jobs, influence & hundreds of billions.  
Those who claim that after Brexit we must continue to be subject to EU law for this or that have failed to understand the mandate of Brexit. 
Theresa May MP: Sack Philip Hammond - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
Refugee Conventions have become a political weapon for the destruction of the West.Repeal them or die.#Brexit#SaveTheWest#Trump#Nexit 
Exeter used to be Tory. My majority trebled in 2015 doubled again 2017, thanks to my stance opposing a hard #Brexit 
Multimillionaire Brexit donor becomes director of Nigel Lawson's climate denying and anti-renewables think tank: 
Kurdish referendum is about 1 week before Catalans', so they have their eyes on Kurdistan to measure Intl. reactions  
Lord Heseltine “There's now a window of opportunity to stop Brexit”   
Hate is at the core of Brexit. It's rotten through and through. 
Nobel-prize winning scientist who discovered 21st century super-material 'graphene' may leave UK because of Brexit  
There is no possible positive version of Brexit. It should be scrapped and the relevant apologies made so we can move on. 
Brexit: Scientist behind one of the century's most important discoveries set to leave UK over EU exit  
7) I don't want a Labour government or a Tory one, I want a sane one that will push against the worst excesses or even kill Brexit 
6) to anyone outside the Labour bubble a Labour hard Brexit is exactly as bad to us as a Tory Hard Brexit, it just has more borrowing 
Any politician (or, indeed, journalist) genuinely claiming to care about the country and the people in it should be fighting against Brexit. 
3) then @jameschappers appears with a plan for a new anti Brexit party to actually, you know, fight this properly 
Britain no longer the top destination for tech talent because of Brexit, survey shows  
Present the facts? Arrest those inciting violence and hate - hate directly enabled by this idiotic referendum? 
Maybe a responsible government and a functioning media could make the point about how obviously damaging Brexit is? 
So much of my current inner landscape defined by 3 political defeats. Indyref, Brexit, Trump. I need to shrug all 3 off, to act anew. 
Seems to be some slight correlation between "places that wouldn't get wiped out in nuclear apocalypse" and "places that voted Brexit".  
Leavers talk about Remainers wanting to 'overturn' the result of the #Brexit referendum, as if democratic campaigning was a coup.#Remain. 
Your Brexit voter  
Since the EU referendum UK exports have increased by 11.4%, as British goods and services are in demand across the world, ONS figures show.  
No, a second referendum wouldn't be 'more democratic'. It would be political double jeopardy, says @Tom_Slater_  
We need the same kind of campaign against #Brexit hate and threats as was conducted against racism, but hey ho Corbyn backs Brexit#Remain 
Oxford English Dictionary revises its definition of Brexit  h/t @JulieOwenMoylan 
On why I'm not following Corbyn & Jones down the Brexit rabbit hole:  
Brexit: Scientist behind one of the century's most important discoveries set to leave UK over EU exit  
If Brexit is such a great thing, then how come it needs to be propped up with arson, ABH & death threats? 
Khan wants another referendum on thee EU. How about another election for Mayor?. 
#Brexit glory rhetoric want it to be 1900, when Britain was a superpower and didn’t have to make 'messy' compromises with foreigners #remain 
In Germany there is still the unfaltering belief that the British public deeply regret Brexit  
Kanu’s Call For Referendum In Order, Call For Restructuring Waste Of Time – Bishop    
Starting a new political party to stop Brexit is, on reflection, a f----- stupid idea.  
It is extraordinary that Britain's PM should make remarks which encourage extremists to make terrorist threats. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Remember this when Putin fanboys claim that the Crimean "referendum" or Donbas referendums were about self-determination.  
T May's “trying to subvert democracy” attack on Article 50 campaigners directly incited the threats against Gina Miller#Brexit #StopBrexit 
How the EU tried to hide £500,000 bill for two months' travel | Government to launch Brexit charm offensive  
How many times do we have to tell Leavers that in a democracy you can campaign against any policy, majority or government. #Brexit 
#Brexit gives us the chance to revive our fishing industry  
Telegraph: Britain's Brexit negotiators denied water Brexit talks.I am pretty sure that's water on the table:  
What's next? Are we to be told David Davis crumbled in Brexit negotiations because there were no cucumber sandwiches available??  
Seconded!! "Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit mistruths, says former chief of staff to David Davis"  
#Brexit: re-taking our place in the world 
Irony is that backers of UKIP and Leave.EU are the millionaires and establishment that the Brexit vote was supposed to be a protest against. 
As the world beyond the EU opens up, the post-Brexit opportunities for British research are endless  
We call on all Manchester MPs to reject #Brexit in any form and join the campaign to remain. For all our futures we must #StopBrexit 
Brexit revisionism at its worst. British people did not think 'risk worth the prize' because Vote Leave swore to them risks were fabricated.  
Britain's Brexit negotiators denied water by Brussels during divorce talks, civil servant claims.  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit  
No people living, working & paying taxes in UK did NOT vote for Brexit! #Brexit Vote was #Avisory Only! 
More hate on Remain side, really? Don't recall Remainers threatening acid attacks or murdering MPs.  Passion?  Yes,  Hate?  No. #brexit 
Britain has made a net financial contribution of £184bn to the EU since joining. They can forget their Brexit bill.  
The experts strike back! How economists are being proved right on Brexit | Business | The Guardian  
Another reason we should all fight Barmy Brexit.  
"Well done! You have completely convinced yourself Brexit is fantastic. Unfortunately, you are insane."  
Labour #Brexit position?Allow me, it's easy,bulletproof and keeps everyone happy& it kills hard brexit at no cost 
Greece asks EU for return of Parthenon Marbles as part of Brexit  via @anteksiler 
Another Leaver who can't understand that in a democracy you can campaign against any policy, majority or government. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
We are supporting: Fight Brexit War Chest Crowdfunding Project. Please share & donate.  
I'm no Lawyer, but even I know we were mis-sold #Brexit I am refusing delivery & sending it back by fighting to #StopBrexit @jameschappers 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Russian Journalist Sokolov Jailed for Extremism After Calling for Referendum  
I accept that the referendum happened - how could I not?I cannot accept that a left-wing party can in good conscience pursue hard Brexit. 
Another great thread by Pete North on the perils of designing (EU) and re-designing (Brexit) customs and regulations systems.  
Let's just make this clear: Brexit will be devastating for the UK, & it will hit the poor & the vulnerable the hardest. 
Good thread on why it's hard to prep post-Brexit customs when you have no plans. EEA is a sensible & known half-way house to avoid cliff.  
… was a MISinformed choice.But I guess it's all about priorities. We both know what damage Brexit will do to this country. 
… and via the opinions of the voters. You COULD be pushing the leadership to reconsider Brexit. You know what damage it will do. 
UK students ‘may be barred from Erasmus after #Brexit’. Lots of attention for this article at the moment.  
Me and @MissEllieMae are back for a new episode of #Agitpod! Download later for: Brexit, centrism, nuclear war   
FARAGE: Remoaners lost the referendum - they need to get over it. 
Whether you're In or Out on the EU no one (except idiots) can be happy with the way the Tories are screwing #Brexit up and hurting jobs  
12) He has nothing constructive to say on Brexit - he's just Corbyn flavoured quicksand acting as lag against it's eventual death 
Says an individual who wholeheartedly supported Musharraf's referendum 
Owen is talking as if all remain voters want a soft Brexit. Not one I know wants that. We want to remain. But just see soft better than hard 
Dave Simonds on the continuing farce of the UK's Brexit negotiations  - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Can we never lose sight of the fact that David Cameron unnecessarily landed us in this Brexit mess & then fucked off to live in a shed. 
#Brexit is the best advertising the EU could ever have hoped for. 
Brutal from Heseltine on why he encouraged May to appoint BoJo, Fox & Davis to lead Brexit. Full article:  
Sir Andre Geim describes Brexit as a disaster for UK science and how likely it is he will leave the country -  
10. Brexit was always a dream for people who yearn for good times that never were.Now Brexit is a good time that will never be. 
Complete tosh by regurgitated #SNP failure :#Brexit powers LEGALLY go from Brussels to UK, can then be transferred to devolved admins.  
3. If there's a better word than "idiot" for anyone who still thinks Brexit will benefit ANYONE but the super-rich I can't think of it. 
UK is no longer the desired choice of destination for international tech talent due to Brexit  
London bus veers off road at high speed in2 a shop as driver 'blacks out'Wonder what his name is?#Brexit #DC #MAGA 
4. Poll after poll suggests a majority against Brexit. UKIP is history. Farage is going down with Trump. These are dark days for Quitlings. 
It's all very well to say "I oppose a Hard Brexit" but it's meaningless unless you actually, you know, *oppose* a Hard Brexit. 
This cartoon on Brexit from French paper Liberation is...hm.  
"The public aren't fools they won't vote to get rid of Prawn Cocktail crisps". I fear disappointment like Brexit. pic.twitter.com/KZBQoMBL77 
Remember when Farage said this? "In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way."  
SNP MP calls for cross-party alliance in remain-voting Scotland to defeat hard Brexit  
I'm not so sure, Andrew. Brexit threatens a political crisis far greater than anything in the 80s. By 2019 landscape could be transformed  
UK exports down, imports up, Brexit hitting a brick wall, it's only a matter of time before it falls apart.  
How are you pretending Brexit is still a good idea?  
Your entire career is based on not accepting the result of the previous referendum, you disingenuous motherfucker.  
'@Nigel_Farage to Vince Cable: "We had a referendum, you lost! Get over it!" Will Remoaners ever respect democracy?  
I'm definitely with Hugo on this one. If you support 'soft Brexit' now, you're a Brexiteer. Doesn't matter how you voted before. 
If Brexit was a mortgage...@peterjukes 
.@Telegraph: "Hurrah for Brexit!".....but if you are rich and want to avoid the dreadful aftermath, here's how.  
And they're processing Brexit for 27 countries more effectively than our Govt can handle for one.  
Thank you to today's facilitators at our Brexit summit with @WalkerWorcester at @AstonUniversity 
Big cheer @WalesGovernance Brexit seminar as research shows welsh speaking voters are the most pro European in Wales  @RWynJones 
Looks like @BorisJohnson MEANT to say during his disgraceful EU Referendum campaign that the Tories would MAKE £350m a week out of the #NHS. 
Or the man who sunk Northern Rock writing a column about the economic benefits of Brexit. Wait, that already happened. 
One of the many reasons why people voted for Brexit was Brussels’ love of lavish, out-of-touch spending  
Not as valuable as oil, not as famous as whisky, but the row over Scotland's fish cd yet halt WM's Brexit power grab  
#honestpoll Those threatening Gina Miller with acid attacks speak volumes of #brexit half baked psychology. Pls RT for inclusivity. 
Has Brexit changed your plans to live outside the UK?  
Pass this on to every Leave voter who still thinks Brexit is a good idea.  # via @HuffPostUKPol 
Depressingly predictable consequence of underfunding, pay cuts & government completely distracted by Brexit.  
"Brexit is a CATASTROPHE" - James Chapman, former advisor to chief Brexiteer David Davies. Stop the #BrexitShamles  
Please can we end this talk of a new 'anti-Brexit' party & call it a 'pro-EU' one? Have europhiles learnt NOTHING about positive messages? 
Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit lies, says former chief of staff to David Davis  
If you mean "a lot of left-wing people get VERY ANGRY when I call them centrists bc they don't like Brexit, Corbyn, & Chavez", then sure.  
Just the tip of the iceberg. Tell me again about your plans for a second referendum?  
Don’t blame Brexit – Public Health England is shrinking our chocolate bars  
Time to admit that #Brexit will make us poorer in every way. Let's take our message to Party Conferences. @parentsmagazine @MumsClub @nusuk  
Absolutely. It's a carefully constructed artifice. It's what enabled (forgive the over-simplification) Brexit and Trump. 
Finally, the #Brexit phoney war is coming to an end and the real fighting is about to start. Can May keep control? >  
I want an exit from Brexit  
Have you ever met met a person who blames everyone &  everything else for their life's miseries? That's the #Brexit mentality.#StopBrexit 
Brexit and customs union — what’s at stake for Britain (£)  
Farage furious at EU judgeWe didn't vote #Brexit for 'compromise' on sovereigntyWe voted to take back full control 
Wrong to conflate anti-Brexit with Centrism. Nothing Left Wing about embracing  the destruction of jobs, workers rights & multiculturalism 
The UK must be able to execute an independent trade policy from day one of Brexit, argues @ShankerASingham  
Welsh is as natural to us as breathing. A language of love. And laughter. And originality. In the wake of Brexit we still know who we are. 
Why when you sign up to Brexit do you have to take whole mad package:climate change denial,privatisation of NHS & the 'I  Donald' T-shirt? 
Theresa May to win Brexit by sitting on her chair at low tide at Kent coast screaming at the sea 
Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
We have updated our #Brexit reading list. Find everything you need in one place:  
Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit claims, says former chief of staff to David Davis  
Brexit will empower big business, undermining workers and the welfare state - my latest article free to download 
Brexit means Brexit Red Brexit means Blue BrexitJeremy wants Brexit so does MayEither way we get Brexit And Brexit means Brexit 
Loving the 'if Brexit was art' feature in @TheNewEuropean - this week's from @leo_lach 
Just saying. The Brexit staff shortages will get a LOT worse in September. EU workers will go home for their holidays... and never come back 
Letter from today's Herald.Martin gets published again - this time on the matter of Brexit and what the SNP really want...  
A brilliant piece debunking all the 'reasons for #brexit' myths.A must read for Leavers and MP's  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Why should Britain pay billions as a Brexit bill so jet-set Juncker can keep travelling in style?  
Corbyn wants Venezuela, Russia & Iran, the Tories want Trump & Saudi Arabia. We Remainers want European democracy.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
#Brexit should be a warning for any "popular" vote conceived as a palliative to internal party warfare. @latingle.  
I'm happy former Brexit journalists are moving to Remain. Just not sure if they're opportunists. Invite them in, but lock up the silver !!! 
A new British political party whose supporters shared nothing but opposition to Brexit would either self-destruct or be easy to tear apart. 
And Brexit is far from the only subject on which blue Vote Leave and red Vote Leave are near-indistinguishable...  
V good piece on one of many paradoxes in Brexit debate (another: EU is too slow & lumbering making FTAs and yet will do a quick FTA with UK)  
Love the lobby but it needs to take a long hard look at why it is not asking @Number10gov hard questions over Brexit #bresist 
Often they're not even centrists, just "Hard Remain". They've become as obsessed with the EU as Hard Brexiteers were before the referendum 
Brexit boost as Bank of England admits increased demand for UK goods means UK is less reliant on consumer spending  
I campaigned for Remain, I oppose a hard Brexit. If some anti-Brexiteers see me as the enemy, where does that leave the wider electorate? 
Buy Bollocks to brexit stickers here...  
Of course, many want Brexit for justifiable reasons. But want to get the bends? Think of the UK during London 2012. Then look at us now. 
Don't @ me maybe chat to the families of the 4,000 people at a retail firm who got laid off yesterday due to falling pound caused by Brexit 
Lord Heseltine interview: There's now a window of opportunity to stop Brexit  
Yes, there was racism and hate before the referendum but it's like now it has a license to operate. One example among many:  
Kanu’s call for referendum or no election in order - Cleric - Vanguard News  
Apparently @UKLabour wants to know our views on Brexit. Well here's one they prepared earlier which sums it up well:  
But a massive increase since Brexit. It's like Brexit has implied it's ok. There are countless examples... 
NEW: Lord Heseltine tells BI: Johnson, Davis and Fox are "the right people to prove" Brexit can't be done  
Agree Brexit bill drives coach and horses through Scotland Act. Agriculture and Fisheries devolved so ScotGov+ UKGov negotiate UK frameworks  
BBC Needs to concentrate on Britain 
Agree with this: my old Telegraph colleague @BorisJohnson should be jailed for his Brexit lies  
Hello @LiamFox. Is Brexit deal going to be totally straightforward or harder than the Moon landings as @DExEUgov says? #confused  
Leave side is producing this appalling behaviour. Think on that, and the amazing restraint of Remainers who see the wholesale mess of Brexit  
Thing is, the Brexit coup has already happened, supported by Corbyn and the establishment. Collusion is the word.  
Lib Dems to end political truce by joining anti-Brexit rally at Tory conference  
A very good analysis of Labour #brexit options#brexitwontwork via @tony_nog 
A referendum on Australia becoming a Republic would narrowly win according to a poll out today. #7News 
Corbyn,@OwenJones84 et al seem to think severely diminished,post Brexit economy is price worth paying as long as there's increased equality 
Me, watching @jameschappers eviscerating the craven traitors of Brexit   
A quick primer about #Brexit and the #IrishBorder from Jacob #ReesMogg.#Brexitshambles #EU #Tories #NorthernIreland #Ireland #DUP #MayDUP 
12. Anti-Brexiteers love Macron but he had it easyUK equivalent =Lab on 18% May on corruption chargesChoice anti-Brexit party or Farage 
President Barzani to @AlAhram : The goal of referendum is independence , we don't need to get permission from any one.  
Woman who forced the government to obey the law over Brexit still getting threats of death or acid  @thatginamiller 
What can we do to make Brexshiters join up the dots? Their Brexit is going to hurt them, how do we get them to see that?Brexit costs!  
This is the issue.Both major parties see Brexit as an opportunity to impose outdated world view on the UK. 
Unsurprisingly, as the truth about Russia's involvement in Trump and Brexit is exposed, the tactics of collaborators escalate to madness. 
Ah, the silly season finally arrives.David Davis defends Brexit team gender balance  
Boris Johnson should be jailed over Brexit claims, says ex-David Davis aide  
Former EU Official: Conservative Brexit strategy the most harmful government policy for over 50 years  
Oh my god, our negotiating team has sunk this low already. Brexit's done.  
'We've collectively let younger people down' - #VinceCable speaks on behalf of the older generation on Brexit and financial crisis 
.@theresa_may's party is about to "descend into all out war" over #Brexit, writes @BethRigby in #SkyViews 
Brexit and customs union — what’s at stake not only during transition  via @FT 
EU plans to restrict movement of UKers living in EU after Brexit  
As far as I can see sole aim. of @jameschappers is to stop Brexit.  He's dangerous because he knows where the bodies buried 
Excellent primer on Brexit and the customs union.  
Brexit definition  
Boycotting because you hate Turnbull/Abbott/Shelton is like boycotting the Brexit vote because you hate Farage. And look how that went. 
The "No" camp will utterly commit to this. The "yes" camp is riddled with (justifiable) uncertainty. Getting Brexit vibes. #marriagequality 
Brexit seems to be leading the UK into a constitutional crisis, @theresa_may Freezing like a rabbit caught in headlights is a bit inadequate 
Brexit happened because people were ignorant. Trump happened because people boycotted. Do not boycott the plebiscite. #MarriageEquality 
Brexit: an absolute nightmare scenario - No one has a plan for a post-Brexit horseracing industy  ...  #Brexit.  
It's worse than that. Brexit is choosing to destroy the UK and  deprive the majority of the  population of their previous standard of living 
Stop Brexit!  
Imagine a remainer threatening this?When you support Brexit, you're on the same side as these people.  
Wanting sovereignty and then being upset when someone goes to court to ensure parliament (the people) are sovereign.  Brexit logic I guess. 
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
Respect to Lord Adonis but this is no time for tribalism.Corbyn wants Hard Brexit & he is untouchable right now  
Welcome aboard! Until recently James's job was to facilitate & execute Brexit, now he's another in a long line of those who reject Brexit.  
Trump's immigration stance is having a similar effect on foreign job applicants for the US as Brexit did in the UK  
Reckoned the stances of UK ministers on #Brexit transition were a simple matter? Think again:  via @FT 
Brexit an ‘opportunity’ for Irish nationalists, says George Galloway  
Oh fuck me! A soft landing Brexit!! I weep for my country. Any form of Brexit is Brexit except No Brexit. If we #StopBrexit we get No Brexit  
Not annoyed, but wholly disillusioned with a Labour Party which now apparently reveals itself as a supporter of Brexit, with all that means.  
The British people should get the final say on any Brexit deal in a referendum. Agree? Add your name:  
Theresa May’s cabinet split three ways over Brexit transition  
Why Switzerland is DESPERATE for Brexit: Swiss economic prospects to improve after UK exit  
GM went to court because May was trying to circumvent Parliamentary democracy - ironic when Brexit was about sovereignty! GM is inspiring! 
After 14 months, it dawns on Theresa May that some diplomacy on Brexit (instead of nationalist shouting) might be a good idea...  
20 years later and @TurnbullMalcolm is repeating many of the same basic mistakes of the Republic Referendum - all over again#GodwinGrech 
"James Chapman, who was a former chief of staff to David Davis, says Brexit is a catastrophe"  
Now more than ever I'd say: Brexit has a distinct colonial stench, Empire 2.0 and all that.  
I don't consider these people Brexiteers. Maybe that's what they think they are.  Being a thug's got nothing to do with #Brexit#GinaMiller 
My employer has invited me to speak with their lawyers about my status as an EU national. Last year this was my home. #Brexit #notwelcome 
Brexit is absolutely Barmy. We need to Stop it! 
This is quite simply Leave.EU supporting terrorism.Enough is enough #Brexit terrorists must be prosecuted. #StopBrexit #Remain 
The U.K. and Scotland fail to reach an agreement on post-Brexit powers  
I’m not quite sure what happened to @jameschappers today. But wow, it’s been quite something! Do carry on James! #Brexit  
Boris Johnson should be jailed over Brexit claims, says ex-David Davis aide  
Britain's Brexit negotiators denied water by Brussels during divorce talks, civil servant claims  
But many people are still failing to grasp that it's impossible to make a good job of handling a project based on lies and delusions#Brexit  
Why Switzerland is DESPERATE for Brexit: Swiss economic prospects to improve after UK exit  
And they will spend the rest of their lives in a post-Brexit crash. The same Brexit that Corbyn supports.  
BREXIT BOOM: Surge in UK investment after EU exit as firms to spend less on European staff  
'Millionaires tried to shout us down!' Fisherman mocks metropolitan elite and hails Brexit  
Absolutely Fabulous will show future generations how fun life was before Brexit, writes @lizziemaypalmer  
Pressure is mounting on HMG to ditch the hard Brexit policy for a softer approach but fear the unholy hard left & right hardBrexit alliance  
Pre referendum - ill informed, duped, lied to.Post referendum - ill informed, duped, lied to, stupid.#StopBrexit 
I think it is very sad that Brexit was caused by lack of education. Reversing it will be quite embarrassing. But it has to be done. 
The leave campaign lied very effectively. Many who voted leave were duped, not stupid. Those continuing to support Brexit now are stupid.  
Gerry Adams says any Sinn Féin coalition deal would focus on housing, health, Brexit 
New anti-Brexit party = fringe. Urban liberals underestimate how hard it is to get new party off ground & rally cohesive electorate. 
I am now supporting 4 crucial campaigns. No Brexit, a Corbyn gov, don't eat meat and now save Count Arthur Strong.  
I don't know.#Brexit is just an excuse. It brought them out of the ooze.Dame #GinaMiller-for services to #Parliament-The People's Assembly  
#Brexit reality1) If we had a functioning opposition then there would be effective calls for the resignation of Gove, Johnson & Leadsom  
The silence is deafening...both Johnson & Davis incapable/unwilling to engage to give us a simple answer - what ARE the benefits of #Brexit?  
Brexit - or at least, a Brexit that does the British people any GOOD - is a fantasy. 52% vote doesn't change it. *100%* wouldn't change it. 
Exactly. Time to put pride aside and admit the blindingly obvious - Brexit the worst decision for Britain in centuries.  
Follow @jameschappers. He is destroying #brexit and brexiteers! 
Finally someone calls Brexit out for what it is. New party - how about Vince, Ken, George and James? Count me in please. #StopBrexitNow 
The U.K. and Scotland fail to reach an agreement on post-Brexit powers  
May was trying to bypass ParliamentWe'd just fought a referendum on the premise of sovereignty & May was threatening that 
Feeling a lot of love in room for @jameschappers. It is indeed time to stand up and be counted over the impending disaster that is #Brexit. 
David Davis accuses EU of failing to match Britain's offer on the rights of citizens after Brexit  
Btw Politico churning out scoop after scoop on Brexit, putting everyone else to shame. Incredible team they have in Parliament. 
Scoop: May orders Brexit charm offensive coordinated by special new Whitehall unit drawn from Dexeu & Foreign Office  
Statement from @scotgov - Brexit Bill talks  
Ex-army chief savages BITTER Remainers as he highlights THIS post-Brexit report.   
UK's data protection plans are an early example of the Brexit myth of 'taking back control'. My latest blogpost:  … 
Trump's immigration stance is having a similar effect on foreign job applicants for the US as Brexit did in the UK  
As part of the ongoing #Brexit negotiations the EU has announced that it will withheld the sunshine from Britain...#BritishSummerTime 
National retail chain put my daughter on redundancy notice today citing rising import costs due to £ nosedive. 4,000 staff going. #Brexit 
Alistair Darling speaks out about the negative impact of Brexit, rising consumer debt and risks they pose to the economy. #StopBrexit 
Brexit has started a new conversation on the island of Ireland. We need to talk about shaping a new debate on a United Ireland @moneillsf 
Food security has to be a Brexit priority | Letters  
Dear #Brexit fans. Is your philosophy so warped that its adherents threaten acid attacks? Nice company you have.  
That's just not even close to true Owen. I honestly have no idea how you can be so deluded about brexit. I thought you were a decent chap 
Do people just push a button & pre-prescribed Brexit sound bites come out without having to think? pic.twitter.com/puKYtMLK4h 
Hearing rumours of thousands of redundancies at retailer Wilko because of brexit. #stopbrexit 
Soft brexit means that we dont leave the four freedoms, which is what we voted to leave 
. @jameschappers has been vv brave on Brexit - & a whole range of politicians are too craven to say the same even though they know it's true  
Quite something from the recent Chief of Staff to the Brexit Secretary. @BorisJohnson thinks he has got away with that big lie - he hasn't 
SNP confirms Scottish parliament will still try to stop brexit bill  via @HuffPostUKPol #StopBrexit 
Everyone is bringing up food standards do they forget the same EU food standards that gave us horse meat instead of beef??? #brexit 
I've acquired several Twitter followers who are young ladies keen on webcam sex. I hope they appreciate my comments on Brexit and cricket. 
MPs who say #Brexit must go through to avoid violence are surrendering to, encouraging & legitimising terrorism. #Remain #StopBrexit 
No agreement in latest Scots-UK Brexit powers talks - BBC News  
65% of Labour voters voted remain. When it becomes apparent Corbyn is pushing his lifelong Brexit ideology they'll turn against him 
'Denier' label, whether on climate change, austerity or Brexit, is a tawdry insult.  
I believe there's now enough signatures to put RTW referendum on the Nov 2018 ballot! Missouri DSA will be working to get this voted DOWN  
I suppose these junket expenses are all part of the make-believe 'Brexit bill'. What a bunch of jokers.  
Furthermore, we should ask whether any of our MPs have changed their public stance on #Brexit in response to such terrorist threats? 
Greece Should Demand the Parthenon Marbles Return for ‘Smooth Brexit’ Says Activist, via @GreekReporter  
Does anyone know of a #Brexit politician condemning the threats of violence coming from Brexiters?#StopBrexit #Remain 
."It is insane for unionists to have supported Brexit because it has created a fundamental instability in the UK". 
Ex-David Davis aide calls for MPs in all parties to admit Brexit is a catastrophe, come together, and reverse it 
You have to raise your game. Why not explain that #Brexit will require changes to Scotland Act and warn of possible danger to devolution.  
Unbelievable. A Tory other than Ken Clark actually talking common sense on Brexit. Brilliant. Please don't stop. 
More #Brexit voters discovering the 'have cake & eat it' nonsense was exactly that. And just wait till all Cornwall's EU grants stop...   
Amber Rudd, MP for Rye invokes popular film Dunkirk & Dunkirk spirit for Brexit. Rye fishing fleet refused to go to Dunkirk. 
Philip Hammond is more unpopular than ever with Tory members who don't share his soft #Brexit hopes.  @MailOnline 
I'm in Victoria station. Choice 1- pro EU Costa coffee or 2- pro brexit Wetherspoons? Easy. Vote with your feet. #Remain 
Just realised our chlorinated brexit chicken is now also going to be radioactive 
Centrists: Theres no centerist anti-Brexit party. Am politically homelessOthers: what about LibDemsCentrist: Don't want them 
Talks between the UK and Scottish govts on post- Brexit powers break up without agreement. SG say they can't consent to Withdrawal Bill. 
Banking watchdog warns of risks from cliff-edge Brexit  via @FT 
Absolutely Fabulous will show future generations how fun life was before Brexit, writes @lizziemaypalmer  
Many of the issues that do come up will be worsened by Brexit, both parties are weak in seeing 'Brexit' as separate rather than overarching 
'Millionaires tried to shout us down!' Fisherman mocks metropolitan elite and hails Brexit  
BREXIT BOOM: Surge in UK investment after EU exit as firms to spend less on European staff  
Nigel Farage, just a tool in the transatlantic clique trying to foist #Brexit on Britain.#StopBrexit #Remain 
How Switzerland is DESPERATE for Brexit: Swiss economic prospects to improve after UK exit  
Let's have no Brexit! Better by far!!  
I always wonder, if you aren't a historical materialist why do you think things happen - Corbyn, Trump, Brexit, Syriza - like they do? > 
Cameron's claim that leaving the EU could spark WW3 existed only in newspaper headlines. Here's the speech #Brexit 
Ex-DExEU chief of staff, @jameschappers, says it's time "to admit Brexit is a catastrophe" 
A referendum is just a way for a government to see if a certain policy will be popular. It is an aid to a decision; not the decision itself. 
In normal scheme of things the Daily Mail wd conduct a full scale hostile operation on Brexit denier @jameschappers. More than a little awks 
Well, 2 days waiting @BorisJohnson & nothing back! So can our #Brexit negotiator can help? 3 benefits of Leaving the EU? @DavidDavisMP 
Stop EU exit 'catastrophe', says UK Brexit minister's ex-chief of staff  
Here's what the British Election Study has to say about the importance of Brexit.  
Welcome that Spain won't raise question of Gibraltar's sovereignty in Brexit negotiations.  
The Conservatives called the referendum, they are negotiating Brexit. They own it and the consequences. We are not in government 
It's clear financial services will remain strong after Brexit.  
Remind me what Mervyn thinks about Brexit...  
Tragic but inevitable. London will pay a price for Brexit which it voted against to its great credit and my pride as its last MEP for 18 ys  
Sack Mark Carney. He should have been as sacked during Referendum, now vital. We need a committed Brexiteer in carge of Bank of England. 
No - he's standing shoulder to shoulder with Arron Banks, Paul Dacre, Jacob Rees-Mogg and other millionaires who stand to gain from #Brexit 
BREXIT BOOM: Surge in UK investment after EU exit as firms to spend less on European staff  
Catalonia and Spain: Will the referendum on independence go ahead?  
The three ‘whats’ of leaving the EU – Brexit Means podcast  
An anti-Brexit party called the Democrats....? Do you see the problem here? 
Labour MPs are pushing for a soft Brexit. A soft Brexit would be awful for the UK.  
*Brexit Explained*  
The Centre for Crossborder Studies Publishes an Update of its Briefing Paper on ‘Brexit and Economic Development’  
Ex David Davis aide calls for formation of new political party to reverse catastrophe of Brexit...  
UK needs new party to stop 'catastrophic' Brexit, says ex-David Davis aide @jameschappers #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Hey Brexiters, this is the graph of Brexit making you poorer, day by day  
Top German MEP on Brexit: ‘For Christ’s sake, give them the best trade deal possible.’  
LOL: Former Osborne adviser calls for new Remoaner Party. Wake up and smell the Brexit coffee guys!  
Net Figures, Gross Deception – Why there is no big Brexit bonus for public services  
With dire threats of #FireAndFury from the USA & #NKorea, I feel far safer within the #EU alliance than outside it. Don't you? #Brexit 
Former @DefraGovUK Secretary @OwenPaterson has called the £36billion Brexit divorce bill “frankly barmy”  
You're underestimating huge anger from Remainers who voted Labour, expecting some opposition to hard Brexit. Stop taking them for granted.  
Former chief of staff to Brexit Secretary calls for new political movement to oppose Britain's exit from the EU  
Former chief of staff to David Davis: Brexit is a catastrophe  
UK needs new party to stop 'catastrophic' Brexit, says ex-David Davis aide  
Brexiteers don't understand this. You don't have to be an EU obsessive to oppose Brexit. Caring about our economy or society will suffice.  
Growing pressure for Labour to change their line on Brexit as more MPs oppose leaving the single market & nixing FOM 
Which side was Mr Chapman really working for in the Brexit department?  
MPs demanded confirmation that UK would be out of the EU's growing defence policy post-Brexit.Govt would not confirm:  
EEA/EU27 citizen in the UK? Please take part in @LSEnews study on post referendum impact, PR process & citizenship  
A BoE deputy governor underlines fears for banks and insurers if they have no time to adjust to a post-Brexit regime  
Direct investment in UK from EU companies has created over 110,000 new jobs since 2012 #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
There are whispers in Whitehall about a ‘soft landing’ Brexit  
The definition of Brexit.  
David Davis has written to @LordsEUCom to give a detailed update on the second round of Brexit negotiations  
Big shout-out to @jameschappers - and yes, the UK urgently does!  UK needs new party to stop 'catastrophic' Brexit  
Put it on the Brexit bill: EU expenses row as it emerges Juncker spent £24,000 on private flight to Rome #premium 
In GFA, UK government 'gave away control' in a forum that can't just be 'taken back' via Brexit. Seem almost no Brexiteers understand this 
It's almost a certainty that #Brexit will mean the break up of the United Kingdom, which is why the Queen is pro-EU.  
RT if you agree! Ex-David Davis aide calls for new party to reverse the 'catastrophe' of Brexit  
Adams says any Sinn Féin coalition deal would focus on housing, health, Brexit  
.@DavidDavisMP writes to EU Cmttee outlining progress in round 2 of #Brexit negotiations  
The #Brexit oldies grew up on tales of Brits beating the Bosch, while themselves living lives overshadowed by the glory of those before them 
Wine journalists who deserve credit for highlighting the failures of Brexit @GilesMacDonogh @jymbudd @Timatkin @sloweyes @robertjoseph. 
That sound you hear is even the Brexit Secretary's former allies realising what a punch-your-own-face catastrofuck Brexit will be... pic.twitter.com/pOVGkT9uL2 
We've reached 82% of our funding target! Here's a sample page of Captain Brexit as a rewardHelp fund #TheBrexit 
Voting Labour is equivalent to voting UKIP on the subject of brexit.  No thanks 
Call for new political party to stop Brexit 'catastrophe'  
Then good luck saving NHS. Brexit = lower tax take & higher borrowing costs, so less spending & nakes it harder to recruit nurses & doctors. 
The ex-chief of staff to the Brexit secretary said what he really thinks about Brexit, and it's brutal  
The #brexit @KITKAT bar 
Strong  yet just  words from former @DailyMailUK political editor - kudos!Time to admit the #Brexit illusion is based on lies#StopBrexit 
REVEALED: @JonathanPlaid discovers UK Gov has no plans for official Brexit meetings with devolved administrations  
So, .@jameschappers has made his feelings about #Brexit clear, once again. Oh dear, oh dear, oh dear Theresa May... 
Monumental levels of denial, ignorance & arrogance from Digby Jones: "not one job will be lost bc of Brexit ... Germany will force a deal"  
Brexit austerity will kill the NHS 
Just who’s in charge? Bank of England chief turns screws on No10 to SOFTEN Brexit plans. Get rid of Carney  
10 years to the day from the financial crash, economists on BBC News just predicted another recession within a year. Cause: Brexit. 
Theresa May is left with egg on her face as a former Brexit guru calls it a ‘catastrophe'  
David Davis’ former chief of staff calls for a new political party to reverse the ‘catastrophe’ of #Brexit #Remain 
"We will not allow a referendum in Catalonia because Spain is a democratic country"  Groucho Marx? Benni Hill? No. Mariano Rajoy.  No Fake.  
Stop EU exit 'catastrophe', says UK #Brexit minister's ex-chief of staff  
Former chief of staff to David Davis describes Brexit as a 'catastrophe' @Independent 
Stop EU exit 'catastrophe', says UK Brexit minister's ex-chief of staff  
UK needs new party to stop 'catastrophic' Brexit, says former David Davis aide  
James Chapman (UK Government Chief of Staff for #Brexit last year) now admits it will be a "catastrophe". Calls for unity to "reverse it". 
Has anyone blamed the North Korea nuke thing on Brexit yet? 
'Who voted for Juncker?' Farage REBUKES caller who claims EU is a democratic body  NO BODY VOTED FOR HIM 
Yesterday the LP rang me to find out why I hadn't renewed membership - Corbyn/Brexit. Explained as remain I felt lost and unrepresented. 
Why r Supreme Court judges fretting over role of European Court after Brexit. Our court will be what it says on the tin: Supreme 
Can we stop using the term "grab" and call it what it is: theft. Scottish, Welsh and NI powers are being stolen by England. #Brexit  
Evening Standard: No agreement in the Cabinet or Parliament about out future relationship with the EU #Brexit 
With respect Owen the current labour brexit strategy will split the vote too. 
A new party to stop Brexit "if need be"? I'd be up for that. Anyone else?  
Spot on thread. "It's simply laughable to say "I can't vote Lib Dems over fees but I can vote Corbyn who is betraying me on Brexit""  
Devastating change of position from Brexit Secretary's former chief of staff. @TheGreenParty policy for #euref19 gaining support! 
If David Davis's former advisory says Brexit will be a "catastrophe" then you know it will be really bad. #StopBrexit 
US stock futures down across the board this morning, which is a referendum on Obama’s failed administration. 
A Brexit minister has insisted the City of London and the Channel Islands will remain financial hubs in Europe  
Top German MEP on Brexit: ‘For Christ’s Sake, Give Them the Best Trade Deal Possible’  
Former chief of staff to David Davis: Brexit is a catastrophe  
The Brexit vote has created a united Ireland, at least when it comes to the border   
#IndyRef2 means the most powerful @ScotParl. Ross hypocrisy is breathtaking as he wants #Brexit to hand devolved powers back to Westminster.  
BREAKING NEWS: Europe has decided to withhold the sunshine from Britain as part of ongoing Brexit negotiations  #britishsummertime 
Timely warning on the dangers for @UKLabour of being complicit in a disastrous hard Tory #Brexit  
A left-wing Brexit is possible – we could change society for good  
Eurozone may start to collapse in 2017. Brexit will be a sideshow. We must get out before EU demands we throw billions into euro blackhole. 
Stopping Brexit is more important than any party allegiance. When are people going to realise this?  
I'm supporting  Chest/ #Fight Brexit #StopBrexit  @_Britain4Europe @crowdfunderuk 
Well. That @jameschappers is setting the cat amongst the pigeons. About time the truth of #Brexit was told. It'll be catastrophic. 
Ex-David Davis aide calls for new party to reverse the 'catastrophe' of Brexit - Mirror Online  
Brexit is a 'catastrophe', says former David Davis adviser | Holyrood Magazine  
What's the breaking point?When does pressing needs of Country to stop Brexit, outweigh traditional party loyalty?  
And if 'arguing it out' fails, what then?You'd stay loyal to party & Brexit happens?Stopping Brexit surely more important than party!  
Has govt yet corrected ministers' claims Brexit will not limit cancer treatments, now condemned as false by every expert body in the land? 
What I'd give to have someone as cool and sensible as Darling running Britain/Brexit now  
Brexit Is A Catastrophe, Says David Davis' Ex-Chief Of Staff James Chapman  
Firms blame Brexit for unfilled jobs. Associated wage rise for workers not expected to keep up with inflation  
As am off active Twitter, I have rounded-up some recent Brexit links and tweets at @JackofKent.May be of interest. 
Welsh and Scottish governments demand UK-wide #Brexit meeting - BBC News  
Today's Brexit round-up – referendum promises, EU position, UK position, Ireland, single market, Brexit bill, ECJ 
Please Go, Go, Go for a Democrats party. Soon be too late.  Must be to stop Brexit not 'soft' Brexit. 
I voted Labour tactically, however it will be Lib Dem next time regardless of tactics. I'll not support Brexit in any way. 
19) and if the pain free #brexit promised by Vote Leave cannot be delivered,the opposition should be demanding resignations. 
This is a serious question. When I ask a Corbynite why do they support him when he wants a hard Brexit, I don't get a reply. Why is that? 
The UK Supreme Court affter Brexit - once we have left UK judges no longer have to follow new judgments by the European Court of Justice. 
Warned by .@jameschappers ex-Chief of Staff to Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP and ex #dailymail that #Brexit 'catastrophe'. He should know. 
Grow up, Brian! Listen to the clever man who knows best. 'People like you' - he means Scots, unable to cut it unlike genius Brexit UK types.  
President Barzani: those countries who say the referendum is ill timed, what is their suggestion for a good time? What is alternative?  
Bailing the banks cost every man, woman & child in Britain £20,000 - £1.2TRILLION in total. #Brexit is loose change by comparison.  
If this pressure on Corbyn over Brexit doesn't work, pro-EU Labour MPs need to break away for sake of the country. 
Many of us are ashamed of project Brexit, its rationale, its purpose, its impact on our future, and the embarrassment it has caused the UK.  
I'm as alarmed by Brexit as anyone but new party no salvation. I was in SDP; it failed. If you are on Left, stay with Labour. Argue it out! 
By voting Brexit, as a nation that also means we're no longer entitled to summer. Enjoy your heatwave, the rest of Europe  
Lord Darling: 'Brexit is causing "massive uncertainty". Alarm bells are ringing' for UK economy.  
We need a government of national unity to sort out the mess of Brexit. We need our MPs from both sides to put country before party. #brexit 
The Brexit Elite lied, deliberately & cruelly misleading the old, vulnerable & infirm. Defending this behaviour degrades GB democracy.  
David Davis MP is going into the Brexit negotiations with his eyes wide open.#MPsPortraits 
Now Preisdent Barzani in Erbil meeting w/1000 Kurdistan Muslim clerics.Referendum is not only for Kurds,for all other nations in Kurdistan.  
There won't just be one punishment budget if Brexit proceeds GBH. A decade of them as businesses flee and revenues collapse #brexitbonus 
#summerofdiscontent it's important now that we keep hammering the points home on Brexit nonsense in preparation for #autumnofdiscontent 
Plus of course . . . Brexit can no longer be described as "democratic".  The EU Ref was very far from democracy.  
It is time to put a BREXIT team in the 'negotiations'Sack the Remain saboteursCarry out the will of the electorateRepeal the 1972 ECA now  
Labour would like your opinion on Brexit. Remainers please give it and RT. Thanks!  
How much does the UK contribute to the #EU budget and how much does it receive back? Our briefing explains:  #Brexit  
Quickest and simplest way to stop Brexit is for moderate Conservative and Labour MPs to defect to @LibDems 
Britain has precious little manufacturing as it is. What we do (e.g. cars) is mostly controlled abroad. #Brexit free trade is a fantasy. 
Bank of England warns Brexit will put strain on regulatory resources  
Irish MEP says UK not brave enough to hold 2nd Brexit referendum  | Another FG figure criticises UK Brexit strategy 
As someone-among many-duped by & has now seen through #brexit lies we need a chance 2 vote on final deal,with option 2 remain in EU #euref19 
Britain shouldn’t be ‘gloomy’ about Brexit, says Australian High Commissioner  
#BREAKING: Kurdish Pres. Barzani says no turning back from Sept. 25th referendum on independence in an interview with Al-Hayat newspaper.  
BREXIT: Britain should be 'optimistic' not 'gloomy' says Australian High Commissioner. UK can trade with the world. 
Sack Carney. He continues to undermine Brexit.   
Brexit and communism. Ideas that work wonderfully, in principle.  
Prepare for lots of 'Brexit was not the problem. How it was done was the problem'. Odds on first senior Tory Brexiter to say it?  
A taste of Brexit to come  
The only way to make the Tories own the disastrous consequences of Brexit is for Labour to offer an alternative.  
No, Brexit is NOT inevitable.It can, and MUST, be stopped!It is every decent politician & commentators duty to stop disastrous Brexit!   
Hundreds of lorry bays will be required, which will mean compulsory purchase and demolition of lots of Brexit voters' houses  
."Balance of power in Brexit negotiations is such that the EU27, including Ireland, holds nearly all the cards.". 
The #ssm debate in Ireland ahead of the referendum was "reasonable", had a "healing effect" say the straight Oz guys on @theboltreport 
*Brexit*  
Welsh and Scottish governments demand UK-wide Brexit meeting - BBC News  
It's nice to know there are a few fellow Tories who share my deepest concerns about Brexit & in particular HardB. policy of HMG & Labour opp  
Thanks James. I'll carry on commenting on the selfish & destructive consequences of Brexit & in particular the hardBrexit path of HMG & Lab! 
No one is saying it's his responsibility. His belief that it's something we should aspire to coupled with his desire for hard Brexit is  
Australian High Commissioner urges Britons to be 'MORE optimistic' about Brexit  
So Goldwater is at the table for #sb1431 & DeVos grp oversees referendum?! Why r dark money lobby grps given so much access/privilege?!?!  
Labour Europhiles raise pressure to change Brexit stance  
"MPs react after Vote Leave economist admits Brexit would 'mostly eliminate manufacturing'":  
BOMBSHELL Report!Veselnitskaya, Goldstone & Agalarova Traveled from NYC to UK For Brexit Then Back to NYC 
111,540 signaturesbut 3 hurdlesfor #AZ school-voucher referendum #12News 
If hardline Tory MPs get their way, London will become the new 'Costa Del Crime' after Brexit  
'Predominant factor': Britain chose #Brexit because voters are poorly educated - academics  
Banking watchdog warns of risks from ‘cliff-edge’ Brexit  
No matter how you voted then, we all know now that Brexit is a crock. Time for all ordinary decent people to come together to #StopBrexit 
Britain chose Brexit due to poor education: Study  
SURVEY: We want to know how Brexit has affected EU citz in Scotland   
Read Trump fans braying for nuclear war & UK nationalists braying for hard Brexit & we see how adult education needs a LOT more investment 
If Bill Clinton & Loretta Lynch discussed only golf, Brexit, & grandchildren, there'd be no need to redact anything. Time to subpoena both. 
I agree with David Davis' ex chief of staff. The public should have a chance to exit from Brexit.   via @HuffPostUK 
Bank of England deputy's Brexit warning is strong stuff | Nils Pratley  
Britain just got its first concrete sign that Brexit will destroy the economy  
David Davis' ex-chief of staff calls Brexit a 'catastrophe'  Very wise man - unlike his former boss  via @HuffPostUK 
Banking watchdog warns of risks from ‘cliff-edge’ Brexit  
Mark Carney says city will thrive post #Brexit #skypapers @sky news @Michael_Heaver @ayeshahazarika The Guardian 
Brexit is entrenching some dangerous myths about ‘British’ culture | Afua Hirsch  
Suppose we can all stop worrying about brexit now. So. Every radiation cloud..... 
- just because of Brexit,we've not all given up on right & wrong. @BorisJohnson & @theresa_may have. But a lot are bothered by @raif_badawi 
Remember when UK youths said Brexit Voters 'stole their future' ? That's probably how these youths feel about the EU #failedexperiment 
Brexit will hit every British city—and pro-Leave areas will find it hardest to recover.It's no surprise, is it?  
Switching on my heater in August. Is summer part of the #Brexit negotiations? 
Australian High Commissioner: Brits should be “more optimistic” about Brexit!   
Brexit cost before it happens: low £, from 5th to 7th in economy,growth slowed,banks leaving,brain drain,prices up opportunities cut! Wakey 
Attention all Brexit voters in manufacturing jobs:  
Brexit Is a 'Catastrophe', and it must be reversed!  
Anti Brexit MPs like @Anna_Soubry @grantshapps @Mark_J_Harper have more in common with @RachelReevesMP @vincecable than @OwenPaterson et al 
The tragic truth is that Brexit.. will mean less money for our NHS rather than more #brexitwontwork  
With respect to democratic principles, at this stage, a no-majority vote or any #referendum failure will not serve people of #Kurdistan well 
London set to boom! Business chief says firms could flock BACK to city after Brexit  
Brexit Is A Catastrophe, Says David Davis' Ex-Chief Of Staff James Chapman  
Well, what do you know! Tanned Tony Blair holidays with EU leader who called for second referendum - The Sun  
David Davis' ex-chief of staff @jameschappers says Brexit is a 'catastrophe' and calls for it to be reversed  
Brexit uncertainty: Many companies are investing heavily in contingency planning (and this utilizes resources)  
Given the chaos in the government over Brexit, companies are preparing for the worst and pining for the best  
Finally (for now): time to admit many Brexit supporting editors would have done anything to destroy Cameron purely because of Leveson  
Also: well past time for sensible journos on papers that supported Brexit to admit it is going to destroy lives of many of their readers  
Introducing the zimmer fork riot frame essential equipment for the betrayed #brexit voter  
Sensible MPs know we are heading for a Brexit disaster. Time to persuade and lead. Going along with this charade is a dereliction of duty  
Top banking authority warns against a hard Brexit cliff edge as risk to stability. Govt must drop damaging 'no deal' mantra. Pls RT:  
These Trump/Brexit weirdos will destroy us if we let let them. Their mantra: Nuclear Armageddon? Yes, we can!  
Keep shouting it across the roof tops - time to end Brexit !!!!!!! 
"Resentment is like taking poison and waiting for the other person to die" #Brexit 
Anti independence Labour says listen to independent Ireland... Truly #Brexit is taking them all through the looking-glass!!  
Looks like the political class are going to fight every step of the way to water down #Brexit We must be ready to push for what we voted for  
FT: Banking watchdog warns of risk to stability from 'cliff-edge' Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Norway-style #Brexit? EFTA? EEA? Schengen? Here is your interactive cheatsheet to European memberships  
8: We believe that #Brexit will be stopped & that the UK will again be a nation of reason, prosperity, openness, freedom & internationalism.  
7: #Brexit represents a triumph of selfish nationalism, ignorance, recklessness, loss of freedom and economic illiteracy.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Spain won't 'jeopardise' Brexit deal to regain Gibraltar sovereignty  
Nigel Farage. Get us a referendum on ritual slaughter. This one we will win by at least 85%. Retweet for ever people. 
Theresa May to harden up Brexit negotiating position - Sky News  
A long and thoroughly depressing read. How Brexit Is Quietly Strangling Science:   
This autumn we are moving our campaign against #Brexit up a gear. You can help! Join us for just £2 here:  
NHS to recruit an army of British nurses after Brexit instead of paying expensive agency staff  via @telegraphnews 
There is no hard or soft Brexit only Brexit, either you're Eurosceptic or not. Such terminology is intentional to deceive & deny mandate. 
If there is a single person who still thinks #Brexit is good news on any level, they should read this. A criminal waste of money & goodwill.  
'Absolutely absurd!' EU's Brexit divorce bill demand DESTROYED in passionate rant by Tory   
We voted labour in last election & will not do so again unless they change their stance on #Brexit @jeremycorbyn  pls take note #StopBrexit 
Senior Tory MP calls for Philip Hammond to be sacked for attempting to delay Brexit  
Interesting: Brexit has exposed deep divisions within UK while simultaneously uniting 27 countries that never agreed on anything 
Here's another one that's handy when dealing with those not accepting the loss of foreigners to #Brexit is a bad thing...good innit!  
Britain is in a heap. Theresa May has no interest in the north. The DUP has given the Tories a blank cheque on Brexit. @moneillsf #feile17 
Watch What REFERENDUM is. It's NOT a call for war.  @Amaka_Ekwo @ProfOsinbajo @NGRSenate @HouseNGR @benmurraybruce 
About .@Jeremy_Hunt employing an 'army of nurses' *after* Brexit...#NHS 
EU could drag UK to court for £36bn Brexit bill... but UK will pay LESS, says EU expert  
FINALLY! NHS to recruit army of 10,000 more British nurses after Brexit  
The Guardian view on the judges and Brexit: ministers must come clean | Editorial  
An anti-Brexit party has the sharp focus to appeal  via @FT 
Brexit: Global broadcasters with bases in UK look to Amsterdam as EU divorce talks stall  @BrexitBin @dontbrexitfixit 
Will you be renewing your membership?NoCan I ask why?Corbyn BrexitCorbyn Venezuela Corbyn Anti-Semitism Corbyn Momentum Ok thx  
Theresa May is expected to harden up her Brexit negotiating position when she returns to Downing Street next week  
Here, Brexists, have this bucket of cold water care of US economist Adam Posen: "Brexit is a trade barrier"  
."In Ireland, we ARE brave enough & courageous enough to have a 2nd referendum". 
Which aspect of Brexit excites you most? 
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
Mindful of how supportive he is on Brexit, Govt eager to be seen to be doing this right before inevitably approving.  
Employers struggle to recruit staff as as applications drop due to Brexit  
Plain lunacy to think Brexit will deliver a socialist paradise. I have unadulterated contempt for these people. 
Brexit Is about taking back control,not asking the EU what we can have,the British people voted Leave EU, not to keep one foot In the door. 
"The Government must provide greater clarity over the role the ECJ will play post-Brexit." @tombrake  
A left-wing Brexit is possible - and it could change the whole of society for good  
Global broadcasters based in the UK are sizing up Amsterdam offices because of Brexit  
And yet another #Brexit problem that #Brexiteers never mentioned. More job and revenue losses for #Britain 
We didn't vote Brexit for a 'compromise' on sovereignty. We voted to take back full control.  
KDP/ PUK held a productive meeting.Reaffirmed 25/9 referendum is in place & no changes,heading toward a new strategic agreement 4 a new era. 
Britain is Europe's primary location for TV broadcasting. Now Brexit is causing problems  
The Other Reason for #Iraqi #Kurds' Referendum: Political Relevance.  My thoughts  @SadaJournal 
this is the main reason for brexit! Tory elite & media moguls want out of EU at any cost ie £40+billion of taxpayers money!!  
Interesting read on the impact of Brexit on science in the U.K.  
Spain to keep Gibraltar out of Brexit talks -  
Detailed questions on Brexit and Trade from Jan Pavec of Czech business media E15. Most Czechs I meet are pragmatic about Brexit.  
'ECJ squabbles threaten to scupper #Brexit negotiations. The Efta Court could help' - leader in tomorrow's @thetimes 
Brexit is quietly killing science  
May says NO to a £36bn 'Brexit bill'  
Brexit or no Brexit, our Jez is the only one looking out for us.  
Brexit could turn London into a 'freewheeling hub for emerging-market finance – a sort of Singapore on steroids' — The Economist. pic.twitter.com/Cq2XTG9GbR 
Good to see farming & countryside bodies uniting in support of EU Customs Union. Pity they weren't more outspoken in Referendum campaign.  
When article starts by describing Brexit vote as a 'true peasants revolt' expect more romantic nonsense to follow.   
The Northern Irish border is a nightmare that could derail Brexit  
...Brexit not even in the top 5 of searched for terms in UK on google in 2016... ... Euro 2016 top, followed by... errr... Pokémon Go  
One last tweet for my unpatriotic attempt to talk Britain down when I really should get over the referendum  #Dunkirk 
EUROZONE on the BRINKGermany imports PLUNGE 4.5% biggest drop since 2009Exports down 2.8% most since 2015#Brexit 
New poll shows 61% of people disapprove w May's handling of Brexit, up from 46% in JuneThe public doesn't think she can secure a good deal 
So long, FarewellAuf Weidersehen, Goodbye!'The farewell has already begun'Poland is ready to leave #EU...#Brexit 
Nigel Farage has vowed to return to frontline politics if "gutless" politicians succeed in "frustrating" Brexit.  
British judges could still apply European court decisions after Brexit - Patrick Blower - political cartoon gallery  
Brexit could force companies to spend money on improving productivity, Richard Jeffrey says  
UK Judges fear that Brexit will be fought in courts' battleground, with plenty of "Enemies of the people" hysteria 
We need to make stories of Roman Britain much more well known - what happened during our first 'Brexit' for example?  
Gov't will allow UK judges to overrule extradition requests by EU nations after Brexit, according to media report  
Walk the remain walk, don't just talk it. Be active, support the right people, don't accept #brexit in any form. It's time to step up folks. 
How the UK's data protection plans are an early example of the Brexit myth of 'taking back control'. My latest blog:  
It's time for MPs to act. Brexit is harmful to the national interest. It's an act of national self harm that must be stopped. #StopBrexit 
@jeremycorbyn need to change stance and #StopBrexitNow as the steel industry demise will be a mere drop in the ocean of Brexit unemployment 
The British tourist board have come up with some 'Visit Brexit Britain' posters and.... yeah.  
Unlike the current British government which is acting against UK citizens' interests with its Brexit mania, the EU cares about all citizens.  
Katie Hopkins SLAMS London Mayor Sadiq Khan over acid attacks in the city  via @Your Brexit 
HUMILIATION for Merkel as 1/3 of Bavarians vote for INDEPENDENCE from Germany  via @Your Brexit 
Please tell me the opportunities of Brexit , Mr Blunt. As an MP, what are the practical, tangible benefits of Brexit for our daily lives?  
#Brexit relocation of EU medicines regulator 'will hit UK researchers hard'  
President @masoud_barzani & Amb of #Brazil discussed bilateral cooperation, political developments, culture of peace & tolerance #Referendum  
If you give a damn about the #NHS, you should be fighting tooth & claw to #StopBrexit. Not only was the bus a lie, #Brexit will COST £58BN!  
Fintan O'Toole {@fotoole) is absolutely one of the best #Brexit commentators around - valuable insights.  
Brexit Britain sees biggest surge in salaries for 20 months.  
BOOST: Wages rise at fastest rate for 20 months. Brexit should finally mean higher wages for British workers!  
Iran uses meeting with PUK officials to deliver some not-so-veiled threats over Kurdish independence referendum:  
Lessons for Brexit from the invasion of Iraq 
Anti-Brexit campaigners to march on Tory Party conference In 'Autumn Of Dissent'  Great PR for #StopBrexit Pls RT 
Brexit poses serious danger to the long and storied tradition of British scientific research  
Brexit means Brexit, but it will be very complicatedMe, one year ago today in @standardnewsStands up quite well 
Friends! Depressing news!Due to Brexit, the only way for certain employers to recruit staff is to pay them more.  
It's official - there's a £200m hole in the Brexit bus NHS promise, says @ChukaUmunna  
The #Brexit vote was narrowly won via a gerrymandered electorate & a massive far-right press campaign of hate and lies.#StopBrexit #Remain 
UK financial sector could double in size as it flourishes after Brexit, says Bank of England Governor Mark Carney.  
My role in the great Brexit conspiracy  
Theresa May to harden up Brexit negotiating position  
The man is Scotland. The cat is England. The Tele is Brexit.  
IMO brexit and TrumpRussia are linked as a Global strategy 
The balance of power over brexit is moving away from the UK, as predicted. We'll have less control if brexit happens  
Higher wages disaster. I blame #Brexit  
Not clear UK students can stay in Erasmus exchange post-Brexit - Swiss suspended after rejecting Freedom of Movement  
*We are opposing Brexit for your future*  
Interviewed in Prague by Czech Radio's former London correspondent @hosekj on Brexit, Trade & my longstanding love for the Czech Republic.  
And if Labour gets rid of Corbyn we the sane anti-Brexit ones will be able to take that control in here too #StopBrexit 
UK recruiters blame Brexit as staff shortage worsens  
Employers struggle to recruit staff as applications drop due to Brexit  
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
#brexit meansA worse trade deal with EUSpending £36B with no say on how spentStill needing EU citz to fill skills gapsDivided nation 
Catalan government will use the Referendum Law to call the independence referendum on 1 Oct even if it's annulled  
QUISLING Tony Blair holidays with EU leader who called for second referendum and said 'Brexit will not happen'  
Neocons sold the Iraq war on basis of dodgy WMD claims. Brexiteers sold Brexit on basis of dodgy NHS claims. In both cases it was a lie.  
The European Parliament's position is clear: citizens' rights come first in Brexit negotiations and we are committed to fight for them.  
That whoosh you hear? It's Chinese money pulling back from property in London to New York  
Why are judges worried about the ECJ's post-Brexit role?  
Brexit is already resulting in higher prices, rising inflation and a growing threat to people’s jobs  
.@euromove @Scientists4EU @HealthierIn @_Britain4Europe are crowdfunding a Brexit-blocking "war chest"  via @CityAM 
'It's barmy!' Tory MP @OwenPaterson blasts EU divorce bill saying Brussels should pay US for Brexit  
What liberal Britain needs: a single issue anti-Brexit party  via @IrishTimesWorld 
Brexit NOT a downer - says Mr Downer, Australian High Commissioner. They did their top 3 big trade deals in one year  
FINALLY! NHS to recruit army of 10,000 more British nurses after Brexit. Not before time!  
'DO NOT insult the people' Nigel Farage bashes Vince Cable over latest anti-Brexit jibe  
Australian High Commissioner hails Brexit saying new 'open' UK will be a HUGE success  
If hardline Tory MPs get their way, London will become the new 'Costa Del Crime' after Brexit  
Brexit Britain didn’t become bitterly divided on June 23, 2016. The divides have been there for some time  
Brexit = angry old revolt? Avg age ofleft behind anti-migration Leaver = 47middle-class affluent Leaver = 47old working class Leaver = 71  
LSE BREXIT – Leaving the Single Market will tear apart Britain’s economy – and Jeremy Corbyn will perish with it  
The #Brexit mentality fits almost all the diagnostic symptoms of Narcissistic Personality Disorder#StopBrexit #Remain 
This is one of those excellent 'dawning sense of horror' Brexit threads.  
Brexit's Dunkirk Fantasyland - Chicago Tribune  
N. #Wales, the largest EU flag ever deployed by #EUflagmafia at 9m. Seeing the damage, Wales is changing position on brexit. #EUloudandproud 
"English nationalists have planted a bomb under the settlement that brought peace to Northern Ireland" #Brexit 
BREXIT BOOST: Companies hire staff at fastest rate for 2 years. Unemployment at 42-year low.  
Delaying Brexit?  Who took 9 months to trigger article 50, then called a general election and appears to have done no preparation at all?  
A quick reminder of the farsightedness of David Davis MP. This was only in April. #Brexit  
A left-wing Brexit is possible – if we play it right, we could change the whole of society for good  
George Osborne has come under fire from a former senior aide who accused him of being ‘too gloomy’ about Brexit  
Joining the Tories in a deluded pursuit of leaving the Single Market will bring disaster to Corbyn & Labour #Brexit 
Don’t blame Brexit – Public Health England is shrinking our chocolate bars, says @blairspowart 
Let's make this our new, post-Brexit currency .  
UKIP's @davidkurten: No need for UK to pay any EU Brexit bill.  
Brexit relocation of EU medicines regulator 'will hit UK researchers hard'  
#Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
We're heading for a situation where a #brexit transition arrangement is essential and yet such a circumstance is dependent on the EU27 
19. Sure they go on Sunday politics shows and say, with dead-eyed stare, "Brexit means stable" and "red, white and blue english breakfast!". 
Crosby got paid £85,000 a day to run May's 2017 election campaign, but I'm sure the Tories will get us the best possible Brexit deal 
16. Do govt basically think Brexit won't happen but can't act that way in case they look weak, so will keep going until process implodes? 
Spain will not block Brexit deal over Gibraltar, Spanish minister says  
There will be huge political change if the Brexit vote is betrayed by Politicians. 
Huge political change if Brexit voters feel betrayed warns @BrendanChilton  
12. STUPID - They just haven't got a fucking clue of the minutiae necessary to pull off Brexit and have actually not got round to it yet. 
10. Another reason, perhaps, why Irish people aren't cock-a-hoop over Brexit Britain. It's a total unnecessary fucking arseache for Ireland. 
What liberal Britain needs: a single issue anti-Brexit party  
Brexit is an opportunity to get out and into the world, by choosing to “make your approach more global and less regional,” says @AusHCUK 
Post-Brexit Agricultural Policy should encourage high environmental protection, food safety & animal welfare.  
Is anyone else noticing an increase in the number of Brexit people threatening riots and violence on Twitter? Disturbing. 
Remoaners, be on notice - don't thwart Brexit, or @Nigel_Farage returns 
This is why our resistance against assaults on truth and the treason of Brexit leaders must be implacable. Give no quarter. Not. One. Inch.  
I think that might be true for the Brexit Elite. Those lower down the food chain seem genuinely to believe their own nonsense though 
Today's warning by Lord Neuberger on the ECJ warning shows Government leaving judges in firing line on Brexit:  
Thread: Why is the govt not preparing for increased border checks and replacements for EU agencies post-#Brexit?  
BREXIT: George Osborne attacked by former chief of staff for being too negative on EU exit.  
Sir @vincecable has been accused of stirring up generational tensions in a 'Brexit jihadi' rant sparking fury  
There is a Norwegian biscuit called Bixit. Invented before Brexit. But don’t forget: Bixit means Bixit, at least in Norway. #BeNordic 
Even Tory party members are getting sick of Brexit saboteur Philip Hammond. Sign the petition to get him sacked! 
Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
Migrants 'milking' benefits system: Foreigners more likely to claim handouts 
David Davis offers to crucify himself as Brexit payment  
I can help. After Brexit, British Judges will operate exclusively to British law, as they had done for centuries.  
Counsel for the applicant said brexit 3 times but counsel for the respondent won.  She said trump 5 times - I miss that game.#courtwordplay 
.@TiceRichard blasts Remoaners who wish for recession so they can 'be proved right' on Brexit  
The right-wing, #Brexit-delerious #Tory MPs who are anti-bureaucracy, anti-#quango are now constructing a quangocracy to cope with #Brexit. 
Corbyn is a lifelong Eurosceptic who is enthusiastically pushing through Brexit with 3 line whips and sackings.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg: UKs Best Hope...Stand tall; be firm; stand your ground & follow through #Brexit via @BreitbartNews 
Thing I don't understand about Brexit. Govt says we're leaving the EU, single market, free movement area etc in April 2019. 20 months away. 
Jeremy Kyle - A proper political presenter. 'People didn't know the ramifications of what would happen after Brexit'  
That's more like it! Revealing piece shows 'Brexit Bill' only £10bn; not €100bn; for customs & other real benefits  
Huge anti-Brexit protest being planned outside Tory conference -- we spoke to one of the organisers  
Better still use it to give PS wrkrs decent pay What Britain could buy with the £36bn being used for Brexit divorce   
Lessons for Brexit from the invasion of Iraq  
Brexit minister's letter gives boost to EU single-market campaigners. By @mattholehouse for MLex #Brexit:  
Great visualisation of #Brexit scenarios that should have been debated and sorted a few years ago.. (via @infobeautiful) 
On data protection, Brexit, and the vacuity of "taking back control".  
The President of Supreme Court has called for greater clarity on the legal consequences of Brexit  
Face it: We're going to pay that Brexit bill, so we might as well come to terms with it  
Fight Brexit at the Party Conferences - on the beaches, in the wheat fields, we shall never surrender  #Labour 
The Tories have us on the Road To Ruin, How many More Grave Headstones Shall we see from their Extreme Cuts! and Brexit Clueless  Madness?  
Norway-style #Brexit? EFTA? EEA? Schengen? Here is your interactive cheatsheet to European memberships  
Sorry the Survation survey showed a clear majority of Britons (54%) would vote to Remain in the EU if another referendum was held. 
Refugee children 'could be separated from their families after Brexit':  @UNICEF #RefugeesCrisis 
As this says, key issue is how UK courts should deal with ECJ judgments post Brexit. +  
One side has taken back control of #Brexit - Ireland (which now will have a veto of transitional deal). V good from @fotoole 
Lord Neuberger tells government it must provide more clarity about how UK law will be developed after Brexit.    
Judge calls for clarity on status of ECJ rulings in UK after Brexit  
Matthew Parris is ashamed to be a Conservative.Powerful stuff on the #Brexit shambles.  
Propaganda & bad stats from both sides of Brexit debate: readers deserve better than @danieljhannan & @jennirsl 
By threatening disorderly Brexit, UK missed the chance to define an orderly Brexit. Shrewd by   @davidallengreen 
On of the many hateful things about the Brexit debate is hearing how magical ‘British judges’ are compared to their European counterparts... 
#Brexit story has been a tale of dishonesty. Govt should come clean on the weak position it is in and huge cost it knows country will pay. 
The Australian High Commissioner on Brexit"I think you are a bit gloomy"More here:  #r4today 
Mismatch of the century between lawyer Dominic Grieve, and leather salesman Owen Paterson, on the ECJ this morning. #R4Today #Brexit 
#Brexiteers insist we should pay no #Brexit Bill.  Has anyone asked them this?#UKIP #NigelFarage #Brexitshambles #Brexitbill #EU #Tories 
All those complaining that Remainers should be charged with treason for calling for BLOCK Brexit, you'll find WE are the true patriots   
"Some say there is no precedent for 'Special Status Within the EU'. But Brexit itself is unprecedented."  
Some say if we block Brexit there will be riots. It will just be like an EDL rally but a bit older. We beat the Nazis, this will be nothing 
Brexit is not just something we're going to properly f*ck up. It's properly going to f*ck us up.  
I've always been a European. Brexit would force my repatriation into a country dominated by idiots. #StopBrexit 
Friends! Rain in the UK for next 3 days while Europe enjoys a heatwave!And yet Climate Deniers claim "this has nothing to do with Brexit"!  
There is no way that the promises made by Leave to voters can be kept. GB is 55% against leaving already. 65% don't want hard Brexit. 
Too many people are being party political about Brexit. In the grand scheme of things Corbyn & May are insignificant. What we do now is huge 
The so-called Norway model is Michel Barnier’s favorite option for a post-Brexit transitional arrangement   
Superb from @fotoole @IrishTimes - Ireland's new bargaining power due to UKs slowly dawning awareness of desperate need to postpone #brexit  
A Nobel Prize winning physicist considers taking his research elsewhere after vote to leave the EU  
ANY Brexit would be a hard Brexit. It's all very well Alf Garnett types spouting shit but will be the young who suffer most. #StopBrexit 
Former EU Official: Conservative Brexit strategy the most harmful policy for over 50 years  via @BIUK_Politics 
The BBC digging its heels in, tantrumming, & hating #Brexit, is quite the soap opera. Desperately milking interviewees for disaster.#r4today 
READ | Osborne's former chief of staff says he's being too sour on Brexit. Time for the Remoaner to give it a rest! 
The "Roman Britain Was White!" argument is so symptomatic of Brexit UK's revisionist racism ☞ "Who controls the past controls the future!"  
I've funded this campaign because I believe we need to prepare the ground for a Referendum on the Final Deal.  
Letter of the Day (and apologies to Sir Mo) #Brexit  
Dear British public. Worry not. 40,000 NHS nurses short NOW, but we'll wait until *after* Brexit to recruit more. 
Brexit relocation of EU medicines regulator 'will hit UK researchers hard'  
Sky blamed Brexit on problems with  maternity units! No mention that the increase in birthrate is entirely of immigrants. Ours is falling. 
Dire warnings on Brexit from the former chief EU negotiator Sir Michael Leigh.  
You won't be able to tackle austerity after Brexit.  Anybody who thinks you can, their judgment should be brought into question.  
Can't be repeated too often. Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
I respect Harry, but he attacks Cable whilst ignoring that Corbyn is currently in Brexit coalition which robs the young of their future  
.@TurnbullMalcolm,Howard changed the #Marriage Act to prevent #MarriageEquality. No referendum, no #plebiscite. You should fix his mistake. 
Big brother’s new Avtar...Big Data. Fascinating article on the common genie behind Brexit & Trump campaigns   
"Bewildered" Brexit: Britain’s “mad” political landscape, stands in stark contrast to centrist consensus of the past  
Brexit relocation of EU medicines regulator 'will hit UK researchers hard'  
EU law will keep pace with modernity. We'll pickle our law in aspic. It's the Brexit way. () (hat @Resjudicatamyft). 
“The relocation of the agency will have considerable impact"Brexit keeps on taking.  
#opinionorfact #brexit may have been about independence, but is turning into isolation.We are building a wall. 
Brexit is 14370 hours away. #brexit 
#Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
This shambolic Brexit government doesn't do clarity.  
Businesses are preparing for the worst version of Brexit  
#NoConfidence I doubt JZ will be removed today. But I was wrong on Brexit, Trump, Corbyn. Would be very happy to be wrong on this call too. 
We didn't think Brexit would happen.It did.We didn't think Trump would become president.He did.We don't think Zuma will be ousted... 
UK judges need clarity after Brexit - Lord Neuberger  
So "BLOCK Brexit" is trending, good to know there's still plenty of people out there who hate democracy when it doesn't go their way. 
“We don’t need a referendum, a plebiscite or our highest court. We need political leadership.” – @SenatorWong, 2016. 
hard brexit  
After the republic referendum I’m expecting the plebiscite question will be “do you support the government deciding which gays can marry?” 
Anti-Brexit protesters to stage mass demonstration outside Tory conference  Date for your diaries 1st October! 
I interview Meghnad Desai on Modi, Trump, Brexit and the fate of the Liberal Order -  
Too right! It's STILL as if Brexit is kind of some 'side issue' that's not really that important. @jeremycorbyn #StopBrexit 
A key point in post-Nov 2016 discourse. Everything sanded down/reduced to a binary, up-down referendum on POTUS  
Let's play spot the Brexit liars.#StopBrexit 
That's right:EU membership per day: £22 millionBrexit cost per day so far: About £1.5 billion  
The cultural roots of Brexit can be reduced to: Britain did not win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels  
Oh.dear.lord. brexiters' level of knowledge...are we even surprised they still haven't come up with one Brexit benefit?  They've no clue.. 
All the government has to do with Brexit is to give us exactly what we voted for and nothing more or less and not part with our money. 
And Brexit is going to make NHS funding ever more difficult isn't it @jeremycorbyn? #StopBrexit and fund the NHS instead. 
Who authorised this arsehole to dictate the specific terms of Brexit?  
Mapping out the #French #FinTech scene in a post-#Brexit era, @JohnDetrixhe explores #startups in #Paris   
From what we understand the Save Our Schools (@arizona_sos) will file a referendum tomorrow.  He's a quick primer on the process.  
Karen Matheson raises the roof in Lorient by declaring non to Brexit et oui to independence  
Mr. Brexit? Mr. Treason – Mnuchin’s Moscow Money  
So now we know the truth. There won't be £350m per week to NHS post/Brexit because we pay less than HALF that. Boris & Gove LIED.  
Tories have never had a plan for #Brexit just a series of unattainable position statements. Time to #EndBrexit 
Anti-Brexit protesters to stage mass demonstration outside Tory conference  
I still support #Brexit and still hate Putin. Hating Putin and fascism is not the preserve of the left.  
"Like I said before the referendum, I'm not a quitter"*takes drag on cigarette*  
Now official, Leave lied!  New Brexit referendum? PLEASE  
Count Arthur was brilliant. And my kids loved it too. Maybe Brexit Britain doesn't deserve nice things. 
Thanks to Brexit, the Irish countryside is more popular than ever  
Brexit, Trump and now cancelling @Arthur_Strong The worlds gone mad. Bloody hopeless @BBC 
Brexit negotiations are a sham, it is time for Britain to walk away - Reaction  
Ken Clarke, another absolute legend, can't understand why he stays within one of the two major Brexit parties, he's worth so much more.  
Retweet if you have grown ever more disappointed (putting it mildly) with the #EUMass migration, open borders#EUisTheProblem#Brexit  
This was known and repeated throughout the referendum campaign, and was a *totally* ineffective message.  
Remainers who squealed about chlorine washed US chicken. Silent about EU poison insecticide eggs #Brexit -  
"Do not insult people just because they voted for a different way to you in the referendum"  
Brexit won't give your babies cancer.  
over 1000 indigenous people of Biafra living in Munich Germany protest in front of @UN office #support #Biafra #freeBiafra #Referendum  
I voted remain but respect that brexit is going to happen. Babies need to get a life and respect the results @af16051107 
These celebs fought Brexit from day 1. Before it was cool to do so. They put their principles before their careers, and deserve our respect  
I'm 60 and I will never vote Tory again. Their pursuit of Brexit knowing it will damage the country ( but save their party) is scandalous. 
Democracy based on lies isn't worth having. The Brexit Extremists lied to the people. It's nothing more than election fraud. #StopBrexit 
Anti-Brexit protesters to stage mass demonstration outside Tory conference. Why would anyone protest against a democratic vote? #IanOnLBC 
The economics of dysfunctional belief as related to Venezuela, Brexit & the Salem witch hunts, by @ricardo_hausman 
kudos to The Benue State Biafrans IPOB, #Nnamdikanu is Another Saviour, #Freedom For #Biafra #Freedom #Biafra #Support Biafra #Referendum  
BUT BREXIT MEANS BREXIT!  
Great fire of London 1666 linked to Brexit, study finds 
Nigel is right. Cable belittled & talked down to voters who supported #Brexit. Vince "is a corporatist" but he should not insult #Brexiteers 
'Give them the BEST deal possible' German panic as Brexit threatens £25bn UK trade deficit  
Every brexiter I have ever engaged with always end up citing foreigners etc as their main reason for brexit Their racial bigotry is apparent 
Her reasoning is flawed. Support for Corbyn made sense only during election as protest against Tories. Now, he must go because Brexit is mad 
India launches £383m submarine, while taking £47m in FOREIGN AID from Britain  via @Your Brexit 
They are responsible for a failed policy 
BofE says investment in the UK 20% lower in 2020 due to Brexit, whilst over 60% of Brexiters say “serious” damage to econ worth it #brexit 
2012: Farage says #NHS should move towards an insurance-based system run by private companies #Brexit #StopBrexit 
From where?  "NHS to recruit an army of British nurses after #Brexit instead of paying expensive agency staff"  
This man thinks an independent Ireland in the EU is the same thing as #Brexit. He also writes for UK broadsheet -no wonder UK is in a mess!  
Tosser Sugar is right: Boris Johnson, IDS, Priti Patel, & f@€¥ing Gove should be in prison over #Brexit LIES! End of 
Mauritania Votes to Abolish Senate, Alter National Flag in Referendum -  #OANN 
REVOLT: Tory MPs vow to REJECT plans to use taxpayers' money to pay £36bn divorce bill  
Arabs, US, political crisis among Iraqi Kurds, conspire to prevent autumn referendum on creating state in Kurdistan 
My thanks to Kak Nechirvan Barzani for an excellent dinner. Encouraged by KDP efforts to reconvene parliament. Also discussed referendum. 
Years of right-wing press hate propaganda against immigrants prepared the ground for #Brexit by @IanDunt #Remain 
.@Nigel_Farage has issued a very stern response to @vincecable's latest Brexit intervention  
The "Healthy Will of the People" a concept used by the Nazis to destroy democracy & the rule of law #Brexit #Remain 
Here's the EU anti corporate tax evasion timeline, it has an (I'm sure totally coincidental) parallel with the UK EU Ref and Brexit  
Claims that denying EU workers entry is an 'unintended consequence' of Brexit. What were the intended consequences? Still would like to know  
...Generational compromise on Brexit is politically unavoidable.my Sky Views column from today:  
'Give them the BEST deal possible' German panic as Brexit threatens £25bn UK trade deficit  
"Former EU Official: Conservative Brexit strategy the most harmful policy for over 50 yrs."  via @BIUK_Politics 
.@Nigel_Farage: I don’t support ‘hard Brexit’ or ‘soft Brexit’ I support a ‘democratic Brexit’  #FarageOnLBC 
Jacob Rees-Mogg on the proposed £36bn Brexit bill.  
When you come across the hate-filled bigots supporting #Brexit you wonder how any Labour leader can associate with such a policy.#Corbynout 
Is @Jacob_Rees_Mogg the man to deliver a proper Brexit? #FreeSpeech 
Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
I especially do like those who assume that my disagreeing with Corbyn's Brexit vision means I'm a Tory. L O G I C   
In another blow to the Machiavellian Eurocrats in Brussels, Spain says it WON'T use Brexit to reclaim Gibraltar.  
Great leadership @jeremycorbyn Urgent action now needed to protect 30k-70k Banking jobs & a car industry ‘utterly demoralised’ by Brexit.  
Sorry but some of us can't respect a referendum where the winning side relied largely on lies, smoke & mirrors. 
."The British public is losing confidence in PM Theresa May’s ability to successfully negotiate a Brexit deal". 
This is good stuff from Mark... The tragicomedy of expensive kamikaze Brexit   when we can't even afford school meals.  
Think Brexit is batshit? @EuroMove,@_Britain4Europe, @Scientists4EU are with us, are you? #FightBrexit  
.@Nigel_Farage: Britain has a very good Brexit negotiating hand, we just need to play it better  #FarageOnLBC 
This truly is what breaks my heart the most about Brexit.  
Want to know something about what is "disruptive"? Try life as an EU national in Brexit UK.  
."Brexit divorce bill: What would £36bn buy?" 
LISTEN | Legendary @goddersbloom hits back at Vince Cable. If EU is the future for our young, why do European youth flock to Brexit Britain?  
I'll stop calling you racist when you name one tangible, practical benefit of Brexit for our daily life.  
Can’t pay, won’t pay? Britain needs to be realistic about its Brexit bill from @IanDunt 
The great #Leave lie, the one that swung the referendum result, is confirmed by official figures. 
During Brexit Ref Kezza you said this , why are you now backing Hard Brexit a la Labour Corbyn?  
Brexit and Scottish Independence are not remotely the same idea. Indy is about nationhood: EU about free nations collaborating. No conflict.  
"No running commentary?"UK Gov is testing each new little piece of its Brexit stance on UK right-wing public thru leaks to papers.  
No. When I was a kid there was an evil cult called the Moonies. #Brexit is a modern political equivalent. I won't kowtow to a false god.  
I applaud his capacity never to miss a good photo opp. Let's not forget he is going for Hard Brexit against his party members wishes.  
Here's a tip for those following Brexit - ignore the Evening Standard and Osborne's whining.  
Emoji, tindern, liken, Brexit, Selfie are only some of the 5,000 new German words, courtesy of @Dudenverlag  
Why wait for Brexit? Get on with it!  
'Early morning, West Hartlepool' 1963 by Don McCullin. The reality of pre-EU Britain. #Brexit is rooted in a yearning for a mythical past.  
We're lulling EU into false sense of security with our repeated displays of incompetence, insist Brexit negotiators  
This, before I accept Brexit.  
Merkel's horror: EU chief says Germany will have to pay £10BN to fill UK's Brexit hole  
Brexit caused by low levels of education, study finds  
Brexit Britain.  
The EU referendum was a fraud to British democracy. Its outcome is worth nothing  
#Brexit Explained:B-order ControlsU-turnsL-eaderlessL-iesS-urprisesH-oliday ChaosI-nept PoliticiansT-otal Mess 
Scottish taxpayers will pay £535 for every man, woman, and child, for UK Gvt's Brexit "deal" even though they voted to Remain in the EU. 
Tory headbangers need to grow up and accept we're going to pay that Brexit bill  
The mistake is to think that Brexit would be happening if Corbyn didn't support it. Labour leadership culpable for failure to #StopBrexit 
Official figures show the UK’s net contribution to the EU was £156m a week for 2016/2017. Less than HALF the sum claimed by Brexit brigade.  
I'm closer to accepting the idea of ramming a rusty screwdriver into my nether regions on a daily basis than I am to accepting Brexit. 
Discussed Role of #CivilSociety Organizations & the Broader Community in impacting current pressing issues & #Referendum w #PAO & #DHRI Reps 
The 'constant diet' of facts on Brexit costs & consequences appears to be upsetting Farage. Poor thing has forgotten he campaigned for it.  
Brexit negotiations have not begun well for UK, says former top diplomat  
Fake conservatives in UK & US r putting voters faith in the democratic system at risk by frustrating Brexit & Trump's agenda ~ @Nigel_Farage 
In 2016 Vince Cable opposed a 2nd EU referendum as ‘disrespectful’. He was right #RespectTheResult  
While you're at it, you can also protect the, albeit shorter future, of the older generation, many of whom are very anti-Brexit & active!  
Those who want to stop #Brexit urgently need a strategy, says @campbellclaret. He's right. 
Biggest fall in consumer spending for 4 years. Awful news as the country begins to take in what Brexit means.  
Independence support rises by 3.5% to 49% since a hard Brexit was announced by UK Gvt. Renewed calls for a new referendum date to be set.  
UK attempting to land that all-important #Brexit deal   
Merkel horror: EU chief says Germany will have to pay up to £9BN to fill UK's Brexit hole  
Brexit Costs Over A Hundred Times EU Membership Per DayVia @Byline_Media 
Brexiteer @Jacob_Rees_Mogg leads the charge against the £36bn 'Brexit bill'  
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in 'autumn of discontent'  
UK is paying the EU less than half the sum claimed by Brexit campaigners, reveal new figures  
Rees-Mogg fan ‘warned by police’ for posting content that is critical of Islam  via @Your Brexit. 
Consider that Brexit means that only Sierra Leone, Congo, Turkey, Uzbekistan & Mongolia's currencies have done worse than the British pound.  
Jeremy Kyle DESTROYED on Facebook after making anti-Brexit comments  via @Your Brexit 
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
£36 BILLION - In EU Dreams!PM May REJECTS £36 BILLION Fantasy Exit Fee'Does not recognise reported figure'#Brexit 
Pound has dropped further again today. That's 10% since #brexit was triggered. Ref was ADVISORY ffs 
Sir Simon Fraser's comments show how shambolic this Conservative Government's approach to Brexit negotiations is:  
Merkel horror: EU chief says Germany will have to pay up to £9BN to fill UK's Brexit hole  
Eleven own-goals scored so far by the govt on #brexit… @InFactsOrg 
Are you any closer to accepting Brexit? Looking for the most entertaining, original response in 140 characters or less. On your marks....Go! 
Divided Tories are making a mess of Brexit, top diplomat warns 
"Brexit is the battle of our lives..." Absolutely right!  
Real Income have gone nowhere forever - this is the basis of Trump, Brexit and nonsense populous stance.......#SaxoStrats 
Do you know what, actually, people are dicks. Yes Brexit costs way more than EU membership. No, I no longer care. 
Retweet if you understand that democracy means treating an advisory referendum as advisory and not pretending it represented a mandate  
We all remember the great "Should we go die in the jungle or f it stay home and play Nintendo" referendum of 1941.  
Exchanged views w @keyaizol on areas of cooperation btwn #KRG- #Kurdistan Federation in #Sweden & Diaspora to coordinate ahead of Referendum  
This dialogue window popped up while I was writing about Brexit for @TheNewEuropean and now I think Chrome is trolling me 
Don’t count Paris out: Frankfurt is not the hands-down winner of the race for some 30,000 Brexit jobs  
Rajoy on Catalonia: There won't be a referendum because Spain is a democracy  
Why Brexit is putting the EU's digital future at risk  @IBGC_Fletcher 
Well said Guy - so why not now INSIST on an honest UK EU Referendum? You know that the 2016 vote was gerrymandered and subverted, don't you 
Pro- EU activists march to make the Conservative party "face up to the reality of Brexit".  
UK facing a “crisis of a new order of magnitude”. UK economy growth is slower than any other #EU nation.#Brexit  
Brexit is on life support. Labour can keep it alive or do the kindest thing, and put it out of its misery. 
Great graphic from @CentreforCities showing how a hard #Brexit will damage Britain's cities  
The Irish countryside is more popular than ever, thanks to Brexit  
On Brexit, Labour must be the voice of:1. Those ignored by the Tories 2. Diplomacy3. Expertise- @AnnelieseDodds  
Tories have no idea what they're doing in Brexit negotiations - Anderson  via @M_AndersonSF 
Dunkirk hints at the cultural roots of Brexit: Britain didn't win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels.  
Merkel's horror: EU chief says Germany will have to pay £10BN to fill UK's Brexit hole  
The final deal should be put to the electorate, accept the deal, WTO rules or #remain. 1st option past the post wins. #Brexit 
The ORB trackers on approval of the government's BREXIT negotiations  
The markets may be underestimating the impact of Brexit on supply as well as demand. My latest on the BOE's dilemma  
If #LFC sold Coutinho this summer, it would be the biggest climbdown since that Brexit bus  
In total, Brexit & the Leavers have inflicted w/ their decision & its impacts a cost of almost £5.8 trillion ($6.3 trillion) to UK. (5/5) 
That daily cost is 114 times more expensive than remaining in European Union. Ouch!It's indeed a high price for the mistake of Brexit. (4/) 
Brexit will destroy us all, part 474  
The @CentreforCities has been looking at how will be affected by Brexit. The news is not *great*, says @JonnElledge 
Thoughts on this text: The costs of Brexit are indeed staggering, including the massive £1.6 trillion ($2 trillion) wipe-out of (1/)  
#Brexit talks have not got off to a "particularly promising start", according to a former top diplomat  
Good heavens Is the Express joining the Mail in reporting anti-Brexit news without the usual insults and expletives?  
#Brexit is not a problem to be overcome – it is an opportunity to be seized:  via @Telegraph 
BREXIT BOOST: UK to deepen trade in Asia as Minister paves way for ‘wealth of opportunity’  
George Osborne on the Brexit bill...  
I dunno. Write a book exposing Russia, Trump, and Brexit and suddenly there's trolls everywhere  
Here's our editorial @EveningStandard - when it comes to the Brexit negotiations, don't follow the money   
After Brexit we can finally give coffees sensible British names instead of all your foreign lattecino bollocks. 
Alternate phases of Brexit1 We'll be better off2 We might be OK3 It won't be that bad4 We said it'd be bad5 We might not starve6 ... 
Britain's Brexit delirium has an upside: politicians are being exposed for who they really are  via @prospect_uk 
Senior Tory MP calls for Philip Hammond to be sacked for attempting to delay Brexit . Why not Hammond is doing nothing for us. 
I know. If we get bored after leaving the EU, we could have a referendum on leaving the solar system. #rotation #sovereignty #control 
Cameron never said WW3. Said war not unthinkable, obvs true eg Ukraine; EU vital for security; Brexit weakens European security. All true 
#dataprotection post-Brexit.. What is data protection? We made a short vid:  more from us: 
Emoji, tindern, liken, Brexit, Selfie are only some of the 5,000 new German words, courtesy of @Dudenverlag  
Brexit,Trump,North Korea...  
Also, the BREXIT 'bible' is planning out ...  
Reminder #Brexit: Article 50 is an 'illusion' and was never actually triggered, argues leading barrister #StopBrexit 
Crazy!UK ready to pay Brexit fee of up to €40bn if guaranteed free trade.UK shouldn't pay anything to corrupt EU 
Anti-Brexit protesters to stage mass demonstration outside Tory conference  
Indeed there are more Yes now than when the referendum took place. Be confident that independence is coming.  
NHS to recruit an army of British nurses after Brexit instead of paying expensive agency staff  @theresa_may 
What Britain could buy with the £36bn being used for Brexit divorce  
SHOCK RANT: Jeremy Kyle says Brexit-backing Brits DIDN'T have a clue what they voted for  
Theresa May has finally announced a breakthrough in Brexit negotiations and we all know what that really means  
Are you having doubts over #Brexit? 
Reading the Telegraph's Brexit negotiation coverage is like going through the stages of griefs: (1) denial, (2) anger, (3) bargaining...  
You know what would help us have the resources our NHS needs?Stopping Brexit....  
Government to release key Brexit policy papers in next few weeks  
And we're called "remoaners"#Brexit  
How much more of this pain will we inflict on ourselves before we acknowledge the manifest truth- Brexit is a disaster.  
'EU is at a turning point – it must be imaginative in response to Brexit and respect sovereignty of member states' 
#Kurdistan: Kurdish parties will meet to form #Baghdad envoy to discuss independence referendum  
No. 10: We do not recognise £36bn figure.Her Cabinet is running roughshod and destabilising Brexit. Show some leadership, Prime Minister!  
#plebiscite VS #referendum The government will waste money and its not binding... ITS JUST A POLITICAL STUNT #auspol #marriagequality 
ICYMI: @vincecable's ferocious denunciation of the Brexit fanatics in yesterday's Mail on Sunday:  
Bloody Spanish, bringing me free tasty food with every drink! What's wrong with paying £1 for a bag of peanuts? BREXIT!  
What's up with the Brexit bill? @scouseview explains why the EU needs Britain to pay up  
Yet another victory for every single Brexit voter. You did this. Be proud.  
Brexit will be catastrophic. Yet I still support Jeremy Corbyn.  Spot on from @rhiannonlucyc 
Friends! Vince's plans:A. Hold a 2nd Referendum.B. If "wrong" result, hold a 3rd Referendum.C. Repeat until "correct" result obtained.  
What are the top 5 Brexit benefits that everyone should be discussing? I'll wait  
I give you ... the Brexit Haiku  
Is someone at the BBC on @Open_Britain's payroll? The constant diet of Brexit negativity shows no sign of stopping.  
The very same folks attacking the Scottish Independence movement seem to now be OK with BREXIT.Work that out  
Tories have no idea what they're doing in Brexit negotiations - @M_AndersonSF 
Why Germans NEED Brexit Britain: USA could bring Germany to its knees over Russia  
Top former diplomat says Brexit talks 'have not started well'  
Clever from Farage. If there's one thing that could persuade the hardest core Remainer to back Brexit, it's this.  
Spending power in longest decline since 1970s as savings hit new record low - Sky News - No Brexit bonanza!  
Spain will not use #Brexit to retake #Gibraltar – Spanish foreign minister 
The €40bn #Brexit cost reported by media is 'not recognised' by PM @theresa_may 
Brexit is not a problem to be overcome – it is an opportunity to be seized' | via @telegraph 
Just a reminder of what Labour support for #Brexit looks like. Sorry..... #StopBrexit #Remain 
Here is the Minister for Europe using the advisory status of the referendum to fend off an SNP amendment to the bill.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Aboriginal people want a referendum & can't get one. But there'll be a gay marriage postal plebiscite even if parliament says no. #auspol 
Prime Minister Theresa May's spokesman says the PM does not recognise the €40bn Brexit bill figure reported in the media 
Woman says Brexit is "biggest act of political self-sabotage in my lifetime" but supports it because Corbyn does.  
Why Germans NEED Brexit Britain: USA could bring Germany to its knees over Russia  
Never has so much ignorance been exploited by so few to do so much harm to so many. #brexit 
The cultural roots of Brexit can be reduced to: Britain did not win two world wars to be run by Germany via Brussels  
Surely Farage and Boris are both busted flushes, exposed as Grade One bullshit pedlars with nothing constructive to say. Brexit's Team Trump 
Paris competes with Frankfurt to sweep up Brexit’s finance jobs, but 20 banks have already moved staff to Frankfurt 
My idea of Brexit consists of not being able to hear, see, feel , smell or know about anything associated with the EU. 
The country has voted to #Brexit, these campaigners obviously do not understand what the word democracy means. 
Is it a Balloon? Is it a Pain? No it’s CAPTAIN BREXIT!Help fund #TheBrexit Comic here:@BorisJohnson 
Cabinet members who disagree with Theresa May on Brexit should quit, Richard Tice of @LeaveMnsLeave tells @juliaHB1  
Push on social media for Hammond to be fired for obstructing Brexit. He will go if enough of us make noise I promise. 
Sir Simon Fraser comments show just how shambolic the Government's approach to Brexit is:  
Brexit and the balance of bullsh*** | The Independent VG indeed from @jdportes 
Brexit will be catastrophic. Yet I still support Jeremy Corbyn | Rhiannon Lucy Cosslett  
Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference Follow @StopBrexit17 for all info!     
A very interesting article on how the liars ( #Brexit and #Trump ) get away with it. 
Why is this not HUGE News @Nigel_Farage actually WANTS  to stay in the EU,Via Germany,he tried for Citizenship Day AFTER Referendum & failed 
If #Corbyn supports any sort of Brexit at the #Labour conference, we need to find an alternative to Labour - and fast! 
A guy who's not involved & probably gets his anti-Brexit information from the BBC, interviewed by the BBC. Really?   
John Redwood: Ministers don't have power to sign off extra Billions to Brussels beyond current Budget period#Brexit 
Why is it Remainers say Leavers are inflaming the #brexit situation  when people like Sir Vince call us martyrs and Brexit jihadis?  
British election failure shakes confidence in May's Brexit strategy: ORB poll  
SHOCK GMB RANT: Jeremy Kyle claims Brexit-backing Brits DIDN'T know what they voted for. Kyle is an idiot.I know of no one who did not know 
Brexit latest: it's going down the toilet  – cartoon  
Brexit leader: GOP leaders are blocking Trump from bringing the change voters wanted  
No hard Brexit go ahead from electorate and no plan B! Brexit negotiations 'have not begun well' - Sir Simon Fraser  
'NO BREXIT' protests must now become louder and more frequent. We need to make this Tory shamble quake in their boots! #NoBrexit 
"Britain facing cancer-toxin milk risk after Brexit..." Time for more people to switch to plant milks then...  
How on Earth is @Nigel_Farage not banged up in Prison yet, he lied on his application to apply for German Citizenship Day AFTER Referendum 
Keep in mind, 62% of people in Scotland voted Remain, who wants to bet since the reality of Brexit, that number has increased. 
Brexit has destroyed their argument for the union The only thing they can do now is attempt to destroy the indy movement. They won't succeed 
61% of British voters disapprove of PM May's handling of #Brexit negotiations, up from 56% in July and 46% in June: ORB Int'l poll 
Brexit is not a problem to be overcome – it is an opportunity to be seized:  @Telegraph @TelePolitics 
Paris aims to win the race to be the EU's post-Brexit financial capital  
.Senior Tory MP calls for Philip Hammond to be sacked for attempting to delay Brexit . Tens of thousands more agree  
Eurosceptic Tory MPs claim 'absurd' £36bn Brexit bill will struggle to get past Parliament vote  
EU seeks to introduce travel Visa's for UK citizens entering the European Union after brexit.  
Bavaria out! German state wants Brexit-like ESCAPE from Merkel and Brussels' rule  
#Catalonia on the frontpage of the Danish newspaper @politiken today. #indyref #referendum #Denmark #pol 
Mauritanians vote to abolish their senate and alter their national flag by referendum  
200 mill wiped from my city post Brexit. That's less social care and help for homeless. That's more unemployment and less investment 
How many dreams will be shattered on the altar of Brexit? Retirement dreams. Studying dreams. Career dreams. Losing rights  in 27 countries 
Brexit is not a problem to be overcome – it is an opportunity to be seized  
NEWS! Elderly face cull to pay for Brexit  
Downing Street has dismissed the idea of paying a Brexit divorce bill of up to €40bn (£36bn)  
BOOST: NHS to focus on recruiting more 'homegrown' nurses post-Brexit. It's about time!  
Ex-head of Foreign Office says #Brexit negotiations "have not begun well" - staggeringly undiplomatic remark.  
Need more Labour MPs to follow Ann's example.  At 80 she is passionate about stopping Brexit.  Looking forward, not back. #stopbrexit 
I'm sorry for England/Wales (I feel NI may be saved by ROI), but you need to sort out Brexit for yourselves. I'm fighting for iScot now. 
If you fancy hearing some sense talked about the Brexit "divorce bill", rather Remoaner nonsense, tune into my @talkRADIO show at 10am. 
Vince Cable says old voters have 'shafted the young' on Brexit, conveniently forgetting LibDem student loan shafting  
We thought Brexit was a type of wafer biscuit, admit pensioners  
Vince Cable is irresponsibly and divisively stirring up generational tensions over Brexit, warns @darrengrimes_ 
The British economy takes a hit as consumer spending slumps further  
BBC News - Brexit negotiations 'have not begun well' Gosh, who could have predicted this? Well, at least 48% of us 
Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference  #stopbrexit Get your boots on 
Cabinet ministers are gutless and weak on Brexit. I will come back to frontline politics if Leave voters are betrayed in 2019.  
As world economy enjoys upswing, Brexit is darkening expectations in the U.K.  - my latest  
A 'Stop Brexit' People’s March for Europe, will march from Hyde Park Corner to Parliament Square on 9 September.  
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in autumn of discontent: London rally planned for 9 September 
Brexit is not a problem to be overcome – it is an opportunity to be seized.  
FARAGE: Establishment still seeking  to frustrate '2016 revolution' of Brexit and Trump.  
"Sir Simon Fraser" Brexit negotiations have not begun well HOW does he think 7 yrs of damaging AUSTERITY have gone? The real problem ignored 
So the Leavers who got EVERYTHING wrong about Brexit now think it's a great idea not to pay your bill.They want WTO to avoid EU tax regs. 
Brexit - hard times foster mean-spiritedness..a willingness to listen to politicians..blame foreigners for our woes"  
Paris aims to win the race to be the EU's post-Brexit financial capital  
Vince Cable wants the UK to go into recession so he can be proved right on Brexit, says @TiceRichard  
REJECTED: Government deny they will pay EU £36 billion Brexit bill. They must stand firm!  
In Prague to speak (in Czech!) with the Czech Government, Parliamentarians, businesses & media to promote trade & post-Brexit relations.  
Excellent to see that @vincecable has already seriously got under the skin of the Brexit fanatics  
This is great & I am strongly supportive  Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference  1/ 
Brexit divorce bill: civil servants are saying that capitulation is "the only way to break the deadlock". How to lose a negotiation. 
France's finance minister insists Paris "will win the race" to attract banks after Brexit  
Brexit is a gift for the Tories. The richest will get even richer and Brexit can shoulder anything that goes wrong for years to come  
A must-read: @BrexitCentral's @darrengrimes_ responds to @vincecable stirring up generational tensions over Brexit  
I see a lot more celebrities tweeting against Brexit now. Coz it's cool to do so.   But we remember those who spoke out BEFORE it was cool. 
As rumours swirl over a reported #Brexit divorce bill, @itvjeremykyle shares his thoughts... 
Brexiteers want no less than we voted for in the referendum, & indeed were promised in a personal letter from the Prime Minister.  
Britons travelling to Europe post-Brexit face tough grilling and £5 permit enter EU. Easy, Long Haul & Staycaction!  
Pro-EU activists to stage 'stop Brexit' march during Tory conference  
Let's have a day without talk of doom & gloom Brexit bashing non stop from the usual suspects TV radio all bloody day Gold  all day better 
I think the real news here is that the people pushing for Brexit went on holiday while this was needing to be sorted  
In 2 recent consmr stories - end to cred card surcharges & today data prot - media gives little or no due credit 2 EU. No wonder Brexit vote 
Time for #Leavers to wake up and realise that #brexit won't stop immigration. The UK needs citizens from all over the world to function. 
The great @Kevin_Maguire absolutely right about the Brexit jihadists  
We must stop Tories flushing Britain down the Brexit toilet  
Thank you Ken Clarke.  I hope that you can persuade other MPs to stand up and be counted. We must exit from Brexit. #stopbrexitnow 
."Pro-EU campaign planning to stage one of their biggest “stop Brexit” marches outside Tory party conference" . 
LibDem chief @vincecable says older Brexit voters betrayed young people. LibDems betrayed students by tripling tuition fees 
.Brexit has "'cast a shadow' over the peace process, which needed to be protected & nurtured". 
*Brexit Explained... Not quite what you thought you were agreeing to*  
I'm keen to be a Brexit saboteur but this useless government seem intent on doing the job for me. @dailytelegraph headline 
EU must be joking! Tory MPs vow to REJECT plans to use taxpayers' money to pay Brexit bill  @DavidDavisMP 
Corbyn’s the one that’s most out of line with his party on Brexit  
Watch FIRST interview in English with #French #Finance Minister @BrunoLeMaire on #protectionism, #Brexit, #taxes: 
As world economy brightens, Brexit is darkening expectations in the U.K.  
Mauritania votes to abolish senate by referendum  
Nigel Farage: Trump and Brexit Voters Wanted Change, But Political Class Denies Them  
UK ready to pay #Brexit fee of up to €40bn if guaranteed free trade – report  
Meet Daniel.Daniel thinks Brexit & ending FoM means he can't leave the UK.Daniel is as thick as 2 short planks.Don't be like Daniel.  
Brexit leader: GOP leaders are blocking Trump from bringing the change voters wanted  
I want Scotland to become a Republic via UDI as soon as possible and definitely before brexit hits. #ConfessYourUnpopularOpinion 
House prices have avoided a post-referendum slump. Poke beneath the surface, however, and trouble is brewing  
UK borders are NOT secure – Britain open to migrants unless 3,000 more guards found  BETTER MAKE THAT 6000 MORE 
Mauritania votes to abolish senate by referendum, amid fierce criticism from a boycott movement  
Eurocrats want Britain to pay for failing EU economies 
Fuck me, Brexit has a face! pic.twitter.com/hxZA4zMUfp 
Brexit: a symptom of a broader failure? - It's not just Brexit where this government is failing ...  #Brexit.  
A scandal remains buried. Same  “election management” company for Brexit/Trump runs counter-propaganda for State.  
You need to sort your party out and concentrate on stopping Brexit. 79% of labour voters don't want it.  
*A visual representation of how well Brexit is going*   
Mauritania votes to abolish the Senate in controversial referendum, replacing it with regional councils - official results 
EU must be joking! Tory MPs vow to REJECT plans to use taxpayers' money to pay Brexit bill  
Here's what happened when one Leaver was asked to suggest a tangible benefit of Brexit: 
#London is half of financial world's infrastructure. #NYC  is other half.If London is no longer a gateway to Europe, VERY BAD NEWS.#Brexit  
I would favour the current Labour manifesto if it wasn't for Brexit. I cannot support it until that is resolved. 
Brexit:The iceberg we warned about, LOOK!- We're unsinkableReally no.- shipwreck's character-buildingWTF?- Stop talking icy death down 
Senior Tory MP @ABridgen calls for @PhilipHammondUK to be sacked for attempting to delay Brexit  
Ex Servicemen living in a car 
Morons to left of them morons to right of them into Brexit strode ReesMogg & other Brexidiots like @michaelgove always mugged by reality 
Until otherwise notified there will be no benefits resulting from Brexit, not a single one. As such we will continue to work to #StopBrexit 
Trump and Brexit voters wanted change. The political class are now denying them what they voted for.  
Like Trump winning, Brexit is the proverbial dog catching the car.  
Some interesting information about Nigel Farage.#Brexit 
Firms prepare for the worst version of Brexit shifting jobs and functions out of UKThe sucking sound is now audible 
Brexit ... needs to be stopped spectacularly and with the force of hundreds of thousands of people. #StopBrexit  
If you oppose #Brexit don't be fooled by @UKLabour.Corbyn wants to leave & put hard left rhetoric into action.@LibDems only game in town. 
#DowningStreet denies #UK willing to pay €40bn #Brexit divorce bill  #politics #Europe #EU #Article50 #business #news 
I bet your mum gave you a bollocking for screaming fire in a theatre when you saw the usher's torch. Labour doesn't support hard #brexit  
If you support #vincecable you support neo liberalism which means the poor will suffer. His Remanin is hunger just like the tories #brexit  
."I’m more convinced than ever that only a second referendum to reverse Brexit can avert a national catastrophe". 
It's not their own MPs anger the Tories should be worrying about but the anger of those who voted for Brexit  
There is no hating the EU & loving Europe. Without the EU Europe would be poorer, squabbling, divided & prey to outside powers.#Brexit 
The fixation with Brexit jeopardises absolutely everything, every single aspect of life in the UK.  
Tories are flushing Britain down the Brexit toilet, says Kevin Maguire 
Stop calling it a Brexit 'divorce bill' – Britain and Europe are neighbours, not lovers   
State Dept's lack of interest in how EU restructures as consequence of Brexit negotiations will have a v long tail of damage to US interests 
Brexit is principally the project of right newspapers + right wing journalists like Johnson and Gove. Take our country back from hacks?  
Leading Brexit campaigner says 'vacuous' referendum should never have been called  
Senior Tory MP calls for Philip Hammond to be sacked for attempting to delay Brexit  
£38 billion for a massivley reduced pound, higher inflation, jobs going abroad.. May, Boris & Davis - deal-makers extraordinaire. #Brexit 
Nothing cld be less strange.Every day tht passes shows more clearly tht brexit wld be ruinous. First Con or Lab to say so wins next election 
Nigel Farage: Trump and Brexit Voters Wanted Change, But Political Class Denies Them  
Monday's Daily TELEGRAPH: "Tory anger at officials over Brexit divorce bill" #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Strange that such shrill language is being used more than a year after the referendum.  
Thank you Minister @FalahMustafa The Head of DFR for ur great advices for my new music for Kurdistan's referendum i was honored to meet u  
'Completely ridiculous' Tory MP shreds £36bn divorce bill: 'No need to pay them a penny!'  
On Friday my new piece on Kurdish referendum was published at The Jerusalem Post...  
Tomorrow's front page: Tories face civil war over £36bn+ Brexit bill ... amid calls for Scottish MPs to unite to protect single market place  
Equating older Brexit voters with jihadists. This is an insult to salt of the earth people who helped build Britain.  
#LibDems @VinceCable telling it like it is, take heed @JeremyCorbyn, surveys say #Labour voters don't want Brexit!  
David Davis hadn't even finished #Brexit impact studies when negotiations began. His lack of preparation & rank amateurism shames Britain.  
US trade deal after Brexit could see milk and baby formula with cancer-causing toxins flood UK market:  
Farms hit by labour shortage as migrant workers shun 'racist' UK #brexit has released the inner racist in so many 
Britain facing cancer-toxin milk risk after Brexit  
Time for all Scottish MPs to fight to reverse Brexit; 'soft' Brexit is damaging to economy too  
Tory MP John Redwood told @toryboypierce why a £36 billion Brexit divorce bill is VERY unlikely   
"How Britain’s farms are being sold out as real consequences of Brexit come home to roost" #Article50 
Brexit! Was there a man dismayed? Not though the people knew Someone had blundered. Theirs not to make reply,Theirs not to reason why.  
So which is it @jeremycorbyn - support May and Brexit, or represent your voters, defeat Brexit and win the next election? 
Me too. Brexit will destroy the Scottish economy. And that may be a gross understatement.  
'ABBA represents everything that people voted for & against in the Brexit referendum.' Discuss. #MammaMia 
A price is finally being put on Brexit, at last  
Forgive the obscenity but this thread well worth your time.It's time to wake up. There are no #Brexit benefits worth the costs #StopBrexit 
The UK is on a path to self-destruction - led by two archaic political parties, after we have ditched Brexit we need to review their status.  
Citizens of Scotland, unite against a #Brexit we didn't want & respect those who did. Cease fire #CivusCaledoniusSum 
Brexit entails a growing risk that fundamental and necessary measures to underpin the economy will be neglected  
Democracy did not stop on 23rd June. It is our democratic right & duty to challenge brexit by any legal means. It would be a disaster for UK  
More details have been released about the Stop Brexit event in Manchester on 1 October. We'll be there. Join us!  
Project Fear was nothing more than a colossal Treasury blunder  #Brexit 
Depressing to see MPs like @NickyMorgan01 lacking the guts to stand up against a #Brexit they know can only harm Britain and its people. 
And when we BREXIT and turn off supply of unlimited cheap Labour, UK wages and productivity will rise too!  
Some Leavers say because Freedom of Movement is not global it should be abolished. Would they say the same of freedom of speech?#Brexit 
Every day rabid Brexiteers outdo themselves by looking that bit more stupid, and every day Brexit gets further away  
A nation whose government ignores and insults those on whom its future depends is a nation heading towards ruin.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Brexit is a God Given opportunity to steal trade from the UK says Trump's top economic adviser  
The future of Britain depends mostly on the young, well-educated, adaptable and cosmopolitan. They overwhelmingly voted #Remain. #Brexit 
We now go live to Brexit  
The last thing Corbyn wants is a second referendum. He wants Brexit - he wants a Hard Brexit. The harder the better  
Vince Cable's justification for opposing second #indyref vote but supporting second Brexit vote? Scots understood what they were voting for. 
Vince Cable tells me on @talkRADIO that there should be another divisive Brexit vote but not another divisive #indyref vote. 
1st law of #Brexit: anything reported as UK position will be denied by Downing Street within 24 hr...  
There's no 'Brexit Bill'. Next? 
Snap out of it, Britain. Brexit won’t save you  
Hey for #StopBrexitHour shall we list all the things which so far appear to be utterly fucked, or about to be fucked by brexit? 
That Labour supports Brexit is a travesty and totally beyond comprehension.  
."The people of N Ireland did not vote in favour of Brexit.It's time for THAT message to hit home with DUP". 
Downing St says speculation of a €40bn Brexit divorce bill is "ridiculous".Unfortunately they're right.It's likely to be a lot more... 
"But the Brexit plan's all cracked and broken.""Sorry Mum, the mob have spoken."  
.Looks like Taoiseach is making preparations for Ireland to step into UK's shoes if UK is mad enough to Brexit. 
Yes and when Brexit is called off, there'll be dancing in the streets, pound will strengthen, trade increase, and old EU friendships renewed  
Loss of protected status for Cornish pasties, Stilton etc was pointed out by many of us before the referendum.  
Problem with Brexit is those who want it can't organise it and those who could organise it don't want it. 
If you are sick of Brexit and can see the damage it is and will cause you must speak up! Join us #StopBrexitHour 
Mrs May should ask Mervyn King to be chief Brexit negotiator. If he needs a plan he can use mine: UKIP EU Exit Plan - Brexit Means Exit! 
Should Britain offer up to £36 billion to the EU to settle the so-called #Brexit divorce bill? Revealed in #thetelegraph @Telegraph 
"A second #Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day" says constitutional Professor, Vernon Bogdanor  
Who staffed the NHS before immigration? Why, Brits did of course? BREXIT. 
#LibDems @VinceCable telling it like it is, take heed @JeremyCorbyn, surveys say #Labour voters don't want Brexit!  
Shame they didn’t include a Brexit event in the World Championships, this guy would be odds on for Gold.#StopBrexitHour 
I wish this wasn't typical of people who support Brexit, but it is. Insults rather than dealing with the arguments.  
."How Britain’s farms are being sold out as real consequences of Brexit come home to roost". 
Sir Vince Cable Attacks Elderly #Brexit 'Martyrs' Who Have 'Shafted The Young' The very same Mr Cable that trippled Student Fees  
"Vince Cable" says young people have been "shafted" by "brexit martyrs"... DAMN STRAIGHT WE HAVE! #StopBrexitNow  END THE MADNESS!  
Spain won't seek to recover Gibraltar in Brexit talks  
I've got a decent plan drafted up for Brexit since you mention it:1/ Cancel Brexit.2/ Enjoy life again.  
Remoaners need to get on board with Brexit or relocate abroad. Your time for whinging ends right here and now. We must make a success of UK. 
Farage: Brexit betrayal has begun, I may return to frontline  
MAYONNAISE WON THE REFERENDUM SUCK IT UP LOSERS 
Gove silent following demands for clarification of the Scotish fisheries "Brexit sell-off".  
UK ready to pay £36bn Brexit bill, but only if EU talks trade - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Vince Cable attacks the oldies for "shafting" the young over Brexit  
Brexit bad news just keeps on coming. Even Brextremist resort to their last line of defence by trying to laugh if off. It just won't go away  
Remainders have been too nice since #EU Referendum. Time to make a stand and shout out loud: "No, you can't destroy #Britain with #Brexit!" 
Brexit test 2 - Will Germany & France persuade EU27 to allow Brussels to talk about our future relationship before exit terms are agreed 3/3 
Brexit Voters - jumping off a cliff and then cursing the rocks below for their demise. Absolute nincompoops  
Brexit test 1 - Do Leavers care more about "taking back control" than cuts to EU cost & immigration as we leave the EU? 2/3 
If this story is right May about to face two huge Brexit tests ...1/3   
Despite (or perhaps because of) impending Brexit, the Brits continue to be funny.  
Vince Cable slammed for accusing Leavers of being ‘Brexit jihadis’ prepared to become ‘martyrs’ for Brexit  
Brexit is destroying UK economyPMI Index:Services—87-month lowManufacturing—44-month lowComposite—87-month low pic.twitter.com/48AHsQ6LAZ 
Tory MP John Redwood told @toryboypierce 'we don't have to pay the EU a penny' post Brexit  
Not only that but every one of Project Fear's immediate post referendum disasters has failed to materialise. Every one.  
This is a thread on possibly the most important Trump, Brexit, Russia book of this year and next. Preorders are now open. Release date 18/08  
Young 'shafted' over Brexit This from @VinceCable is the kind of direct speech the #Brexit debate needs.#StopBrexit 
Exactly this. The unionists realise Brexit has all but destroyed their argument for the union, so stir up silly infighting w/Yessers.  
Sir @vincecable: Young people in Britain "shafted" by older Brexit voters nostalgic about our imperialist past  
1. In my book #AlternativeWar, out on the 18th, I tackle Russian interference in the UK's Brexit and the US election of Trump head-on, 
I don't think the fact there are at least three different Brexit policies in the Cabinet right now is because of a clever EU plot, guys  
Not actually the first sign, just another one that #Brexit will badly harm the British #Economy 
The 19 Scottish MPs who voted with the U.K. Gvt for a "hard Brexit", risking jobs, pensions & rising household costs.  
Sorry Leavers, German industry will protect the single market, even if this harms trade with Britain #Brexit #Remain 
"Stop calling it a Brexit 'divorce bill' – Britain and Europe are neighbours, not lovers" #premium 
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in 'autumn of discontent' - including me!  
GBP collapses, £66bn annual loss from Brexit, £1.7trn national debt - Silent Tories14 children arrive from Calais - Angry Tories  
Stop deflecting from real issues. Presently in Berlin & it's made me realise how hard I'm going to fight you xenophobic Tories re:Brexit  
Fears grow at UK companies over political risk surrounding Brexit poor old @michaelgove mugged by reality yet again 
UK to offer EU £36 billion for Brexit bill - twice the amount that was promised for the NHS after Brexit.Put this message on a bus.  
Pay them nothing The people were never asked if we wanted to join this dictatorship So why should we pay too leave 
Excellent articke. Lib Dem leader Vince Cable blasts back at Brexit hardliners  via @MailOnline #libdems 
UK ready to pay 40 billion euro Brexit divorce bill: Report  via @TOIWorld 
So much effort is being spent explaining to deluded Brexit voters - slowly & clearly - that it can't happen but it's not sinking in. 
Failure to reach Brexit deal ‘suicide’ for UK, says former EU chief   
May 2016: BBC attacks our Defence Union warning.Aug 2017: Govt has agreed Defence Union FIVE times since Brexit vote.  
When will the government start taking Brexit seriously?  
Then you apply for a visa the same as you would do if applying to Australia etc.The majority of the UK agreed and voted for Brexit thank God 
Irony = a pensioner who tripled student fees after being elected to abolish them now accusing older voters of "shafting" young over Brexit 
For certain people Brexit still seemingly remains an abstract concept rather than something with real-world repercussions.  
.@janetRCN interview in @thesundaytimes: NHS faces ‘perfect storm’ as fear of Brexit adds to nurses’ anger over pay  
Here, finally, is the reality of #Brexit, in the flesh.  
With greatest of respect you'll not be around to see the devestation caused by Brexit. My daughters generation will pay for your ignorance. 
Vince Cable: Nostalgic martyrs have shafted young on Brexit  
UK has not negotiated a trade treaty since 1973!Here is number of deals to negotiate by 03.2019, services not being covered! #Brexit #remain 
On my way to Prague to discuss Trade & Brexit. 30yrs to the day since I was studying Czech at Univerzita Karlová! Redoing my grammar & vocab  
Chuka - a lot of us, including me (and I helped kick a Tory out), voted Labour as a 1st step towards stopping #Brexit altogether. 
Brexit: UK could quit EU without paying a penny, say Lords  
If I were young in 2017 I think my anger would be directed to Jeremy Corbyn for persisting with a Brexit plan that will hurt for generations 
Trailfinders blames Brexit vote for wiping out £12m profit  
More and more @UKLabour people are coming out in favour of free movement/Single Market. All good, next just a small step to opposing Brexit! 
More criticism should be directed at MPs, who authorised an advisory referendum then lost their nerve and treated it as binding  
When you go the pub with your mates and your dad turns up and starts talking about Brexit.  
*Brexit Resistance Explained*  
#Brexit Dinosaur Sir Vince Cable still spouting his nonsense non stop about Brexit, FFS shut up   put him in a mental hospital now please  
Do these headlines sound familiar?They are not Brexit headlines, but from a very prescient film instead... 
Vince Cable's time In bed with Tories is an issue but ALL young people (& old) will be hurt by Brexit more that students by tuition fees 
Brexit Betrayal: EU Boats ‘Will Still be able to Catch Large Amounts of Fish in British Waters’, Says Gove.  
After Brexit, we can cut grocery bills by 17% while still supporting our farmers, says @DanielJHannan 
UK needs Brexit fall-back position, says ex-BoE governor King  
Really? That's the least of our worries. I'm angry at Tories for bringing us Brexit and Corbyn for enabling it. 
I don't agree with @EuroBriefing that the only answer is hope to get the referendum, or his terms of entry, which are anchored in reality.  
Brexit: Leave voter realises his fruit farm empire faces ruin without EU migrant workers | The Independent  
Young EU migrants could get 2yr visas after Brexit:-Will they take Young Brit's jobs?Will they have free NHS?Who'll pay accomm costs? 
Brexit jihadis? A thoroughly irresponsible comment from a man who shafted the young a long time ago! #TuitionFees 
DISGRACE: Vince Cable warns of 'Brexit jihadis' or 'martyrs' shafting the young for choosing to leave EU. 
Lib Dem leader SIR VINCE CABLE launches attack on Brexit fanatics  via @MailOnline 
It's more than chlorinated chickens, a trade deal with the EU would interfere deeply in British domestic policy.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
With poor education, infrastructure & other weaknesses Britain's economy depends heavily on inward investment which will be hit by #Brexit  
It is not in the national interest to leave European nuclear agency after Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit will kill off her own plans for a green car revolution  
It's because of Brexit, init?!  
My generation will suffer most from Brexit. Only @LibDems are speaking up for 71% of young people who voted Remain. 
Older generation has 'shafted' Britain's youth over Brexit, says Vince Cable  
To save you time reading the Sunday papers, it's the usual nonsense: we're all going to die & it's probably Brexit's fault. Have a nice day! 
Boris's dad & sister thinks he talks bollocks on Brexit,but, unbelievably,a chunk of the electorate thinks he's come up with a great idea. 
Very good points from @stephenkb on the gulf between the hard right Tory Brexit agenda & what many leave voters voted for. #brokenpromises 
‘Father of the House’ Ken Clarke vows to fight against Brexit  
#honestpoll Should brexiteers foot the bill for #brexit? Please RT for inclusivity. Comments welcome.#buyersremorse 
The Mail is quoting Vince Cable without railing. We must be coming out of Brexit. They don't want to be seen on the wrong side of history. 
UK's #Brexit position to be published. This should have been published during the referendum, not 15 months after.  
Professor Ted Malloch on how Britain can deliver a strong Brexit and why Jacob Rees-Mogg is the man to do it...   
.@NickCohen4's assessment on the UK's current position vis-a-vie #Brexit is just excoriating, worth a read  
Brexit could see GM crops forced upon Scotland against our will, where we currently have EU protection from them.  
*Brexit Explained*  
Vince Cable: Young 'shafted' over Brexit  
Lib Dem leader Vince Cable said "the old have comprehensively shafted the young" over #Brexit. 
‘Father of the House’ Ken Clarke vows to fight against Brexit  via @FT 
Brexit staff exodus 'could plunge the NHS into crisis'  
UK Govt for 1st time preparing people for reality Brexit bill will have to be paid. £36bn figure likely to grow. 
Stark words from head of .@theRCN on the perfect storm of Brexit, pay cap & 40,000 NHS nurses short already. 
'Young people have been shafted by Brexit martyrs', says Sir Vince Cable  
Britain 'ready to pay £36bn Brexit divorce bill' - despite what Boris says  
Reminder: "Brexit bill" will emerge from agreement over method to calculate UK's financial commitments ≠ Boris Johnson haggling in a bazaar 
British businesses are particularly worried about losing access to EU talent after Brexit  
Oops ...Britain just got its first concrete sign that Brexit will destroy the economy  
Meet Rachel.Rachel is verified by Twitter.Rachel is telling a bare-faced lie, blaming Brexit for something unrelated.Don't be like Rachel  
"Old Brexit voters shafted the young"Says Cable, who voted for tuition fees.Uber-hypocrisy, even for a LibDem. 
And 16/17 year olds not allowed to vote. And Brexit in some ways irreversible. Democracy?  
In tomorrow's @ScotNational strip, Brexit For Beginners, the Brexiteers discuss their current clueless predicament.  
So the children of those of us who marched against the Iraq war have to suffer May & Corbyn's hard Brexit because of the war? Pathetic  
The Status Quo don't opt for self harming disruptive change - Brexit ... it's down, down, deeper and down  
I voted leave my friend. I soon realised we'd been sold a pup. Genuine question. How bad do things have to be for #Brexit cancellation? 
Brexit-fuelled boom gives Dublin’s Celtic Tiger a reason to roar  
Brexit exit first offer £36 billion...it'll be north of £50 billion - and for what? #CrumblingBrexit 
The Brexit Elite are lying to you. EU is thriving. Brexit is kicking UK down the stairs.  
I no longer wish to pay for:BrexitUKIP MEPsThe Conservative MPs pathetic version of Glastonbury Let's give the money to the NHS instead 
Hard Brexit will see Britain's favourite brands 'ripped off abroad', food groups warn Michael Gove  
If we can afford £36 billion for the Brexit car crash than we can damn well afford to give every disabled person dignity. 
UK willing to pay £36 billion Brexit divorce bill to the EU. That's 180 Neymars. 
Tories prepared to pay £36 billion Brexit divorce bill while repeatedly telling us £28.3 billion disability cuts are needed to save the UK. 
One of the many complicated consequences of Brexit: What will happen to the borders in Ireland?  
I am sorry if you feel I am going on a bit about #StopBrexit. I make no apology - it is the most grave crisis of my lifetime. Fight Brexit! 
Purpose of visit? First night address? Diseases? Convictions?What Europe-bound Brits must provide post-Brexit. + €5 
Another industry lost: "UK sidelined as Europe looks beyond Brexit in aerospace". #Article50 
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in 'autumn of discontent'  
Let UK vote on the final Brexit deal>Before anyone starts shouting 'bandwagon jumping', this was written in April   
The best way to Brexit is to simply LEAVE, offer zero tariffs if reciprocated, and get out whilst we still can. Every day makes it worse. 
Cable on old people's lack of economic fear from Brexit, imperial nostalgia & spectre of Brexit thought-crime. Bold & refreshing interview.  
Incidentally, during my month in Canada I WAS mocked for Brexit & Canadians were appalled & amused in equal measure at the idea of CANZUK 
VERY CHEEKY Vince Cable Never mind brexit He helped Cameron 'shaft' young ppl with austerity @vincecable 
REMINDER: 64% of Brits say a Brexit bill of even £10 billion would be unacceptable!  
£38 billion for a massivley reduced pound, higher inflation, jobs going abroad... The Tories certainly know how to do a great deal. #Brexit 
Tories now accept #Brexit will include a £36 billion bill. That's £692m a week to crash our own economy. The Leave NHS pledge is in tatters 
Britain to offer £36 billion for Brexit divorce bill says @Telegraph what happened to no deal is better than a bad bill 
Vince Cable attacks older voters 4 backing Brexit for blighting young people's prospects. They voted Labour who want to exit single market 
Fine. The EU states should not enjoy the same access to the UK market post Brexit either, ok?  
Denial is at the heart of Brexit chaos. But Scotland has a choice.  
Brexit Negotiations: key phrases and what they actually mean. Latest update.  
Vince Cable: Brexit is no longer Project Fear but Project Near. After that it will be Project Here.'#exitbrexit 
Vince Cable says young people were shafted by older people in Brexit. I say all people were shafted by politicians  
The missing party in British politics isn't on the centre: it's the gap between the Brexit elite and Leave voters:  
Brexit is being regarded as an end, it should be seen as the beginning that it is. New opportunities, greater freedom to choose our future. 
Ouch! UK prepared to pay £36bn for EU Exit. Why not cancel Brexit and spend it on the NHS  
British government set to offer £36 billion Brexit payment to EU. Haven't we handed them enough already?  
"Young 'shafted' over Brexit" @vincecableEr...Vince...the Lib Dumbs called for a 'REAL' referendum. You got it. And lost. Shut up, eh?  
Older people who voted for Brexit have "comprehensively shafted the young", Sir Vince Cable has said.  
Time for @ScotTories MPs & @scottishlabour MPs to confirm they will represent their constituents' views on #Brexit  
Vince Cable has managed to encapsulate everything I think about Brexit into one paragraph. #brexit #vince #oldshaftyoung 
Spoke to the continental rep of one of UK's big crockery manufacturers yesterday. He said that since Brexit, UK orders are down approx 50%. 
Britain’s miserly post-Brexit offer to EU nationals shows a disdain for rights #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
There is a majority in parliament against a destructive, extreme-Brexit, says @vincecable 
Vince Cable: Young 'shafted' over Brexit  
Giving plenty of notice for tonight's #StopBrexitHour Find a Gif which sums up #Brexit & Tweet at 6pm!@StopBrexit17 @nickreeves9876 
RBS, still majority-owned by this Brexit govt, is getting ready to move jobs to Amsterdam because of, err, Brexit 
Brexit staff exodus 'could plunge the NHS into crisis'  
Mark Carney issues a warning about the potential economic impact from Brexit  
Maybe if MP's salaries were reduced to minimum wage due to mass immigration they might finally begin to understand Brexit. Hey, Vince Cable? 
"Like asking the winners of a debating contest to engineer a spaceship" - Simon Kuper on Brexit:  
As Brexit negotiations resume, another must read from @davidallengreen  via @FT 
Sir Vince Cable attacks elderly Brexit 'martyrs' who have 'shafted the young':  
Revealed: the tangle of red tape that awaits British travellers post-Brexit  
‘Father of the House’ Ken Clarke vows to fight against Brexit  
gay referendum 
It would be great to wake up to a world where there is no Brexit and no Trump. #SundayMorning 
Tories offer £36Bn to leave EURwingers go crazy"this isnt hard cock Brexit we want a bone attack fuckn Gibraltar get Capt Trump on board" pic.twitter.com/8VDrTWbqGy 
We'll have to cancel flights without a Brexit deal next year, Ryanair's Michael O'Leary says  
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in 'autumn of discontent'  
Slowly but surely prominent MPs are getting off the fence. Keep up the pressure to stop Brexit  
#UK ready to pay #Brexit fee of up to €40bn if guaranteed free trade – report  
Many of the loudest Leave voices have absolutely no understanding of Brexit. Reactions to this will identify them:  
Dozens of iconic UK foods like Cornish pasties under threat from Brexit 
Control freak Theresa May caused Tory Brexit chaos, says John Prescott 
Britain 'must be prepared for no Brexit deal', former Bank of England chief says  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
This is what the single market and customs union actually are – and what will happen to Brexit if we leave them  
And it's about time it was. Come on @UKLABOUR a manifesto for the many with #Brexit will mean nothing, our economy will tank @jeremycorbyn 
"I don’t think Leave voters have begun to understand the consequences [of #Brexit]" Excellent again by @NickCohen4 
Britain is PREPARED for Brexit and will 'crank up the pressure on the EU' in future talks  #Brexit  
"Real and growing likelihood" of Brexit disrupting flights, Ryanair's Michael O'Leary says  
They say after Brexit there’ll be food rotting in the fields. It’s already started | John Harris  
Britain's top universities give Theresa May 10 demands she must meet to protect higher education after Brexit  
Fall in number of students taking up foreign languages prompts Brexit concerns  
Brexit may cost us $300 million, HSBC says  
U.K. fights rearguard action on EU financial laws before Brexit  
Sums up #Brexit perfectly ... c @SKZCartoons 
Brexit supporters are willing to wreck the economy and lose their jobs for the sake of leaving the EU  
Deutsche Bank reveals its most likely Brexit scenario and how many jobs it expects to move  
If #Indonesia was a democracy, they would respect the right of West Papuans to have a referendum. #LetWestPapuaVote pic.twitter.com/ZYOrLefEEw 
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit... the people who voted for it won't have to live with it.  
In 1993, San Francisco held a referendum over whether a police officer was allowed to patrol while carrying a ventriloquist dummy.  
Watching murder mysteries. Dunno what Brexit was about, by my calculations the U.K. needs immigrants or they'd be completely depopulated. 
Let's have a report detailing path to referendum by the end of the year!  
"UK food is rotting in the fields because of #Brexit".More #FakeNews.The Grauniad, UK's worst liars. 
"Liberal Democrats Brexit spokesperson says it's 'extraordinary'."Par for the course.  
It's time to consider separation/referendum before things get bloody. Na so civil war start in 1966  
Brexit has upset the status quo.  
Before #Scot24, @PutinRF's use of SCL and Cambridge Analytica had not needed the AI DARPA weapon Flynn stole - #Brexit a nationwide vote 
Islington: 75.2% Remain in the referendum. Your party AND your constituents overwhelmingly Remain. Are you listening, Corbyn? Do you care? 
Here's another image that explains things very well but not in a good way... #brexit #brexitshambles #stopbrexit #remain @theNewEuropean 
They say after Brexit there’ll be food rotting in the fields. It’s already started, pickers from EU are staying away 
What Juncker said was, in effect, that you can't ignore the rules of the club and remain in the club. Commonsense really. #Brexit  
If Jeremy Corbyn had not been leader, I think, Labour would have won and Brexit would, by now, be history. 
Brexit has given the bigots license, & xenophobia is rife. I feel ashamed. Deeply ashamed. But we will reverse Brexit. Decency will triumph.  
Like so many embittered Remainers he HOPES British Brexit plans will fail. He would rather see Britain fail than Brexit succeed.  
May & Corbyn will follow their own hard Brexit agenda. They don't give a toss about anything else. NHS is part of the collateral damage. 
* @campbellclaret We can campaign, but we also need leadership and organisation. Over to you #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Your mother wants a soft Brexit 
Piece in .@mailonsundaySTL. on #Brexit 'martyrs' in .@YouGov poll who think economic cost is worth paying. Mainly elderly: others will pay 
Remind me again what is going right with Brexit. I just want to bring the list up to date.The full list so far is:1. 
UK ready to pay €40bn #Brexit bill, but only if EU talks trade. My latest.   
What a pity we can't divide Britain between Remainers and Leavers so we can watch Leaveland sink under the weight of its own idiocy.#Brexit 
Secondly: Brexit is not primarily about economics, but sovereignty. The EU is dedicated to the destruction of the nation state.  
£36bn!!! Let's spend it on the #NHS instead. Cancel #Brexit now.  
It might just be a wise idea to accept that "Project Fear" wasn't just a scam designed to burst your Brexit fantasy  
Damning fact that shows how chaotic the Government's Brexit policy has become  
Michael Moore denigrates Brexit Britain as a “miserable island” but celebrates Cuba – a tyrannical pariah state – as a socialist utopia.   
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' #Brexit, with investment already plunging #StopBrexit #Remain 
Tomorrow's Sunday Telegraph front page: Britain to put £36bn on the table in Brexit divorce offer #TomorrowsPapersToday 
#BREAKING: #UnitedKingdom prepared to pay up to €40 billion to settle #Brexit liabilities - about same as total annual spending on education 
£10bn to the EU each year even AFTER we #Brexit? No way.  
'Extraordinary' number of Britons are applying for Irish passports because of Brexit  
World record transfer fee about to be broken again. Some fella called Brexit Bill.  
This Conservative Brexit Government doesn't have a plan A - let alone a plan B  via @LibDems 
SUNDAY TELEGRAPH: Britain to offer EU £36bn for Brexit bill #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Brexit, Trump, Gatlin. 
Justin Gatlin gets the Gold medal. The least popular result in London since Brexit 
Biafra: We Will Win If Referendum Is Conducted – IPOB Responds To Arewa Youths  
UK ready to pay €40bn Brexit bill, but only if EU talks trade #Premium 
This is what the single market and customs union actually are – and what will happen to Brexit if we leave them  
Banks' dire Brexit warnings are finally getting through to the government, RBS chairman says  
Important to stay in Euratom after Brexit  
- Let's go.- We can't.- Why not?- We're waiting for Brexit.- Ah!Silence.- This is awful!  
Too many of you embittered Remainers would rather Britain fails than Brexit succeeds. Time to make it work not endlessly complain about it.  
Brexit. Time to drain the Treasury swamp.  
Labour's Brexit avoiding subject today is rail transport. Like all other subjects, Brexit will make it impossible to deliver.  
Michael Russell @Feorlean writes 4 @iScotNews in our August issue    @theSNP #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Today's calls by Mervyn King should be a wake-up call to this shambolic Conservative Brexit Government.  
Scottish farms face losing millions in subsidy after Brexit  one year on and we have Farmers Crying Now. 
Theresa May didn't think people cared much about the terms of Brexit. She was wrong  
Fury at Gove sell-out to EU over UK fishing waters after Brexit, we should send an Armada of little boats to protect our seas for 'B' Day. 
Who'd have thought an Irish passport is better than a UK one!!!Brexit and the great Irish granny grab  via @FT 
Control freak Theresa May caused Tory Brexit chaos, says John Prescott 
To be fair NFU warned of dangers of Brexit but many rich farmers (e.g. Dyson) thought they knew better; now we face shortages, rising prices  
Yup- that's the only "open border" we have.Brexit is v confused on borders. Many stull think FoM is something to do with border control.   
Farage: Brexit betrayal has begun, I may return to frontline  
May ready to WALK AWAY from EU without a deal. EU need to trade with UK, £70B Trade Deficit!  via @Your Brexit 
Wembley for Spurs this season will be like Brexit. If things go well, will be despite it; if things go badly, will be because of it. 
The EU27 aren't laughing at us. They just cannot believe what we're doing to ourselves. #Brexit  
This, co-ordinated with #Remain MPs locating their brains, would be immense.#Brexit  
Can you imagine a complete idiot putting a #brexit vote to the thick morons of this country, without having a Plan B or even a Plan ?  
'Extraordinary' number of Britons are applying for Irish passports because of Brexit  
Labour's contempt for the will of the people. MPs demand free movement after Brexit.  
There can't have been one Brexit politician who didn't know there'd be less money not more for the NHS bc of deminished tax revenues. #Liars 
YEP it's all happening - in the meantime the Tory carnage rolls on & #Brexit is taking the UK over a cliff !Just another day in the UK !  
This Government doesn't have a Brexit plan A - let alone a plan B - @vincecable  
Translation: the attempt to implement Brexit in the real world, instead of the Farageland of Panglossian rancid xenophobia, has begun.  
August Kicks Off With Brexit Good News Hat-Trick  via @GuidoFawkes 
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit | Business | The Guardian  
The 17.4 million are awaiting Brexit extraordinarily patiently. But there will be no prisoners taken if it is betrayed. Get it yet, Tories? 
Amazing @MMFlint berates "Russia collusion" but is happy to go to Britain to try and thwart Brexit. FOREIGN AGENT!   
Furious woman in the passport queue wanting to know why she can't skip onto her Eurostar. Tempted to ask her if she voted #Brexit 
This was lesbian-look-a-like @MMFlint's $5.2m, 7-bed home. Meanwhile he lectures working classes for #Brexit and #Trump. Keep going, Mike! 
Britain's top universities give Theresa May 10 demands she must meet to protect higher education after Brexit  
More self-inflicted #brexit hassle and #BrexitCost that #Brexiteers told us wouldn't happen: 
Michael Moore (@MMFlint) insults the Brits on #Brexit: ‘Enjoy Your Miserable Life on Your Island’#saturdaymorning 
UK must have credible 'no deal' Brexit plan – ex-Bank of England chief  
We must stop Brexit full stop! It's insane, the ref should never have happened. I will never forgive Tories for putting party above country  
Etonians caused Brexit. Many of them want a dictatorship. George Orwell (Eric Arthur Blair) went to Eton. He knew what they were capable of.  
We are heading towards a world where a democratic nation state has been hijacked by a Brexit Elite pedalling racism and lies.  
#Brexit is a far right anti-immigration project. Why is Labour failing to oppose it?#CorbynOut #StopBrexit 
Brexit will surely go down as the greatest UK political misjudgment made in peacetime. I remain wholly convinced it will be reversed.  
Leavers say the #Brexit vote was all about immigration.... or not. Diane James vs Daniel Hannan. #StopBrexit #Remain 
There's no reason to wait til June or late 2018 for a referendum.We're tired of waiting, it's #TimeToAct 
THANKS BREXIT  
#Mauritania referendum cartoon: - I mistakingly voted no, but came back to correct it - we caught it and fixed it. don't do it again.  
In an instant, after Brexit, one part of Ireland would be in Europe, and the other would not  
I sure am looking forward to the home office "handling" all of us EU Nationals when Brexit hits. Nothing to worry about here at all.   
BBC now using your licence fee money to take the piss out of people who vote Brexit.  
The Daily Mail cheering on the fascists in the 1930s and in 2017 #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Read the Good Friday Agreement or delete your account, @KateHoeyMP #brexit #Taoiseach 
If Brexit sets a precedent a 4% win in an advisory ref is all you'll need to:Bring back hangingCriminalise homosexuality Ban trade unions 
The Daily Mail peddling fear and hatred of immigrants and refugees in the 1930s and today. #Brexit #StopBrexit #StopFundingHate 
Alan Partridge will return to BBC as the ‘voice of Brexit’ in 2018  
Hanover fans not exactly helping my efforts to shift Burnley Brexit opinion?   How many bloody friendlies get abandoned for crowd trouble? 
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
Britain just got its first concrete sign that Brexit will destroy the economy | The Independent  
'Extraordinary' number of Britons are applying for Irish passports because of Brexit  
Stupid, Sad and Shameful! #Brexit can be harmful not only to your pocket, rights and freedoms but also to your self esteem! FFS Britain WHY?  
Friend's birthday party. "What do you do?". "I work on #Brexit". "Oh cool, I'm from Spain - what should I do now?". #nevergoesaway 
Mrs May was a terrible Home Secretary. Only serving so long because she dodged responsibility. And a worse PM. UK Brexit chaos is just that  
Yes of course there are queues in airports it is called Brexit but the point is you'll soon be patriotically queuing with a BLUE PASSPORT. 
Former BoE governor Lord King says the UK needs to be prepared for a "no deal" Brexit to show Brussels there is a "credible" alternative  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage took aim at fake conservatives, crony capitalism, and issued a warning over radical Islamic terrorism.VRA 
.@Nigel_Farage captivated young Americans @YAF last night: "I think the great Brexit betrayal has begun" 
Looks like this poll didn't go as its promoter wanted :)#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Michael Moore Slams Trump, Brexit, Telling Brits: ‘Enjoy Your Miserable Life on Your Island’  @3lectric5heep 
One of the many complicated consequences of Brexit: What will happen to the borders in Ireland?  
A selection of charts from our scholars' work to guide you through #Brexit:  
Brexit Poll: What should @theresa_may offer for #Brexit? Bill at a billion' May urged to reject EU's 'laughable' £90bn divorce demand. 
Here are the British towns and cities that will be hit hardest by Brexit  
Tories only go for really easy targets, jobless, ill and disabled, pensions.They now have #brexit and have no clue what they are doing. 
#Farage: Brexit betrayal has begun, I may return to frontline. Should Nigel return?  – Westmonster       #fo2eu 
."Profound failure to understand the intense emotions that Brexit has stirred up in a region scarred by the past". 
FARAGE IN DC- 'Brexit betrayal has begun'- Could return to frontline - Tears into Cabinet - "chinless wonders"  
."The 2016 European referendum in effect put a huge neon sign over Britain, saying, 'Foreigners not welcome'". 
Brexit: baby boomers ruin our country, blame it on the foreigners and retire, leaving us to deal with their mess. 
Feuding Tories entangled, bewildered & trapped in Brexit foreplay impotent to control NHS crisis, prison chaos or Trump's excesses. GE now. 
Deutsche Bank expects to move 4,000 jobs to EU after Brexit  
Difficult to tell whether the BBC has a bigger crush on Leo Varadkar or Emmanuel Macron.  #Brexit 
#BrexitwontWorkUK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit  
Brexit UK = "foreign workers not welcome" So guess what? They aren't coming, 20% shortfall already#BrexitwontWork 
A Brexit fallback is called no Brexit.  There is no point going on with this nonsense.  #StopBrexit 
Dear @theresa_may there is time to stop #BrexitChaos RT #Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  
*Brexit Explained*  
...in the meantime, Brexit rather reminds me of Suez: obviously wrong, but UK carries on regardless, then withdraws covered in ignominy. 
.@VinceCable: Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit...  
RBS plans move to Amsterdam for post-Brexit EU hub   
That #Brexit voters think UK-only queues are an option shows how extremely silly their neocolonial fantasy has made them.  
Ireland's prime minister tells Theresa May to strike Norway-style Brexit deal with the EU  
Since brexit the weather has been peak. The EU have stopped paying our summer subscription 
Kyle Lafferty: all the grace and dignity of Boris Johnson performing a Brexit rap on rollerskates 
.@stellacreasy, Labour MP, on the Brexit negotiations #bbcaq @BBCRadio4 
Leading Brexit campaigner says 'vacuous' referendum should never have been called...  
Take back control ... and starve a bit as well.  Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  
Lord King ridicules #Brexit scaremongering and calls for both sides to come together to deliver a successful EU exit 
Act now - or watch the #Brexit lie machine win, says @campbellclaret  
One by one the banks move out of London. Less jobs, less tax revenue, less opportunities for Brits. Well done Brexit  
Brexit: Majority of older Leave voters say significant economic damage is 'price worth paying', finds YouGov  
A second referendum gives us, the electorate, the final say on any deal. After all, Brexit was supposed to be about 'taking back control'  
If Britain stops attracting educated cosmopolitans it will stop attracting many dynamic businesses. A downward spiral is possible.#Brexit 
Leaders along Irish border worry that Brexit, and a hard border, could bring back an "us vs. them" mentality.  
In the interests of balance I'm trying to find any positive assessments of #brexit negotiations so far. Failing. 
A brutal analysis of the #Brexiteers from @SimonKuperFT in @FT  #brexit 
Why do you want to #Remain in the European Union? #Brexit #Leeds 
This week in #Brexit:  
Mervyn King says what every non-insane person already knows: UK 'must prepare a Brexit fallback' #StopBrexit 
#Brexit lies: @Lord_Sugar says @BorisJohnson and @MichaelGove should be in prison. Read and share our report. Link:  
Michael Moore on Brexit: 'Enjoy your miserable life on your island’  
They say after Brexit there’ll be food rotting in the fields. It’s already started | John Harris  
Theresa May must prepare 'credible' plan for no Brexit deal, says former Bank of England governor Lord King  
Brexit: Frustrated Institute of Directors puts forward some sensible ideas but common sense is on holiday in Britain  
Amsterdam shines as financial groups seek post-#Brexit EU access Bravo #Nederland. 
BBC News - Nigel Farage: Narrow Remain win may lead to second referendum  @acgrayling @dontbrexitfixit 
#BREAKING: #Kurdistan Pres. Spox. denied phone call b/w US Secretary of State Rex Tillerson, @masoud_barzani about opposition to referendum.  
Just remembered that whsg had an internal referendum on whether or not to tuck in school shirts, such a strange strange place 
Kurdish community in #Sweden calls authority to support #Kurdistan referendum #TwitterKurds 
The Government will publish several significant Brexit papers during the week of 14th August, report @POLITICOEurope 
I think we need a new system post Brexit for junior doctors, a very British system. #saynotosho Med Student - SquireF1 - Duke/Duchess 
Thank you for 2000+ followers! The remain movement keeps growing. We won't stop until we #StopBrexit. In honour of #Brexit being bananas...  
there'll be a huge "ppi" style claims industry in a few years "were you missold brexit?". 
Crowded field but prob least informed, most jaundiced piece on #Brexit and Ireland https://t.co/3Oo8p0eIq2?amp=1 @gavinsblog @brianmlucey 
Those old enough to remember the Cuban Missile Crisis will know that common sense prevailed, disaster averted. So shall it be with Brexit. 
The only thing anyone should want, if rational, is no Brexit.  
Tories to pay Mo Farah £1 billion to change his name to Brexit Billy and stand at the cliffs of Dover throwing Quorn at immigrants 
Brexit may cost us $300 million, HSBC says  
They say after Brexit there’ll be food rotting in the fields. It’s already started | John Harris  
Labour's Diane Abbott brands the 17million voters who backed Brexit as racists  
The 'Healthy Will of the People' a concept used by the Nazis to destroy democracy & the Rule of Law #Brexit #Remain 
I understand why a lot people voted for Brexit (propaganda can be infectious), but surely now only the ignorant and/or selfish still want it  
.@Cambridge_Uni demands to know what rights EU nationals will have post-Brexit.  
"No deal is better than a bad deal." Really? In EU, UK has trade deals with >120 countries covering >40% global GDP. All lost post Brexit. 
UKIP support was highest in areas with fewest immigrants. Clearly there's a strong element of fear born out of ignorance /1#Brexit  
National Farmers Union warns UK must increase home-grown food production & build stronger supply chains after Brexit  
Not satire.Brexiter Jacob Rees-Mogg slams "elites" of remain strongholds Liverpool, Manchester, Peckham and Glasgow over Brexit:  
National Farmers' Union warns of food security issues for Brexit Britain  
Standard Chartered to spend £15m on turning Frankfurt office into post-brexit European base  
Britain not prepared for a hard Brexit, warns former Bank of England Governor  
My husband Irish. Has worked in NHS 27years. We will leave UK for Dublin when we retire. No interest in living in post Brexit UK 
Time will tell, but it appears anxieties about Brexit were based on more solid ground than the 'exaggerated' Brexit.  
Will everyone please listen to Dad.Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  
Brexit is starting to trash the economy. £ has now fallen by 25% against the € since Brexit vote.  
Public opinion towards brexit will ONLY change significantly if remainers encourage regretters to speak out. This must happen fast ! 
Revealed: The 9 levels of Leaver expectations about #Brexit  
Passport control is at present really easy and fast. It won't be after Brexit... 
Carney - Governor of the bank of England seems to have  got just about everything wrong and his dislike of Brexit is worrying. He should go. 
As @DameEdnaEverage said to Jeffrey Archer 'if you can't laugh at yourself, you're missing the joke of the century.' Brexit goes the same. 
EU fishing boats can still operate as far Inland as Birmingham, Coventry and Stoke on Trent after #Brexit, says Gove  
My cartoon - the (not great) repeal bill#Brexit 
The sin of Brexit originalism  
May called election to get big majority for her version of Brexit; lost majority instead. To Timothy it doesn't matter. Profoundly arrogant.  
Rip up your plan for Brexit, May told by Irish PM 
Richard & I from different political families have found common crossparty cause as MEPs to champion UK in SM & CU. Soft Brexit vital for UK  
Revealed: The horrendous travel rules awaiting Britons after Brexit  
The new ambition of Brexit... coping.  
Trump supporters justifying trump "yeah but Hilary's emails" Corbyn supporters justifying hard Brexit "New Labour used PFI"  
Will you be voting in #Kurdistan’s independence from #Iraq referendum?  
Snap out of it, Britain. Brexit won’t save you  via @IrishTimesCultr 
They say after Brexit there’ll be food rotting in the fields. It’s already started | John Harris  
"Oh, ha-ar-ard Brexit"  
Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  
Being a responsible minister my good friend Michael Gove wouldn't advocate hard Brexit if it leads to food shortages  
The killer argument against hard Brexit ... not enough food    
UK 'must prepare a Brexit fallback'  
Those who read my letter to Gove will find this warning from the NFU re bare larders post Brexit horribly familiar  
National Trust orders all public facing staff to wear UKIP badges to show support for Brexit. Or did I just make it up? 
Your soft #Brexit merely gives away UK sovereignty, which we have as Members of the EU. No change is a good change so #stopbrexit 
If proof were needed that May's interpretation of Brexit Referendum was incorrectHere it isUK citizens support FoM 
Michael Moore on Brexit: ‘Enjoy your miserable life on your island’  
Au contraire. Very easy to answer. Day one post Brexit offer a free travel deal between UK and Ireland only.   
RBS picks Amsterdam as the home of its EU headquarters after Brexit  
Democracy means reading the small print. Referendum was advisory.  
Latest from me: on Brexit, the food industry, and the messy end of cheap stuff/stagnating wages economics  
Bill Shorten has met with Noel Pearson, Pat Anderson and many other senior Indigenous leaders to commit Labor to #referendum #garma2017 
Oh dear, Mervyn King. No deal is not a credible fall back position #Brexit @BBCr4today 
An EU answer to Tony Benn's 5 questions  #Brexit  
The rest of the EU is moving ahead, the UK will become an atrophied backwater if we foolishly allow Brexit to happen.  
Strange how SSM plebiscite is essential but referendum on Aboriginal Treaty & constitutional recognition isn't. #auspol #garma2017 
At the heart of Brexit is an English arrogance that we are better than every other nation, and the world should be grateful to have us.  
Are you a far right extremist 
Is Britain’s ‘Brexit chaos’ a cunning ploy?(No.)My post at @FT, responding to @POLITICOEurope's playful piece. 
This week, President Maduro claimed victory in Venezuela's referendum where 10 people died in protests on polling day.  
Irish commentary on #Brexit growing more incredulous by the day;  Snap out of it, Britain. Brexit won’t save you  
Don't know the source but this seems about right! #brexit  
Staying in the EU solves them all, an advisory referendum based on lies not facts should not condemn the UK to "Brexit". #StopBrexit 
Staying in the SM & CU solves so many #Brexit problems. "Rip up plan for Brexit"  
The astonishing thing is that Brexit means we have an "Irish question" again. Do none of these people know any history? 
The four reasons for Brexit neatly destroyed   
Spotted at Ronnie Scott's but then most professional musicians are anti brexit. #thankEUforthemusic 
RBS picks Amsterdam as the home of its EU headquarters after Brexit  
Excellent piece done by @StephenGethinsLabour's Brexit position puts Scottish jobs at risk.  
BIAFRA: BIAFRA REFERENDUM IS INEVITABLE -IPOB TALKS TOUGH  
Today's horrible Brexit realisation: 38% of all UK archeology funding is from the EU.  Gone. #ThanksBrexiters 
#Russia’s ‘positive’ stance with regard to the Kurdish independence referendum has empowered the Kurds  
Brexit is already hitting your income  
Is Varadkar about to call the Brexit bluff ()? 
Brexit - the greatest political error in peacetime?  
'He blamed Brexit for everything!' Carney lashed by economist for 'unbalanced' outlook  
It can only get better! Brexit could improve wage inflation as tycoon@truemagic68  slates Mark Carney  
'Not to do with Brexit!' Tory MP @johnredwood shreds Carney for 'sloppy' blame of EU vote on slow down 
Thanks to the financial crisis and Brexit, Britain has lost all of its global functions in one great rush  
Never mind that the 1967 referendum had nothing to with indigenous voting rights.  
Confirmation that the two 2016 vote results that floored pundits - Brexit &Trump - were meddled with by the Russians 
'Just give up!' Julia Hartley-Brewer bashes Mark Carney for 'negative' Brexit forecasts  
Breaking: let's be real referendum validated by election board in #SanFrancisco whatcha think @MaliaCohen ??? #vaping #adultsLikeFlavors 
Kurdistan Independence Referendum Rally on August 13th @ 2pm 1 Public Sq. Nashville TN 37201. Please Retweet! #KurdistanReferendum 
Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  I warned about this months ago! #toldyouso 
Referendum Council hold up the Uluru statement from the heart at #garma2017 
Referendum Council co-chair Pat Anderson says there is hope in the words of the PM and Opposition Leader. #garma 
Congrats San Francisco residents! We just heard from City Hall that we have more than enough valid signatures to qualify the referendum! 
"Brexit taught both sides that voting matters. Be politicised. It's about accountability"   Michael Mansfield QC radical lawyer  
Indigenous ppl should take inspiration from the 1967 referendum, not the 1999 one @billshortenmp #Garma17 
No reason a question for a referendum "can't be made by the end of the year" Bill Shorten says #Garma2017 #auspol 
PM says compulsory voting makes referendum hard because those uninformed more likely to to vote no #auspol #Garma2017 
#Scot24 - did Russia offer Mnuchin's money-laundering PACS plus Cambridge Analytica bots to Trump after #Brexit?  
"HSBC could move 1,000 jobs to Paris, UBS said about 1,000 London jobs could be hit by Brexit"Not a rich Brexit.  
"RBS group, is set to move a large part of its international trading division to Amsterdam"Brexit is double Dutch!  
.NFU is NOW up to speed on the dangers of BrexitWas it informing the farmers of the dangers before the EU Ref?.  
Offshore secrets of Brexit backer Arron Banks revealed in Panama Papers (From Oct 2016) 
Brexit could leave Britain with a bare larder, farmers warn  
I know people who are leaving. Even people with children born and raised here.#Brexit  
Lord Sugar says Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be in prison over Brexit 'lies' | The Independent  
‘Tasking Brexiters with managing Brexit was like asking the winners of a debating contest to engineer a spaceship’  
Cobblers. Solve 'the Irish question' and Brexit still splits the country, trashes our reputation, makes us poorer and loses us freedoms.  
Time to support our good, loyal friends from across Europe by committing to the EU.By doing so you would prevent Brexit destroying the UK.  
It's been two years since Seamy called for a referendum. Maybe it's time we listened.  
Every day, we find new costs to #Brexit , hitting #Britain's economy , losing jobs, diminishing tax revenue. Not what they promised... 
More #brexit job losses for #Britain : 
I just found out I'm losing the only dentist I've ever had who doesn't make me have panic attacks to Brexit. She's going back to Spain. 
The one thing that nationalists hate more than the non-existent EU dictatorship, is the very real EU democracy.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Tony Benn was wrong. The EU has developed democratic institutions, much to the chagrin of nationalists who scream 'Federalism!'#Brexit  
Survation called the GE. They have Remain 8% ahead and we've only just started to taste Brexit's bitter fruit.  
Brexit negotiations are a sham, it is time for Britain to walk away  
How many voted Brexit b/c they thought they were leaving a sinking ship?Irony: EU is fine. It is UK that is becoming the sinking ship 
Britain no longer believes in fair play. Instead EU27 citizens are seen as fair game for arbitrary rule changes.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
We'll be back on the streets of #Leeds tomorrow to talk to YOU about #Brexit and how we stop it. Find us on Briggate.  
Irish Taoiseach Leo Varadkar throwing some brutal shade on the UK government over hard Brexit absurdity. Dublin has more ideas than London 
WATCH: UKIP politician DESTROYS BBC reporter in brilliant interview  via @Your Brexit 
There is no key to Brexit: it is an historic stupidity; the gullible led by the fallible 
Michael Moore on Brexit: ‘Enjoy your miserable life on your island’ | London Evening Standard  
EU Chief Juncker DESTROYS REMOANERS and states UK will definitely leave EU  via @Your Brexit 
This was their April take. The UKIP 9% has shifted from 2% in June last year. Even the hardcore are abandoning Brexit pic.twitter.com/hkh4vYTBuz 
In foreign airports? This Brexit is brilliant. #FFS 
Taoiseach speech v important: the key to Brexit lies in solving the Irish question #border #customs #union 
A very good summary by @AdamBienkov of why post Brexit life for 3m EU nationals won't be like before.  
Ireland's prime minister has warned the clock is ticking on finding solutions to Brexit issues on the island  
Exclusive: EU migrants under age of 30 could be given 2-year visas to live and work in UK after Brexit #premium 
Revealed: The tangle of red tape awaiting British travellers after Brexit  
Someone needs to tell those Liberals 
Let's stop the semantics  of Hard, Soft, Smooth Brexit or Transition and just CANCEL BREXIT. Just Cancel! 
GE2017 was all about Brexit. Honest. "Bedroom Tax still devastating Liverpool's poorest four years on".  
Katie Hopkins SLAMS London Mayor Sadiq Khan over acid attacks in the city  via @Your Brexit 
It is time that the decent politicians stood up and called out the Brexit Extremists lies, rather than backing their cause. #StopBrexit 
Minister urges for UK-only passport lanes to combat the European Union’s attempt to “punish” Britons  @Your Brexit 
Greek MEP demands Elgin Marbles become part of Brexit negotiations, via @Telegraph 
All the rights EU citizens in the UK are set to lose after #Brexit  by @AdamBienkov#StopBrexit #Remain 
Meanwhile, at the Brexit department  
Brexit is the stupidest, most unplanned , chaotic, suicidal and dangerous populist policy Britain has ever embarked on. 
I think they can only aspire to even organising a piss up in a brewery. There is no future in Brexit, none. #StopBrexit  
Suspect Brexit means nothing more than getting UK away from EU's universal rights culture & over to the pay-as-you-go culture of US #bbcaq 
UK small & medium-sized firms see Brexit as an opportunity, as international trade rises. Millennials embrace Brexit pic.twitter.com/bnIlVYyri8 
There is a good chance Trump will be gone by next year andBrexit will fail. In any event, the alt-right (far-right) rise is OVER 
.@campaignforleo commitment to #Brexit special deal for NI welcome, says @naomi_long 
Everywhere I go outside the UK, people regard #brexit as an absolute disaster - for us. Why can't we all see it here? You own this, #Leave 
My weekly roundup of the best Brexit analysis featuring @IanDunt @davidallengreen @SiobhanFenton @jennirsl & more:  
Irish Ambassador to the UK @DanMulhall discusses what #Brexit will mean for Ireland and the border with the UK #SNT 
The Establishment-run judicial system wouldn't jail Boris Johnson and Michael Gove but Brexit should be put on hold pending public inquiry  
Brexit is a profoundly selfish project. It hurts people - ppl of Ireland, EU citizens in UK, children - who had no vote & did nothing wrong.  
Lord Sugar says Michael Gove and Boris Johnson should be in jail for #brexit referendum lies. He makes a good point, it was rather fraudish 
The Tories are ripping each other apart over Brexit. We need a unified direction and serious leadership or face disaster! My TV appearance:  
'@KateHoeyMP is right, demands for a referendum rerun aren't democratic, they're a desperate measure from those unable to accept the result!  
Banks' dire Brexit warnings are finally getting through to the government, RBS chairman says  
Varadkar hits nail on head here. Hard Brexit has failed. Now time to work in everyone's best interests, not just those of Tory hardliners.  
As part of Leave, Gove tells UK fishermen Brexit means getting our waters back. As part of Tory Gov he tells Danes will be little change. 
Britain seems so badly prepared for Brexit that other countries think it's some kind of trick  
Many of the skilled workers Britain needs are precisely the highly educated 'citizens of the world' the #Brexit press & politicians insult. 
Guys, get used to it. We're all mocking you. In fact, the whole world is doubled up laughing at #Brexit Britain. Not funny, is it? 
So, UK govt. assures us they'll get fantastic Brexit deal. Great! If it's so good why not put it to a referendum & we'll all back it... No? 
Growing backlash against sanctuary city could spark first in nation referendum in November.  
."Tragically May’s govt is not only itself delusional on Brexit but is now fatally dependent on DUP for survival" 
Why dost thou continue thy futile and suffering search for logic in Brexit...  
A mean-spirited, unstable, irrational, poorly educated, cold, damp, xenophobic little island on the NW corner of Europe. #Brexit Britain. 
Greek MEP demands Elgin Marbles become part of Brexit negotiations 
Brexiteers claim that 80+% of voters at the last GE support Brexit.If you voted Labour, did you do it because: 
Irish PM wants Britain to stay in single market. Ireland has form If EU doesnt get right result with 1st referendum they hold another one 
I voted Labour to thwart the Tory #Brexit - but my vote goes to stop Brexit whatever party will do it. Welfare of the country first. 
"If that is TOO MUCH for unionists to stomach, they'd better get workingHard Brexit, in THEIR case, is unworkable" 
Two goals a game, three assists a week, 99.9% shots-to-goal efficiency, BREXIT negotiations after finding Jimmy Hoffa's body.No pressure.  
Boris Johnson should be in prison over Brexit 'lies', says Lord Alan Sugar  
The EU has shrugged off the impact from last year’s Brexit vote, with support for the eurozone at a 13-year high  
Adams welcomes Taoiseach’s comments on border and Brexit  @GerryAdamsSF 
Our car industry & its 814k jobs find Brexit 'utterly demoralising'. For the many jobs, first we must #StopBrexit 
Getting rather tired of the Irish Taoiseach meddling in the UK's internal affairs i.e. Brexit. Blog on this tomorrow. 
We MUST know all the truth! What really happens at #Barcelona #Airport ?#Catalonia #Eulen #Elprat #referendum #mustknow 
.@SDLPlive delegation following a productive meeting with Taoiseach @campaignforleo with discussion on Brexit and NI talks  
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit 
UK Gvt promised "respect", "Union of Equals" & "constructive Brexit dialogue".So far,no respect,equality or talks,only fishing rights sold. 
Remoaner Demonstrators trying to stop Brexit  
Vince Cable warns  that the country is heading towards a Brexit 'disaster'  
The Architect of mass immigration into the EU 
BBC suddenly quiet about Scotland’s post-Brexit fishing sector  via @InformScotland 
Lord Sugar says Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be in prison over Brexit 'lies'  
"Enjoy your miserable life on your island!" ~ Michael Moore on post-Brexit Britain.  
NHS sell off as part of a post Brexit trade deal must surely be a step too far even for Leavers! We have best deal already. #StopBrexit NOW! 
As #Trump's White House takes America to the precipice, and #Brexit does the same to the UK, this is essential reading on how #Russia won: 
A former Tory ministers joins me @lbc after 7 to say why Britain should bring in UK only passport queues to hit back at EU brexit queues 
New US ambassador offers huge Brexit boost: ‘We will strengthen special relationship’  
In the Age of Trump, Brexit and Love Island this is an astonishing accusation.  
Starting to worry!!!What is wrong with them, Brexit is an unplanned, dreadful, abomination.  
Very disappointed you could tweet that Anna !Even though you're  Tory - I was really beginning to respect how outspoken you've been #Brexit  
UK car industry facing an 'utterly demoralising' Brexit  
BREAKING: Brexit voters have no sense of humour  
La la la ....  RBS plans to make Amsterdam its EU base after Brexit  
Simon Rattle: 'I would have been wary about taking the job had I known about Brexit'  
Brexit means Britain opening up to the world and reengaging with our old allies in the commonwealth. 
WRITE TO YOUR MP: Say ‘NO’ to Philip Hammond’s ‘Halfway House’ on Brexit – Respect the Referendum Result or Resign  
PODCAST: the brilliant Ali Smith on (probably) the first post-Brexit novel  
Michael Moore on Brexit: ‘Enjoy your miserable life on your island’  
Implicit in the Taoiseach’s speech today is a threat to block the start of Brexit trade talks, says @JGForsyth 
Give it time, brexit will be fictional too..... 
Watch our supporter @OwenPaterson talk about Brexit and Ireland on @BBCNews 
RBS '14: vote Yes & we leaveRBS '17: we're off to Holland post BrexitAnd we still oppose iScotland(What unscrupulous unpatriotic tarts) 
Christmas is coming! What's more festive than a copy of #Queers from @NickHernBooks? (Also coming but less cheery: Brexit and death).  
WATCH: UKIP politician DESTROYS BBC reporter in brilliant interview  via @Your Brexit 
Sales of new cars plunge amid #brexit uncertainty. Knock on effect to manufacturing jobs. Careful what you wish for 
Cabinet minister Priti Patel insists the Government's position on Brexit is "very clear"  
Because our centre backs are Italian and Portuguese. It's like payback for Joe Hart's pro Brexit agenda 
Oh YES! Brexit referendum medlers Cambridge Analytica..their fraudulent use rendered the referendum illegitimate!  
UK business chiefs too gutless to tell Theresa May to stop Brexit to avoid disaster.  
A year on from EU Referendum, and Remainers and the media still question if the Referendum was a fair one, and not biased to Leave.Well...  
RBS is preparing to move 150 jobs to Amsterdam, which it's chosen as its EU hub after Brexit 
Disinformation created Brexit.Conspiracy theories about the EU were planted in order to distract us from the REAL conspiracies of the 1% 
A second Brexit referendum over the final deal it’s looking more likely by the day—choice is hard Brexit or remain 
In 1 speech @campaignforleo has given the British people more insight into how #Brexit may work than May has over last 14 months. Good job. 
@mikegalsworthy from @Scientists4EU filmed some great content with us a couple of weeks ago. Here is that footage. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Im talking about outrageous Nat Trust edict 4 staff to wear gay ride badges on my @lbc show from 7pm and splits in Labour on brexit 
So Brexit  
"Brexit, Trump, climate change, oil producers, dark money ... it’s all connected" - Al Gore  
Minster urges retaliation over what might be a covert EU move to delay British holiday makers, as a Brexit warning. 
Ooohh Please,Please, I dearly hope so....The United Kingdom could tear itself apart after Brexit  via @BIUK_Politics 
‘IT’S APPALLING’ Farage slams Gove for saying Britain’s waters will be OPEN to Europe  BETRAYED BY OUR OWN GOVERNMENT 
.@RhonddaBryant – Fall in car sales shows Brexit uncertainty is damaging our economy  
Is Britain’s ‘Brexit chaos’ part of cunning plan?My response to this fun, thought-provoking piece up tomorrow.  
James Dyson: If Brexit talks fail with the EU it's 'no big deal':  Falling back on WTO rules would be no problem. 
That's the last straw. I'm not having it. Stop #Brexit now!  
David Davis' GoT binge: comic for @prospect_uk  #Brexit  
Car sales hit major speed bump in Brexit Britain  
He couldn't make it any clearer. Remember denials of plans for EU military pre-Ref? UK is still being signed up to this since #Brexit.  
I understand this reaction. Remainers see the logic of Stop Brexit - not Soft or Delay Why aren't @LibDems @vincecable @joswinson our voice? 
Labour MPs ask Corbyn to commit to free movement post-Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
UK interest rates could rise due to Brexit, warns Bank of England deputy  
Why should he. Brexit is a slap on the face to EU27 & creates huge problems for Ireland GFA. DUP & SoS during Ref denied NI border an issue  
A year after voting for #Brexit, Britain’s divided, and in uncharted waters: Professor Timothy Ash discusses:  
We're uniting with our Russell Group peers to ask the UK government for greater clarity on #Brexit and its impact:  
Irish PM claims there must be a hard border after Brexit & it's Britain's fault for exiting, EU Finland have free border with non-EU Norway 
In fact I'm of firm belief that a lot of the ideological motivation behind Brexit was to get UK 'free' of EU labor/environment regulation.. 
Irish PM Proposes Customs Union or "Deep Free Trade Agreement" With UK after #Brexit 
BREXIT: No-one beats Mail readers when it comes to intolerant, self-righteous delusion whipped up by wish-fulfilment and imagined slurs.  
The EU wants to give Brits living in Europe full rights. Our Brexit government refuses to do the same for EU citizens in the UK. Shameful! 
You support #Brexit, austerity, Trident and the House of Lords. Keir Hardie would be disgusted with you. 
A report released today shows that Ministers are risking a Brexit brain-drain from our universities - read more:  
I hope .@UKLabour stands up for UK fisherman by guaranteeing that a Labour government post-Brexit will secure full 200 mile fishing limit. 
*Brexit Explained*  
How Brexit Can Reset the Immigration Debate>A great article that sets out a real challenge for progressive politics  
I’m starting to wonder if Brexit is some necessary completion of the fall of empire. 
 @StephenGethins: Labour's continued confusion & division over their Brexit position puts Scottish jobs at risk.  
F**k you, EU fascist superstate. We're sick of you making things cheaper. After Brexit, we'll bang our roaming fees right up again#Control 
.@Alison_McGovern says Ministers must listen to Leo Varadkar's speech on #Brexit today ? 
Honest and important speech on Brexit by @campaignforleo @QueensUBelfast 
Is Coogan aware of the fact that millions of the same people he calls "little Englanders" are Labour supporters who also voted for Brexit?  
Pro Brexit politicians like May, Gove, Davis and Corbyn are lying to the country. They should all be called out & held to account  
Ireland's prime minister has warned the clock is ticking on finding solutions to Brexit issues on the island  
People blithely saying "it'll be fine" on Brexit/NI are like the kid at school refusing to admit he lied about his dad having a Lamborghini  
UK new car market declines -9.3% in July, the fourth consecutive monthly fall amidst growing uncertainty over Brexit  
A nightmare and utterly disgraceful. Expect more of this for EU citizens too post-Brexit.  
Scottish bank which was bailed out by tax payers, moves its EU HQ to Netherlands. So Brexit = Scottish tax payers funding jobs elsewhere.   
Strong support for high welfare meat at #CountryfileLive debate. Let's hope public #BackBritishfarmers after #Brexit  
Zebari: Russian view of the referendum, as expressed by its foreign minister, is very “positive” and “progressive.” 
Wait for UK Govt's Scottish Sec to announce special deal for Scotch in return for Scotch Whisky Association's new found support for Brexit.  
#StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow #ExitBrexit 71% of @UKTories poll says Brexit Needs Stopping. It's the will of the people to #StopBrexit 
Animals are sentient beings -they feel pain. Add your voice @ciwf petition to save this status in law post Brexit.  
Alan Partridge to return to BBC to be 'voice of hard Brexit' 
The pound sinks again on the back of Brexit. It's time to back the British economy and fight to remain inside the EU. #StopBrexit 
Without Irish unification, a hard Brexit is impossible | Simon Jenkins  
Hence why almost all new roads in these areas have been built with major EU investment. What happens now post Brexit?  
Brexit will cause 'decade of damaging uncertainty' for the environment, warns outgoing National Trust chief  
Truly Brexit at Palma airport.  
Not true. '75 referendum govt info listed economic benefit 3rd out of 5 benefits. 1st was "bringing people of Europe together" 
Right wing press: "let's invent scandals over student debt, Brexit & Venezuela, that'll do the trick....oh"  
The Government need to get a grip and accelerate the process of Brexit - @TiceRichard on @SkyNews 
Our Brexit stance is 'very clear', Cabinet minister Priti Patel insists  
Amazing that a UK radio presenter is the first person to give NI a voice on #Brexit. Bravo James. 
Vince Cable warns that the country is heading towards a Brexit 'disaster' #LibDems 
"Labour MPs ask Corbyn to commit to free movement post-Brexit"  <-- @labourlewis is one of the MPs to have signed 
UK car sales fall 9.3% in July says motor trade body... blames Brexit... car sales dropped 8% in Germany- Gerexit?  
That's nonsense. Laws aren't "pushed on us". We all collectively propose, debate and agree on legislation. #Brexit  
Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar has said he does not want an economic border between Britain and Ireland. #Brexit 
Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be in prison for Brexit 'lies', says Lord Sugar  via @HuffPostUKPol 
"Without Irish reunification, a hard Brexit is impossible"  
Savage moment Jacob Rees-Mogg ripped into Bank of England's Mark Carney over 'pro-EU' bias   #Brexit 
Britons living all around the world are applying for Irish passports to “safeguard their positions” after Brexit, ambassador has revealed.  
Yes they're allowed a life, but I am really hoping to hear something useful from RD about her position on #brexit and Scotland . 
Simon Rattle: 'I would have been wary about taking the job had I known about Brexit'  
Fact: Britain is NOT an economic powerhouse. Poorly educated. Low skilled. Propped up by EU. Brexit bad idea.  
Nothing to do with Brexit. Mainly down to Government dithering over future of diesel after Labour told us to buy diesel 10 years ago.  
The weird fantasy world of Brexit transition  Excellent dissection by @iandunt. 
Yezidis wouldn't have faced genocide in 2014 if forces loyal to the party pushing the Kurdistan referendum hadn't fled when IS attacked.  
Irish PM can condemn Brexit result in Brussels as much as he likes but has no right to condemn a legitimate democratic vote in Britain. 
An advisory referendum that parties said they’d respect, but no super majority because it was advisory. What a merry mess. #brexit  
Brexit means the UK taking back control “of our borders and our immigration policy, which means an end to free movement,” says @patel4witham 
Well quitlings, you voted for it & now you have got it with much worse to come  #leave #brexit  
‘Germany is a "YUGE" MESS’Trump says Merkel told him she REGRETS opening borders to migrantsWell I never!#Brexit 
"Ministers are risking a Brexit brain-drain." says @LaylaMoran  - find out why here:  
45°c heatwave (aka "Summer") all over Europe...except the UK.  That's Brexit for ya - we're even being left out from having nice weather 
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day | Vernon Bogdanor  
There is no need for our government to go ahead with brexit. It's dangerous and is seriously harming the Uk's standing internationally 
In which  I  discuss  the essay "The Reichstag Fire Next Time" and how it could apply to #Brexit@TheNewEuropean 
Boris Johnson and Michael Gove should be in prison for Brexit 'lies', says Lord Sugar  
This article shared a bit. Perfectly sensible and its irritation is understandable. But it's false that we can't stay in EEA after Brexit.  
My last word on #Brexit - and the concerns it raises for Ireland - before I leave @IrelandEmbGB. From @standardnews. 
'Poland doesn't need EU,Poland isn't needed by EU'Tusk HUGE bombshell as Political Superstate disintegrates#Brexit 
Alan Partridge set to return to the BBC as the voice of Hard Brexit  
Brexit: Frustrated Institute of Directors puts forward some sensible ideas but common sense is on holiday in Britain  
Brexit uncertainty blamed as UK car sales fall for fourth month  
.@vincecable in @WalesOnline today "Britain is heading towards a Brexit disaster"  
* @RCorbettMEP explains why the best option for Britain is to #Remain in the EU. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The Good News on Brexit They’re Not Telling You - via @DanielJHannan @nytimes 
Britain seems so badly prepared for Brexit that other countries think it's some kind of trick  
Labour MPs ask Corbyn to commit to free movement post-Brexit  
Michael Gove says European fishermen can cast nets wide in UK waters after Brexit  
Irish Prime Minister Leo Varadkar says "time is running out" on Brexit and he believes "no extra time will be allowed" 
No, you see, that's a football match., not a non-binding referendum result that followed a dishonest campaign  
If there is a finer Brexit metaphor anywhere on the internet I haven't seen it. Also VERY funny. 
"Onus on those who want a hard border to explain how & why it will work. In 14 mths they have come up with nothing" @campaignforleo #brexit  
Second referendum please  
Brexit uncertainty and the Government's crackdown on clean air has been blamed for a drop in new car sales  
.@Lord_Sugar tells @EmmaBarnett  he would be willing to help the government’s Brexit team in their negotiations if asked #5liveDaily 
Why Brexiteers fear any second confirmatory Referendum for their chosen hardBrexit UK economy destructive path.  
The Czech Air Force has introduced their new anti-#Brexit livery Tim Felce CC-BY-SA#Avgeek 
"Labour is now a brexit party" . Exactly why I, a Labour voter for 45 years am not renewing my membership. Labour you have betrayed me.  
Vince Cable warns that the country is heading towards a Brexit 'disaster'  
€100 just cost me £101. Living the Brexit dream. 
Brexit 'transition' means a worthless Brexit. Let that sink in. 
While politicians debate soft & hard Brexit, fiddling while Rome burns, business shift to EU27 continues apace  
Nearly run over by car with Vote Leave sticker driving erratically down a No Access road. Draw your own conclusions. #brexit 
Is there anything funnier than the unfolding fear among Quitlings that Brexit is undeliverable 
Brexit is already causing EU citizens living in the UK to be discriminated against for jobs and housing  
Declaration of interest: I want Brexit to end. I want End Brexit to trend  until Brexit is officially called off. 
By far the simplest solution. But EU may be bigger stumbling block than even the Brexit headbangers. Needs smart sustained UK diplomacy. 
'Five Escape Brexit Island': Enid Blyton adult series set for EU sequel - as well as more adventures  
End Brexit squabbles and nail down transitional deal, IoD urges ministers  
Gove tells Danish fishermen they'll still have access to our waters after Brexit ...but doesn't consult the Scot Gov  
Typical Remainers. We don't need Free Movement of People.It's clogging up our NHS, housing and benefits. Hence 17.4 million voted #Brexit 
Now imagine you're not white, or a man. And people are telling you stuff like that all day, every day. That's reality beyond Brexit. 
The "economic hardship is worth it" argument for Brexit is coming from people who won't be touched by it. That's privilege in action. 
Huge surge in demand for Irish passports since Brexit vote  
So Brexit means keep the foreigners out but as we Brits are bettter than anyone else we can still do what we want and go where we want? 
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day | Vernon Bogdanor  
#Brexit Cambridge Analytica connection to Atlantic Bridge (Liam Fox / Werrity scandal)by @textifire  
Don't end brexit #BrexitMeansBrexitThe European Elite have destroyed the UKIts time to take our country back! 
End Brexit. Full stop. Deeply flawed & therefore undemocratic referendum, chaotic process, a disaster in the making. Come on! Let's end it. 
Podcast: @mattzarb explains why Brexit won't turn young people against Corbyn   
You know when you press 'escape' or 'delete' on your PC and you get a message saying 'are you sure?' - we need an 'are you sure?' referendum 
Odd that Quitlings are calling for #Dunkirk spirit in Brexit when it was actually a disaster a national humiliation.  
Project Fear 2 - the BoE, the CBI & the Treasury department all ganging up again to make us frightened of Brexit, says @JLongworthLML 
BBC to give EU flags to all prom visitors to protest over Brexit. This is inciting trouble, blatantly political and they should be stopped. 
End brexit #stopbrexit 
WE VOTED OUT! So Why End Brexit ?Because Brexit has become a vote to leave the Single Market, and we were never told what that is.  
Exclusive: EU threatens to suspend Brexit talks until Britain pays its divorce bill 
Ireland's departing ambassador to UK was interviewed on Radio 4. also told me Brexit border checks were non starter  
When a medicine is this bad for you, you certainly don't need to be a doctor to know not to take it. Time to wake up #brexit  
Oh golly! They're back! Five Escape Brexit Island this autumn... #FiveGo  
'Extraordinary' numbers applying for Irish passports because of Brexit, ambassador says  
New post: How Brexit will constrain a future Labour government   plus a response to Owen @OwenJones84 
We always could control EU immigration but didn't. Non EU immigration continues and India seek more for a FTA. #brexit big neg supply shock. 
This needs to be addressed & this should be a priority for a reinvigorated liberal centrist movement along with halting Brexit.  
Food tariffs to be dramatically reduced post Brexit resulting big big savings on your weekly food bills. 
This is the stirring Brexit warcry from a Conservative MEP: "We need to get on with it. It's much simpler than other trade deals."  
Example of #European police cooperation, helping stop illegal #Immigration , that will cease if we #Brexit @Europol 
One, tangible, practical, BENEFIT of Brexit please? Anyone? Seriously. Just one? 
"DUP not published a single substantial paragraph on how customs or immigration controls might work after the Brexit for which it voted."  
Hot air won't get UK trade agreements after #Brexit whatever Liam Fox and Boris Johnson claim | Andrew Adonis  
EU fishing boats can still operate in UK waters after Brexit, says Gove  
#Brexit: "Gove confirms foreign access to UK [i.e. Scotland's] fishing grounds."  
Mark Carney's pessimism suggests his confidence in an orderly Brexit is starting to fade  
Mark Carney,Bank of England, says Brexit consequences are starting to build.Wages & investmented decimated.What a #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Brexit is a monumental act of self harm, yet Brexiters continue to promote it. Promoting self harm is not normal behaviour. 
With Brexit looming, 2 German chains are winning big in Britain's supermarket wars  
The private sector is terrified by Brexit and the government at this point should be stepping in - says economist @AnnPettifor 
Now here's an original piece from @adwooldridge on Brexit  
A government report says Britain is losing £24bn because of race inequality at work. Brexit Britain can't afford racism. #takefairness 
Despite Brexit vote UK National Sperm Bank to close due to wanker shortage 
Spot on! Brexit will wreck UK & damage EU, so perfectly right to insist that democratic basis of this decision is sound 
RBS plans move to Amsterdam for post-Brexit EU hub  
Oxford and Cambridge struggle to hire EU talent thanks to Brexit  
May to slash tariffs on food and drink to open up plethora of trade deals after Brexit  
Project Fear all over again! Brexiteer tycoon SLAMS Carney's prediction of Brexit effect  
A host of questions remain on the Brexit transition deal  
Yet another thing Brexiteers promised could never happen. Brexit impact on UK higher education & medical research will be huge sadly  
A sobering piece - but many of us have been banging on about this for years. Thatcher biggest disaster to  the UK before Brexit came along.  
#Brexit to lead to gr8er economic & pol subservience to US, reinforcing UK hard right  extreme free market forces.  
Bully boy Juncker:'You'll be lonely after Brexit' EU’s Juncker unleashes fresh threat to rebel Poland  
50 years ago Britain withdrew from east of Suez, now it is withdrawing from east of Dover.  #Brexit - taking the Great out of Britain. 
RBS picks Amsterdam as the home of its EU headquarters after Brexit  
Should There Be a 2nd EU Referendum after EU Exit Negotiations?  
BREAKING: RBS is in "advanced discussions" about setting up EU hub in Amsterdam after Brexit  
Fury after Gove tells Danes they can fish in UK waters post-Brexit  
Notion that UK continues to be dictated to by ECJ is complete rejection of Brexit the British people voted for only last year. (9/10) 
UK maintaining Common External Tariff would stop us doing free trade deals w/ rest world. Economic benefits of Brexit would be void. (8/10) 
IoD adopted a pro-EU position throughout referendum. Report is evidence that it is part of continuity Remain campaign. (2/10) 
A remarkable list of the harm #Brexit will do to UK. This is not scaremongering, this is reality  
Brexit reveals Britain’s enduring flaws -  via @FT 
The EU has shrugged off the impact from last year’s Brexit vote, with support for the eurozone at a 13-year high  
Small firms seek delay to Living Wage target as Brexit looms  
Referendum: 23 JuneSterling slide 1: 24 JuneMore QE: 4 AugustSterling fall 2: 5 OctoberYup, must have been Carney.#r4today 
UK Minister Gove admits that under Tory plans EU trawlers will continue to fish off UK after Brexit  
Or just stop itUK business chiefs call on Theresa May to delay Brexit to avoid chaos  
Yes, I'm happy to admit that I do seem to have got this aspect of #Brexit wrong. Very happy to admit it, in fact.  
Vince Cable warns UK heading for a brexit disaster He's forgotten LibDems helped Tories implement AUSTERITY the biggest post war disaster. 
If it wasn't independent, surely it would be doing the Government's bidding and talking up Brexit? 
Mark Carney Warns of brexit which hasn't happened yet damaging economy. No mention of 7 years of TORY austerity which HAS destroyed economy! 
No. People/papers who complain there will be more checks at airports after brexit are behaving like spoilt children. It's embarassing tbh 
Cost of racism in jobs market is 3x the #EU bill (counting rebate). Brexit Britain can't afford racism. #takefairness 
Brexit casts lengthy shadow over UK rate tightening outlook  
Institute of Directors joins the CBI in highlighting the dangers of Brexit. Pessimism not optimism about Brexit.  
Noel Whelan: Varadkar’s straight talking on Brexit is welcome  
'The bank expects investment in the UK economy to be 20% lower than it had forecast before the EU referendum' @FT #Brexit bites. pic.twitter.com/TgEsUrJo0B 
‘A location for growth’ Swiss bank dismisses lenders' Brexit fears by moving staff TO UK  
PM @theresa_may to slash tariffs on food and drink to open up plethora of trade deals after Brexit  
BIAFRA IS ALL WE ASK 4 @MBuhari GOVT BEATING DRUMS OF WAR#PEACEFUL REFERENDUM @realbenetanyahu @realDonaldTrump @UN 
Yet another reason why #Brexit is bad for Britain ...  
The Tory government’s Brexit talks are so shambolic, EU diplomats think it’s an elaborate ploy  via @thecanarysays 
This is what the single market & customs union actually are – and here’s what will happen to Brexit if we leave them  
It seems to me we could have avoided this #brexit disaster if the Leave leadership had googled "What is the EU?" BEFORE the ref, not AFTER 
And if you've ever wondered if Russians meddled in Brexit vote, you shd note that Cambridge Analytica was also involved in that referendum.  
Stolen Seas: How UK suffers under Common Fisheries Policy: Ray FinchFishing waters = litmus test of true #Brexit 
Flynn discloses ties to Cambridge Analytica, the Mercer-related data co which interfered w Brexit & our election.   
Asked Farage for his top ten Brexit benefits that BBC 'weren't talking about'. And answer there came none.  
.@carolecadwalla wrote this stunning piece (among others) abt Cambridge Analytica's role in Brexit. (Thread) 
The infighting over how to handle #Brexit is recorded in breathless detail daily in the British press.  
A while ago I asked for anyone to give me a genuine Brexit benefit. You won't be surprised to learn I've received the square root of sod all 
Hey, farmers. Here's The Telegraph, throwing you under the bus.#brexit  
Yep! Since Mercer was also behind Brexit leave, which is now under investigation in the UK, hopefully he will go down with the ship. 
The words Brexit and intellectual do not go together 
Faced with the reality that Brexit is a total shambles, leading Brexiteers try to avoid blame by turning on each other  
Bill Shorten calls for finalising of referendum question on Indigenous voice in parliament  
Britain may have drunk the Kool-Aid with Brexit, but they still have it right with @bbcproms Listen to this! 
#brexit Anyone there from the leave camp? Why the silence? No boasts about sovereignty? No wild dreams on trade deals? No 'move on' tweets? 
Leave leaders told people Brexit would be a piece of piss. Welcome to the real world, where we trade away the family silver just to survive.  
This is also the firm that backed the Leave campaign that fed all that disinformation to British voters regarding Brexit. 
Nigerian Gov'has no choice than to carefully make sure that the request for referendum by IPOB is in accordance with the wishes of #Biafrans 
FT: Carney warns Brexit uncertainty is choking business investment #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Poultry farm that supplies Asda, Tesco and Sainsbury's boiled halal chickens ALIVE 
"Universally acknowledged business abhors uncertainty, and nothing is more uncertain than Brexit."That's a fact. 
The 'Healthy Will of the People' - a Nazi concept used to justify destroying democracy & the rule of law. #Brexit 
Brexit has been projected to push up UK banks’ costs by 4% and capital needs by 30%  
The private sector is terrified by Brexit and the government at this point should be stepping in - @AnnPettifor tells #newsnight 
A host of questions remain on the Brexit transition deal  
Says a UKIP MEP who has zero knowledge of economics, takes MEP salary for doing nothing & will get EU pension which is part of #Brexit bill.  
I hope @nealerichmond realises most of us in the UK are totally opposed to May's illegal #Brexit, and does all he legally can to prevent it. 
John Longworth, ex CBI chief, sacked because he voted Brexit says Remoaners in BofE, Treasury & CBI are spouting project fear 2, traitors. 
Brexit UK: way beyond ridiculous  Britain should introduce UK-only passport lanes in response to queues in Europe  
Scots fishermen backed No, backed Brexit & backed the Tories. Now they're stuck with backstabbing weasel, Gove...  
Think this "Brexit Analyst" underestimates how popular a 'British Passports Only" lane will be.  
But abandon Brexit *is* what we should do next.  
Said it before. Davis selected because he's an idiot. Talks fail. Hard #Brexit Murdoch, Dacre, Corbyn, May all happy  
Owen Jones: "Discipline has collapsed in the Conservative Party..."49 Labour MPs rebelled against the leadership over Brexit.#SkyPapers 
Another brilliant evidence-based thread from Steve, showing exactly how a #brexit myth was spread by television presenters and politicians.  
Today's #skynews:Brexit badTrump badVenezuela mehMan gives birth to baby - yayAnd now for some Owen Jones. 
More money wasted on Brexit that Britain can ill afford. A Brexit that is damaging the British economy. It's time to #StopBrexit 
After the EU proposed toughening external Schengen checks DEC 2015 (long time before the referendum eh?), Home Sec Theresa May told Parl / 2 
Getting really sick of this "EU now trying to discriminate against Brits b/c of #Brexit on airport checks" nonsense. So here are some FACTS 
Britain to pay £520 million to move EU agency out of London because of Brexit  
A 2nd Brexit referendum? Looking more likely by the day. By Vernon Bogdanor, who is worth reading   
Will Poland leave the EU next? Could Polexit happen soon after Brexit?  
Public now very worried about outcomes of BrexitWith best result being damage limitation it's time to call it off. 
Tomorrow's front page: Gove's Brexit bombshell for fishermen (and without consulting Scottish Govt ... despite fishing being devolved)  
Car insurance has gone up because of ambulance chasing lawyers and outright fraud, not #BRexit #BBCNews 
BBC News At Ten... Leading with the UK's dreadful Brexit economy. 
At last. The backlash against Brexit whipping boy @jeremycorbyn begins. @WelshLabour threatens split. 
40) Instead, Nechirvan used his genocide commemoration speech today as a platform to attack Baghdad ahead of the KRI Independence Referendum 
Dear @UKLabour MPs. You don't need to be @vincecable's bestie. But join him to oppose a damaging #Brexit 
The Brexit Elite are desperately seeking some reason other than the obvious for Brexit economic disaster. Still in stage one-denial.  
Why the EU Referendum Provides No Genuine Democratic Mandate to Leave | austinharringtonCan't share this enough  
The biggest problem we face is millions of people are acting illogically on Brexit. Promoting self harm is not normal behaviour. 
ROYALS: “Ghost of Princess Diana would support Brexit” says spiritualist “which is odd as she’s not normally a fan of car crashes.” 
Brexit...  
Don’t believe the bad news about Brexit  
"Tasking Brexiters with managing Brexit was like asking the winners of a debating contest to engineer a spaceship." 
Bank of England - #Brexit uncertainty is hitting investment - just as some of us predicted #StopBrexit 
Mark Carney indicates bad economic data, but this is ineffective as anti-Brexit argument. Focus on people & communi…  
Lady from England asked me did us Irish vote in favour of Brexit. Nearly fell off the sun lounger before singing Go on Home British Soldiers 
Everyone's spoiling Brexit! If only they would believe! Or at least shut up! And stop reality! And destroy logic! Then Brexit would be bliss 
'Parasites! Stop wasting our taxes' Outrage after EU politicians release anti-Brexit video  
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU'  
Rees-Mogg FURIOUS ‘Metropolitan elite are REJECTING the referendum’:  
You are wrong..the momentum against brexit is reaching overwhelming proportions. 
Donald Trump BACKS THE UNITED KINGDOM in out future outside of the EU  via @Your Brexit 
Alan Partridge will return to the BBC to become the 'voice of Brexit', says Steve Coogan  
2016 Brexiters: No sharks after Brexit2017: Nobody said there wouldn't be sharks2019: You all voted for sharktown  
The relentless remoaning of Nick Clegg - now he wants to ‘pause’ Brexit . What a nasty piece of work this moron is.  
Remain will piss off half the population. Brexit will piss off all the population 
So do I!Hopefully MPs from other parties will gain the confidence to speak out about madness of Brexit as @LibDems @LaylaMoran is. 
We have two choices: Brexit or Remain. Each will anger about half the population.But only Brexit will destroy the country.Sorted! 
Perhaps there's a global conspiracy to thwart our glorious Brexit. Or perhaps it's just a dreadful idea.  
Honestly. The world - more specifically, Brexit Britain - has gone f**king insane.  
How the @UKLabour will square the circle? Hard or Soft #Brexit? Confusing.The majority isn't for a Hard Brexit. They said it during #GE2017 
'Enjoy your miserable life on your island!' Activist and filmmaker Michael Moore on post-Brexit Britain.@MMFlint 
MPs should be asked now to state their preference for Brexit or Remain, it's such a significant issue - time to stand up and be counted.  
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day - Vernon Bogdanor  
."The UK's top universities say they are struggling to hire talented EU academics & it’s the fault of Brexit". 
IN AN EFFORT TO NOT OFFEND 
13. This time the question is: "After Brexit, WILL we be in the European Single Market, Yes or No?" and the answer is simply "No".  
It seems to me that pro-EU labour have retired from the scene & decided to accept Hard Brexit.  Sadly. & IMO madly too #StopBrexit 
Oxford and Cambridge struggle to hire EU talent thanks to Brexit  
I consider myself as an EU citizen.That's why we need to protect the #citizensrights to @The3Million friends and family affected by #Brexit 
Even now, Brexit-Wankers still won't admit the damage they've done.  
I'm so glad to be at the @OxfordTownHall tonight to be your voice against #Brexit. We do need an exit from #Brexit. #oxford4europe 
Will Poland leave the EU next? Could Polexit happen soon after Brexit?  
@67Kelechi Welcome to the city, son. We're a Hard Brexit club so no side foot shots (head down & laces through the ball). #welcomekelechi 
The VERY FIRST thing we should do is abandon Brexit.THEN we can fix the UK problems for which the EU have unfairly taken the blame. 
Has there been a strong demand for *Brexit transition*? I don't think so. I'm just getting wind of a strong demand for No Brexit.  
Between Brexit and Trump, I have been thinking about leadership (or lack of) a lot lately. This is an amazing quote:  
."Report calls for establishment of a task force to address prospect of violence unfolding as a result of Brexit". 
A United Ireland is inevitable focussing on Brexit referendum result and the March Assembly election @StMarysBelfast with @FeileBelfast 
Hard Brexit: Recession+ more InequalityStay in Single Market: Same benefits+ less SovereigntyRemain:Same benefits+possibility of reform 
Referendum ‘yes’ vote campaign to begin on September 15  via @catalannews 
Trump, Russia, and Brexit Exposed In New Book...to be released this month#AlternativeWarVia @Byline_Media 
Do you believe the government has a Brexit plan? @clivebull 
useful infographic of this week's brexit progress  
So @alstewitn reports a sober @bankofengland report on the economy #Brexit - and is attacked.  
"Brexiters were tasked with managing BrexitLike asking winner of debating contest to engineer a spaceship"  via @FT 
Petty EU is out of order picking on UK holidaymakers, this airport shambles just goes to prove we were right to Brexit, threatening bullies. 
Theresa May asks Philip Hammond to give the nation a Brexit update!  
The Tory government’s Brexit talks are so shambolic, EU diplomats think it’s an elaborate ploy  #Brexit 
Alternative title for @davidallengreen's latest post: The #SocialConstruction of #Brexit. It's all gone #sociological at the @FT. 
Brexit gets royal assent, as Princess Di has beyond-grave doubts over EU  
"Why are those who based arguments for Brexit on the will of the people now opposed to consulting the people"  
It's time to get behind #Brexit and Respect the Result.  
If Parliament can't decide on a #Brexit - hard, soft or cancelled - then the decision should go back to the people. 
first concrete signs that #Brexit will destroy #UK economy... This isn't scaremongering this is FACT. #StopBrexitNow  
Remember when the Remain campaign said there would be a exodus in financial services after Brexit?  
Scottish Whisky Association is embracing BREXIT but not independence. Hilarious. 
"#Brexit reveals Britain’s enduring flaws." Some painful and necessary home truths from the @FT 
Dutch Bank: ‘let's move more jobs to London’"talent pool is there, people there, so that's what we've done”#Brexit 
66% of people back the single market - are you one of them? Add your name today:  #brexit  
We're going to have years of this:"It's not Brexit's fault! It's everything else that's ruining our economy and making us poorer!"  
‘A location for growth’ Swiss bank dismisses lenders' Brexit fears by moving staff TO UK  
Alan Partridge will return to BBC as the ‘voice of Brexit’ in 2018  
."Or – just a thought – we could cancel Brexit" 
UK heading for a 'smooth Brexit' Mark Carney finally admits economy is NOT set to collapse  
Just came across this excellent #Brexit letter, highlighting the famous German sense of humour and ending in an epic #humblebrag 
True patriots want their country to get better, not worse. Wanting Brexit when it will destroy families and society is deeply unpatriotic 
"If you don’t want to be part of Europe, then leave Europe & enjoy your miserable life on your island." @MMFlint on #Brexit on #c4news - 7pm 
The afterlife of a referendum question.By me, at @FT:  
Brexit country, "with no-one at its head, wandering off a cliff, while patting itself on the back" @IanDunt - 
No response, yet. But  Brexit is looking increasingly imperilled and @TheSun doesn't like losers. 
"Yet another lie of the Leave campaign has been exposed" @thomasbrake responds to Michael Gove on fisheries  #Brexit 
The Brexit effect: growth falling, investment falling, wage growth falling, sterling falling.  
Carney is dead right. Businesses are hedging because no post-Brexit clarity and no consensus in Cabinet.  via @FT 
Add the £50bn UK drinks industry to the massive list of sectors damaged by Brexit. Wake up. There is no good Brexit!  
Brexit is the problem Chuka  
‘Tasking Brexiters with managing Brexit was like asking the winners of a debating contest to engineer a spaceship’  
A second Brexit referendum would be a 'life raft' for Theresa May, says David Cameron's former politics teacher  
More cabinet chaos on Brexit. Gove now edging away from his own promises and grand standing just a few weeks ago. 
So i've (co)written a Brexit book. You'll prob hate it. But won't know unless you buy it.  
Fine piece by @KuperSimon - asking Brexiters to manage Brexit is like asking a debating club to design a spacerocket  
EU fishing boats can still operate in UK waters after Brexit, says Gove  
UK students ‘may be barred from Erasmus after #Brexit’, says @Cardwell_PJ  
When the #Brexit referendum was announced, £1 bought 1.43€. As of August 03, 2017 at 06:00PM, £1 buys 1.1059€. 
Britain's economy is at the mercy of Brexit, with the Bank of England slashing forecasts  
Any attempts to force a repeat referendum should be resisted. We need to move forward and get our economy growing.  
Brexit is casting the biggest shadow over Britain's economic outlook, Mark Carney says  
Brussels fears Britain's 'Brexit chaos' part of cunning plan  
Follow the logic of the referendum result and the conclusion is that Brexit must eventually mean a clean break  
For #Brexit to work we need Dunkirk spirit not Naysaying Nellies. EU is a" corrupt, sclerotic club" @TeleWonderWomen 
Pound falls after Bank of England cuts Britain's economic growth forecast  
My newest comment piece for @CapX on why Brexit negotiations aren’t going all that bad:  
Project Fear all over again! @JLongworthLML slams Carney's prediction of Brexit effect  
Company that runs #Venezuela’s electronic voting system says results of Maduro’s illegitimate referendum were faked:  
#Brexit or #NoBrexit the #UK and #EU must stand up for #HumanRights My article in @HuffPostUK this month - 
Friends! Excellent!To ensure political balance, the panel will also include an anti-Brexit Tory MP, a LibDem MP, and a Green activist.  
Pound now at €1.10 - close to 25% depreciation since Brexit. And only going in one direction  
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day | Vernon Bogdanor  
Brexit is like a Shakespearean drama that's still waiting for the first entrance of its hero.Who knows who he or she will be? 
Bank of England keep rates on hold to deflate sterling, puts out gloomy economic predictions to get floppy #Brexit. Independent they are not 
Bank of England warns Brexit is seriously hitting investment. - How much longer will MPs allow the ship to race towards the iceberg? 
Brexit: Growth revised down, sterling down, employers handing out fewer pay rises, investment slowing  
DUP disrespecting will of people on Brexit – @GerryAdamsSF  
ICYMI: Today we published a new note on areas where clarity over the #Brexit rights of #EU citizens is needed  
Alan Partridge to be BBC’s ‘voice of Brexit’ in new series, Steve Coogan reveals  
Good list. Kurdish independence referendum is both opportunity and tremendous challenge.  
UK – Trade ministers spend over £1 million on recruitment agencies for Brexit trade negotiators  
Another study reveals negative econ impacts of #Brexit. SW MPs must back staying in single market & customs union.  
Mark Carney says Brexit will take a toll on Britain's growth and cuts economic forecasts  
The tories are selling us out on #brexit, freedoms and much else. If you valuethat belongs to us then get behind @AMDWaters 
Brexit uncertainty building.Business investment at all time low.MPs should now begin to press for 2nd referendum. 
How does the lack of agreement in Northern Ireland bode for #Brexit asks @hayward_katy @QUBMitchell - @QUBEngagement 
1/n What has the EU ever done for us? A question asked by many Leavers pre #brexit referendum last year. Well…  
Let down by British politicians who will have far less money to spend on those areas in future directly due to Brexit #Madness 
What a friend we have in cheeses. That's our post-Brexit economy sorted then.  
Sterling’s Brexit slide has yet to deliver trade’s sunlit uplands  via @FT 
'It's a WHITEWASH' Brexiteers furious as BBC boss denies Brexit reports are 'DOOM-LADEN'  
Barry's disappointed we're not in that recession his Remainer chums promised us if we voted for Brexit. Sorry, Barry.  
Czechia: Eurozone membership referendum, TNS Aisa poll:Join the euro: 21% (-5)Keep national currency: 79% (+5)#Czechia #Euro 
Project Fear all over again! Brexiteer tycoon SLAMS Carney's economic forecasts for Brexit  
Sweden: Eurozone membership referendum, TNS Sifo poll:Join the euro: 26% (-2)Keep national currency: 74% (+2)#svpol 
Hey Brexiters - world economy growing at over 3%...UK 1.7% and slowing. We haven't even left yet..well done you absolute *#*/^&$ #Brexit 
Carney warns Brexit uncertainty is building. As is the case for abandoning Brexit!  
"Uncertainty in the countryside": the National Trust warns of the dangers of Brexit for farmers 
Are you one of the 66%? Join our campaign today:  #brexit  
Netherlands: Eurozone membership referendum, TNS NIPO poll:Remain: 81% (+3)Leave: 19% (-3)#Brexit 
Most of the EU migrants in UK draw in-work benefits, child benefits,etc and will continue to do so AFTER #Brexit#TotalMadness 
Expert, Mark Carney: Brexit already making us poorer.Remainers: We told you, Brexiters.Brexiters: Project fear!  
Is there any UK political journalist or commentator who still does not believe a second Brexit referendum is  now likely?  
Mark Carney says Brexit will take a toll on Britain's growth and cuts economic forecasts  
Philip Hammond serves no purpose to Brexit other than to thwart. If you refuse to acknowledge the will then you have no place in high office  
There is a party in Scotland that is doing their utmost to ensure there is never another Independence referendum. They're called the SNP. 
Princess Diana 'votes for Brexit'. Peak Daily Mail, pretty much peak everything  
Sad and funny #brexit illustrations in the the New European  
Govt must urgently answer this question: What benefit will Brexit deliver that outweighs us all becoming poorer?  
Mark Carney just warned Brexit is already dragging down your wage  
Leading constitutional expert and Cameron’s former tutor thinks a second referendum now likely  
Theresa May under pressure to sack anti-Brexit trade envoys | Read all the Brexit news here  
Our fishing waters are the litmus test for a true Brexit. The gov't are about to sell out British fishermen AGAIN!   
Make no mistake, even if we walk back from the cliff of #brexit, Britain is a busted flush if we continues to follow neo-liberalism. 
Brexit uncertainty hitting wages & business investment  
You ever watch Brexit and wonder how Britain manged to colonise most of the world 
Sack the four envoys who hate Brexit, Duncan Smith tells Theresa May  via @MailOnline 
An astonishing statistic: Investment in the UK in 2022 is now forecast to be 20% lower than the Bank expected before the Brexit referendum.  
Eurozone grows at fastest pace in six years. @bankofengland downgrades UK forecast. #Brexit makes us poorer – permanently. Let’s stop it. 
Alan Partridge set to return to the BBC as the voice of Hard Brexit  
"Leave Means Leave" say fall in growth forecast is nothing to do with the Brexit they pushed and demand a new Chancellor   
Carney warns Brexit uncertainty is building  
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day | Vernon Bogdanor  
The UK seems so ill-prepared in Brexit negotiations that some EU countries think it must be a trap—playing for time 
1 Euro is now going to cost you 90p Thanks to the stupid Tories and the morons that voted for #brexit  
Worth a listen: Carney's language & tone measured but the content both explicit and more especially implicit is pretty devastating on Brexit  
Bank of England today warn that a hard Brexit means: Lower growth Weaker £ Higher pricesNobody voted to become poorer. Pls RT:  
'You'll be lonely after Brexit' EU’s Juncker unleashes fresh threat to rebel Poland  
My time line is awash with folk who backed the #Brexit bus claims & the 'no one is talking about tariffs' tosh. It is tedious & frightening 
Brussels thinks Britain's 'Brexit chaos' may be part of a 'cunning plan' ... but no our negotiators are just idiots.  
EU gives Spain a veto over #Brexit deal for #Gibraltar -a veto that could be illegal under EU's law. #TheMindBoggles 
An anagram of " Brexit is looking good" Reads"What a shambolic fucking disaster you selfish thick twats have created" 
Like the Iraq war and the financial crisis, Brexit reveals Britain’s enduring flaws — Simon Kuper  
Brexit is fraud. Pure and simple. And those who helped perpetrate it belong in prison.  
#Brexit will change the way we eat, farm and use our countryside. Back to the Victorian diet?  
Opinion | The Good News on Brexit They’re Not Telling You  
Bank of England forecasts, which are bad enough, assume a sane transitional period not a cliff edge hard Brexit favoured by the hard-right 
President Barzani received Norwegian ambassador, reiterated that no turning back on Kurdistan Referendum. It is irreversible.  
Leaving aside the bollocks stuff like taking back control, teaching Johnny Foreigner thing or two, funding NHS, what are benefits of Brexit? 
Rees-Mogg FURIOUS at Starmer on Brexit: 'Metropolitan elite are REJECTING the referendum'  
If business saw Brexit as a golden opportunity for growth, why isn't there any? The answer is in the question!  
Brutal @kupersimon column about hot air of #Brexit with brilliant Harry Hayson cartoon on British grandeur.  via @FT 
EU's oldest policy - CAP - symbolises why people voted for Brexit says Warwick Lightfoot of @Policy_Exchange 
Gove: EU boats can still fish in UK waters after Brexit  @mikehookemmep 
Pound falls to lowest level against euro this year after Bank of England's latest forecast  
Last wk Chancellor told me Brexit was partly to blame for weak GDP. Today Carney echoes him. These aren’t forecasts. “It’s happening now” 
Brexit means ... an upper class Etonian calling Remainers an "elite".  
Attention: The unionists are all but completely ignoring the perils of Brexit. Make of that, what you will.  
How much more evidence do our elected reps need of the dire consequences of #Brexit ? @garylineker @iandunt @tes 
Brexit not so sunny uplands await UK it now turns out in contrast to economic global trading eldorado promised by Brexiteers  
5 types of EU worker we may never see again thanks to Brexit  via @HuffPostUK 
And, when the Brexit cult gets challenged, the mask starts to slip and its desperate followers will expose their ignorance and bigotry.  
The EU passport control row is a preview of Britain's Brexit fate, says @georgeeaton  
I asked Carney if Brexit had ALREADY  damaged econ. In short:Yes. Investment weaker, businesses nervier… “consequences starting to build” 
I hate to break it to my friends in the UK, but: no, you can’t "stay in the EEA" after Brexit.  
More and more talk lately about Brexit being reversible - "Tixerb"? "Tixerb means Tixerb"? Makes as much sense to me... 
Jean-Claude Drunker has expressed belief  Brexit will happen. unelected despots like Juncker are exactly why it will happen 
Clear opportunity here for a new Blackadder Brexit special: @Tony_Robinson 
Blimey.Carney - MPC forecasts level of investment in 2020 to be 20% below that projected before the referendum. 
If perjury takes place in a trial, a verdict can be overturned. There are 350m reasons, @BorisJohnson, why the referendum result is unsafe. 
Remember Farage called for a 2nd referendum when he thought Remain was winning.  
Why are those who based arguments for Brexit on the will of the people now opposed to consulting the peopleLord Butler  
Referendum on final deal looking 'more likely' -  
Most just want a stable job + fair wage they can live on. Government cannot let the basics fall by the wayside in pursuit of a hard Brexit. 
British and American society are both infected by irrational right wing populism. Which will fall first, Trump or Brexit? 
Steve Coogan reveals that Alan Partridge will be ‘the voice of Brexit’ when he returns to the BBC  
 Britain's economic outlook has been downgraded and Mark Carney is explaining why  
Rees-Mogg FURIOUS at Starmer on Brexit: 'Metropolitan elite are REJECTING the referendum'  
Who gave the British Government a mandate to hand away 100% UK control of and access to British Territorial Waters post-Brexit? No-one! 
More evidence of the cost of hard #Brexit - the Bank of England forecasts lower growth and higher inflation  
The UK seems so badly prepared for Brexit negotiations that other EU countries think it must be a trap  
Brexit and the City - Aviva confirm their support for the UK and the City. 
The tale of the Brexit referendum questionBy me, at @FT 
We're too divided to continue with Brexit. Lies were told during referendum. Voters deserve the chance to reconsider  
A second Brexit referendum is looking more likely by the day, says Cameron's former politics teacher  
WTF: Gove tells Danish fishing industry they'll have access to UK waters post-Brexit. What about our fishermen?  
Labour's shadow Brexit minister plots vote to remain in Single Market despite Corbyn insisting the UK must quit it 
Spice World! Alan Partridge to become 'the voice of Brexit'  
The European Medicines Agency is moving on - I wrote about it, and the wider implications of Brexit on science here:  
A brilliantly witty piece on why #brexit will never work.Brexit reveals Britain’s enduring flaws  
The way I see it, Brexit is a boil that needs lancing. And that means a politician saying that it's bollocks and they're not supporting it. 
Alan Partridge will return to the BBC to become the 'voice of Brexit', says Steve Coogan  
It seems to be only Liam Fox & a few Brexit-ultras that think this.  
WATCH | @KTHopkins: 'America isn't a mess, Londonistan is a mess! Trump, like Brexit was lost voice of millions standing up to the elite.'  
Eurosceptic MPs accuse BBC of 'whitewash' after broadcaster rejects claim of Brexit bias  
First Brexit. Then Trump wins the election. And now I'm curator of @sweden. 
Is it during a national referendum campaign?  
You'd never have guessed. Turns out Gove's Game of Thrones Brexit is completely impractical.  
Second referendum voters ‘might try finding out about it this time’  
Another excellent #Brexit piece by @davidallengreen this time on #EEA 
Brexit: A very deliberate act of self harm. Wonder what proportion think damage to NHS is "worth it" for Brexit.  
If only Diana's ghost had warned of imminent snow causing cancer as well as endorsing Brexit, the Express would never need another article 
If the Remoaners want a 2nd EU referendum, well that WAS the 2nd one. It's one all and we can have a decider in 40 years time. 
New laws will give the UK beefed up anti-terrorism powers after Brexit  
Thanks, Brexit Britain... EU nationals suffering 'unlawful discrimination' over Brexit uncertainty, campaigners warn  
Loss of Medicines Agency will impact on entire pharmaceutical industry in UK. Brexit is vandalism. 
Britain to pay £520 million to move EU agency out of London because of Brexit  
The fact that 52% of Brits want a Brexit outcome that is not possible is a problem. Politicians need to start being honest with them.  
Biased? Us? BBC bosses DISMISS anti-Brexit accusations and REFUSE to meet eurosceptics. Sounds like the BBC morons.  
Exeter among U.K. cities whose economies will be worst hit by #Brexit  
CBI factsheet on the benefits of EU membership #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
In the 1960s when the Empire was being dissolved Churchill supported UK membership of the European Community.#Remain #StopBrexit #Brexit  
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day 
Brexit was made about 30 years ago at the Oxford Union — Oxford university’s version of a children’s parliament.   
So @realDonaldTrump wants to introduce an Australian-style, points-based immigration system?? Wonder where I've heard that before! #Brexit  
Rupert Murdoch accused of enjoying ‘astounding access’ to Downing Street Who controls #Brexit Britain!#StopBrexit 
Alan Partridge to be BBC’s ‘voice of Brexit’ in new series, Steve Coogan reveals  
The @FT is finally embracing Brexit with our new hot water boiler  
Good to see @vincecable is up to taking on the task of leading Xparty grouping of MPs to fight the madness of May's & Corbyn's Brexit.  
Spending years calling for tighter border controls & Brexit, Daily Mail now doesn't like it when it sees it. #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Journey to Yes #18 ScotLibDems face existential crisis over Brexit and Scottish independence @bellacaledonia 
The Tories cut funding to local authorities by 27%. So will they make up the billions in EU funding lost to Brexit?   
#Brexit means... Giving away UK Sovereign Fishing Waters!WRONG! WRONG!Michael Gove methinks you need a Rethink... 
Remoaner bore Chuka Umunna your still trying to derail Brexit were leaving the EU you had your chance to become labour leader you bottled it  
Hot off the press Innovation Ireland ezine with videos/stories on @BorgWarner @nuigalway #Brexit and lots more  
"Referendum is not the end goal, rather it leads to the greater aim of independence." PM Barzani  
Ryanair boss Michael O'Leary says EU will block UK flights to avenge Brexit, the Remoaner can't help himself any airline deal is reciprocal. 
Released today @migrants_rights report: Migrants' Perspectives on Brexit & UK Immigration Policy. Download here:  
Does DUP still think it was so clever to back Brexit?  
What right-minded person exercising a modicum of common sense can't see this as a major downside. Stop #Brexit soon ffs! & repair the damage  
We will never accept any #Brexit agreement that treats EU citizens less favourably than they are at present.  
Why is Hammond giving millions to Brazil when he should be preparing the ground for #Brexit back home?  
A second Brexit referendum is looking more likely by the day 
A finance chief hailed London for its talent pool as it moves jobs to the city in the face of Brexit  
Today we have published a new note on areas where further clarity on #EU nationals #Brexit rights is needed  
SNP’s Brexit minister launches outspoken attack on David Mundell  
#Brexit is NOT will of the people, it's the wilful negligence of #Tories and willingness of #Labour to collude, putting #PartyBeforeCountry 
All you Fishermen from NE Scotland that voted Brexit & Tory to get a better deal what say you now?You have been shafted AGAIN fools !  
Lots of @PrivateEyeNews cartoonists like @BeakyBirch will be at #HBCartoonFest Sunday 12-5pm. Expect gags on #FakeNews, #Brexit and #Seaside 
And yet Labour supports leaving the single market, backing Theresa May & co on their hard Brexit. Will lessons will be learned next time?  
Tories called an EU referendum for self-interest thereby ensuring a weak economy for the coming years. This is hypocritical. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg fires warning shot at scheming Tory Remainers trying to thwart Brexit  
You WILL leave EU! Sorry Remainers - even Juncker admits Brexit is INEVITABLE  
Brexit, a plan so weak that a few people being mean about it is enough to make it collapse.  
Ireland already has border controls. Won't be a problem after Brexit to make them all-Ireland.  
It will cost Britain £520m to stop hosting an agency that employs 890 people after Brexit  
Disagree. They chose to listen to BoJo when health experts were saying Brexit was dangerous for funding, staffing, research & medicines.  
Vernon Bogdanor sets out why UK heads towards 2nd Brexit referendumWithin few months most Tory MPs will call for it 
That Leave voters are willing to endure economic hardship in the name of Brexit is inspiring, says Brendan O'Neill  
And get him in the cabinet ASAP Sack the four envoys who hate Brexit, Duncan Smith tells Theresa May  
The EMA is leaving London- so we'll pay £ half a billion as well as losing research capacity.  It's all so Brexit.  
Most British people now believe the United Kingdom will tear itself apart after Brexit 
Vernon Bogdanor is right. Soft Brexit is regulation without representation. Hard Brexit unacceptable. Second referendum looms. Bring it on. 
Are you listening NE Scotland pelagic fishing #Tory and #Brexit voters. Gove is going to negotiate away your desired non #CFP fishing rights 
I am not talking down my country Brexit is taking down my countryI am talking down Brexit#StopBrexit#ThatIsMyWill 
The night of the referendum Yani came to my office and I thought to myself "welcome our testicles the two". 
BOOST: Asian bank selects Brexit London for new European headquarters.  
Brexit reveals Britain’s enduring flaws  
Yes, it may take the UK time to rebuild our fishing and fisheries capabilities (fleets, processing), post-Brexit. But they are OUR waters. 
Scottish fishermen shafted again!!!Brexit fisheries: Gove vows EU fishermen can STILL use UK waters AFTER divorce  
Exc: latest YouGov weekly poll has 3 pt Labour lead, drop in support on Tory performance on Brexit  
James Dyson campaigned for Brexit. Has been complaining about Brexit ever since. #Idiot 
In her interview with the Express, direct from the afterlife, Princess Diana appears to back Brexit. Truly incredible journalism.  
BBC rejects claims of anti-Brexit bias. What do you think?  
People keep writing these demands of Brexit as if there's any chance *at all* they can be fulfilled - or any chance the govt will care.  
Corbyn's priorities are 90 degrees off target. Labour can save the UK from Brexit but he is May's poodle on it. The PLP should leave him.  
Brexit: UK's top universities demand Theresa May rethink plans for EU citizens' rights | The Independent  
Exclusive: Top universities give Theresa May 10 demands she must meet to protect higher education after Brexit  
Vince Cable EXCLUSIVE: Majority in parliament against a destructive, extreme-#Brexit transcends party politics.  
Brexit? What Brexit? An Asian merchant bank has just set up its European HQ in London  
Gove must RETRACT this assertion that the EU will have access to British Territorial Waters and fishing areas after Brexit. @michaelgove 
An American wrote this Twitter thread on Brexit and it's eye-opening  
For anyone as obsessed as me about the EEA, Brexit negotiations etc, this is well worth a read  
Sack the four envoys who hate Brexit, Duncan Smith tells Theresa May  Yes and get rid of those in the cabinet too! 
Latest from the master: full of knowledge from @_BTO research & timely as we craft post-Brexit land-use policies @DefraGovUK @michaelgove 
A second Brexit referendum is looking more likely by the day, writes Vernon Bogdanor #stopbrexit 
Tasking Brexiteers with Brexit was like asking winners of a debating contest to engineer a spaceship.  via @FT 
Your guide to Super Thursday at the Bank of England and what to expect from Mark Carney  
A second referendum may be the only way out of this national crisis for the UK...  
The UK seems so ill-prepared in #Brexit negotiations that some EU countries think it must be a trap  
Iain Duncan Smith wants trade envoys who opposed Brexit to be sacked  
.@JunckerEU: "The Commission's working hypothesis is that it will come to Brexit." End March 2019: UK = 3rd country.  
Philip Hammond in Argentina to boost post #Brexit trade. Bear in mind UK exports to Argentina: £289m. Latin Am overall: £7bn. EU: £241bn 
Tory sell out of British fishermen as Gove promises that EU nations can fish in British waters after Brexit.  
Good to see Bogdanor, our leading constitutional expert, agreeing w @TheGreenParty on need for 2nd Brexit referendum 
55% of UK farm income comes from EU CAP subsidies.58% of farmers voted for Brexit.UK farmers need to be careful what they wish for. 
A second Brexit referendum? It’s looking more likely by the day | Vernon Bogdanor  
"Why are those who based arguments for Brexit on will of the people now opposed to consulting the people"Exactly!  
Dear working class. The upper class ate lying to you about #brexit. It won't help You, they plan to throw u off a cliff and take what's left 
'Brexit raises fundamental issues. That's why the deal needs the consent not only of parliament, but of a sovereign people' Vernon Bogdanor 
Zuckerberg would be able to find voters who want an autocrat even better than Bannon and the Bad Boys of Brexit. 
Boris Johnson Unhappy And Expected To Resign In Protest Against A Soft Brexit  
Frankfurt may be winning the race to lure Brexit bankers but it looks like a hollow victory  
Duuuuuuuuuude. It's a friendly played by a team that doesn't know each other. This is in no way a referendum on MLS.  
EEA may be only port In a Brexit storm writes @davidallengreen but it's not plain sailing.Another referendum & Remain look much simpler  
How to make a Brexit coup  
United Ireland referendum is inevitable after Brexit, says Irish parliamentary report author  
Sack the four envoys who hate Brexit, Duncan Smith tells @theresa_may 
DEATH OF PROJECT FEAR: Red-faced experts ADMIT they were ‘too pessimistic’ about Brexit  @theresa_may @AmberRuddHR 
Look at the positives! Brexit will lead to more British trained workers, says expert  @theresa_may @AmberRuddHR 
Key US near strategic issues:-Afghan strat-Russians in Ukr-nKorean nukes-Cyber-Venezuela implosion-Iraq post ISIS -Kurd referendum 
MARKETS HAVE PRICED IN TOO MANY NEGATIVES FROM BREXIT, HAN SAYSis he referring to the MSCI World which is at record highs? 
Commons should consider if circumstances UK finds itself in now have evolved beyond an advisory referendum 'outcome'. 
All those who are trying to push through hard Brexit & limit FOM,like Theresa May& Jeremy Corbyn , should see this video  
There is no economic upside to Brexit, says @AdamPosen. Hear more of his views on the deal:  #Brexit  
Brexit latest.!Time for #UnityRef 
Why in the world would the EU welcome a Brexit reversal?  via @bv 
Coup 2.0Remainer plot to keep UK in single market after Brexit | Daily Mail Online  
Sack the four envoys who hate Brexit, Duncan Smith tells Theresa May  via @MailOnline 
London’s New Subway Symbolized the Future. Then Came Brexit.  
fair to say Canada is running its Nafta negotiation in a manner completely different to Britain's Brexit negotiation  
Anyone else of the opinion that #Brexit will screw up our economy & intimidate European workers providing vital services. Just saying. 
It's step back from the abyss, if they are successful, but we'll still have #Brexit & the best case is #NoBrexit. @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry 
Brexit: UK's top universities demand Theresa May rethink plans for EU citizens' rights  
How many times did we warn this?  UK students may be banned from Erasmus exchange after Brexit:  
Interesting to note that Eastern European immigrants are much better educated than native Britons.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
UK consumer confidence falls to post-Brexit poll levels  via @FT 
Very clear analysis by @brheading of the latest 'simple' idea for a post- #Brexit Border.Must-read for anyone still hoping for an easy fix.  
Nope. Pass. Don't want your Brexit. Don't want your United Kingdom. Don't want your lame WW2 references...  
Brexit disruption to UK-EU flights 'more likely', Ryanair says #exitbrexit 
Irish Ambassador to UK: "#Brexit is threatening to reverse decades of improving relations since peace was established 20 years ago"  
Letter from @PaulBlomfieldMP lists widespread unlawful discrimination against EU nationals in UK. Consequence of Govt's failure #Brexit  
Sorry, but it is just posturing as long as Labour does not fight brexit . 
Kurds steady calling Assyrians savages and animals for a peaceful protest but their referendum is "for us" lmao trash 
As the Brexit transition debate rages on, the sense of unreality grows stronger, writes @Simon_Nixon 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Growing backlash against sanctuary city could spark first in nation referendum in November.  
70% want to stay in the Single Market. May's Hard Brexit would destroy jobs, threaten workers rights, and go against what the public want. 
“Must learn lesson from Brexit: lay out future in detail, talk about issues of great concern to all communities.”  
A cracking summer to be had in booming #Brexit Britain unless you are a Remainer... 
But which flavour will it be?Hammond's skimmed Brexit?Davis' semi-skimmed Brexit?Johnson's full fat Brexit?Or Fox's chlorinated Brexit?  
New poll finds most Brits want to stay in the single market after Brexit 
This is what young people should threaten: cancel Brexit or we'll scrap the triple lock and tax Werther's Originals. 
Arlene Foster slaps down Leo Varadkar - Ireland must ACCEPT Brexit will happen 
Probably many factors including social media, but I think this theory better explains Brexit & rise of populism; ? 
Ain't no grass long enough! #brexit ##batshit @Labour4EU 
Isn't Brexit brilliant? When we do the Brexit thing, we can change the colour of our passports! Brilliant!  
#Brexit can 'poor us' Brexiters stop moaning about opponents? Their side is made up of loud bruisers. Not sweetness and light. 
Yet another poll showing that people don't want to leave the Single Market. A Hard Brexit is history. Now we need to #StopBrexit 
The Dutch bank's boss says London is in danger of 'shooting itself in the foot' over capital rules after Brexit  
New question: if Brexit meant forfeiting your pension, would you still think it's worth it?  
New rule, if you fall apart in the face of a long queue maybe don't also talk about the "sacrifices" you're prepared to make for Brexit? 
Those whom the gods wish to destroy they first make mad.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
If only the UK had such a mature attitude to correcting mistakes....#Brexit for example? Confess the error and improve. @acgrayling @IanDunt  
"The EU referendum dispensed with the most basic democratic requirements. The winners were not accountable for the promises they made."  
As predicted - saying one thing in Scotland  and quite another in Europe.  The same as in 1974 but by even more duplicitous Tories. #Brexit  
This was massively played down in media.Santander UK in "good position" to face Brexit, no need to move operations 
It's Great that Britain has its second woman PM, but not so great this one won't stand up to the madmen in her cabinet who want Brexit. 
The EU passport control row is a preview of Britain's Brexit fate, says @georgeeaton  
Thursday's INDEPENDENT: Top university chiefs demand post-Brexit guarantees for EU staff #tomorrowspaperstoday 
t will cost Britain £520m to stop hosting an agency that employs 890 people after Brexit  
Deutsche Bank reveals its most likely Brexit scenario and how many jobs it expects to move  
Growing backlash against sanctuary city could spark first in nation referendum in November.  
I don't blame anyone who voted for Brexit. £350m extra a week for the NHS would've been nice. Only @BorisJohnson turned out to be a conman. 
The problem with Brexiteers is they see the EU as a foreign body "ruling over" us, rather than the UK being part of a common entity. #Brexit 
We'll have to cancel flights without a Brexit deal next year, Ryanair's Michael O'Leary says  
Irish Parliament launches major report on Brexit and Irish unity:  Significant Fianna Fáil are driving this. 
I haven't mentioned this for a long time & I will only say it this one time. BREXIT IS FUCKING WANK. 
As Brexit implodes, and U.K. becomes a global laughingstock, #snpbad will increase. #Deflection 
Brexit is brilliant! It's made others in the EU realise just how lucky they are, and how stupid we are.*sigh* 
BBC bosses dismiss calls for new guidelines on Brexit   Good work from UKIP peer Lord Pearson 
August Kicks Off With Brexit Good News Hat-Trick  
New poll on Leave voters shows many think economic damage & family losing jobs is worth it for Brexit.  
Brexit Fundamentalist would destroy the British economy for Brexit. It is time to end their act of self harm. It is time to #StopBrexit. 
Britain is budgeting millions to train inexperienced trade negotiators ahead of Brexit  
Kate Evans on Theresa May and the pressures of Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
."Whatever our position on Brexit, Euratom does not need Britain more than Britain needs Euratom". 
Huh? Has anyone called Leavers "saboteurs" or "enemies of the people"? Grow up and debate the merits of (implementing) Brexit civilly.  
BBC bosses dismiss calls for new guidelines on Brexit news after anti-EU MPs accuse them of bias   of course they did 
Brexit Means?"Ireland shld begin preparing for "peaceful reunification" to address long-term consequence of Brexit" 
Theresa May facing calls from her own ministers to sack 'anti-Brexit trade envoys' #premium 
Every single cabinet meeting they argue over the fundamentals of Brexit. Their entire programme for govt has been kicked into the long grass 
SCL & Cambridge Analytics need to be investigated for US, UK & Brexit activities in the last 2 years. Some interesting connections. pic.twitter.com/AIh4ITbRqx 
This from the party that called a referendum without a plan to leave, invoked Article 50 then called an election which delayed negotiations  
We're at brexit Level 5 already. And well on our way to Level 6.  
Tories accuse Labour of trying to kick Brexit into the 'long grass'  
The Conservatives lost their majority because millions oppose a Hard #Brexit. We'll continue to boldly fight it.  
We need to stop those migrant boats coming into EU And start returning those illegals back to their country of origin BEFORE IT'S TOO LATE 
Wonder if we might introduce a test of understanding as a prerequisite for voting in a referendum... 
"EU passport control delays are a preview of Britain's Brexit fate"  
What you on about? Proper Hard Brexit Englishman. Probably shits baked beans 
Cancelling Brexit would work 
UK Muslim prisoner slashes guard’s and inmate’s throats while screaming THIS IS FOR ALLAH  via @Your Brexit 
Much-needed construction work, including housebuilding, is being put on hold due to uncertainty over Brexit 
To those asking "Why pressurise Labour on Brexit?" here's your answer. When it stands up, Brexit is vulnerable. 
BREAKING: Italy impounds migrant rescue boat for aiding illegal immigration  via @Your Brexit 
.Barclays #Brexodus From Brexit Britain"Barclays’ new offices capable of accommodating more than 400 staff". 
This chronicle of Rupert Murdoch’s Sun portrays the ascendance of populist sensibility that gave us Brexit  
Challenge over next month is how to convert surging opposition to Brexit into Parliamentary action. 
Time to 'dispense' with Brexit, it's nonsensical and without any real value or substance.  
I’m a ‘Brexit extremist’ and proud of it | Coffee House  
Remaining in the EEA may be the UK's only practical option if Brexit is to be done with speed — David Allen Green  
If this is what we can expect from Brexit Britain, Wales is in for a rough future.  
He's not a Brexit extremist. He's a snowflake.  
Does it not trouble you that the vast majority of the well educated members of the generations who will have to implement Brexit oppose it? 
I do hope one or two of my @LBC colleagues read this and examine their own reactions to those who regard Brexit as something to be proud of.  
And biggest fear of UK business is no deal/bad deal Brexit, not election of Labour govt. 3/3 
Turning Brexit Britain into a tax haven would make us all richer says  Jamie Whyte   
Brexit: Majority of older Leave voters say significant economic damage is 'price worth paying', finds YouGov  
Shadow Brexit Minister letter to @DavidDavisMP demanding end of EU nationals #citizensrights uncertainty already leading to discrimination 
My mate Dave keeps referring to Brexit as "Brit-ex". How can he not know? I'm not going to tell him. 
Brexiteers have insufficient cultural, mass & interest group support. Over 65s + Brexit press too weak a base. Article 50 not possible to do 
After Brexit, more Europeans than ever say they feel like citizens of the EU  
Airline CEO warns of "severe disruption" over Brexit  
Let's say that we could 100% guarantee the cause of the job loss was Brexit. Would you be fine with someone in your family losing their job? 
We must have our laws! Rees-Mogg blasts EU judges saying ECJ rule MUST stop on Brexit day  
Many people who were strong, long-term, Labour supporters are already looking elsewhere, and would never lend a vote again to a Brexit party  
*Brexit Explained*  
Airline CEO warns of "severe disruption" over Brexit  
If only Canada, Australia and New Zealand were calling for this. Sadly, they are not interested.#brexit  
The Brexit betrayal bandwagon is growing says Nick Cohen:  
Uitstekend artikel over #brexit van @DanielJHannan : "The Good News on Brexit They’re Not Telling You"  
UK is more Eurosceptic than ever, with long term trends in Euroscepticism continuing to rise after referendum in June 2016, via @NatCen 
Number 10 reveals CRUCIAL Brexit trade policy in JOB ADVERT - and Remainers WON'T be happy  
Johnny paints the process of a beautiful England's journey towards Brexit 
Danish fisching organisations optimistic about future access to UK waters after meeting with Michael Gove #Brexit  
Growing backlash against sanctuary city could spark first in nation referendum in November.  
Brexit.  
Michael Gove tell Danish fishing representatives their fleet will continue to have access to UK waters after Brexit  
Brexit: Job advert reveals UK trade dispute plans  
I was taking the piss earlier about Diana supporting Brexit from the grave: yet here we are  
The most patriotic thing leave voters could do now is to admit that Brexit will not bring what they were told it would. We must #StopBrexit 
The ultimate Express story - a psychic who is in contact Diana and guess what - she supports BREXIT  
I voted Remain but I accept the result & I support Brexit. It's really dusturbing to see the length hard line Remainers are willing to go to 
NEW Boris Johnson slapped down by Brexit department over ‘no plan’ claim -  
UK election result paved way for real Brexit debate, says French ambassador  
Barclays agrees 20-year lease for Dublin office as it plans to boost its presence in Ireland in response to #Brexit.  
Referendum on a united Ireland inevitable following Brexit vote, report author says  
£ has now recovered half the drop since #Brexit against $. Probably at something like fair value in my subjective view. 
He's on fire! @mrjamesob pointing out the crazy situation we are in with Brexit if we have to invoke the 'spirit of Dunkirk'.  
I said all along that this ridiculous referendum wasn't about sovereignty or the EU. It was private hate written in political form. 
EU passport control delays are a preview of Britain's Brexit fate.  
Looks like we’ve already reached Brexit Justification Level 5.  
Leave supporters who would happily inflict pain & misery just to get their #Brexit Yet more reason to #StopBrexit 
Express published a piece on Diana supporting Brexit from beyond the grave. I think we've gone peak Brexit.  
Deutsche Bank expects to move almost half of its London jobs to the EU after Brexit  
No, I don't support a hard Brexit. A blog responding to baffling arguments and accusations >>  
Britain's Fading Appetite For #Brexit # via @HuffPostUKPol 
Minister confirms that Boris was wrong – the Government is planning for Brexit with no deal  
Announced plans today to ensure the UK can still impose, update & lift sanctions after Brexit, & tackle threats to international peace  
Peter Lilley: Remainers are leaning on a Brexit transition like drunks on a lamp post. We should reject it#premium 
Brexit has...1) made the UK a worse place to live  2) killed economic growth  3) decreased our incomes 4) made all of us poorer 
Remain voters destroyed Tory majority by flocking to Labour as best bet to stop a hard Brexit—the crucial issue 
“The stark truth today is that Scotland needs a lifeline to escape this horrendous Brexit debacle, and quickly too.” Derek Bateman  
I went "through hell" during the Indy Referendum in 2014.  Did you ?  No - me neither ! 
There's only one #Brexit, & that is the Brexit of Murdoch, Dacre, Farage & the Tory Right. Corbyn is its eager collaborator.#RedBrownBrexit 
Dunkirk was a retreat that led to a victory against the forces of rabid nationalism which are once again on the rise #Brexit #StopBrexit 
10. Millwall. Unreal season inbound. Looked impressive against ISIS at home last year. Brexit club deserve Premier League.  
The Express has just run a story where a psychic claims to be in touch with Diana and she supports Brexit 
The City of London is Brexit-proof and will still lead Europe even after we leave the EU, says Dr Gerard Lyons.  
Excellent reflections by @joseantich, editor of @elnacionalcat on perceptions in international media v Spanish press of Catalan referendum.  
Amber Rudd,MP for Hastings & Rye, evokes film Dunkirk over Brexit. Rye fishing fleet refused to go to Dunkirk  
I am going to nominate the UK Brexit Plan for consideration by Man Booker as a work of fiction. Worth £50K! What do you think? 
In the Eisteddfod on Thursday? I'll be presenting an interpretation of & some striking data on Brexit ref vote in Wales. With translation  
No irony son. I'd pick Mark Albrighton over Neymar. Proper Brexit spirit, good crosser of the ball too.  
The @nytimes @WSJ said that if @realDonaldTrump wins Market will crash by 10% whereas Dow Jones rallies by 20%Ditto happened in #Brexit  
Johnson may resign to launch his own independent bid for leadership if he does not agree with #Brexit negotiations  
I see ignorant #Remainers are now blaming long immigration queues on #Brexit.Wrong. We were never in passport-free Schengen and... 
"The myth of Dunkirk is a tool for those who want to reinforce the myths underpinning Brexit." @OxfordYasmin  
Get #Farage! Britain WILL quit Customs Union in 2019: No 10 reveals Brexit trade policy in JOB ADVERT  
t will cost Britain £520m to stop hosting an agency that employs 890 people after Brexit  
On post-Brexit UK deal Trump positive "much much more business" but explicitly suggests US-UK deal will include US agriculture blocked by EU  
Bit of a cock-up on the BREXIT front - Farage demands tighter, err looser, err tighter border controls pic.twitter.com/pYXwbLHWUh 
Not good enough @Keir_Starmer I won't be voting @UKLabour next time & neither will 100,000s who firmly support #Remain#Brexit #stopbrexit 
Have you ANYTHING serious to say on urgent matters facing Scotland and how your Party is dragging us over a cliff ? #Brexit. 
In summary. Labour supports Brexit by "fighting" to keep us in the EU institutions. Yes, THAT bad.  
Construction activity slowed to an 11-month low in July on the back of political uncertainty and nervousness among businesses about Brexit!  
Germany optimistic that #Brexit will speed up EU-India trade deal. Are you listening, Brexiters? 
City of London is Brexit-proof and will still lead Europe even after we leave the EU, says @DrGerardLyons  
Why are we being told by Brexidiots we need the Dunkirk spirit to get through Brexit. We already had the fastest growing G7 country spirit? 
#EU is booming, whilst the #UK economy has slowed to half the EU average (because of #Brexit). Share our editorial:  
Your papers, pleaseWhy UK passengers face long delays flying to/from Spain, Portugal, Italy, Greece etc. Not Brexit 
How long until the now unemployed #PrincePhilip loses his right to stay in #uk after #brexit ?  
Brexit: can and should the UK remain in the EEA?By me, at @FT 
Trapping Britain inside the EEA with free movement would be a betrayal of the referendum result, pure and simple.  
Yes, it's well over due for pro-EU MPs to stand up and be counted. Brexit is an abhorrence and based on very little of any real substance.  
Irish universities benefit from #Brexit: number of foreign student applications up 40% in places as turn back on UK 
BREAKING: Venezuela authorities tampered with constitutional referendum turnout figures, company that ran vote says  
Bottom line. Should have been a #supermajority, not a simple majority.#Brexit ...over a 4% margin.    
The psychology of (Brexit) lies and why we fall for them >>  
So the US want the definition of Scotch Whiskey relaxed so they can sell their stuff over here post-Brexit. They'll destroy an industry. 
Keep it up people, with all of these Brexit is good for Britain stories I've just heard that Alastair Campbell is thinking of leaving the UK  
Brexit disruption to UK-EU flights 'more likely', Ryanair says  
But at summer holiday time-for the #DailyMail - it's #OpenBorders.An #evil and dangerous rag. #Brexit@DailyMailUk 
Listening on radio about free EU roaming charges, my son asked "Mom, you know Brexit? What do we ACTUALLY (his emphasis not mine) gain?" 
Remember guys, Brexit is not failing because it's a completely flawed plan enacted by charlatans, it's because people are 'talking it down'  
Jonathan Isaby for @BrexitCentral exposes many of our cross party trade envoys are viscerally opposed to Brexit.  
David Davis' excuse not to give evidence to Lords' EU committee is not good enough as #Brexit clock ticks. 
Shambolic Tory Government tearing itself apart over #Brexit, whilst inflicting chaotic uncertainty on the rest of us  
Older Brexit voters think ‘economic carnage’ is price worth paying, according to a survey of 1,000 people who have since died. 
BREXIT: Stare into the face of denial.  
Welcome to the Brexit Betrayal Movement aka A group of racist, bigoted, selfish, thick-as-pigshit, angry old farts  
Britain's foreign policy and Brexit strategy.  
Trump brands EU ‘UNFAIR protectionists’ - but delivers good news for post-Brexit Britain  
Sorry to disappoint Leavers, but the Eurozone's 2nd Quarter growth was double the UK's #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Ireland's departing UK ambassador shares 'sadness' over Brexit  
#Dunkirk: What the absence of any of the 2.5 million Indian soldiers says about Britain, empire and Brexit.  
"Everybody else is in denial” - @Ryanair boss Michael O’Leary on impact of Brexit on air travel  
Government under pressure to fire anti-Brexit Trade Envoys accused of “talking our country down,” writes @isaby  
Labour to fight to keep UK in single market after Brexit #premium 
#Brexit newsletter: EU warns of delays to talks, Hague predicts 'disaster' and UK says free movement to end in 2019  
Britain's Brexit debate is reflected in this classic 1979 study on confirmation bias. No side will agree. We will only polarize over time.  
As #Brexit negotiations lull for the summer, here's what's on the table (UPDATED)  
'Democracy throws up' is a perfect description of Brexit, to be fair.  
Excited to announce a conference on the marine environment after Brexit on the 31st October. Book your place here.  
Growth in Britain's construction industry is the weakest in a year  
Leavers conveniently forget that Britain wanted Eastern European countries in the EU for reasons of national security.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
I don't mind if #brexit fails quickly, sharply and cleanly. The quicker brexit dies, the sooner we get a hard remain. 
We ARE all moving on from brexit. We are talking now about what hard remain will look like.#HardRemain #brexit 
Removing Freedom of Movement is taking away control from Britons and giving it to foreign governments.  Unpatriotic!#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Leave voters are happy for family members to lose their jobs over #Brexit at least we have got our country back innit  
Rupert Murdoch accused of enjoying ‘astounding access’ to Downing Street#Remain #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Only 11% of Leave voters believed (December 2016) that Brexit would make them worse off (). 
Why is a 'cross-party group of MPs trying to force a vote on UK staying in EEA'? Why not 'in EU'? Absurd & pointless. Just stop Brexit. 
Finally, clarity about exactly what #Brexit means. Should have been done BEFORE Referendum. Pls RT so ALL our MP's see it. @StopBrexit17  
Dear @Keir_Starmer how much jumping up and down and screaming will it take for Lab to realise that people no longer want  Brexit??? 
Did JNU protest Brexit? Did JNU protest Germany's partition? Alexander's invasion? Shahjahan's imprisonment? Unpatriotic lot!  
Brexit boost. Santander UK in "good position" to face Brexit. No need to move operations, says CEO Nathan Bostock.  
Letter by InFacts editor @bill_emmott in @nytimes, challenges @DanielJHannan opinion that Brexit is good news for UK 
The best path forward is to abandon Brexit, which is (just) possible. Asking which flavour is like asking which bullet I wish to die by. 
Breaking on @BrexitCentral: Iain Duncan Smith calls for anti-Brexit Downing Street-appointed Trade Envoys to be replaced  
Interesting to see that just after the referendum, brexit expectations were for Single Market membership  
SHARE: @tradegovuk under pressure as IDS calls on the government to replace those “viscerally opposed to #Brexit”   
Exclusive to @BrexitCentral: Pressure on May to fire anti-Brexit Trade Envoys accused of “talking our country down”  
There's "a collective delusion" over securing post Brexit Open Skies deal to safeguard flights to EU says Michael O'Leary 
Boss of @Ryanair Michael O'Leary says "pessimistic" about  post Brexit deal to secure flights to EU 
Royal Family Relocating To Ireland Over Brexit pic.twitter.com/68KyDPMoM1 
Every day, every hour, every second we persist with this Brexit madness we damage ourselves more, to the extent it is becoming irrepairable. 
August Kicks Off With Brexit Good News Hat-Trick  
Trump vows to be "very involved" with post-Brexit Britain and slams protectionist EU. What a guy!  
Brexit is about protecting the hidden fortunes of the 1%  
I know of farmer who voted leave as protest cos his EU cheque was 3 weeks late  - thought it didn't matter as it was an advisory referendum. 
Ireland’s Ambassador to London @DanMulhall strikes the right note on #Brexit in The Guardian here:  
Trade negotiators aren't buying #brexit, either.  
I don't understand the shock at the YouGov "yes I'd take econ damage if meant Brexit". That sentiment was clearly visible in pre-ref polls. 
Brexit leaders: who is Gina Miller, the businesswoman that challenged the Brexit process  via @VerdictUK 
Labour implied they would seek a sensible Brexit - a softer one than the Tories were offering. They lied.  
The kind of thinking that led to @realDonaldTrump presidency and #brexit is dumb and needs replacing.RT if you agree 
And remember as you claim, this is another right awarded to you by the EU and that you will lose after Brexit  
Which #brexit does Lilico want to implement, I wonder? Each brexiter has their own, particular brexit. Every single one of them a disaster. 
One year after #Brexit broad majority of Europeans is very optimistic about future of EU, according to new @EurobarometerEU: 
Ryanair may not fly between Ireland and U.K. in summer 2019 if a Brexit deal fails, CEO says  
Possibly the 3 most perfect tweets in response to Brexit fantasist.  
Lessons for Brexit negotiations from 60 years of Britain and Euratom | Science | The Guardian  
When I was young the Daily Mail condemned mindless vandals who wrecked phone boxes, now it cheers on the #Brexit vandals wrecking Britain. 
The Corbyn 'left' want to deny the fact that the GE2017 was about Brexit - primarily because they want Brexit as much as the Tories 
A year after UK voted to leave the EU, optimism about the #FutureofEurope is increasing.  #Eurobarometer #Brexit  
READ: Transcript of Professor Dougan's video one year on from the Brexit referendum 
Brian Feeney: DUP out of their depth as Brexit negotiations crank up 
The General Election was all about Brexit. The electorate voted Labour to stop Tory Hard Brexit - it wasn't a vote Corbyn or his Hard Brexit  
Irish Brexit report sets out united Ireland proposal:  
Theresa May returned from her last walking holiday having had an epiphany - an election! Rumours abound that this time she'll dump Brexit. 
Let's face it, who would want to have working for Liam Fox on a failing Brexit project on their CV? 
This sort of thing is why Brexit makes me angry. Real people are greatly affected. Lack of freedom of movement really blights lives.  
Come on @Keir_Starmer be a shepherd, not a sheep. MP's should act in the national interest. A good Brexit is an oxymoron. Stop this farce 
EU migrants in UK before #Brexit will be able to continue claiming these massive benefits,£300+ per week,AFTER BrexitUtter madness.  
Brexit reality will continue to anger them 
Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts scheming Tory Remainers for trying to derail Brexit  
Leave voters now say we need the ’Spirit of Dunkirk’ to get through Brexit. This is @mrjamesob’s brilliant response  
I fear some Brexit supporters haven't quite grasped the meaning of Brexit. 
TRUMP: US President slams 'unfair' EU and confirms massive post-Brexit deal with Britain. 
Apparently SNP voters turned against @NicolaSturgeon's anti-Brexit message. Or maybe they're turning against her?  
*Brexit Explained*  
Our own politicians need to turn their backs on Brexit. But not slowly.  
The European Court of Justice's involvement in the UK should end on "day one" of Brexit, Jacob Rees-Mogg has said.  
City Brexit job loss contd: Deutsche Bank foresees 4,000 UK jobs to be shifted to the EU after Brexit  
"Yes but not for US. For OTHER people." Peak Brexit.  
Alastair Campbell in the media today exercising his greasy mouth and putting Britain and her people down because of brexit. What a tosser. 
A prominent Brexit-supporting journalist tweets the EU should install preferential queuing lanes for Brexit UK passport holders. #noreally 
The idea you have to invoke the spirit of Dunkirk to get through Brexit something that the same people said wd be brilliant... @mrjamesob 
While our govt is obsessed with extreme Brexit, everything else is going to hell in a handcart inc prisons, NHS, schools, economy.  
Brexit.  
Felt this in the immediate aftermath of the referendum and have an even worse sinking feeling now  
Macron and Merkel lobbying for post-Brexit travel HAVOC  We should walk away now. We are being screwed.  
Long queues at passport control as #EU diligent with border checks. Foretaste of true travel hell post #Brexit. #brexitshambles 
The Express being angry at border queues – given Brexit – feels like performance art.  
Deutsche Bank reveals its most likely Brexit scenario and how many jobs it expects to move  
Rebel Tory MPs and Labour are working together to stop Theresa May’s Brexit  
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU'  
CAPTAIN #BREXITBY DAY - BUMBLING BORISBY NIGHT - BUMBLING BREXIT#TheBrexitFund him here:  
Will brexity snowflakes REALLY be happy to forgo jobs, economic security to get their #brexit? They're already moaning about border queues.  
Many pensioners say Brexit's worth it even if their kids lose their jobs. They weren't asked if they're willing to give up their pensions.  
Remain voters destroyed Tories’ majority by flocking to Labour as 'best bet' to stop hard Brexit, study finds  
I'm all for a Dunkirk #Brexit as long as they leave the scots behind like they did last time 
I thought the Daily Mail wanted tougher border controls? Reap what you sow.The arrogance of Brits to think #Brexit would be a breeze.  
Professor Dougan gives his view one year on from the Brexit referendum - From project fear to project reality 
Donald Trump confirms he expects a "major trade deal" with the UK after Brexit  
James is upset that employees of an #EU agency see better career prospects in post-#Brexit UK than with the EU agency. Please pray for James  
That's the spirit!! |For Brexit to work, we need Dunkirk spirit not 'Naysaying Nellies'' | via @telegraph 
Economic thinktank NIESR: UK exports will 'boom' GDP growth to shoot to almost 2% Higher wages post-Brexit 
Irish Brexit report sets out united Ireland proposal  
Cornwall asked the Government to replace the money it'll lose from Brexit. You can probably guess what happened  
Five months after starting the Brexit process, PM May's ministers can't agree on the UK's position on many EU issues  
Nope, @hugorifkind I have always believed in Brexit on principle. I also happen to believe it will be economically beneficial. Next?  
Quote of the Day is from Willie Walsh on that remainer nonsense about aviation grinding to a halt after Brexit  
Brexit and higher education: ‘The interest in Ireland is amazing’  via @IrishTimes 
No role for EU court after Brexit says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I plan to dedicate all my next three columns to what TheEmoji Movie says about Brexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg fires warning shot at scheming Tory Remainers trying to thwart Brexit  
Cross-party MPs want vote to stay in EEA, that is Soft Brexit.Do you want MPs to do this?Or press for No Brexit - RemainOr neitherPls RT 
Can't think of anything more Brexit than a personality cult without a personality  
Both May & Corbyn insist we must leave the Single Market after Brexit. This poll finds the public strongly disagree.  
Study finds late-switchers in the General Election, who overwhelmingly backed Labour, did so to stop a hard Brexit.  
Off to Dublin. Got a five stage, five man, Scouse-swerving, Brexit-busting plan to get final copies of the UWS summer issue on sale tonight. 
Always worth a re-read European Council (Art. 50) guidelines for Brexit negotiations   
 Brexit disappoints brexiter  
If me sitting here questioning whether Brexit is such a good idea is enough to ruin it… Call me crazy, but I'm going say it's a bad idea.  
‘I’m not alone!' European Union leader clinging to hopes Brexit WON’T happen (So they can drain UK of all we have)   
Using "the spirit of Dunkirk" in the context of supporting Brexit is historically illiterate and borderline offensive. 
For an Exit from Brexit  
I know exactly what everyone voted for. I say that everyone voted Leave to end farm subsidies. Brexit means Brexit.  
Brexit will allow UK to SMASH terrorists without being held back by EU red tape, MPs vow  
The Sun, my old paper, says London is Brexit proof. I've rarely seen such a ridiculous article. Sad. Wrong. Just untrue.  
New documentary offers terrifying vision of post Brexit Britain  
If you've gone from claiming Brexit will be easy & enriching to saying we need 'the spirit of Dunkirk' to get through it, please be quiet. 
Things that are not like Dunkirk:1. Brexit.2. The film 'Dunkirk'. 
I don't get Brexiters who believe that by us all having some sort of British nationalist hive-mind, Brexit will somehow be okay. It won't. 
"We want to control our borders" they bleated. "Brexit means Brexit!", but delay US at a border and we are outraged. #Schengen 
If #Brexit was a good idea we'd be behind it anyway. It isn't. We aren't. If it was a good idea it would work anyway. It isn't. It won't. 
For Brexit to work you need a cohesive plan, a strategy & the undivided support & will of the people, none of which you have. #StopBrexit 
The scope for demagogic politicians to claim the people have been betrayed over Brexit is vast, writes @NickCohen4 
Umuna, Kinnock, Alexander, Soubry, Hammond & their ilk should be 'sent to the Tower' for their #Brexit treachery. 
FREEDOM: Brexit means Britain's counter-terror measures aren't stifled by Brussels anymore. 
If Brexit means anything, surely it should mean a Government initiative to revive the handcrafting of cricket balls?  
noone claimed that....i wonder what books you yourself have read on roman britain (while living the Brexit dream!)  
Ireland's PM trying to 'keep door open' for Britain to halt Brexit  
Calling 'Dunkirk spirit' for Brexit in poor taste imho. We were fighting Germans to the death, bombing French land, Brits dying in process 
For BREXIT to work we need a suspension of all laws of economics (and probably physics). It cannot work and the PM and cabinet know it. 
Oh, the people who thought "taking back control of our borders" only worked one way.  #Brexit  
Brexit world: iron-clad borders through which Brits pass in seconds by waving a Union Jack, but nobody else does, at all.  
Corbyn betraying young people on Brexit? What colossal nonsense. Via @mattzarb  
The Politics of Madness.Divorce bill for Brexit. £50 bn.Savings for pushing up pension age for women. £5 bn.#exitbrexit 
Leftists pre-Brexit:  'Cleanse the Country! Kill the Bankers!'Leftists post-Brexit: 'We love our Bankers! Bankers must stay!'Go figure.. 
Soft Brexit, Squidgy Brexit, Slightly Stiff Brexit, Hard Brexit. They're all rubbish. Whoever heard of a Not So Bad Catastrophe? 
William Hague warns only a transitional Brexit deal can save us from 'disaster' 
If David Miliband had won #Brexit wouldnt have happened & Labour 2017 would be a functioning political party not a fan club so sad  
Tougher powers to freeze terror bank accounts announced after Brexit.Good news!  
Why is UK Govt leaving it to the Americans to ask questions about Russian interference in EU Referendum?  
Brexit sparks surge in foreign applicants for Irish universities  
Brexit and higher education: ‘The interest in Ireland is amazing’  
Car crashes happen in the blink of an eye. Brexit could have a slow-motion impact that will be no less harmful  
Government is badly split on Brexit & many matters. Conservatives are now so ideologically muddled they are beyond the point of redemption.  
My piece in the Times Higher on #Erasmus after #Brexit @UniStrathclyde  via @timeshighered 
He has to go.Sacking him would strengthen Doris.It would show BREXIT means BREXIT.But, you see, it doesn't does it?  
Sorry to disappoint Remainers, but London will remain Europe’s leading financial centre even after Brexit.  
Oh how the doom merchant remoaners will be crying over their cornflakes this morning, waking up to more positive #Brexit news like this.  
Brexit desparation removes influence.UK should be pushing back on environmental crimes,insist on better standards #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Said it time & time again. Vast maj of Labour voters see Brexit as a disaster for the UK. Corbyn & McDonell see it as an opportunity  
The Remainers are wrong: Brexit was not about immigration, but democratic control, argues MEP @DanielJHannan 
The Bank of England shouldn't wait until after Brexit to raise rates, says thinktank  
PIIE President Adam Posen Discusses the Damage of Brexit to the British Economy  via @YouTube 
Irish home prices could boom because of bankers moving to Dublin after Brexit vote  
"Despite the Brexit"  
"Price worth paying" - the latest #Brexit mantra?#brexitshambles #Brexiteers #recession #UKIP #StopBrexit #StopBrexitnow 
No wonder farmers fear the Brexit wolf in sheep’s clothing | Polly Toynbee  
Brexit Stage Left @midnight #AddCartoonsToHistory 
I support an *each *woman referendum. As in, each woman gets to vote on what happens to her own body. And, nobody else gets a vote. 
61% of Leave voters think #Brexit is worth ‘significant damage to #UK economy’ – poll 
Let the Flake faction run on a platform of U.S. occupation of Syria, open borders, opposing Brexit, disdaining Deplorables. Run Flake, Run!  
Is Brexit really all down to the delayed symptoms of human Mad Cow Disease?  
Jean is "i don't wanna decide, lets referendum!" Kenney is "I have no policies, you pick the policies!" Fildebrant is "cut everything NOW!"  
Ok so Cambridge Analytica involved in Brexit, US, Kenya, Australia, India and now Mexico. 
Five months after starting the Brexit process, PM May's ministers can't agree on the UK's position on many EU issues  
European Financials ETF hits a new high, up 69% from the post-Brexit lows. $EUFN pic.twitter.com/3aCsWzpT1e 
Britain has gone mad, it's the Brexit tail wagging the dog. Our future in the hand of the tripple lock pensioners ?  
Ironic, TTIP was my tipping point for voting brexit. It just the first step to aCorporatocracy, as is TiSA 
Food price increases come off Brexit boil as pound pressure eases  
Why the BBC wants you to think #GE17 was all about #Brexit  
Scared about your human rights after Brexit? You should be | Schona Jolly  
Post-Brexit sanctions law will hit terror group finances  
Theresa May 'staring into the abyss' on Brexit by putting Tories before national interest, top officials say  
Brexit means out, didn't you vote for it?Decisions have consequences.Don't whine now, it's un-british.  
Perhaps you ought to read what William Hague says about it. He's hardly left wing but too evidences why Brexit is idiocy. 
This is toe in the water stuff, one of the brightest legal minds of his generation cannot bring himself to admit that Brexit is fools gold. 
As Brexit looms, Britain plans a fund to level the tech playing field with the U.S.  
BREXIT BOOST: UK Economy will 'grow faster EVERY YEAR in run up to leaving EU'  @theresa_may @andrealeadsom 
Calexit (think Brexit, but for California) campaigner wants to export the middle class and replace them with immigrants.  
Stop #Brexit through education.Teach the next generation respect and tolerance. Support the kid's book about #Europe 
A former Stokey, I have loads of respect for you as constituency MP. But...#Brexit a national disaster; your duty is to UK, not your party. 
Brexit will affect more of your future than mine. Time for the young to call for an exit to Brexit #StopBrexit  
Eh,hmm, didn't the Brexiters demand stricter border controls? #Brexit Oh sorry, maybe that was just for everyone else ?  
FLNKS engaged in a nationwide campaign to prepare indigenous Kanaky people for referendum vote next year @ForumSEC @PacIsNewsAssn @pangmedia 
Anybody else getting hacked-off with @ChukaUmunna & @Anna_Soubry? Forever criticising brexit, but never actually saying #exitbrexit now. 
Banning flags: #Brexit and the display of way too many of the classical hallmarks of #totalitarianism/#dictatorship. #Proms #EU #EUFlagBan 
Theresa May 'staring into the abyss' on Brexit by putting Tories before national interest, top officials say  
The Proms embroiled in Brexit row as concertgoers' EU flags are 'banned' | London Evening Standard  
The Brexit Hall of Mirrors: Doubts, Deliberations and No Clear Vision In Sight  
It's for the youth of EU27. Yours are out, you know, that Brexit thing. 
Rise in Southampton companies reporting 'significant financial distress' ahead of Brexit  
That dreadful Brexit decision, driving away foreign investors and ruining London as a global financial center... 
#Brexit: Post-Brexit #customs chaos could 'cost UK economy £1bn a year' 
I already know Brexit Twitter will be mad cuh he's a refugee and dont deserve to benefit from this country's facilities.  
The Good News on Brexit They’re Not Telling You  
“A year ago, the consultants found that a hard Brexit would cause up to 35,000 jobs to leave the UK across all ele…”  
Hague backs Hammond on Brexit approach amid cabinet tensions  
#Brexit: Post-Brexit #customs checks will lead to border chaos, high costs: report 
'If a slowdown does happen, expect it to be blamed on a failure to implement Brexit properly, rather than Brexit itself'  
Deutsche Bank Expects to Move 4,000 Jobs to EU After Brexit  
Cities scramble for Brexit spoils of London’s EU agencies 
Britain could lose 40,000 investment banking jobs in Brexit exodus  
Tigers gears up for Brexit with AEO certification  
Only an exotic brexit means brexit! Anything else, such as a 'corrupt' brexit, would be a farce. 
Brexit is 14519 hours away. #brexit 
Brexit increasingly means learning difficulties 
What makes you most aware of the cost of Brexit 
*Brexit Explained*  
I am really angry that our country is now the laughing stock of the world. We used to have influence. Brexit destroyed us. 
Nationalist ideologies are responsible for the worst things that have happened in human history. Why don't we ever learn? #Brexit #Trump 
WHY IT IS REFERENDUM FOR IPOB AND NOT RESTRUCTURING OF NIGERIA  
Sorry more costs of Brexit occur. Sheer sense of despair of seeing 
He who still supports Brexit has been given a brain by mistake, since for him a spinal cord would surely suffice. 
UK faces a brain drain post-Brexit . This article from Australia featuring @no10vigil group. Respect. 
Hard to tell which is a more dramatic negotiation: Brexit or the Birmingham bin strike 
 Newfoundland and Canada have officially reunited into one singular nation after a referendum was held. 
.@CNN reports that #DavidDavis  gave a 3 hour power-point presentation to say that. #Barnier#Brexit  
This is a must-read thread on #Brexit 
"#Brexit Can't Happen"-clear,beautifully concise..& in the @Telegraph Thks for publishing it & thks @BremainInSpain 
Brexit has seriously rattled the EU cage and it is clearly worried about more countries leaving so its now trying to tie them up for ever. 
TOMORROW: Brexit negotiations not going well? Don’t worry, we’ll find a photo which has no bearing on anything other than to get you angry.  
1. So, another day where Brexit scepticism turns into unhinged histrionics based on misapprehensions. 
Tell the government to release the hidden Brexit studies! Sign the petition here:  
The way the UK @Conservatives government is mishandling #Brexit is beyond belief. Just pray it can still be stopped.  
Brexit: "This is simply impossible" - a test the UK Brexit negotiators can't pass.  #Brexit.  
There will come a point in time when we as a nation recognise that Brexit was the most serious political mistake in the past 70 years.  
Kofi Annan says UK should allow freedom of movement after Brexit  
Brexit should be reversed;Brexit has to be reversed;Brexit must be reversed.But most of all...Brexit will be reversed.  
Oh, so now even 'making the wrong sort of remarks' can loose you your citizenship. How very Brexit!   
You can't buy it, because it was an twitter satirical series about a book called "The Brexit Handbook".  
“Bonjour! Can we?”“Non!”“Guten Tag! Can we?”“Nein!”“Bugger. This Brexit business is tougher than we thought” 
AngusMacNeilSNP: RT Brexit: Two of Angela Merkel's potential coalition partners back an independent Scotland in th…  
Macron's labor reforms to boost Paris in post-Brexit jobs race: lobby  
Long day; went on @SkyNews this evening to talk about PM and BREXIT, and #Plymouth obvs.. 
Bit more newspaper reviewing coming up, incl May's nonsense, Brexit nonsense & laughing gas nonsense. 
This is Labour turning it's back on all those Labour areas that voted for Brexit. They will be deserted 4 pro Brexit parties like @TheSDPUK 
Japan and China have both blown a giant raspberry at @theresa_may's #Brexit fantasies. So much for your bright global future, @Conservatives 
Labour Leave voters when they realise Labour have been lying to them about Brexit. #Newsnight 
This will be a test of whether @UKLabour is a real opposition or simply the Tories' little #Brexit helper. 
Brexit may not be stupidity, there might be a very, very big geopolitical agenda. Fishy.  
Important point by @JolyonMaugham. Parliament must vote to retain Parliamentary control of the exit date #Brexit  
Poland!This is the #EUNever, ever, allow them to bully you out of YOUR land.Take back what's yoursFight the EU#Brexit #Nexit #Polexit 
Government "would be willing" to look at a Brexit settlement figure of £30bn - with conditions - a senior source tells @nicholaswatt 
Soros: UK approaching tipping point that'll see the economy slow to such an extent that Brexit might be reversed.  
Catholic Church urges Government to reconsider Eighth Amendment referendum plan  
Is Labour the party of soft Brexit? Yes, says deputy leader @tom_watson #newsnight 
Brexit benefits? ZERO.  
"Brexit has achieved opposite of what it was supposed to doIt hasn't boosted British influenceIt has negated it" 
So coming up is a slightly scattered thread re PoC/migrants. It's over a year since #Brexit referendum and just under since Nov 2016. 
4) The UK made a political decision to #Brexit, but Brexiters insist that the EU are stubborn for prioritising Politics over economics 
The behaviour of EU officials during the Brexit talks only validates the vote to leave   
Friday's Guardian: "Barnier attacks UK's approach to Brexit talks" #tomorrowspaperstoday  (via @hendopolis) 
1) just when you thought #Brexit thinking couldn't get more bizarre.Brexiters are getting upset with the EU and it's "stubbornness"  
People apparently voted Brexit for politics, not money.But you expect the EU to ignore the Politics and focus only on the money 
I... thought that @BBCNewsnight  ...was a news programme.Why are they leading with...gambling?#Barnier; #DavidDavis; #Brexit#Newsnight 
Once politicians asked electors if they were better off than they were 4 years ago. Is anyone,a year on from Brexit,bar Murdoch,better off? 
Fascinating thread on how to map the bots... with network graphics and screenshots of trolls, bots and Brexit-Trump-UKIP advocacy. #dataviz 
UK wants 'impossible' Brexit deal and doesn't understand single market, says EU negotiator   
What does the EU have to gain over brexit ? Absolutely Nothing. So why should the U.K. gain at their expense ? 
Britain’s cake-and-eat-it Brexit routine wears thin with Barnier  
@BBCNews seem to think Ireland are exiting the EU too. #brexit  
You go to the Ritz. You order an enormous meal with quality wine. Half way through you decide to leave and say you're paying nothing #Brexit 
In the fantasy world of David Davis more than a year ago, the "businessmen" of Europe would ensure a smooth Brexit. Oh dear.  
Weird thing is everyone I know would happily vote Labour or Tory if they just admitted Brexit was a disaster 
UK’s approach to Brexit is ‘nostalgic and unrealistic’, says EU negotiator | Politics | The Guardian  
Let's go live to #Brexit  
The German @SZ on the British farce called #Brexit. V good.   
This is why the Brexit talks are making little progress  
The UK govt wants Brexit and all the benefits of EU membership. Let's keep the membership & break with Brexit ! 
Every single MP who backs Brexit believes that their personal job is more important than the future of the entire UK.Consider that. 
A brutal and accurate column from SZ's @ChZaschke. "May and her ministers stagger cluelessly into #Brexit"  
I know you think all Brexit supporters are ignorant, but answer me this. If the EU has a FTA with Canada, why would it not want one with us? 
But if post Brexit Britain's trade deal with third biggest economy in world is to be based on Brussels' deal, what about rest? TTIP? Canada? 
EU: "Here's a shit deal".UK: "No, let's negotiate".EU: "Here's a shit deal".UK: "?"UK Media: "UK are failing at #Brexit negotiations"  
...It also puts pressure on the EU to account for a post-Brexit UK in its negotiation with Japan - on things like rules of origin for cars 
There's no such thing as a Brexit 'hardliner' in UK, Verhofstadt. There are Brexiteers, the 52% (now 67%), and those who don't want to leave 
Behind the fireworks from both sides, the UK's Brexit strategy is starting to gain traction, says @HughRBennett 
Brexit summed up in one photograph  
Guess what is falling off the Brexit cliff edge? The Brexit pound is fuelling inflation. It is time to #StopBrexit 
Japan's economy is 42.5% larger than Germany's.Japan and the UK are now working on a post-Brexit bespoke bilateral free trade agreement. 
..Japan has achieved much from the release of that extraordinary Brexit memo it released a year ago, that I revealed  
UK just OFFICIALLY rejected the Brexit bill and the EU is not happy  via @Your Brexit 
Plot twist, he voted for Brexit hoping it would mean fewer foreigners. Be careful what you wish for (@mapduliand) 
Britain has a far stronger hand in the Brexit talks than some people think - The Telegraph  
Britain isn't acknowledging its legal obligations, Michel Barnier says as Brexit talks end  
Brexiters can't grasp that for the 27 the EU is not an optional extra, it is fundamental to their well-being #Brexit 
Czech minister “not possible to have the same advantages and less obligations in general” #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Economist interviews German FDP leader in part responding to my story re ministerial hopes for better Brexit talks with new Govt in Berlin  
Michel Barnier says there was no decisive progress during the latest Brexit negotiations  
Once out of the EU the bastards can scrap the basic human rights of all people, which is what Brexit is all about. 
UK wants 'impossible' #Brexit deal and doesn't understand single market, says Barnier. It is called "cake 'n eat it"  
Theresa May will be a national hero if she delivers a proper Brexit, says Peter Bone  
It's hard to take seriously disagreements over the Brexit divorce bill knowing all this was completely avoidable. Brexiteers were sold a lie 
The leader of Germany's FDP on Brexit (compare and contrast with what Brexiteers say about the FDP position: ) 
Remember folks. Brexit = Austerity. 
Who would want to be PM after Brexit?  
Latest Brexit talks reach a brittle conclusion  
Then what? We take the deal which is more beneficial to the stronger, better organised negotiator? Or go for chaotic "no deal" Brexit?  
Fury as Blair gatecrashes #Brexit talks for Juncker love-in. Farage says "..the Kiss of Death"   #fo2eu  
Why is the Brexit divorce bill causing deadlock at the EU-UK talks?@BBCChrisMorris explains 
15 months after 52% of 72% of Britons voted Brexit and their state of denial goes on unaffected by reality.That's utterly un-British. pic.twitter.com/lrKwttdT05 
Slaughter by Myanmar Govt. David Mundell has been toadying up to this lot for post-Brexit trade  
#Brexit negotiations are in deadlock and tensions are rising as the two sides clash on key issues  
Stephen Kinnock Labour MP for Aberavon on this fabricated Divorce Brexit Bill. We do not owe them a penny.  
This isn't working. Extending UK #Brexit negotiating team to include Scottish & Welsh govts and N Ireland reps would boost the talent pool.  
It happened to most sentient people about a nanosecond after the announcement of the result of the EU referendum  
Stunning insensitivity , crass arrogance & a warning of what the Tories really want from #Brexit..deregulation for workers & environment  
Brexit talks end in acrimony, with EU saying UK is asking for the impossibleRemember having cake and eating it too? 
For the #Brexit Right the people of Britain are just so many tools to be used, abused and discarded in the service of their own interests. 
The #Brexit Right are the real elite, absolutely focused on their own self-interest, without the slightest concern for ordinary people. 
Total madness to plough ahead with #Brexit, ignoring half of the electorate and probably 75% of young people. Who is driving this? 
Poor @IainDale. Like many #Brexit fans, he doesn't grasp that the EU looks after its members interests, which is why it's handy to be in it. 
"Like a milkman in a Carry On film"... @MichaelPDeacon hits the target. #brexit 
UK post-Brexit trade policy unravels in Japan—Officials say trade deal with UK would take a back seat to one with EU 
.@M_AndersonSF tells EP committee, being briefed by the Parliament's Brexit coordinator @GuyVerhofstadt, that Tory Govt is reckless with GFA 
After the latest round of talks, @Nigel_Farage is beginning to wonder if the EU actually wants a Brexit deal at all  
To be fair #ChukaUmunna , any government would be out of their depth.  #Brexit is unacceptable and totally disastrous  
French govt vote against licensing toxic #glyphosate. Now, will Gove put on his Green #Brexit hat & follow suit?  
BREAKING: UK on brink of NO DEAL as Barnier says EU won’t shift ‘ONE IOTA’ on Brexit  via @Your Brexit 
Ryanair chief claims Theresa May shouldn't be in Japan drinking Sake, but in EU dealing with Brexit. She's already had 3wks hols #ToriesOut 
Brexit will be like this, the night of the deadline it'll be David Davis telling Sky News from his Range Rover window a deal is 'very close' 
'Kiss of death for democracy'. Fury as Blair gatecrashes #Brexit talks for Juncker love-in  @daily_express #StopBlair 
There will come a point when rational leavers will realise how demented & self-harming Brexit is. But being generally old they won't feel it 
'Brexit has achieved precisely the opposite of what it was supposed to do. It hasn't boosted British influence. It has negated it.' 
Blair handed over more money and powers to Brussels when PM. He should #RespectTheResult, not undermine Brexit 
ERC's @martarovira assures that the ballot boxes, census and polling stations are ready for the referendum  
They call us Remoaners but really, what is Brexit other than one huge whinge? So now, toys are out of the pram and EU won't put them back. 
Since EU doctors are leaving in droves, #NHS taking desperate measures, the cost of Brexit ballooning day by day!  
Kofi Annan says UK should allow freedom of movement after Brexit  
Pierce, the Brexit-zealot of zealots, calls Barnier a zealot for following EU rules & clear instructions of EU parliament. Desperate stuff  
Why are the Brexit talks stalling? Because the government doesn't know what it wants, says @stephenkb  
#IWillGetBehindBrexit and insert a tightly rolled A50 into its Brexit. #Remain 
Pay TWICE to #BrExit“We have every right to demand back our contribution of £185billion paid to EU since we joined" 
Chief EU negotiator warns Britain that time is "passing very quickly" to reach a Brexit deal as talks stall  
Britain’s cake-and-eat-it Brexit routine wears thin with Barnier  
Japan and UK Will Work Together on North Korea and Post-Brexit Trade  
You are right. It will be up to the UK parliament to summon up the  courage to exit Brexit and end this sorry mess 
Tear up divorce bill or Brexit talks will collapse, Davis warns EU. 
May's post-Brexit trade policy unravels in Japan  via @politics_co_ukIAN DUNT NAILS IT - VERY INSIGHTFUL PIECE ! 
The politicians who led us into Brexit, on the right or left, do not have the judgment to run this country.  
This extremely hammered & angry & enormous fellow bellowed that it was nothing to do with Brexit he just hated the English. Fantastic. 
All of us immediately, reflexively said: yeah, sorry about Brexit, mate. Because that is the world we live in. That was what sprang to mind 
Do you count Manchester as part of England? I know everything is really confusing with Brexit and all...  
Pound falls to one-week low against dollar after Brexit talks end in stalemate  
Brexit chaos. But Scotland has an alternative.  
"Bretton Woods to Brexit" - Harold James on global economic cooperation in the latest issue of F&D -  pic.twitter.com/Lp4AP8rzsH 
Twitter's wisest barrister @seanjonesqc with a thread on the Brexit negotiations.  
The UK and Japan have signed an agreement to  "establish a new economic partnership" after Brexit. #GlobalBritain 
I'm delighted. 5th excellent news Brexit post today!   
But I thought they needed us more than we need them! Do you mean to say the Leave campaigns lied about #brexit?  
George Osborne has turned the paper into his grudge paper over brexit and his sacking. 
If only it were true. - Pollard talks of 'betrayal of 17m who voted for Brexit' without mentioning THEIR betrayal of 58m = the rest of us.  
Basic.#Brexit#Barnier#DavidDavis 
.@PeterBoneUK tells @Nigel_Farage that Theresa May will be a "national hero" if she delivers a full Brexit  
My objection to Brexit is that it'll lose real world jobs & make our real world country poorer & less secure. Hope thats real worldy enough 
Still not read any Brexit commentary describing their side's position as "formulated and controlled by Laboratoires Barnier". Disappointing. 
The irony of Andrew pierce calling other people Zealots.Wasn't #Brexit  supposed to be easy?  
Kofi Annan says UK should allow freedom of movement after Brexit  
The EU’s chief negotiator has a stern warning for the UK at the end of the latest Brexit talks. Read more:  
Dear Iain McNicol @IainMcNicol (Labour Gen Sec)Please would you ensure that the Party Conference discusses Brexit and the view of the 71%?  
Subtext of this article is as mad as Brexit: 'Doesn't matter about dire consequences of leaving EU, we MUST proceed bc 17m voted for it'  
President @KRLS in Danish leading newspaper @politiken #Catalonia #Democracy #referendum #1OCT 
The Brexit dilemma in 31 seconds:  
EU threats to kick Britain out of Europol after Brexit exposed as posturing  
What is it like to be a young EU worker in the UK? #Brexit  
Britain has no understanding of key Brexit issues, EU negotiator announces  
It's an odd day when you realize that the boss of a low-cost airline knows more about the consequences of #Brexit than your PM @theresa_may 
Ok, this is cute.Using Brexit as a spring for cross-Europe representation in the parliament.  Never let a crisis be wasted.  
Britain wants 'impossible' Brexit deal and doesn't understand single market, EU negotiator says  
Negotiation is meaningful part of what I do for a living though I don't claim to be an expert. Some thoughts on our Brexit negotiations /1 
No Decisive Progress on Brexit Talks> We're now,officially,in FUBAR territory. This shambles of a govt needs to step 
This. Ludicrous over-regulation of research. UK should use Brexit as a trigger to rationalise research governance.  
I'm beginning to think there is another Brexit happening efficiently in another universe. Only explanation for the UK press coverage. 
Tory peer says Brexit is good because young people will be able to work longer hours  
What's your point? That those of us on the remain side who told you this all along were right & that Brexit is therefore a national disaster 
BIAFRA: IPOB PRESS STATEMENT; WHY IT IS REFERENDUM FOR IPOB AND NOT RESTRUCTURING OF…  
 @KRLS Puigdemont and @ForcadellCarme declare the appeals at the Spanish Constitutional Court won't stop the referendum.  
Did Cambridge Analytica influence the Brexit vote and the US election?  
Nearly one year later, still the best Brexit tweet.  
Ran poor referendumRan poor electionRunning poor EU negotiationsRunning country terriblyTories would struggle to run a bath efficiently  
These are the Brexit cards we hold.  
British Brexit plans exposed as unworkable and unrealistic – @GerryAdamsSF  
Britain may be heading for Brexit with no deal, Barnier warns Davis | London Evening Standard  #citizensrights 
Britain has no understanding of key Brexit issues, EU negotiator announces  
Our politicians are not capable of negotiating a taxi fare, let alone Brexit  
one year ago Matt did this #Brexit  
This article by @OwenJones84 on Labour/Corbyn & Brexit is so convoluting. It's pure Corbyn propaganda   
It's a political & economic commitment, not a legal one. It's a matter of honour. We are all shamed by Brexit stupidity 
Pleased to welcome @PhilipHammondUK & @AmbRobinBarnett to our Spencer Dock HQ to discuss the latest #Brexit developments  
15 months after Brexit and the political reputation of the British is increasingly of being ill-prepared, unintelligent and xenophobic. 
Might it not have been a good idea for this point to have come before we had a referendum, rather than over a year after it?  
Through gross incompetence or dastardly design, we hurtle towards cliff-edge Brexit & a chaos unseen in our lifetime.Where's the leadership?  
Wow. Insightful.  Because Brexit was all about a magnanimous outward-looking benevolent approach to the other 27 countries of course? 
WATCH | @GuyVerhofstadt: There's a fear that some in UK don't want to negotiate with us & want a hard Brexit.By Jove, I think he's got it!  
In other words, UK thinks it is not liable for commitments it agreed to before the referendum was even held. 
Great to have @PhilipHammondUK in @PwCIreland getting the views of Irish business on #brexit  
The year is 2078. The EU's chief Brexit negotiator is still waiting for the UK to produce a coherent plan.  
Labour's dramatic new #Brexit policy.  
Read our man in Brussels @pietercleppe who suggests EU is already compromising on Brexit and will need to move more  
withdrawn its previous recognition that they'll have fin obligations after Brexit Day, and curled up into Rees-Mogg's denialist corner 2/ 
Whatever your view on Brexit, a narrative's developing it's becoming a shambles, and May's going to have to find a way of countering it. 
Pound dips on uncertainty over Brexit talks - business live  
Seems to me that most Brexit problems attributable to one thing: Complete lack of due diligence undertaken by parliament *prior* to EU Ref 
Brexit talks - an updated joint technical note on the talks re EU/UK citizens' rights just published:  
If #Brexit had to be a single news story:  
Interesting that @DavidDavisMP criticizes EU for not breaking down exit bill but UK Government refusing to share #brexit impact reports w us 
More evidence that Brexit will be a great success for Britain.  
L O L - Brexit negotiations are going well...   
Blair & Juncker's smacker during Brexit talks are "the kiss of death 4 nation state democracy" , says @Nigel_Farage 
Japan has been a polite but pointed critic of Brexit  
Soft #Brexit is dead in the water! Staying in the single market & #Brexit are incompatible; hear it from the horse's mouth! #BrexitTalks 
#TheresaMay should sack incompetent David Davis, Boris Johnson, and Liam Fox. What's she got to lose, for goodness' sake? #Brexit 
Brexit showdown: EU left 'flabbergasted' after British negotiators dismantle legal basis for divorce bill'  
.@ThomasBrake: Lack of progress in talks shows why we need to give people a chance to exit from Brexit  
UK Slams EU’s ‘Unsatisfactory’ Brexit Bill Sums as Negotiations Stall  
After latest - less than successful - round of Brexit negotiations, what would No Deal" really mean? Our research:  
Speech by @MichelBarnier at the end of Round 3 of the #Brexit negotiations:  
some in Cabinet think German FDP in Govt might help with Brexit deal - yet its & Green manifestos offer Indy Scotland & NI way back into EU  
I fear that some of the #Brexit hardliners don't want to negotiate. Watch more here:  
And Davis is right to pick apart the inflated claims by the EU for a #Brexit divorce bill. No deal seems a realistic prospect now.  
Tory retail tycoon Lord Harris wants #Brexit to free us from a non-existent EU 35 hour working week rule #StopBrexit 
FSB's @davidcgeary gives his thoughts on Brexit and what small businesses want, as negotiations continue in Brussels #FSBbrexit 
Brexit talks end in acrimony, with the EU saying Britain is asking for the impossible  
EU's Barnier says no 'decisive progress' in Brexit talks  
If they lie in a General Election we get to punish them next time 'round. But when they lie in a Referendum the joke's on us.  
Britain has no understanding of key Brexit issues, EU negotiator announces  
Errm we want to leave???? "I can't be flexible on Brexit until I know what u want" Barnier  
The word most used to describe Brexit now seems to be catastrophic. I thought we were told that we were heading for a post European Utopia. 
"No decisive progress on #Brexit - Barnier"Does this mean the deals off and we go back as we were last May? Discuss 
The day after Brexit, the economy of the EU will be a fifth smaller. 
Another #Brexit boost ignored by mainstream media: Aston Martin announces £500m Japanese trade and investment deal   
Britain's 'impossible' Brexit plans just got savaged in a nightmare end to talks 
Having watched Davis & Barnier’s Brexit talks press conference, a bemused looking @chrisrogersBBC sums up the thoughts of most:“Ermm. Err”  
May humiliated in Japan as Davis hammered by Barnier in Brussels. Brexit going terribly well.  
UK now being openly mocked for wishful thinking around Brexit negotiations - this really isn't going well  
Financial settlement:UK doesn't feel obliged honour their obligations. How can we build trust&start discussing future relationship? #Brexit  
Just under a year until Britain needs to conclude its Brexit deal  and the negotiations have gone basically nowhere.  
I'm in Ireland today for meetings on Brexit and the economy. First up, Irish Foreign Minister @simoncoveney 
We always knew Brexit was going to be a complete shambles, just look at the faces of the "winners" on the day after the vote. #CancelBrexit 
David Davis: "we also recognise moral obligations sometimes"Really?@Conservatives?Can't say I've noticed such#DWP#NHS#Brexit#Yemen 
News goes from Brexit presser to May saying she'll stay the course. First tragedy, then farce. 
Michel Barnier repeatedly insisting there must be 'consequences' for Britain.These people aren't friends and we must walk away.#Brexit 
From what I can see, this is where the Brexit negotiations go off the rails. The EU is calling the Tories' bluff. 
UK decided to leave EU & Single Market. The #SingleMarket will not be undermined by #Brexit.  You cannot be outside & shape its legal order.  
EU's chief Brexit negotiator says position papers sent to him by the UK show "a sort of nostalgia" for the "benefits of the single market" 
They also expressed their disappointment with the brexit vote- just because their not talking about American politics 
My cartoon Thursday @TheTimes on #May's kamikaze mission to fight the next election....#Brexit  
'Impossible!' UK on brink of NO DEAL as Barnier says EU won't shift 'ONE IOTA' on Brexit  
BREXIT: Andrew Pierce presents a mature and considered assessment of Michel Barnier which prompts some thoughtful reader comments.  
Ouch! Barnier accuses UK of "nostalgia" in its Brexit demands. DD shoots back: "I wouldn't confuse belief in the free market with nostalgia" 
The UK's position is "substantially more flexible and pragmatic" than the EU's, says #Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP 
Barnier burn: There is a "certain nostalgia," to some of the UK's proposals. (Some journalists giggle.) #EUCO #Brexit 
Barnier tells press conference: "Brexit means Brexit". Looks like we're all on the same page now. 
EU's Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier: "There has been no decisive progress on key issues." UK's Davis: "There has been concrete progress." 
Barnier-Davis Brexit progress report in brief: Little to none 
Michel Barnier clear: if the UK wants a decent Brexit deal, it will have to pay for it (as has always been the case). 
Brexit talks are stalling. The government must unite and plan for a clean break.Britain must not sell out and take a bad deal! 
I am also concerned and worried about time passing quickly and the lack of progress on Brexit negotiations @DavidDavisMP 
David Davis: It's complicated. We've made a lot of progress.Michel Barnier: It's complicated. We've made zero progress.#Brexit #EUCO 
.@MichelBarnier @DavidDavisMP #Brexit "Taxpayers of #EU27 should not pay for obligations taken by #EU28, including the #UK." 
There is strong disagreement over citizens' rights post-#Brexit. @MichelBarnier says Home Office snafus show need for EU court oversight. 
Tory MP claims Twitter account was hacked after series of posts demanded "hard facts" from EU over UK Brexit bill  
EU negotiator sees 'no decisive progress' in Brexit talks  
BREAKING: No decisive progress on the main topics during Brexit talks, Michel Barnier says  
Still think a post-Brexit free trade deal with the EU should be the “easiest in human history”, @LiamFox? 
EU's chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier says no "decisive progress" has been made in talks but discussion on Ireland has been "fruitful" 
The EU's chief Brexit negotiatior says no decisive progress has been made on any on the principal subjects during four days of talks. 
David Davis and Michel Barnier hold press conference after Brexit talks - Politics live  
How did Brexit talks really go? EU's Michel Barnier and Britain's David Davis give an update  
 Live now: Watch the press conference following 3rd round of #Article50 negotiations with UK #Brexit  
My latest comment for @CapX: Why the EU will have to start talking about trade soon #Brexit 
14) but during this time of change the UK has decided to opt out, to take an extended sabbatical for 6+ years whilst #Brexit drags on 
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Tokyo and London will "work quickly" on a post-Brexit trade deal, Abe and May agree  
12) the question really is: who in their right mind, if they knew the #Brexit reality, would actually have voted for 6+ years of Zombie UK? 
£1 now = 0,86€.It was ~1,50€ when I lived in Spain.Take a bow, #Brexit.#StopBrexit #BrexitShambles 
U.K. seeks "closest, freest" trading relationship with Japan after Brexit, Theresa May says  
#TelegraphLetters: Brexit stalemate arises out of the EU’s failure to abide by its own rules  
David Davis shows his steel...EU left 'flabbergasted' after British negotiators dismantle legal basis for divorce bill#BrexitTelegraph  
Brexit must be "smooth and successful," Shinzo Abe says as Theresa May visits Japan  
EU officials were reportedly left "completely flabbergasted" when British negotiators picked apart the Brexit bill.  
It is our intention “to sign new bilateral trade agreements with partners around the world in any interim Brexit period,” says @theresa_may 
Ryanair boss Michael O'Leary launches scathing attack on Theresa May's Brexit strategy  
Tory plan:1. Let Brexit destroy UK2. Blame everyone else3. SurviveLabour plan:1. Let Brexit destroy UK2. Blame Tories3. Victory! 
The Labour Hokey Cokey continues. While Labour try & play politics, this Government is working to get the best Brexit deal for everyone  
If anyone thinks they're not in the midst of a national emergency caused by Brexit and the advisory referendum, they aren't paying attention 
Sorry, mate. Canada, Australia, and NZ think Brexit is a colossal mistake.  
Brexit Boom: Aston Martin Announces £550m Anglo-Japanese Deal as UK Trade Delegation Arrives in Tokyo  
NEWS! Brexit saves UK from catastrophically lucrative EU free-trade deal with Japan  
Ryanair boss tells Theresa May: 'Get your finger out in Brexit talks or we'll close down flights'  
Labour beating Tories in latest poll (YouGov).71% of those Lab supporters think the referendum Leave vote was wrong.So... @jeremycorbyn ? 
The pound heads for its biggest monthly fall against the dollar since October  
The Tories are absolutely screwed with the youth. Brexit will make this much worse. May saying she'll stand again looks utterly out of touch  
John Humphries called Theresa May a 'fashion icon' on the radio this morning. Brexit and food banks are going to be big hits on the catwalk. 
Shinzo Abe and Theresa May are holding a news conference as Japan and Britain talk trade and Brexit   
Brexit Britain received a massive boost of confidence from economic powerhouse Japan   
PM Abe: Japan received commitment that Brexit talks will be transparent  
"If she delivered Brexit - and I think she will - she will be a national hero" - @peterboneuk on Prime Minister Theresa May 
Brexit is the most important issue facing Britain, Labour don't know what they want.  
EU 'will not step back one millimetre' from defending citizens' rights during Brexit  
A devastating indictment of our Brexit government  
British officials have slammed their #EU counterparts as being incapable of carrying out the #Brexit negotiations  
Why should Remainers show any respect for the wilfully ignorant wooden-headed fools who are supporting the self-harm of #Brexit?#StopBrexit 
Brexit day should be celebrated every year by shooting yourself in the foot and then remembering the good old days when we still had an NHS. 
New post: Why Brexit has led to falling real wages   It is not as obvious as it may seem. 
In 12 months. Worth remembering that in the first 12 months of Brexit they did the square root of fuck all. 
Amazing how people who keep telling me I can't accept democracy can't accept democracy gave us a non-binding advisory referendum. #Brexshit pic.twitter.com/bxFYv0ZJCi 
Yes, very annoying all these pesky facts that prove Brexit is a disaster of epic proportions. Here's an idea, stop Brexit. Problem solved. 
Japanese PM hails 'full confidence' in post-Brexit Britain as May's trade mission secures new agreement with Tokyo  
Labour: take note. Don't try to win over UKIP voters: serve the country's interests. Stop Brexit.  
Looking increasingly unlikely round 2 of Brexit talks will start in October. They must conclude by October 2018, to leave time for votes. 
Japan's PM said he was convinced Britain would continue to be a “compelling” place for Japan to invest after Brexit  
Grant Shapps said: "people are impressed by our Brexit positioning papers"Were these people Sebastian Fox & Michael Green by any chance? 
If immigration is still your 'reason' for agreeing with Brexit, you need to take a long hard look at yourself. 
.@Conservatives now blaming the electorate for Brexit.They'll blame everyone for this monumental f*ck up but themselves.It's their mess. 
UK should apologise to Japan for 'breaking promises' with Brexit, says Asian business expert  
Shinzo Abe said he was convinced post-Brexit Britain would remain a “compelling” place for Japanese investment  
Alarmingly, the UK's Brexit approach appears to be increasingly drawn from the Varoufakis playbook. My latest.  
Japan gives vote of confidence to post-Brexit Britain as Shinzo Abe urges 'transparent' negotiations #premium 
*Brexit Explained*  
REJECTED: UK tears apart EU proposal for €100 billion Brexit bill. In their dreams!  
Brexit: The position advanced by the EU commission, which started out as inflexible, has become downright ludicrous.  
*Brexit voters insist they know what they were voting for*  
The weak and wobbly Tories continue to mess up Brexit talks. It is time to end the madness and #StopBrexit 
‘Brexit talks will be transparent’?Brexit, like Emperor’s New Clothes, will be shown for what it is: a total sham. 
In this thoughtful piece @OwenJones84 outlines challenges Labour faces in carving out a distinct #Brexit position  
Grant Shapps says "people are impressed by our #Brexit positioning papers"Well, they are pretty fancy.  
Why the Brexit talks went nowhere this week: must read by our man in Brussels @alexebarker  via @FT 
Note for readers: Owen lives in a parallel universe in which Corbyn had nothing to do with Leave winning, so Brexit is a Tory mess 
EU 'will not step back one millimetre' from defending citizens' rights during Brexit  
Brexit showdown: EU left 'flabbergasted' after British negotiators dismantle legal basis for divorce bill #premium 
Owen ‘which way is the wind blowing?’ Jones:“We must fight Brexit!”“Brexit means Brexit!”“Labour can save us!” 
#r4today Grant Shapps: 'People were impressed with #brexit position papers. Not their content necessarily, but that we got them out'  
Brexit is a Tory mess. Labour has now shown it can clear it up | Owen Jones  
HaHa - referendum wasn't about EU, it was an examination of UK collective intelligence which you failed miserably & continue to do so. 
If you regularly relocate in EU27 for work, what happens at Brexit? Complex questions but real people and real lives. #citizensrights 
EU stunned as UK rejects €100 billion Brexit bill  
They won't, and I don't like their imperious approach to the UK & their incessant campaigning to overturn our referendum.  
Why will @Ryanair be unable to fly in/out UK after #brexit ? Currently fly to Israel, Morocco, Switzerland etc. Are they in #EU ? @SkyNews 
World's fourth largest maker of mechanical seals, £143m-turnover UK manufacturer AESSeal, is bullish about Brexit.  
#Brexit default position for @GovUk is expulsion - British-born man told to leave country in Home Office blunder: 
Honored to be a part of #Referendum with my boy rodanCheck it out and don't forget to also share it thank you.. 
'Charlie, how are the Brexit negotiations going?'  
Exclusive: More cracks in EU unity as head of Calais region praises UK's post-Brexit border plans 
Brexit showdown: EU left 'flabbergasted' after British negotiators dismantle legal basis for divorce bill 
If you repeat an untruth often enough people may believe it. A mantra taken straight from the @ScotTories & #BetterTogether songbook #Brexit  
Peter Bone: "If Theresa May delivers on Brexit she'll be a national hero." He really thinks that. He really does. #brexitshambles 
Bye bye, Fox News UK! Even the dentally-challenged army of tattooed chimps that voted for #Brexit wouldn't watch your bullshit. 
How much does Japan want a UK trade deal? EU trade comes first. Brexit reality.  
This is extremely worrying for the Igbo (Jews) & other tribes in Biafra. Discriminated against because of their ethnicity. Biafra Referendum  
Brexit Toll?UK #FinTech #VC share deal declined in 2016/17 sharply, still represents 1/3 thoughby @CBinsights 
Brexit is a Tory mess. Labour has now shown it can clear it up | Owen Jones  
EU Brexit chiefs 'incapable' of carrying out flexible divorce talks, UK officials warn  
Liberal pundits are treating the Kamala Harris thing as a referendum on dudebros, as with literally everything else since 2015. WE ARE HAPPY 
While Japan takes a bigger interest in Brexit than many, the topic still comes low down the pecking order  
Paper publishes highly suspect US intelligence document on ISIS attack in Barcelona ahead of Catalan referendum.  
I was never an EU booster. But Brexit was another case of voters wishcasting away the modern world.  
And post Brexit, with EU no longer involved, WM will have a free hand to do ANYTHING it wants to Scotland. 
Brexit has been a fucking disaster from start to finish!!  
The argument for Brexit that prevailed in the polls was built on sham promises and xenophobia. 
Britain must accept the hard truth about Brexit  
EU 'will not step back one millimetre' from defending citizens' rights during Brexit | The Independent  
#UK : 65% of Brits reject £20 billion Brexit bill – Westmonster   #fo2eu 
Brexit: charities join forces against repeal bill 'power grab' by ministers  
Looks rather like the Tories' plan for post-Brexit Britain. #StopBrexit 
Japan has grave doubts about Brexit, ex-diplomat says as Theresa May visits Tokyo  
Emily Maitlis that rarest of things, an interviewer scrutinising Brexit told to be a bit patriotic by Andrea Leadsom  
The Brexit divorce negotiations are mired in a shortage of compromise  
So the point of Brexit was what exactly?  
Theresa May is in Japan to try to convince govt/companies that Brexit won't make the UK any less attractive. Really  
10) so all this posturing by Redwood & Rees-Mogg & the anti EU headlines might be great for the Brexit echo chamber but... 
9) as Politicians they can let the UK walk itself into a damaging hard Brexit & after, give a (Gallic) shrug and say "what could we do?" 
Theresa May on Brexit:"We’ll copy EU trade deals with rest of world."I say no problem! After all, we have everything the EU has, right? 
Seen elsewhere: German Parties Snub U.K. to Back Scotland’s Push to Defy Brexit - Bloomberg  #ScotRef 
Unlike EU President Juncker, Calais's region endorses Britain's papers & model for the post-Brexit Irish border  
Hardly surprising that British legal minds were able to eviscerate shoddy, half-baked EU Brexit bill nonsense.   
I'm going to keep repeating: I want the 2019 mayoral election to be a referendum on Rahm's education policy. #Troy2019 
If we leave the EU we instantly lose the special trading deals we have with counties like Japan. Brexit isn't worth it. #StopBrexit 
Time to march and let it be known we will not go quietly, we will not accept Brexit and we will not let the lunatics ruin this country.  
#brexit time bomb Care homes facing skills crisis as nurses head home, warns new research.  
Back to you Edwin. DUP has run Economy for 10 years and zero growth in GDP. By backing Brexit they have killed jobs and Investment in North.  
#FFS Andrea Leadsom doesn't believe in Brexit either.  
UK tells Brussels negotiators their Brexit bill sums do not add up  
This is Brexit. This is who wants it and why. This is whose 'will' is being respected..... Harris, Tebbit, Lawson - all nuts. Read and weep.  
"Young man from Whitehall" caused "total amazement" on EU side by taking apart their €100bn Brexit bill demand, @pmdfoster reports 
Team Barnier "flabbergasted" by British team questioning their Brexit bill demands  
William Hague has blamed the VOTERS for UK getting a bad Brexit deal from EU!Not the 3 incompetent Brexiteers?  
If Theresa May delivers Brexit, she will be a national hero - @PeterBoneUK says there is no plotting against the PM #newsnight 
William Hague has blamed British public for failing to return a Conservative maj & weakening #Brexit negotiations  
One EU official said the UK position amounted to: “let’s pretend Brexit has no consequences”. 
Peter Bone talking about Theresa May & sounding like a bad Barbara Cartland novel. "Her eyes sparkled when she spoke of Brexit." #Newsnight 
#Brexit showdown: EU left 'flabbergasted' after British negotiators dismantle legal basis for divorce bill  
UK Brexit officials have criticised their EU counterparts describing them as "incapable of being able to carry out the Brexit negotiations" 
German Parties Snub U.K. to Back Scotland’s Push to Defy Brexit, reports @Bloomberg. 
EU negotiators 'incapable' of flexible Brexit talks, UK officials believe  
#UK : Free Press and Free Speech DEAD as Journalist imprisoned for criticising ISLAM | Your Brexit #fo2eu 
Arrogant nonsense. And suggests her party has no say in who it's next leader might be. Or maybe after Brexit they've given up?  
Lazy sloppy interviewers allowing myth to be portrayed as fact instead of challenging it. Same during referendum. Lazy with our democracy.  
This would be most unfair... Must make sure it's only those who voted for Brexit... That's a Joke & so is Brexshit pic.twitter.com/Yz16DNs34d 
"If we wait until after 2021 then we could well find that an independence referendum is prohibited by law." |   
EU 'will not step back one millimetre' from defending #Citizensrights during Brexit.  
There are many MPs want @theresa_may to keep going - she won #GE2017 She kept Corbyn out of No10 She's delivering #Brexit 
Insightful thread explaining how UK benefits from long term EU-Japanese progress on trade, and the risks of leaving this all behind #Brexit  
It's more likely than ever that there will be no Brexit.  
May to UNDERMINE EU: PM will go straight to European countries for post-Brexit trade talks  
PM lacks most basic understanding of UK SM membership options after Brexit. Worrying. No grip.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
That's the thing about Brexit, it was built on nothing but lies. We need a 2nd referendum.  
UK 'confusion and hesitation' means Brexit talks unlikely to move on  
Absolutely no doubt that Brexit was heavily influenced by Russian social media operation.  We got played.  
.@Alison_McGovern – Brexit could see UK lose trade deals with Japan, not gain them  
Revealed: How Brexit will damage the UK's relations with Japan  
Joe thinks Brexit is nothing to worry about, and that all our problems will disappear on the stroke of midnight on 29 March 2019.  
German parties snub UK to back Scotland’s push to defy #Brexit.  
On devolved issues, Corbyn offers Scotland nothing that we don't already haveOn reserved matters, he supports austerity, Trident and Brexit 
Britain must outline its Brexit position before the EU can be flexible, Michel Barnier says  
1. Having learned what I've learned, here's a little sketch of what *may* have been cooked up by some devious, rightwing, Brexit minds... 
#AwfulThemeParkIdeasBREXIT LAND! We’ve got great plans for this, it will be ready either 2019 or never. Any complaints are wrong shut up. 
Theresa May on Brexit: We’ll copy EU trade deals with rest of world - the very definition of futility!  
She lost a majority. Empowered the far Left. Endangered Brexit. Promised much on social justice and delivered little... so no, not a fan  
Walk Now! : Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt says transitional deal must be SAME terms as EU membership  
Two of Angela Merkel's potential coalition partners back an independent Scotland in the EU  
True! There is already less money for the NHS due to deminished tax returns & Brexit fanatics don't give a f*ck.  
Traction now behind call from Times - where Gove has so many pals - to ditch @BorisJohnson. Boris has only one card left: to recant Brexit. 
MP's need to stop shaming our country and collectively get behind achieving a successful Brexit getting the best deal with or without the EU  
Interesting: Tory Brexiter John Redwood showing remarkable sympathy for Putin's aggression against Ukraine #Brexit 
What are they hiding in the 50 #Brexit impact studies? Demand we get to know! Sign the petition here:  #StopBrexit 
Big turnout at meeting to discuss Limerick campaign to Repeal the 8th, look forward to working cross-party to win referendum #repealthe8th 
Japan has grave doubts about Brexit, ex-diplomat says as Theresa May visits Tokyo  
Washington fears a Kurdish independence referendum could prompt unrest  
We believe Brexit is costly, economically damaging & destructive of jobs. End the lies, release the studies  
The latest in the saga of the secret Brexit studies. The European Movement has launched a petition demanding the...  
Couldn't disagree more. Think it's exactly representative of the UK. This is why Brexit happened. Casual xenophobia AOTS. 
In September 2014 John Redwood MP made this creepy anti-democratic threat to punish businesses speaking in favour of EU membership #Brexit  
Lord Harris wants Brexit as wrongly believes EU restricts employees to 35hr week. Someone save us from these fools.  
25 May 2016: John Redwood warns that if #Remain wins Many Tory MPs will be "waiting for a second referendum..#Brexit #StopBrexit 
EU 'will not step back one millimetre' from defending citizens' rights during Brexit  
Daft rich unelected Tory lawmaker wrongly blames EU and wants Brexit to increase working hours. Stupidity of leaving in one wealthy Con peer  
*My 'Brexit Stopped' pic is ready*  
Half of Britons think Islam is ‘threat to West,’ study reveals 
Notting Hill Carnival should be scrapped after spate of police injuries, says union boss 
Being non British most of the directors of Aston Martin will probably be thrown out post Brexit - Kuwaiti, Italian & Egyptian  
Now the PM can't even get the basics right! It's like the Titanic is being steered by Mr Magoo! Oh shit!!! @BrexitDebateUK @Brexit @Reuters pic.twitter.com/nYnyL16aVv 
Richard Leonard was one of the three nonTory MSPs that voted to back May Governments Brexit plan at Holyrood. 
I like the sound of a 'flexible' Brexit - in fact so flexible that we remain as we are now - in the EU. 
It is time to make more progress with the #Brexit negotiations, says @GuyVerhofstadt  
Britain needs a unified Brexit plan as time is running out, Portugal's top diplomat says  
Brexit: I believe that Labour actually needs to do one of the following: 
The #TrumpTrain and #BREXIT are same reassertion of sovereignty. Explaining #MAGA to UK next.216pmET (716pmUK)@Channel4News@Channel4 
A new "Analytical Report" by @RusEmbAU claims no Russian troops were outside their bases during the Crimea "referendum" 2014.Fucking liars. pic.twitter.com/YCVDrMMVtf 
Rees-Mogg is a snake; he rejects a middle-class metropolitan Brexit only because he wants one for the oligarchs  
Yeah he also said after Brexit we should slash environmental & safety standards & consistently votes against welfare & human rights sooo  
Exclusive: More cracks in EU unity as head of Calais region praises UK's post-Brexit border plans #premium 
Great proposal by @johnredwood. Devastate UK trade with our biggest trading partner and destroy other nations' trust in Britain.#Brexit  
I've called for this before, but at some point, seriously, we need an inquiry into Putin's involvement in making Brexit happen.  
It's not that I want David Davis to fail to achieve his Brexit negotiation objectives, it's that I know failure is inevitable. 
Japan has grave doubts about Brexit, ex-diplomat says as Theresa May visits Tokyo  
A very good & fair point. Farage & UKIP shld be publishing their own detailed proposal of how to deliver a workable/successful Brexit  
The WV Chamber of Commerce membership has unanimously voted to support the Roads Bond Referendum. Our business leaders understand.#WVBizSum 
The pro-#Brexit press say @MichelBarnier's comments are "unhelpful". Not as unhelpful as their poisonous tone. 
Hi @Nigel_Farage instead of carping, why not get your taxpayer funded staff to develop some #Brexit solutions? Unless that seems too hard.. 
We were promised better trade deals with #Brexit - PM now simply wants to copy EU trade deals after. So why leave?  
Aston Martin secure £500 million deal with Japan. Another important boost for the Brexit British economy 
Japanese snub EU saying they will look to trade with Brexit Britain 1st despite negotiations for deal with Brussels.  
The question isn't whether or not Britain can SURVIVE after Brexit. The question is whether or not the loss of what we have now is worth it. 
Pinched this from FBThe referendum wasn't a vote on EU membership, it was an audit of the UK's intelligence. The country failed it. 
No position paper from EU on Irish border. No justification for ‘Brexit Bill’. That’s what’s truly unsatisfactory  
If Mr Barnier believes Britain should pay a bill for leaving EU it's up to him to present such a bill– clearly itemised#BrexitTelegraph  
Fucking Brexit. Oh...I mean despite Brexit.  
Jacob Rees Mogg says Labour's new Brexit stance is for "metropolitan cappuccino drinkers"  
We'll have a stall in Market Square, Cambridge this Saturday for @Open_Britain @EuroMove, @_Britain4Europe day of action against #Brexit  
Brexit: UK 'likely' to stop sharing intelligence with EU through Europol, says Amber Rudd  >> absolute mess frankly 
Labour’s Brexit U-turn appeals only to their metropolitan cappuccino drinkers says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  
Democracy doesn't stop at one election or referendum. And btw, if we have another it won't be the 2nd, it will be the 3rd (remember 1975?)  
Ireland must stop talking down Britain's Brexit plans and begin to face reality  
@theSNPOppose trident  Support sensible immigration  Oppose Brexit  Oppose austerity  Dont use PFI's  Build affordable housing  
UK wants to copy and paste EU trade deals after BrexitWhat's the point of Brexit then?Just xenophobia? 
The Brexiters claimed the world would queue up to sign trade deals post Brexit.They are. With the European Union.#BrexitTradeDeals 
Join a 'day of action' against Brexit in a town near you on Saturday! With @Open_Britain @EuroMove, @_Britain4Europe  
Bloody EU! Don’t they know ‘Brexit means Brexit’?! What more do they need from the UK government? A proper plan? Such bureaucracy!  
The possibility of an approaching brexit was a huge factor in my Yes vote in #indyref & now the major factor in my lack of support for Jez 
More reality bites ... #Brexit  
In case the numbers are correct, the socis will vote in a referendum of the motion. 
Brexit: Retailers 'Running Out Of Options' For Protecting Shoppers From Price Rises - HuffPost UK  
EU Brexit chief suggests talks being held up because UK won't clarify its position -  Politics live  
From the FT: Free movement of people is "a description of the nature of modern business"  #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit  
So Japan openly saying #Brexit will damage trade with UK. How long do we have to put up with @theresa_may and her idiot Brexit cronies? 
The Home Office isn't fit for purpose now - nevermind after Brexit, @coyleneil argues 
Brexit "David Jones" Tweeter w 100k followers is a bot linked to #Leave @mrjamesob @carolecadwalla @ElectoralCommUK 
Leavers think of a tidal wave of uneducated immigrants, but on average EU immigrants are considerably better educated than Britons.#Brexit  
This is how Putin pushes #Brexit and far right policies through fake news  
Some of Britain's top company bosses have been summoned for #Brexit talks with @DavidDavisMP  
#France and #Sweden are scooping up a bigger share of Europe’s #Fintech deals since #Brexit @johndetrixhe #VC 
An accurate,crystal-clear+concise note which every UK citizen should read: What the German elections mean for Brexit  
Some excellent questions from the Group 2day including funding, football policing, Brexit, culture & being Chief #greatengagement #thankyou 
Who will the right-wing press blame when #Brexit falls apart? Those "arrogant EU apparatchiks" of course. 
Iraqi premier says Kurdistan's planned referendum on independence is illegal and 'will create problems'  
This is the thing Lord Harris got wrong and 'felt'  made Brexit such a good idea. UK destroyed by old people.  
PM in Japan, she must come clean on sweetheart Nissan deal, public need to know if chaotic Brexit plans lead to blank cheques for businesses 
We want seamless borders with the EU in Ireland and a hard border with the EU everywhere else. We would like this not to be a contradiction. 
You know what would have just impressed the hell out of me and others, if JC's visit to Scotland included meeting @ScotGov to discuss brexit 
We have launched a cross-party campaign to petition government to come clean on 50 #Brexit studies  
Lord Harris on #r4today: "...#Brexit...good for the UK because retailers like me can make people work more than 35 hours a week' FFS  
Hey, UK Govt. A tip. Serious politicians in rest of EU think you & #Brexit are mad. Marginalising Barnier won’t help  
UK will pay more and get worse Brexit deal because of election result, says William Hague - Politics live  
Now William Hague says May's disastrous snap election will lead to 'a worse deal' on Brexit.  
.@M_AndersonSF: British paper on Irish border is "fluff" and tries to wrongly blame EU for risk of hard border #Brexit  
Former Swedish minister and ex EU ambassador Gunnar Lund see many positive effects from #Brexit. "U.K. acted as saboteurs for decades"  
...someone with access to exact same papers and briefings on Brexit which, say, a PPS to a foreign secretary would have. 
So: the @ConorBurnsUK hacker is either an expert on EU law and/or the Brexit budget issue or... 
New paper on "norm cascades" - what does the civil rights movement have in common with veganism, Trumpism, & Brexit? 
This is such arrogant nonsense. These trade deals were already long in tooth eons before the referendum  
Brexit boost as Aston Martin announces a £500m trade and investment deal between the United Kingdom and Japan  
"Belief is a wonderful way to pass the time until the facts come in" - Carl R White. The #Brexit facts are coming in. To roost. 
Sweden is in the post-Brexit competition for medicines agency EMA. Here’s the location being offered, close to Karolinska Institutet.  
UK sought to win a sympathetic ear in capitals across Europe — and it floppedIts Brexit charm offensive falls flat 
After Jean-Claude Juncker accuses UK of Brexit "ambiguity", David Davis says he might have a point, or might not. 
Stop Brexit march on the Tory party conference. 1st October in Manchester  
“The Japanese simply don’t understand why we’re doing Brexit. They’re far too polite to say so publicly.” 
I'm really looking forward to this special Brexit edition of Sherlock. *lines up alibi*  
European Parl Brexit Co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt says his update on how far the Brexit negotiations have got "will be very short." 
FT Brexit analysis is dire. As is the "analysis" of those low grade lobbyists who parrot it.  
This week's podcast question: If Brexit was a song what would it be? Reply with your suggestions using #TNEpodcast and we'll use the best! 
2/2 ...someone with access to exact same papers and briefings on Brexit which, say, a PPS to a foreign secretary would have.Rotten luck. 
1/2 So: the @ConorBurnsUK hacker is either an expert on EU law and/or the Brexit budget issue or... 
Yeah! Come and join us, Ireland, because Brexit is going sooo well! We can wallow in an idiotic cesspit together. 
.@vincecable: The government's Brexit strategy now "defies all logic".  
Brexit boneheads still talk about "taking back our country". If you're not one of the top 1%, it hasn't been yours for the last 1,000 years. 
65% of British people reject the absurd £20 billion #Brexit bill.  
Yeah, the first thing hackers do is tweet about Brexit discussion papers... 
Well who'd have thunk it. If Russia wants Brexit, then it has to be good for the UK, right?  
Join us, @euromove & @_Britain4Europe this Saturday to campaign against no deal Brexit, the hardest of all Brexits  
Thanks. If I cancel my gym or broadband subscription & want to avoid paying what I committed myself to, I'll come to you for advice  #Brexit 
.@theresa_may has been accused of pursuing a "cut and paste" #Brexit  
Despite summer efforts of Remainers, there's been no opinion shift against Brexit, no recession and no new pro-EU party called The Democrats 
Who stands to benefit from Brexit? Bastards. Complete and utter bastards. pic.twitter.com/8Gg86zKxB4 
Brexit  
Brexiters rant about trading outside the EU. In 2011 China imported almost twice as much from the EU than from the USA.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
About #Brexit negotiations, I know a divorce is never easy, but a strong future partnership is in the best interest of all 
The SNP will continue to oppose Trident, hard Brexit and the scapegoating of immigrants. Get back to me when labour can say the same!   
Without all this posturing from politicians like #Juncker, surely we could be making good headway with #Brexit negotiations by now…?  
#Brexit- useful 2 have  Britain's view. Imp 2 underline #Norway's special interests as #EEA member. Outside #EU but inside #Singlemarket 
Brexit is the new excuse for Austerity. #BrexitMeansAusterity 
Matt on the EU's Brexit Bill - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Tory retail tycoon mocked for wanting Brexit so staff can work longer hours  
Join @mollymep @RCorbettMEP @catherinemep and @healthierin in demanding the unpublished Brexit studies are released  
Davis, Fox and Johnson . You must be kidding!Brexit is Barmy.  
Some topics on my agenda for the coming months: #UNGA #DigitalEurope #EasternPartnership #EUCO #Brexit:  
Brexit backdown for Ryanair? Budget airline joins UK aviation trade body despite EU threat  
Ireland should consider 'Irexit' to avoid Brexit damage, says academic  
Why is anyone surprised by Labour's Brexit 'u-turn'? It's been the Remainer Party for 30 years, says Mick Hume  
Brexit is really very simple: Just get everyone to agree where the UK should be on this. You're welcome.   
The Brexit-gushing @DavidJo52951945 account has gone private, after US data scientist exposes Russian-like patterns: 
If I was negotiating brexit and the EU were being intransigent I would publish my 'no deal' manifesto to the country. The EU would brick it. 
'Brexit is good for young people as they will be able to work longer in shops,' says multimillionaire Tory peer  
Tory tycoon wants Brexit because 'we can only keep our staff 35 hours a week' 
Just when you think it's reached bottom, the government plumbs new depths of conceited #Brexit inanity #Remain 
Look at The Left's fetish for Islam. Can you really blame people for running to Trump & Brexit when The Left demand no criticism of THIS - pic.twitter.com/sxuJy0N30b 
Siding w Juncker isn't automatic, it's because he's correct - because Brexit is a calamity of epic proportions  
"Let's leave the EU so we can then have a deal like the one you've just done with the EU". Brexit. It's Alice In Wonderland stuff. 
I can't see how David Davis couldbe handling Brexit negotiations much worse than he is now. RT if you agree 
Sad, but telling, that #brexit supporters so often rely on parroting myths and cliches : 
Ireland should consider 'Irexit' to avoid Brexit damage, says academic  
Fwiw, take no pleasure in UK's poor Brexit negotiation performance.Like watching Aston Villa being relegated. Just that you see it coming. 
#weredoomed May wants to bypass the Brexit negotiations - that should end well   
Evergreen tweet: whether through dishonesty or ignorance, PM has once again been recorded talking incomprehensible nonsense about Brexit  
President Barzani: I ask our people to set aside any other internal or economic problems. Referendum is bigger than any thing else.  
Great that Theresa May is in Japan this week to discuss post-Brexit trade ties with the world’s 4th largest economy 
Someone finally benefits from Brexit! Frankfurt to gain 80,000 jobs.  
Yes, MPs angrily tweeting at Michel Barnier seems like the best way to get through the Brexit negotiations.  
It's like watching Brexit for the slow & bewildered unfolding UK plan to bypass European Commission  
The Tories now lining up to blame the British electorate for a bad deal on Brexit. They'll blame anybody but themselves. 
EU left red-faced after Japanese PM's aide hails UK's 'special niche' in boost for Brexit  
People's March for Europe: London: Saturday 9th September 2017 @ 11 am #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
Brexit to blame for food price rise, say industry reps  
We signed Coutinho for £8m, and are poised to sell him for €160m. Post-Brexit exchange rates mean that's a profit of approximately £800. 
UK plan to bypass European Commission in Brexit talks doomed to fail  
"There is nothing noble in defending an exercise in democracy that was as deeply flawed as the EU referendum"  
It seems that UKIP and Russian state trolls have common interests.I think we can see who the traitors are.#brexit  
.@theresa_may is asked about North Korea, UK trade after Brexit and @BorisJohnson by @JasonFarrellSky, during the PM's visit to Japan 
Britain tried 'devide and rule' tactics in #Brexit negotiations and failed miserably  /via @giuliaparavicin 
Retailers warn of empty shelves after Brexit if Government refuses to wake up  
There's a rather quaint idea that Europe should have been more co operative.See? People have not understood that Brexit is a hostile act. 
There is also widespread opposition to paying a #Brexit divorce bill of £10 billion. We owe ZERO after we leave.  
Kurdistan's president Barzani says partnership, democracy & federalism failed with #Baghdad, confirms independence referendum will go ahead. 
Britain will ‘piggyback’ on EU trade deals after Brexit. You could not make this up. We're becoming a joke 
Even if #Brexit cancelled now, it has cost UK dearly & will require years of work to fix. However, still far less damaging than real #Brexit 
Visiting museums in Europe: free for UK students... until Brexit that is of course. Sigh. One million small advantages we're throwing away.  
Who do those arrogant EU apparatchiks Juncker and Barnier think they are?   #Brexit 
The new buzzwords, 'ideas and clarity'. Although I have  a couple of suggestions for her, 'Brexit', 'stupid concept' and 'I resign' 
1. So no great new trade deals?2. Why should other nations give the UK the same deal as the EU? #Brexit #Remain 
The EU currently has advantage over UK in Brexit talks, but EU should watch the Viper vs the Mountain before any Hubris. 
Thread in which @StevePeers makes many good points, critical of *both* sides, on Brexit negotiation stand-off.  
Russian troll @DavidJo52951945 was at the forefront of the online Brexit campaign. His tweets shared by Farage etc  
Labour's new Brexit policy is an unsatisfactory half-way house, says @John_Mills_JML 
POLL: 65% of Brits say Brexit bill of £20 billion or more would be unacceptable. Brussels can go whistle!  
From Brexit means Brexit, their strategy now is Brexit means Xerox 
'We will NOT move ONE MILLIMETRE!' EU chief's SHOCK outburst as Brexit tensions boil over  
Brexit will deliver 80,000 new jobs…in Frankfurt  
Brexit debate has been "very British with a lot of wishful thinking - cake and eat it", says outgoing Danish Ambassador Claus Grube  
This is shocking, but far from the only dishonesty involved in the Brexit endeavour:  
Nissan set to increase production by 20% - another vote of confidence in Brexit Britain  
Brexit has made England an increasingly "hostile and divided" nation  via @LondonEconomic 
EU Boss: 'We will NOT move ONE MILLIMETRE!'Once a Bully, always a Bully!Britain should Leave & Leave NOW#Brexit 
This was discussed in referendum. Overwhelmingly deals with small economies. Nothing to do with potential new deals with likes of US, India.  
PM Theresa May: It's the UK that's brought "ideas" & "clarity" to #Brexit talks 
What is the point of #Brexit when the best that the UK can do is simply replicate EU trade deals?  
65% of Brits reject £20 billion Brexit bill  
Lord Harris on #R4Today:“Brexit will give more opportunities to young”“How?””I just FEEL it will be better”I FEEL you should stfu 
1/ Some thoughts about the apparent deadlock in UK/EU Brexit talks, and ideas about how it might be addressed. 
There is very little public appetite for handing Brussels a large Brexit Bill.  
The state of this! A book calling Trump and Brexit the work of Russia. Liberal tears everywhere. #AlternativeWar 
Russian interference in Trump and Brexit votes exposed in the new book #AlternativeWar RT if you buy it / have bought it. 
Lord Harris on #r4today "just feels" #Brexit will be good for UK retailers and the young as he can then make them work > 35 hrs. Poor lambs!  
On some days I think #Brexit spells total disaster for the UK. On the others I think the same.#StopTheMadness 
Mr Barnier wants the UK to set out its calculation of the exit bill. That’s easy. The bill is zero. Nothing. Zilch. #Brexit 
Chris Williamson: Brexit Means Leaving Single Market  
In 9 days time we're holding a Citizens' Assembly on Brexit. @alanjrenwick & @beckymckee90 explain how it will work  pic.twitter.com/7lieN7Tpgt 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has branded Jean-Claude Juncker a "pound shop Bismarck" amid disputes over the Brexit bill. pic.twitter.com/GOB0J9wEQB 
And some people wonder if we're taking Brexit seriously enough  
Japanese officials are "far too polite" to tell Theresa May what they really think of Brexit  
#Brexit talks have resumed so here's a reminder of the EP's critical role in passing any #Article50 deal. Thread.   
To think that people like Lord Harris are in charge of many of UK's schools. No place for argument. Puts acts of faith first. #Brexit  
This is the succinctly damning truth about the cheat that is Brexit:  
As soon as Brexit causes a labour shortage the people who pretended to care about "British" workers will be calling them "lazy scroungers" 
Natural disasters affecting world - look at UK & realise all our disasters have been inflicted by Tories:Poverty,Homeless,Brexit,Schools,NHS  
What is it about this very simple statement that government find so hard to understand. Brexit needs to be a short sharp exercise.  
Japan is as curious as everyone else: what is Theresa May’s Brexit plan? | Henry Newman  
Labour’s change of course over Brexit: can it change Britain’s fate?  
Lord Harris clearly at the intellectual end of the Brexit spectrum with his 'It'll be great just coz, so there' answers on #r4today 
UK looking to replicate EU's external trade deals after Brexit: PM May  
#BREAKING: Kurdish President @Masoud_Barzani reiterates that the upcoming referendum on independence will take place on scheduled time.  
Jean-Claude Juncker's office release his statement on the missing Brexit papers.  
"The leading #Brexit twitter account with 100 000followers exposed as Russian deception agent". Slowly the penny will drop with leavers  
In the space of one week, Labour has moved to sanitise "British Pakistani" rape gangs and oppose Brexit. This is the true face of Corbyn. 
Brexit has made England an increasingly "hostile and divided" nation  via @LondonEconomic 
PM visiting Japan today for first time. As I started my academic career on EU-Japan relations, here are some Brexit-related thoughts: /1 
Right, don't panic everyone. I'm off to Brussels this morning to help sort out all this Brexit business. How hard can it be? 
Jean-Claude Juncker labelled a 'poundshop Bismarck' over Brexit divorce bill demands 
Lord Harris: “Brexit will give more opportunities to young”Humprhys: “How?”LH:”I just feel it will be better”FEEL?! #r4today 
Looks like "taking back control" of trade means copying EU trade deals! Brexit overwhelming government.  
Lord Harris on #r4today: 'Brexit will be good for the UK because retailers like me can make people work more than 35 hours a week'. WTFF? 
Glad that I previously sacked three ministers who had the effrontary to support my new #brexit policy 
Lord Harris on #R4Today:'Brexit is best for young people''Why?''Well, at the moment I can only make people work 35 hours a week...' 
Plus, no one seems to be mentioning £315m Government is wasting every week because Brexit killed our currency and increased inflation.  
So this guy's argument is that he wants to be free to squeeze more hours out of his existing employees. Brexit in a nutshell #r4today 
Some British politicians are now so set on Brexit that they side automatically with UK government against common sense and our prosperity.  
Theresa May is getting a lesson in the reality of post-Brexit Britain this week on her tour of Japan (£)  
Huge questions here. Not least for @Twitter. But also British gov't. Mounting evidence of Russian influence in Brexit. Wheres our Mueller? 
No wonder people were misled on #Brexit when there's full time Russian Trolls pushing it  
The way the pound is going, we may as well call off Brexit and join the Euro to try and salvage the economy. 
Analytical Report: Referendum in #Crimea was held legitimately and should be recognized by foreign states -  
How Brexit could endanger Britain's supply of fresh food  
Backing Labour is giving Corbyn his mandate for his Brexit. Corbyn Brexit and May Brexit are the same Brexit. There can only be No Brexit.  
You know you have a problem when the Trump administration thinks you're a joke. #brexit  
Each time Jean-Claude Juncker attacks Britain on Brexit he reminds us why we're leaving: he's an arrogant unelected oaf 
The penny is dropping - we were sold a Brexit pup! How can it be wrong to have second thoughts?  
TRADE TRANSITION: Britain hopes to simply copy and paste dozens of EU trade deals after Brexit - PM:   
Excellent news. EU27 should adopt exactly same approach. Brexit liars alone caused this mess; let them lie in it  
about those #brexit negotiations ...#DavidDavis #MayDUP #StopBrexit #EUref #Remain #Brexitshambles #EU #Tories #StopBrexitHour 
Up next on #r4today: Sir John Bell launches an industrial strategy designed to build on the UK's lead in the life sciences post Brexit  
Co-founder Labour Against Brexit joins Lib Dems  via @markpack 
UK Brexit charm offensive falls flat – POLITICO  
"Posing as a UKIP supporter". POSING? The appalling, sad reality of UKIP and #brexit. Dancing to the Kremlin's tune. 
We always had sovereignty. Immigration figures were out by 96%. NHS won't get 350M a week. Brexit built on lies has no mandate #StopBrexit 
Who's an acknowledged expert & good talker on the Russian troll bots shilling Trump & Brexit? 
Oh dear, oh dearIt's official: the majority of people think Theresa May's Brexit is 'bad' for us 
Brexit Is Beginning to Look Like No Brexit - Bloomberg  
'Starmer is prevaricating to give people time to see the folly of Brexit and change their minds'. Sadly those people are Corbyn & McDonnell. 
.@thetimes: Twitter account popular among UKIP, Brexit & EDL supporters is a Russian troll, investigation shows 
Why haven't the A team stepped in on this? Brexit is home for the B listers and no hopers.  
The likes of Jean Claude Juncker is the epitome of why so many Britons chose to leave EU; he typifies the arrogance that fuelled Brexit.  
Britain asks EU for more Brexit negotiating sessions as reality sinks in  
Sadly, backing Labour at the moment is not going to stop Brexit, at least not while Corbyn leads.  
Japanese diplomat in London told @GMB there'll be no early trade talks with Brexit Britain. I'm discussing in a mo Theresa May's doomed trip 
#R4Today refers to DavidJo52951945 as widely retweeted suspected troll pushing Kremlin talking points eg Ukraine. NO MENTION OF BREXIT! ffs  
Oh no your are not, John. Labour have stuck two fingers up to the people who voted #Brexit. You lot are a disgrace.  
'DIRTY TRICKS'EU’s crack team of negotiators use social media snipes to ‘undermine UK’s Brexit deal’  
UK in a bizarre place w Remain PM pursuing hard Brexit & Brexit leader of Remain Opposition actively helping her @vincecable #exitfrombrexit 
Am I the only one who has moved beyond anger to utter contempt with #Brexit traitors Corbyn Abbott, Starmer & Labour  
May heads to Japan aiming to allay #Brexit fears, however, Japan confirms it's deal is with EU, not UK.  
Never forget: the whole Brexit process is about finding solutions to problems that DID NOT EXIST before the Brexit process. 
#Catalonia  Army - President calls for independent force ahead of Spain referendum  
#Leaver tells me falling pound and higher food import prices will be corrected when UK stops subsidising EU imports, post #Brexit  
Even upon his return Buhari was still mocking Nigerians in the UK because of Brexit. A man who only left England because of angry protests? 
A "nightmare scenario" for Brexit has been spelled out by a giant pension fund  
Theresa May to begin official Japan visit as she seeks to drum up trade and allay Brexit concerns:  
Brexit is beginning to look like no Brexit  via @BV 
I propose a referendum that forces all elected officials to agree on a pronunciation of "antifa" before they're allowed to write or say it 
Brexit border controls risk gaps on the shelves, warns the retail industry  #StopBrexit #Brexit #brexitshambles 
More than 70% of Britons would REJECT Brexit bill of £30billion or more, new poll finds  
Brexit is causing big headaches for UK automakers  
May is off to Japan today to try and sell Brexit Britain. But the Japanese couldn't be clearer, for their interest and ours, stay in the EU!  
Brexit risks creating care homes skills crisis as nurses head home, warns new research | The Independent  
Hello spam and tinned peaches: is Britain facing a Brexit food crisis?  
.@JoStevensLabour is absolutely right. We must stay in Single Market and CU and prevent a catastrophic hard #Brexit  
Today marks 18 years since Timor Leste overwhelmingly rejected Indonesian rule in national referendum sparking violence. 
With an indepdendence referendum coming up, Iraqi Kurds are waiting for more U.S. military aid, @paulmcleary reports 
Co-founder Labour Against Brexit joins Lib Dems  
It's not that he doesn't know what will happen after Brexit that's frightening. No one is certain. It's that he doesn't know what it is.  
Dunkirk 2.0: #Merkel slaps UK with hefty #Brexit bill in another effort to break the Brits (Op-Edge by @MartinRJay) 
He's just stamping his little foot because his #brexit toy is being taken away. Ah diddums! #boot #on #other #foot #pot #kettle #black 
*Brexit Explained*  
Rejection of BREXIT is positive. We then need to tackle reasons why we arrived at this point & eliminate them.  
Theresa May seeks to allay Brexit concerns during Japan visit  
All of the #Brexit-related problems are to do with Brexit. None is to do with the EU. Bottom line: Brexit, not the EU, is THE problem. 
Need a national referendum on term limits NOW! Start petitions and bypass politicians? 
Reject it. I would demand a referendum on it! It should be us the British people who decides on any divorce bill.  
Why do we want to lose the right to work and live in European countries?#Brexit will diminish our lives.A second referendum offers hope. 
#Brexit thread (I know, I know, but this is really good!)  
More than 70% of Britons would REJECT Brexit bill of £30billion or more, new poll finds. No legal reason to pay.it  . 
How many tsk-tsked at the chaos of the Arab Spring? The protests/riots in Paris? Venezuela? Brexit?We have tempted fate.  
Dear @theresa_may are you paying attention? RT EU Brexit chief tells Britain to "start negotiating seriously" in fre… 
Actually this was a second referendum on the issue. No reason we can't have a third.  
Vote Leave ever advocated leaving the single market. The campaign was high jacked by a minority of Brexit extremists. Time to #StopBrexit 
#Brexit is going EXACTLY as I had imagined. Shambolically...  
JUST IN!!! UN TO STORM NIGERIA FOR BIAFRA REFERENDUM FOLLOWING AREWA QUIT NOTICE TO IGBOS.  
Yep the independence referendum sure did that.  
Gunster, US strategist on BREXIT, to help GOP 2018 election My Q: will Cambridge Analytica help too? via @voxdotcom 
Stop misdirecting and take responsibility for the wretched, deceit strewn omnishambles known as Brexit that you fooled people into backing.  
Co-founder Labour Against Brexit joins Lib Dems  
UK Parliament must hold the same debate the EU plans for October. Has sufficient progress been made? If not, should Brexit be continued?  
#Labour must do more, it must withdraw its support of #Brexit  
I would just keep yr head down Jonathan, Brexit happened because of the emotionally unintelligent hyper-liberalism of officials like you  
WATCH: Wetherspoon’s boss Tim Martin DESTROYS every Remoaner in one interview  via @Your Brexit 
Brexit: over 70% of people find a divorce bill of £30 billion unacceptable  
Theresa May is taking 15 executives with her to Japan to 'prepare the ground' for a post-Brexit trade deal  
That stupid referendum lost Britain respect throughout Europe. Now we're losing more due to the crass incompetence of UK negotiation team!! 
Augustinian approach to Brexit: "Take back control, but not yet". Note: it took Augustine at least 15 years....  
Jean-Claude Juncker says none of UK Government's papers on Brexit satisfactory, reports @PaulBrandITV  
Brexit transition deal 'could face legal challenge or be shot down by German parliament', Government warned #premium 
Yes. I really want Brexit to fail and I do automatically side with the EU against right-wing extremists such as you and the Tories.  
May heads to Japan aiming to allay Brexit fears and lay basis for trade deal  
The new consensus on a Brexit transition in May's Cabinet - the definitive guide @GeorgeWParker  via @FT 
Brexit: playing chicken - never try this with Brussels ...  #Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn is plotting to 'wreck' Brexit with continued membership of the Single Market, Frank Field MP warns  
My cartoon - #EU demands that Britain ‘start negotiating seriously’ over #Brexit#Barnier#BBC1news 
UK demands more imagination & flexibility from EU27 in Brexit process. Does UK truly believe this is how internat. treaty negotiations work? 
Sooner or later the UK Brexit team will realise that they're attempting to negotiate with programmed robotic humanoids who aren't flexible. 
"The idea that somehow the British people were misinformed about Brexit is absolute nonsense" ~ IDS  
Back in January, I punted devolution to return by Christmas of this year, at this stage we'd be lucky to get back this side of Brexit. 
As I'm holiday, I decided to write the fourth post in my super popular series on Brexit and rules of origin. Enjoy:  
How the EU uses dirty tricks on social media to wage Brexit war on Britain   
How did it go from 'Hard Brexit' to a transitional deal? 'Everything has changed since the general election'  
A brilliant thread by @EmporersNewC  dedicated to you Leavers#brexit  
In the space of one week, Labour has moved to sanitise "British Pakistani" rape gangs and oppose Brexit. This is the true face of Corbyn 
EXCLUSIVE: Alastair Campbell urges students to take action on Brexit  via @themancunion #StopBrexitManchester 
Co-founder Labour Against Brexit joins Lib Dems  
That's why being at the mercy of the HO post-Brexit is not good news for 3m EU nationals in UK as @The3Million & @BritishInEurope said 
Why Brexit may not mean Brexit after all  
Busy but successful two days in Aberdeen, here are a few thoughts about my time here. Thanks to @oilandgasuk @SCDINews @AGCCevents #Brexit  
1/2 Tomorrow on #r4today: Sir John Bell launches an industrial strategy to keep the UK at the heart of the life sciences sector post Brexit 
All very odd.I was under the distinct impression that this little smarmy pipsqueak was desperate for Brexit to fail.#ImBackingBigBozza 
'Orders Brexit' - remainers' contempt for the voters and their ability to think for themselves is so palpable now  
Campaign for Jacob Rees-Mogg to become PM in 2019 SURGES  via @Your Brexit 
UK pushes for more frequent #Brexit meetings as Juncker asks the UK to just tell the EU what it actually wants. 
Brilliant. Hate Brexit, hate prejudice, hate political ideologies, fucking LOVE people, from all over the world. Thank you, thank you!  
Juncker blasts Britain for 'huge' unanswered Brexit questions  
Great thread on how #Brexiters so often think it's someone else's job to find solutions to probs #Brexit causes. Starts at top, with gov't.  
Chocolate as a case study of Brexit risks. Key issue, as many have been saying for months/years, isn't tariffs it's non-tariff barriers.  
McDonnell: Single Market Membership Not Respecting Referendum  
#Brexit is breaking and only when it’s broken can we start to re-build #Britain and get our country back. Editorial:  
New Bake Off is like Brexit - I don't agree with it but I'm just going along with it anyway #GBBO 
Co-founder Labour Against Brexit joins Lib Dems  
Read this and cry for our once wonderful nation now disfigured by Brexit venom  
AN AD BREAK DURING #GBBO WHAT FRESH HELL IS THIS BLOODY BREXIT TRUMP MILLENNIAL SNOWFLAKE BULLSHI 
I think I may start supporting Brexit. Not because I want the UK to leave the EU, but because the EU doesn’t deserve the idiots of the UK.  
Thread. Come on Brexiteers, step up, own your Brexit. You did this, tell us how you'll fix it. Don't dare try just hide behind xenophobia.  
We need a referendum. #GBBO 
‘Nigel Farage could come back’ Labour MP warns of Ukip revival after Corbyn Brexit U-turn  
After Brexit and the US election, we’re assuming nothing. #GBBO 
BREAKING: Brexit talks STALL as EU steps up financial DEMANDS making way for a ‘No Deal’ scenario  via @Your Brexit 
OUTRAGE as Journalist imprisoned for criticising ISLAM  via @Your BrexitTHIS NEEDS TO BE SHARED 
If we didn’t have right-wing, pro-Brexit newspapers constantly lying & blaming EU, Brexit would die a quick death. 
I don't want Britain to fail, but considering the tone of the campaign it would be actively weird if I didn't still want Brexit to fail  
Another benefit of Brexit seen 5 years ago in Antifragile  
The only way to stop Remainers moaning about Brexit is to quit your jobs and do the things you said would be done. 
This is happening, Leavers, you won, and now all those simple solutions proposed have to be implemented to make Brexit a success. 
If you’re one of those Brexit academics, you need to be looking at how the UK adequately replaces Horizon 
.@JamesCleverly: Japan does more and more business with Britain, and that will only continue after Brexit  
Kurdish oil center Kerkuk to vote in Kurdish independence referendum. Centuries long Arabization project is dead now 
Revealed: How EU uses 'dirty tricks' on social media to wage Brexit war on Britain #premium 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
You're a wrecker and a looter whose business is making Britain fail. No doubt  making another killing on sterling's latest #brexit fall.  
This discussion today between German & French Ambassadors on Brexit is brutal about the illusions of UK position.     
.@Nigel_Farage is getting fed up with the EU treating Britain like a “hostage” during the Brexit talks  
May called election so UK could show it was strongly behind her. It showed it wasn't. Now she wants to 'see thru Brexit.' She's no mandate. 
All we want is:- Brexit to fail- Britain to succeed- You to shut the fuck up- Pancakes  
The producers of The Great British Bake Off are the only people in the UK experienced & trusted enough to take charge of Brexit negotiations 
No other modern Nation is attempting to go back 45 years in time. Brexit Britain is doing just that.  
If 51.9% voted in referendum on firing Trident at North Korea wld labour say respect democracy? Polling for Iraq was 76% &JC went against!  
Behind every shady character lies a whopping great bank account. #Brexit @UKLabour 
#Brexit ain't going to happen. It's a complete waste of time and energy. Please #Remain Think positively and we will #Remain 
Man To Move £180 Million Business To Spain Because Of Brexit - LBC  
Sorry, what? UK will still have the Director of Europol after Brexit and a seat on the Management Board? With an extra seat for our unicorn?  
Boris Johnson has gone from poster boy for Brexit to national liability - @ThomasBrake 
Nope. We just want Brexit to fail. And it will, Herr Farage. 
#airports in panic about massive post-#Brexit #BrexitShambles : 
The Hospitality industry’s Brexit concerns ‘are echoed by food and drink sector’  
Just met with @MichelBarnier. I urge the UK to move forward on #Brexit: citizens on both sides of the Channel need us to deliver.  
WATCH | @MichelleDewbs blasts money-grabbing EU leaders for their arrogant refusal to discuss future trade before 'Brexit bill' is settled.  
'Brexit causing crisis in hiring bar and restaurant workers in London'  
Hello spam and tinned peaches: is Britain facing a Brexit food crisis?  
Stark warning from a Labour leading light in the #Brexit campaign.  
How EU uses 'dirty tricks' on social media to wage Brexit war on Britain  
So confident that Brexit will be a rip roaring success, Nigel begins compiling a list of scapegoats to cower behind when it all goes wrong.  
'What's he on about?' British negotiators puzzled by Juncker's bizarre Brexit papers rant  
You confuse "Britain" with "Brexit". Brexit failing will be the best thing to happen to Britain this decade. 
'There could be a revived Ukip' Labour MPs warn Brexit u-turn could spark Farage return  
How @Keir_Starmer's new policy could force Theresa May's Brexit to unravel: me for @IndyVoices yesterday 
Pound falls to eight-year low against the euro, Aren't the Tories doing briliiant with #brexit  
Behind the scenesBig businesses and banks are dominating the Brexit process in secret meetings 
Politicians start doing what you have been elected for Or Clear off 
Labour's plan for Brexit 'could mean we never really quit EU'  
Japan does more and more business with Britain, and that will only continue after Brexit - @JamesCleverly #premium 
MUPPET: Labour MP claims Brexit should be negotiated by "sensible women" not "macho males". #EveryDaySexism 
'Respecting the referendum result means passing all this off as just normal. It is not normal.'  
MEP @M_AndersonSF updates group of Socialist Party senators from The Netherlands on #Brexit, Ireland & the growth of Sinn Féin#EP 
"Hard Brexit" is usually just the name given to Brexit by Remainers and "soft Brexit" their euphemism for never leaving the EU.  
Lack of skilled EU workers 'could choke UK growth post-Brexit'  
May ally: we supported EU-Jap deal so UK-Jap deal on same terms makes sense. Breathtaking naivety: has ally not heard 'Brexit means Brexit'?  
Juncker blasts Britain for 'huge' unanswered Brexit questions  
Dear Moderate Brexiters,I’m sure there are many who now feel like this caller. Your country needs you to help reverse this Brexit madness.  
People think Brexit will leave UK worse off in everything, but with less immigrantsThat's Brexiteers' dirty little asset—sheer xenophobia pic.twitter.com/JPv1tP3lcd 
Another great thread from one of the best Brexit #follows on Twitter. 
Stop applying Logic to the Brexit discussion. Brexiters want out on a primal level, nothing to do with logic and they wont change. 
Our second edition @EveningStandard as No10 appeals to other European governments to help in our Brexit negotiations ....  
The EU president just rated our Brexit papers and it is brutal  
It's almost as if having a referendum on an extremely complicated issue about which the national mood could change easily wasA BAD IDEA  
The government is doing a terrible job of managing expectations about the Brexit divorce bill.  
POLL Should only Leave voters pay for the Brexit bill? Please retweet after the vote. 
This Leaver thinks we should walk out of the Brexit talks until they are "ready to talk our lingo".  
Shipping things to the EU is simple. Brexit may change that dramatically  
Boris says Britain will now help Turkey join EU despite using prospect to help win referendum. Remember this BORIS ?  
The length period before Brexit doesn't happen is God's way of exposing xenophobes for what they are. Like looking under rocks 
Goodhart's generalisations underplay significance of racism 4 BME & immigrants. Hate crime incr by 23% 11 mnths post #Brexit @NadineElEnany 
Merkel slaps UK with hefty Brexit bill in another effort to break the Brits  
Brexit was a working-class revolt, both Conservatives and Labour are still grappling with that fact, says @GoodwinMJ  
Brexit. its all so uninspiring. 
You should read Japan's Brexit note to Britain — it's brutal  via @BIUK_Politics 
Brexit Briefing: Labour’s deft move drives Britain further towards a 'Norway option'  
Every day begins with a binary choice for the govt: reverse Brexit or continue with it. Each time they choose wrong, the losses mount up. 
Some British MEPs are making asinine tweets to deflect responsibility for their part in the shambles that is Brexit.  
No, when I married my husband in 1994, I never expected Brexit & our right to  family life being put at risk.  
The process of unwinding Brexit, by withdrawing notice under A50, would be far less difficult and damaging for the UK than not doing so. 
23% of Corbyn supporters think that supporting a catastrophic right-wing Tory Brexit will be beneficial to the poor? How peculiar.  
If a real Brexit is not delivered there will be an almighty backlash from the British people. 
These MPs, 'journalists,' tycoons & 'thought leaders' who have sold us Brexit must never blight our landscape again. We must live & learn. 
I voted Labour for a softer Brexit. Now, I might get one | Isaac Qureishi  
*Brexit Explained*  
What a Brexit fool  
Like a broken record on #Brexit: Please don't rely on the German car manufacturers for a deal. @SquawkCNBC @CNBC 
It will soon be crunch day, when the banks have decide if they are leaving or staying in Brexit Britain. Time to #StopBrexit 
Decolonising Geography #RGSIBG2017 starts with an all white male panel on #Brexit. 
Brexit unwinds over summer. Lowest € v £ rate in 20 yrs, immigration figs overstated, timeline for withdrawal impossible. Ref 2 only way out 
Davis! D- for you! Get to the back of the class!@JunckerEU says none the UK's #Brexit papers are satisfactory 
£1 is now worth €1.07, the lowest for eight years and only time below 1.10 outside 2009 crash. It was €1.40 six months before Brexit. 
.@LibDems accuse Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP of "destructive complacency" in Brexit negotiations. Party's Brexit spokesman @thomasbrake: 
Brexit lunacy has no bounds, now the suggestion that UNDERGROUND farms can replace EU food imports, SERIOUSLY???  
I may be WRONG !The way Davis & Co are handling #Brexit leads me to conclude they're angling for *no deal*Will then BLAME EU intransigence 
Jean-Claude Juncker is making #BrExit as difficult as possible to dissuade others from leaving the disastrous & corrupt anti Europe EU  
Jean-Claude Juncker says none of David Davis Brexit papers are satisfactory. Tories failing to answer timetabled questions. #BrexitShambles 
Labour heartland MPs warn of Brexit betrayal by .@Keir_Starmer 
Because this government has handled Brexit absolutely atrociously.  
German firms moving investments away from UK due to #Brexit: DIHK #StopBrexit #Remain 
Nice to see Boris Johnson lending David Davis his support as they arrive for the next round of #Brexit negotiations  
EU's Jean-Claude Juncker criticises UK's 'unsatisfactory' Brexit papers as realism sets in.  
Given the demographics of Brexit, more should be done to explain to pensioners just where their pensions come from. Economic growth. 
The problem for UK is that process and position papers is what EU Commission *does*.  UK is playing away from home in Brexit negotiations. 
EU & Jean-Claude Juncker waste of timeUK lose nothing by walking away - except 75% of our deficitNo Deal far and away Best Deal#Brexit 
David Davis replaced as Brexit negotiator by two short planks 
"Student's homework is unsatisfactory," lashed out a head teacher, according to Bloomberg today. 
If I were Theresa May I would throw in the towel, she will never see a single reform she believes in. She is a Brexit patsy nothing else 
Also: "lashing out"?Sad to see Bloomberg @brexit use such daft language. Weakness of UK documents (so far) is plain. No "lashing" needed. 
News of the #Manchester march has reached Germany!'It's only about one thing... ..."Stop Brexit."' 
The paradox of May: without Brexit she would never have been PM. But it has destroyed Mayism.  
Jean-Claude Juncker can see the UK's #Brexit papers for what they are: meandering drivel that fails to stand up to scrutiny. 
Remorseful Leave voter says Britain is a “tiny country” and will now back Labour if it means reversing Brexit  
Bring in Jacob Rees-Mogg and Nigel Farage to deal with Brexit. It will be fast, effective and we won´t be allowed to throw money away. 
McDonnell: Single Market Membership Not Respecting Referendum  
Our editorial @EveningStandard on what the last few days tell us about Brexit  
This #Brexit battle is cold, hard capitalism vs. civilised, co-operative order, writes A. C. Grayling  
the gospel is spreading like wildfire.If I were @MBuhari I will yield to the desire of a referendum by IPOB.Reality!  
The head of the European commission Jean-Claude Juncker says the UK's Brexit plan is not satisfactory  
Remember when the Pound was really strong and brexit didn't exist? Yea I miss those times 
.@M_AndersonSF slams David Davis for walking away from Brexit negotiations  
Remoaners who appear to want Britain to pay the EU an unsubstantiated Brexit bill just prove how anti British they really are. Emigrate. Ta. 
YouGov: How well /badly government doing in Brexit negotiations?Well 25%-1Badly 55%+1 
Britain 2017 with Brexit looming is peddling backwards to 1971...Memories are not made of this...#Brexit is Barmy  
The EU referendum wasn't really a vote on EU membership. It was essentially an audit of the UK's intelligence.And we failed it. 
A BREXIT JOKEAn Englishman, an Irishman and a Scotsman walk into a bar.The Englishman wants to leave, so they all have to. 
Strong & united?You've had so many policies on Brexit that Diane Abbotts head exploded counting them.  
My interview on @GMB:  about the #Brexit negotiations. We do not owe the EU anything!  
Jean-Claude Juncker: None of UK Government's papers on Brexit satisfactory 
YouGov: More people now think Brexit will leave UK worse off, with less influence, fewer jobs and worse pensions, than think the opposite.  
I'd remind John that Leave was 5 million votes short of a supermajority. How about respecting the vast majority who DIDN'T vote for Brexit?  
An interesting thread on lessons from Iraq for Brexit.  
David Davis heading back into Brexit negotiations today:  
There's nothing anti-Uk about wishing to remain in EU.brexit is an act of national suicide 
Going really brilliantly this Brexit #Sarcasm 
Back from holiday & off to Japan, but May is still in cloud cuckoo land on trade agreements:  #JEFTA #Brexit 
So need candid national conversation on where we are, how this might all end up and realistic options (before any new referendum). End 
Very worrying to watch Brexit discussions becoming political football. We need a cross-party approach in the whole national interest 
Soft Brexit is neither possible nor preferable. The UK needs a Clean Brexit, says @LiamHalligan  
Mustafi out, Jonny Evans in, BREXIT MEANS BREXIT! 
UK care homes are 'teetering on a knife edge' thanks to Brexit  
Wonder if "flexibility and imagination" will become the "strong and stable" of the Brexit negotiations. 
'Not good enough': Juncker attacks UK's approach to Brexit talks  
Labour has betrayed many of its grass-roots supporters with its U-turn on Brexit. 
As we approach the 3rd anniversary of the Scot. referendum this is a beautifully written article by @2351onthelist. 
Gary Neville’s commentary on the Brexit negotiations  
Brexit will collapse under the weight of its own internal contradictions.  
‘Nigel Farage could come back’ Labour MP warns of Ukip revival after Corbyn Brexit U-turn. Get your skates on Nigel.  
'Not good enough!' EU boss Juncker TEARS into Britain over 'unsatisfactory' Brexit stance  
It's almost as if we don't seem to know what we're doing with Brexit...."Jean-Claude Juncker" 
Juncker gives the UK’s #Brexit papers an F grade  
Labour has to be bolder on Brexit: our economy depends on it | Seb Dance  
Daniel Levy has just got Stoke to pay £18m for Kevin Wimmer. We need this man to take charge of Brexit talks immediately!  
Gained seats (against an abysmal Tory campaign) by producing a ludicrous manifesto, lying to students and playing both sides over Brexit.  
Tens of Thousands of Syrian 'Refugees' Temporarily Return Home For Religious Holiday 
We asked some anti-Brexit campaigners to pull a face that best describes Brexit. Here's the results...  
Kate Hoey: ‘Labour Betrayal Opens Way For Farage Return’ 
Compare Thatcher's view on democracy and the Rule of Law with that of the Daily Mail.#StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Head of @ucl fears UK’s world standing will slip after Brexit as a third of his staff are from other EU countries. 
JUNELabour Shadow Chancellor'Single Market membership not respecting referendum'AUGUSTIt's Labour party policy#LabourBrexitBetrayal 
Thatcher: "The late Lord Attlee was right when he said that the referendum was a device of dictators and demagogues"#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Let's remind @Nigel_Farage that even he thinks that a 52%-48% result in the EU referendum would be "unfinished business."#Brexit  
Tory Leavers should remember that Margaret Thatcher was one of the prime architects of the Single Market #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit  
Britain’s Brexit position papers are not good enough, EU president Jean-Claude Juncker says  
The pound is heading for #parity."That's a 23% #depreciation." @BloombergTVBad news for:  #pension funds.#Brexit 
Hard Brexit will only profit non-tax paying media oligarchs. bankers & billionaires. No Brexit would be best for all. #BrexitShambles 
Jean-Claude Juncker: None of the UK #brexit papers sufficient to move forward with negotiations. #BrexitShambles 
Jeremy Corbyn's 'soft Brexit' U-turn will cause Leave voters to abandon Labour and return to Ukip, - The Telegraph  
What is at stake with #Brexit ? Chief negotiator @MichelBarnier briefs EU Ambassadors 
The longer  #Brexit continues the more the #UK government will be humiliated. They don't understand that leaving has to have consequences. 
The Pound takes another sharp fall against the Euro this morning.  1.07494 at 09:20.#Brexit - working hard to make us poorer.#StopBrexit 
Please,It's NOT a 'Brexit bill' or 'divorce bill'!It's confirming the already made and existing commitments - not a single new penny! 
EU's Jean-Claude Juncker slams 'unsatisfactory' Brexit papers  
PSA: This was the ballot for the EU referendum. There is no mandate to leave the single market.  
Man To Move £180 Million Business To Spain Because Of Brexit @LBC 
How Keir Starmer’s plan could cause Theresa May’s Brexit to unravel  THOUGHTFUL ANALYSIS - WELL WORTH A READ ! 
Closer trade links between UK & US after Brexit could be derailed by loss of a series of complex US-EU agreements  
3/5...but official Leave literature said this: eg this leaflet referencing Brexit as like both Iceland (EEA) & EFTA Switzerland...  
Farage used to be for staying in the single market - now says people who want to stay in are betraying Brexit. Almost like he's a dick. 
The right to study, love, work and retire in 31 different countries..that's worth fighting for....#Brexit #StopBrexit @UKLabour 
UPDATED: As #Brexit negotiations restart, the landscape of options visualized  
If the EU genuinely wants a no-deal Brexit, that's a pity & will be disruptive for both sides, but life will go on. That's their call. 
Want to know why Brexit/Trump happened? Stop winging about 'dumb proles' and consider 35 years of this bullshit.  
Border free travel in Europe sounds like a good idea, says Brexit voter who queued for four hours in passport control 
Britain after Brexit.  
The Brexit negotiations are starting to feel like Groundhog Day  
Brexit forcing more Japanese companies to move their HQs out of UK.Not just banks, manufacturing also.Today's Financial Times:  
Juncker: None of UK govt's #Brexit papers satisfactory. Until divorce issues resolved, there will be no discussions on future UK-EU trade  
Welcome support for a 2nd referendum on Brexit from @andrew_adonis 
Jean-Claude Juncker lashes out at Britain's stance on Brexit  
McDonnell: Single Market Membership is Not Respecting Referendum  
David Davis orders EU to stop Brexit delaying tactics  
Good analysis of Brexit by Philippe Sands. Professor of law at University College London.  
As the third round of  #Brexit talks starts in Brussels, check out the Parliament's position  
A third of food firms 'unviable' without EU staff - industry #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
I made a boo boo in the Brexit book on financial services in Efta  
Mr Barnier suggested the UK would be less secure post-Brexit, which was dismissed as “risible nonsense” in Whitehall  
And I wish people like you Linda wouldn't constantly keep declaring that everyone who voted Brexit is somehow lacking knowledge or intellect  
#BREAKING: Kirkuk Provincial Council decides to join #Kurdistan Region’s upcoming referendum on independence by a majority.  
The Brexiters lies to us again when they said countries were queuing up to sign deals with post Brexit Britain. They aren't. It was all lies  
EU's Barnier scaremongers over UK's post-Brexit security and claims EU protecting external borders. Truly delusional  
Labour's latest Brexit policy looks like it could lead to an attempt to defy last year's referendum vote  
"EU..didn't initiate Brexit; it's happy for the U.K. to stay..and if it loses its vote..that'll..be a bonus"  via @bv 
#Brexit ref result was sad, but I take heart that millions of Brits recognise that their lives have been immeasurably enriched by the EU. 
Ah, bless here we go again, only the uneducated voted Brexit. Really we shouldn’t allow the plebs to vote. We should let @acgrayling decide  
I see the "Brexit for the lulz" approach hasn't been as successful as the Tories thought.  
The euro has gained 16.42 pence against sterling since the Brexit vote in June 2016, going from £0.7649 to £0.9291 - a shift of almost 21.5%  
‘Nigel Farage could come back’ Labour MP warns of Ukip revival after Corbyn Brexit U-turn  
Fintan O’Toole: Parishes of Fermanagh and Tyrone are unravelling Brexit  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Biggest problem with Brexit's £ collapse, we're now using its 1985 value to pay 2017 prices. 
Brexit row breaks out as Britain lashes out at Michel Barnier for 'ill-judged and unhelpful' attack on UK  
The EU gives Britain's Brexit chief an ice cold warning to his face 
ICYMI: UK-US trade could be derailed by 19 lost deals after Brexit  
May is off to Japan.Hoped for trade deal.Now Japanese say no.Their priority: EU deal.#Brexit Reality  
Currency markets showing their usual confidence in Britain's Brexit negotiators this morning.  
There's a major dilemma for Britain as 80 foreign banks decide on their future after Brexit  
The next few months will be dominated by Bake-Off and Brexit (from @timesredbox email)  
FARAGE: Corbyn has buckled on Brexit. Labour hijacked by Remoaners who still want to remain inside EU!  
What use is Labour to Britain? ‘Nigel Farage could come back’ MP warns of Ukip revival after Corbyn Brexit U-turn  
Phil here has swallowed the Brexit liesPhil here believes EU only after money Phil here repeatedly ignores what Barnier said  
So what you are saying is that the referendum was bogus, because most voters had no idea of what they were voting on? 
Britain is being made a laughing stock by Tory incompetence and referendum that divided a nation. It's time to #StopBrexit 
Britain receives a firm rebuke from the EU - plus Tuesday's other Brexit headlines  
EU is increasingly losing its patience with Britain as Brexit talks continue  
Soft Brexit could be attractive for Tories - Theresa May's Hard-Brexit policy could get voted against. Theresa's #BrexitShambles continues.. 
A "nightmare scenario" for Brexit has been spelled out by a giant pension fund  
So the same companies who warned they'd leave after Indy, are now leaving anyway under Brexit...UKOK ! 
Labour Remainers Call For Permanent Transition to Reverse Brexit:  
Labour's Brexit BetrayalAmidst rising anger, Jeremy Corbyn clarifies his position on the Single Market, the Customs Union and the ECJ ...  
Frankfurt is winning the battle for Brexit spoils - BBC NewsThe #Brexit dividends just keeps giving....to the EU  
I love another brexit success story. Everywhere you look another 2 from today   
Here's one reason why #Remainers will not sit back and "accept the result".  #BorisJohnson #NigelFarage #Brexit #brexitshambles #StopBrexit 
SHOWDOWN: Catalan parties step up referendum planning in clash with Madrid... 
Very good thread about the failure of journalists to hold politicians to account in the crazy #Brexit era.   
Major world economies want to do trade deals with the EU. We leave, we lose existing and future trading relationships. Brexit reality.  
Right now we have trade deals (via EU) with 79 countries. Brexit will reduce that to zero. It'll take to 2040 to get back to square one. 
Brexit Is Beginning to Look Like No Brexit - Bloomberg  
A million skilled workers plan to leave the UK after Brexit  
Brexit is a tax Dodge for the rich.  
. @Kevin_Maguire tells @GMB that Labour "has had more positions than the Kama Sutra" on Brexit 
Fintan O’Toole: Parishes of Fermanagh and Tyrone are unravelling Brexitvia @IrishTimes 
Theresa May is moving too slowly to strike a short-term Brexit deal  via @BV 
More great Brexit news... for Frankfurt!  
Labour ready to take 'a political hit' over change to Brexit stance  
Morning. @josephmdurso has a Brexit stat for you: Article 50 was triggered 154 days ago and the window closes in 579 days. 
#FreeKurdistanWith Referendum Approaching, Kurds Wait for More U.S. Military Aid  
64. Mensch despises immigrants, refugees, Muslims. She is Transphobic. She was an avid spox for the anti-globalist Brexit movement.  
Seems to be a very good way of making it a referendum on Trump. By running basically Trumpish agst a generally moderate well- liked Dem.  
The combination of Brexit and Jeremy Corbyn could lead to an exodus of capital and talent from Britain  
No change to s 44 can occur without a referendum. Labor is not hiding anything. #coalition clutching at hot air   #laborgo #auspol 
No they don't - we've decided to change the rules not them. Time for a second referendum to stop the criminal waste of money that is Brexit 
New post: Graeme Dinwoodie & @RochelleDreyfu2 on Brexit & IP  
It doesn't matter if it takes 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6 yrs, Brexit will fuck up my country. I don't want a Tory or a Corbyn Brexit, I want No Brexit. 
Lack of skilled EU workers 'could choke UK growth post-Brexit'  
Brexit means No Brexit  
"Many of Europe's largest financial institutions already announced intention to relocate.Massive Brexit-own-goal.  
Time for UK to withdraw Article 50 notification, why not, government hasn't a clue and official opposition swaying in the wind?Stop Brexit  
With an indepdendence referendum coming up, Iraqi Kurds are waiting for more U.S. military aid, @paulmcleary reports 
Brexit is beginning to look like no Brexit  via @bv 
Anyone who campaigned online in UK's EU referendum knows Russia used same method as during US 2016 election- but our media silent. Shameful.  
The Cavs, Kevin Kelley, Armond Budish, and Marcia Fudge (so far) have all blamed public/signees of referendum petition for Q deal death. 1/2 
Bet the Mail won't show this ,even if it does show up the Labour party! 
You want a referendum? You’ll get a referendum. This time it’ll be for 10x the public financing Cavs asked for - this time for a new arena. 
Read @paulmcleary on Kurdish fighters waiting on more U.S. military aid while holding a controversial referendum  
Comments on today's UK government Brexit papers - shocked, shocked that they are so vague  
How Brexit is quietly killing science >>  
1/10/17:10am: Welcome (@No10Vigil, @Mcr4EU, @NW4EU)11am: Rally/march (us)2-6pm: Street party (as 10am)& then obv.6.01pm: Brexit stops  
"The UK needs to take #Brexit negotiations seriously" according to #EUBut that's not possible.BREXIT = 1 big jokeexcept i'm not laughing  
This was one of the arguments against Brexit: it makes the UK more dependent on the EU than ever (ironically). 
Old Nan: have you heard of ice zombies, dragons, direwolves?Bran: have you heard of Trump and Brexit?(Pause.)Old Nan: tell me more. 
Now all too clear - PM May triggered Brexit before she knew what kind of Brexit she wanted. Oops. | via @telegraph 
UK-US trade could be derailed by 19 lost deals after Brexit, say MPs  
Tories are making a right mess of Brexit and they blame the EU's chief negotiator.  
Maugham was behind #Brexit legal challenge. He failed to stop Article 50 being enshrined into British law. He should accept democracy now. 
The Tories will damage the UK economy, deny its citizens freedom of movement, all in pursuit of a UKIP driven #Brexit Second referendum... 
Here are some useful images to use when Leavers claim #Brexit is patriotic.#StopBrexit #Remain /1 
Good exchange with #French CG in #Kurdistan on bilateral ties, areas of cooperation, #Erbil- #Baghdad dialogue #Referendum & the way forward  
A million skilled workers plan to leave the UK after Brexit  
Almost all of our Brexit demands can be fulfilled by virtue of the EEA Agreement. 
SPAIN IN CRISIS: Catalonia vows to hold independence referendum against PM's wishes  
Brexit, an unnecessary, expensive, risky, unyielding, unpleasant, unhelpful, distraction from all that truly matters  
Game is on. Publication of #Catalonia's transitory law makes the 'yes' option in the referendum binding and credible  
Statement by German Chamber of Commerce regarding Brexit: 'Many of our members are already shifting investments away from the UK'  
Morten Morland on Brexit and Toxic fumes over Eastbourne  – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Nigel Farage previously praised Jeremy Corbyn for his stance on Brexit… not any more  
Tories continue to play games over Brexit negotiations, putting own party political interests above interests of UK 
Tomorrow @ScotNational Groundhog day: EU slams UK over lack of clarity - EU’s chief Brexit negotiator calls on Davis AGAIN to end ambiguity  
Foregone conclusion but Q transformation officially dead now as Cavs lay PR guilt trip on "referendum" (their scare quotes, not mine)  
Replies to this tweet are wild, including someone spectacularly missing a joke and Michael White dragging Liam for lack of clarity on Brexit  
Catalan parties step up referendum planning in clash with Madrid  
"Japanese hold back on trade talks"-@FT.Very bad and very worrying  news.#Brexitshambles#Brexitpic-@Hendopolis 
Off we go whizzing to all those amazing post Brexit trade deals that being in the EU stopped us from doing....  
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
Labour's new #Brexit policy: Same old Labour, New Danger. #BetterOffOut 
3 new UK Brexit papers1 atomic contracts 2 atomic waste 3 immunity  
Jeremy Corbyn's 'soft Brexit' U-turn will cause Leave voters to abandon Labour and return to Ukip, MP warns  viahnews 
OUTRAGE as Journalist imprisoned for criticising ISLAM  via @Your Brexit 
If D Davis agrees 'exit bill,' Right go mad. If he doesn't, no trade talks. This is where Brexit falls apart  via @FT 
Is David Davis doing a good job of negotiating the UK's exit from the EU? #brexit @DavidDavisMP RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Heseltine on Brexit: 'We will get a deal which is worse than what we've got, and that is our f…  via @wordpressdotcom 
POLL: Should Remainers support or oppose Labour's policy shift on #Brexit? Please RT for large sample of Remainers. 
I hate @Brexit 
Get the best analysis of the #Brexit mess on the new #Remainiacs podcast with @IanDunt @pimlicat @Dorianlynskey 
How Keir Starmer’s plan could cause Theresa May’s Brexit to unravel  
Before I wrote this book, I sent seventy pages of evidence on Russian involvement in Trump and Brexit to the FBI. 
With an indepdendence referendum coming up, Iraqi Kurds are waiting for more U.S. military aid, @paulmcleary reports 
"EU nationals quitting Britain; hospitality/ construction/ universities hit"@Brexit#Brexiteers- #winning#Brexodus 
The EU Internal Market (its treaties never once refer to it as a 'Single Market') is inward-gazing. Brexit is about the UK looking outward. 
Japan to tell Theresa May to end 'sense of crisis' around Brexit during Prime Minister's trade trip  
EU chief Michel Barnier warns UK security will suffer Brexit ‘consequences’ That is more or less what Hitler said in 1939. 
i quite like owen jones but get the feeling that if labour's brexit policy was to paint all dogs purple he'd find a way to get behind it 
Of course not all Brexit voters are stay-at-homes, but many are, hence their disinterest in EU Freedom of Movement. 
Holy crap. This Saatchi and Saatchi describes why poor people vote Tory - but it's an even better description of the delusional Brexit vote.  
#Brexit, a bizarre mix of fantasies of a buccaneering 'Global Britain' and stay-at-home voters unwilling to leave their home town.#Remain 
The Brexit exodus has begun: European workers have started to leave Britain  
Shocking how seldom the question of Freedom of Movement is couched in terms of the loss of our Right to live & work in 31 countries.#Brexit 
Katie Hopkins SAVAGES Sadiq Khan over Buckingham ‘terror incident’  via @Your Brexit 
BREAKING NEWS: the Labour Party LIED over Brexit to get votes in Gen Election. The extreme left wing party will NOT stop Immigration ! Liars 
I do care. Like you Liam, I'm a patriot who cares deeply.  That's why we need a second referendum once the exit...  
EU demands that Britain ‘start negotiating seriously’ over Brexit  via @FT 
Labour's new Brexit policy offers no certainty or clarity – just more muddle - @MrTCHarris #premium 
Brexit and a shaky economy may stall London's property prices for years, economists say  
Brexit negotiations need a good script editor. Unclear what some of the characters want, narrative episodic and repetitive, tone messy. 
The UK's would be Churchills and Palmerstons get to Brexit talks and go all Frank Spencer. Tory foreign policy: shit + embarrassing pic.twitter.com/gLBwDKW66F 
Catalan parties step up referendum planning in clash with Madrid  
.@Nigel_Farage says Jeremy Corbyn has “devalued himself” with latest shift on Brexit  #FarageOnLBC 
Catalonia Steps Up Legal Preparations For Referendum#Catalonia #Referendum #Spain 
For graduates with a masters in finance, the UK remains their top destination despite Brexit, according to FT data  
Did he just threaten us with Terrorism? BREXIT THREAT:   
Brexit is beginning to look like no Brexit  via @BV 
Some Leavers need a reminder. It is a democratic right to campaign against any policy, however that policy was arrived at. #Remain #Brexit 
Erm, some of us worked that out a few years ago, long before the referendum. Maastricht and Major might jog a historical memory.  
Martin Rowson on David Davis and Brexit talks – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
I am not aware of any other site which puts together all the official documents on the Brexit negotiations in one place.  Enjoy... 
As the Third Round of the Brexit negotiations get underway, here is my fully linked resource page on UK and EU positions.  
Disgusted at Labour's U-Turn Which Is Designed To Do One thing - Inflict As Much Damage As Possible On Our Brexit Team And Public Confidence 
Remain wins 52%. Farage says it's only an advisory referendum, only 37% of eligible voters voted Remain, we need 2nd ref. What would you say 
The UK is supplicant-has served notice to leave. EU27 wants exit terms sorted before a trade deal.What's so hard to understand?#Brexit  
The EU says it's time for the UK to 'start negotiating seriously' on Brexit  
Michel Barnier 'concerned' about Brexit talks progress  
Statement from the Elysée on allegations in UK press about Brexit talks:  
Government has to up its game on Brexit – Adams  
As 90% now believe #Brexit to be prohibitively damaging to the UK economy, when will it be halted, and #A50 withdrawn, by our UK Parliament? 
It shouldn't need saying but the EU didn't ask the UK to Brexit, negotiation failures are caused by lack of UK Government planning. 
#BBCPM I keep hearing that #Labour have changed their mind over #brexit. They haven't. So-called soft brexit was in the election manifesto.  
#Brexit  Theresa May is not capable of standing up to the globalist EU. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg the UK needs you  
The idea that there has been a 'Brexodus' since the referendum is a myth - @sundersays 
EU chief diplomat Michel Barnier 'concerned' over Brexit talks and tells Britain to 'start negotiating seriously'  
He LIED about:#BrexitSingle MarketTuition FeesIRA supportTrain seatsNo one believes #ConmanCorbyn anymore. 
What is happening in Biafra to the Igbo (Jews) & other tribes is utterly abhorrent. Give them their referendum (off topic apols!)  
How can the government be forced to release those #Brexit impact studies they are suppressing? There must be a way surely? 
'I don't recognise my country anymore': British citizens leaving UK because of Brexit amid exodus of Europeans  
Hi it's lovely to be back on Twitter. I've had to take a few days off. Glad that Labour is changing its position on Brexit. At last. 
No Isabel, it's a responsible Brexit that puts jobs 1st with adequate transition arrangements. Still leaving single market just not rushing  
From the archives: Almost half of UK investment banks say they plan to move jobs out of the country due to Brexit.  
Jeremy Corbyn: Those who support ISIS should NOT be prosecuted - it's a 'political view' 
YOU MUST PAY! EU's Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt THREATENS UK over divorce bill  Never good to threaten Brit voters! 
Find out more about the important contribution our fellow EU citizens make to Scottish society, as #Brexit negotiations continue.  
Brexiters claim that other countries do well outside the EU, but which are comparable with Britain? #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit /1 
Anyone who thinks a Trump trade deal will save the UK from Brexit should read this- Trump agenda clear  
Remainers are trying to use the election result to block Brexit. Our vote to Leave must be respected →  
Third round of Brexit talks in Brussels starts with a stern warning by the EU: serious negotiations now needed.  
Jeremy Corbyn's 'soft Brexit' U-turn will cause Leave voters to abandon Labour and return to Ukip, MP warns #premium 
The EU just gave Britain's Brexit chief an ice cold warning to his face 
EU Chief on Brexit: 'To be honest I am concerned'  
It is a mistake to assume that LAB leave voters FEEL as strongly about Brexit as CON ones  via @MSmithsonPB 
#Brexit - 3rd round of negotiations just started. @MichelBarnier : "We must start negotiating seriously. We need UK papers that are clear" 
EU's Brexit chief: UK must start negotiating seriously  
BREAKING: European Union's chief negotiator says British positions need to be clearer to achieve progress on Brexit. 
May 'to insist on Northern Ireland border checks post-Brexit' in move likely to anger the Republic #Brexit /1 
Starting 3rd round of Brexit talks in Brussels, Michel Barnier says he is "concerned" at absence of UK position on #Brexit bill  
Barnier tells David Davis: "To be honest I’m concerned as time passes quickly... We must start negotiating seriously" #brexit 
Or, in other words from @KateHoeyMP "I want an economically damaging #brexit and am disappointed that you no longer agree "  
The SNP had to bail out Yes Scotland with £825,000 after the referendum.Of course it was a separate entity. 
‘We have a LOT to lose’ German economist's bombshell warning to Merkel over Brexit talks 
Not long in coming round Belfast - London & Brussels next stop - up & at it on your behalf - The only MEP in north against #Brexit impact  
Next time Corbyn supporters blame the chaos of Brexit on Tory factional infighting & delusional centrists, read this.  
.@UKLabour distancing themselves from the @Conservatives over #Brexit...  
No, they're just explaining Brexit. In fact, best explanation yet.  
EU citizens write to EU Brexit negotiators to say UK Home Office 'cannot be trusted', on EU citizens' rights group.   
Re-sharing my thoughts on the future of Brexit / Europe:  
Labour's new Brexit policy offers no certainty or clarity - just more muddle, says @MrTCHarris 
Hey @UKLabour If you haven't the cojones to admit you're trying to wreck #Brexit, then stop treating us like idiots by pretending you're not 
EXIT Brexit, let's get away from this burning mess that is Brexit. Our new Exit Brexit t-shirt is now available  
Labour does yet another Brexit flip-flopLabour too divided to be trusted on BrexitCorbyn too weak to stand up for Britain#LabourShambles 
Why do #Leavers moan that #Remainers want to stop #Brexit.Farage said that a 48/52 vote would be unfinished business.We agree on that! 
Brendan O'Neill on the nonsense of 'Soft Brexit'  
Senior Labour figures say Labour's new Brexit policy mean the UK could be stopped from leaving the EU altogether  
why all Labour MPs (eh grand total of 3 so far) who are backlash against anti-Brexit policy all aged over 70? 
'We owe them NOTHING!' Staunch Brexiteer @johnredwood rebukes EU attempts to force UK pay Brexit bill  
Labour's latest shift to a so called 'sifter' Brexit will turn off their Leave voters in their northern heartlands 
This. This this thisetty this. The referendum vote was invalidated the second Leave admitted their whole case was lies (ie. THE NEXT DAY).  
7) If that Brexit can't be delivered (and it can't) then surely all bets are off and we need to think again, this time with some realism 
6) A brexit that limits immigration, returns £350 M per week but has almost no financial downsides is the Brexit that was voted for 
#UpdatedFilmTitles the brexit club 
#UpdatedFilmTitlesBrexit at Tiffany's 
The 82% who voted for parties supporting a real Brexit in the general election have been betrayed.  
5) yet for some bizarre reason pushing a Brexit which creates pain, job losses, inflation that was not expected is respecting the vote? 
And my position hasn't changed since the referendum. Maybe I should call myself a eurosceptic who wants a 2nd ref and you'll make me leader 
David Davis calls for “flexibility & imagination” to break Brexit negotiation deadlock - he exhibits neither. #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Sources @Elysee dismiss reports that France pushing to open trade talks on Brexit, as unfounded and not corresponding to reality. 
French not pushing for trade talks with Britain until EU demands on citizens, Ireland and exit bill are met, according to @Elysee. #Brexit 
Nightmare on Brexit Street ICYMI. Me in today's @DailyMirror 
Sums it up. #Brexit  
Most recent poll in UK:Brexit was right: 45%Brexit was wrong: 45%Contrary to what many claim it has basically been static since the vote 
Chicken May wants to save her career by pushing Brexit through - but runaway the day after to avoid the consequences/blame. Seen on FB:  
So are you taking the principled stand for or against Brexit this week? Your stance changes every few weeks/months  
Soft Brexit is the most slippery, duplicitous phrase in the English language right now. - Brendan O'Neill of @spikedonline 
A year ago people warning of cliff edges. Transitional period always inevitable doesn't alter  UK leaving. #brexit  
Labour moving with public opinion against unexpected Brexit horrors of £devaluation, jobs haemorrhage, loss of essential workers & NHS cheat 
I would love it if this 19th Century throwback becomes Conservative party leader. They would be unelectable for a generation.#Brexit   
Jeremy Corbyn is plotting to 'wreck' Brexit with continued membership of Single Market, Labour MP warns #premium 
Counter the xenophobes. Please write to congratulate Labour MPs on the proposed shift against Tory hard Brexit  
As the next round of #Brexit negotiations start, find out more about the key role our fellow EU citizens play in Scotland's economy.  
Brexit could be the death of the Vauxhall motors manufacturing in the Britain. It's time to save British jobs. Time to #StopBrexit 
A government with 36% of the vote brought us the Brexit referendum.  
Spot on! @ChrisLeslieMP identifies the first real test of Labour's 'shift' re Brexit. Will Corbyn deliver?  
“I don’t want to go to prison, but there is nothing they can do to me that will make me stop this #referendum”  @FT 
'You FAILED, now recognise democracy' Channel 4 host scolds Quisling @vincecable over Brexit stance  
Just heard the city are selling Hard Brexit Drinkwater to Chelsea & replacing him with a Polish fella with a name like a deadly pandemic. 
UK officials arrive in Brussels to resume Brexit talks  
German firms moving investments away from UK due to Brexit: DIHK | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
As govt refuse to say what the final Commons vote will be on, or when, I can understand the drive for a referendum to ratify a deal  
Problem with Jeremy Corbyn's brand of Socialism is that it's so closely aligned with what Trump, Rees-Mogg & the hard right want on Brexit. 
Exclusive: EU could be open to Brexit climbdown over trade talks amid revolt led by France   
"Business- delighted"-@BloombergTV#Labour re: #Brexit.-a  blinder.#KeirStarmer#JeremyCorbyn#BankHolidayMonday 
W/@MichelBarnier to prepare #Brexit negotiations.#Citizensrights,Ireland& financial settlement are priorities before talks about the future 
Five things you need to know about Labour's new Brexit policy | @DanielJHannan 
If it were 'while we sort this out,' ok. But in fact it's just a (prolonging the damage) delay. Only No Brexit is acceptable.  
Waitrose in Britain post-Brexit.  
Important reminder for the #Brexit negotiations.Please, @MichelBarnier and @GuyVerhofstadt, we're 5 million people and we want to stay home 
When you voted #Brexit because you want your country back but can't afford a foreign  holiday anymore  
John Redwood on Sky spells it out re Brexit talks, says we owe them nothing & nowhere in the treaty does it say we must pay a leaving bill. 
can't read news about Brexit without hearing Mother from Alien doing the voice over... Self-destruct in T minus... 
Brexit talks resumes today.As usual there will be little or no progress.We are, after all, still stuck on point one. 
I was a fan of Corbyn during election, but his stance on Brexit and lack of knowledge on Labour's supposed heartland of Scotland, is poor. 
John Redwood: The UK can easily calculate the EU exit bill – it’s nothing!The bill is Zero. Nothing. Zilch!#Brexit 
The economy is starting to slow thanks to Brexit. It is time to stop damage and put the brakes on Brexit. #StopBrexit 
The 'Common Sense' approach is to abandon Brexit altogether. Hopefully Labour will get there eventually.  
Labour making moves to split from the Tories on Brexit & propose things that are more sensible. Puts them in command 
Theresa May & Tories represent the rich while driving rest of us into poverty. #Austerity & #Brexit are further excuses to turn the screw  
Cynical Labour does yet another Brexit flip-flop  
My FT column on why Brexit will have no impact on EU unity in the  short run and a  large impact in the long run   
Labour supporters who voted for Brexit have been deeply betrayed by their party. 
UK prepares to play hardball after EU 'massively over-egged' Brexit bill 
Struck by the extent of support for a 2nd referendum. Thinking we need to get a new national petition going for one to be held next summer 
'You didn’t see Brexit coming!' Trump ex-aide Gorka unleashes furious tirade at BBC host @bbcpaddy 
At last, Labour has wrested control of the Brexit debate from the Tories | Zoe Williams  
As #BREXIT talks resume, David Davis demands that the UK team publish a list of major concessions already won  
Instead of fussing about a bent businessman that's upset Corbyn, Labour should be asking why HSBC is determining the outcome of Brexit. 
Labour MPs warn of backlash if Jeremy Corbyn shifts Brexit stance JOHN MANN & TWO *ANONYMOUS* ! THAT'S IT !!! 
Can you believe it Nigel - the fools swallowed our bullshit!#Brexit pic.twitter.com/87Zkfvzzz2 
A million skilled workers from EU27 see future outside UK. Most professionals w PhDs planning to leave due to Brexit  
Farage doesn't want Brexit because he thinks it will benefit the economy. He wants it because economic collapse gives fascism a chance. 
37 percent Labour voters & 7/10 of Labour constituencies backed #Brexit. Single Market is disguised EU membership. Corbyn has betrayed them! 
Labour's new Brexit position is sensible and significant in hung parlt. It addresses some of issues I raised here-  
Why Amsterdam may prove a better EU hub than Frankfurt or Paris for Brexit traders  
I think both Labour and the Tories are considering major changes to Scotland's power, post Brexit EU power repatriation.The Kill Indy Bill 
New post: Would Remain win a second referendum?   
Corbyn fired 3 frontbenchers voting to stay in Customs union & Single mktNow its Labour policyCorbyn: Unfit to deliver Brexit #ForTheMany 
Labour's new #Brexit policy has got Farage frothing at the gills. Come on Labour, oppose Brexit and Farage might chew his feet off. #Remain 
The only thing we care about is toSTOP #BREXITEverything else is noise 
Check our #Brexit timeline: from referendum to EU exit  
'Worst of ALL worlds' Dan Hannan SKEWERS 'childish' Labour's latest Brexit plans  
Corbyn has been Theresa May's biggest ally in pushing for a hard Brexit. Judge a party by hard actions, not words.  
'Labour knows this plan won't work.' 5 things you need to know about Labour's new Brexit policy, by @DanielJHannan 
A million skilled workers plan to leave the UK after Brexit  
It's just delaying a hard #brexit. And sapping the will to reverse Article 50. Not much to celebrate. via @FT 
Around 150 Labour seats voted for Brexit.  
No David. Brexit is a thoroughly 21st Century project.  It's about the future, not the past. Nothing old-fashioned about self-determination.  
Is Brexit Falling Apart? 
A few weeks ago, journos were asking "What's the point of UKIP after the Brexit vote?"  I think Keir Starmer just gave us the answer. 
Brexit talks resume in Brussels today. Will David Davis stay for more than an hour this time?  
Former Conservative MP Matthew Parris - would consider voting Labour following 'dramatic' Brexit shift" 
Today's Mail leader highlights that "you have to stay very wide awake to keep up with Labour's twists and turns over Brexit."  
I voted Labour - in Kensington - but only because I was helping to put in the House @emmadentcoad who sees Brexit for the disaster it is  
At last, Labour has wrested control of the Brexit debate from the Tories | Zoe Williams  
Brexit is going to be just fine. I'm hearing a huge load of experts on individual international trade deals on radio phone-ins. 
Just to remind you all: so-called 'soft Brexit' is just a prolonging of chaos, uncertainty & damage. The only sensible option: stop Brexit.  
Labour MPs Grow A Spine. Over 200 of you bullied on Brexit by a tiny minority of MPs who also kick aside unanimous conference policy? Shame pic.twitter.com/AmHnH7Tz69 
Brexit is...  
Leader of the Opposition to BrexitPlease vote if you favour one of the top three in our poll 
Once upon a time, £1 = €1 seemed unlikely. But two big banks think parity is on the way  
EU could be forced into Brexit climbdown with French diplomats determined that trade talks start on time in October  
Now we know the negative effects of Brexit of course people should be able to change their minds.  
#r4today Brexit was 'the will' of the small majority of the people that voted for it (37%). Based on misinformation & mistruths. 
NEW: Brexit simulator for BBC Model B computer!  
Brexit talks are starting again, and Britain is still arguing with itself  
The Bank of England is vindicated as Britain's economic growth deteriorates  
The reality is real working class labour voters north of London want a clean Brexit.  
This is the only message.  Wake up all political parties and cancel Brexit.  You know it makes sense!  #Stopbrexit 
British and German firms unite to call for business-friendly Brexit talks  
Brexiters are furious about £60bn size of Brexit divorce billI am furious about £60bn cost of Brexit to our economy 
Worth a reminder about the same Starmer who is actively campaigning for sabotage #Brexit.  
The real problem with Brexit talks is that UK is arguing against its own best interests with an EU who know it and regret it.  
Brexit "gloomsters" should "put a sock in it," says pub landlord Tim Martin  
#bbcbreakfast #Brexit Please,  It's not just "the rights of EU citizens in Britain" but the rights of Brits in other EU countries! 
Save the Date: @DublinCityUni #Brexit Institute inaugural event: "Which Brexit after the UK elections?" 14 Sept 2017  
Most Brits know #Brexit will damage the UK. Most of the 17m were conned and misled. Time to listen to the people.  
Brexit is only one of the urgent challenges facing Europe's leaders  
#Brexit is like wilfully smashing the teapot then looking forward to a cup of tea. #StopTheMadness #StopBrexit 
'A fraud on the British people'. Exactly. #brexit is no more democracy in action than 20m mis-sold PPI policies were normal commerce.  
Most MPs know that #Brexit will damage the UK. How can they sleep at night? #StopTheMadness #StopBrexit #DoYourJob 
baffling that none of the seven Brexit position papers put out so far by UK government address the divorce bill, an EU preliminary demand 
Labour's weak SM for transitionary period is a trap to ensure MPs vote for repeal bill so JC gets his beloved hard Brexit  
Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar is "confused and puzzled" by Britain's plans for Brexit  
EU could be open to Brexit climbdown over trade talks amid revolt led by France #premium 
Speaking as a metropolitan member of the middle class, I cannot but agree. #Brexit  
Sign up for No Brexit, not the Different Speeds to National Self-Harm of Tory and Labour both.  
Cynical Labour does yet another Brexit flip-flop via @MailOnline 
On those 50 #Brexit impact studies the #Govt keeps refusing to publish ...#StopBrexit #StopBrexitnow #DavidDavis #Brexitshambles #Tories 
Is it strange that Jeremy Corbyn didn't tweet anything yesterday about Labour's huge shift on single market market membership after Brexit? 
U.K.'s opposition Labour Party is coming off the fence over Brexit, putting pressure on Prime Minister Theresa May ? 
When the Guardian pushes the Express line on Brexit. Grim.  
Theresa May is under pressure from both the Labour Party and EU as Brexit talks resume  
David Davis urges 'flexibility' in bid to break deadlock in Brexit talks. Do you still trust the government to deliver the Brexit you want?  
The Guardian view of Labour and soft Brexit: so far, so good | Editorial  
The real problem with Brexit talks is there are hardliners on both sides | Charles Grant  
Brexit’s threat to long-term European unity  via @FT @EuroBriefing 
A million skilled workers plan to leave the UK after Brexit  
The Labour party in the UK is now arguing for a "soft Brexit". Important shift. But the details are less than clear.  
WTF is wrong with the Guardian??? It's a fuckn centrist newspaper especially on Brexit!! But hates Corbyn so much it aligns with DalyExpress pic.twitter.com/7pnREdwEXy 
My cartoon for today's @Independent (just standing in) on Labour's new soft #Brexit position for poor ol' John Bull;  
Brexit VICTORY as UK set to win on first agreement with EU despite bloc's stalling tactics  
One way to reduce the #Brexit divorce bill would be to refuse to contribute to paying @Nigel_Farage 's pension 
UK education system is more of an obstacle for high-growth companies in filling jobs than Brexit.  
Nightmare on Brexit Street - the movie  
Corbyn talking about Labour's new Brexit position  
Brexit: UK officials in Brussels for latest talks  
Absolutely devastating evisceration of the phoney case for Brexit by @iainmacwhirter 
It's a very sad referendum when the Thai food place sends cutlery for 10 people when you only ordered food for you and the wife.  
SNP demand UK government rule out "no deal" on Brexit  
But it's not soft Brexit ☞ Labour’s soft Brexit ‘solution’ would turn the Brexiters’ lies into reality | Toby Moses  
If #Brexit, #Trump and the rest of the far-right ultra-nationalists are correct then why do they need bots, propaganda & dishonest tactics? 
Labour's policy on scrapping free movement after Brexit is under fire—from radically differing wings of the party  
There is surely not one shred of evidence that Brexit will equal or improve the current wealth or health of the UK?  
Jeremy Corbyn has dashed hopes of any distinct #Brexit deal for Scotland.Hard #Brexit #ForTheMany#ScotRef 
I blame Labour almost as much as the Tories for BREXIT. Anyone taking away my citizenship and vote will have a lifelong enemy. 
Who knows what Labour believe? We believe Scotland is a modern European country & we shouldn't be dragged out of EU against our will #Brexit 
This is more interesting. Could we now enter a Labour-Tory race to be LESS suicidal on Brexit... playing Reverse Chicken?   
The Labour Party is embracing a gradual and narrow Brexit, drawing the clearest distinction yet with the Tories  
You can't trust @jeremycorbyn or @UKLabour on Brexit. They will always put Party before Country -   
Lifelong Tory who worked for Thatcher says Labour could win him over with new Brexit stance  
The referendum was invalid because the Leave campaign broke electoral law. Say this once, say it a thousand times. 
shockingly clear that Conservative government with a weakened leader and a delusional policy on Brexit is inadequate  
#UK : confirm 8,500 of 20,000 vulnerable refugees have arrived in Britain | Your Brexit #fo2eu 
The fight goes on, @campbellclaret is right. Just because @UKLabour have gone soft on Brexit doesn't mean we shouldn't fight to #StopBrexit 
Peter Schrank on Labour's shift on Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The great Brexit betrayal has become more complete.  
Labour voters were 68% Remain in the referendum as well according to John Curtis. Good move by @Keir_Starmer. #brexitwontwork 
#Labour has shown clarity & pragmatism  Tories should put national interest first..  #Brexit 
Realisation that Brexit is damaging the economy and make working people poorer? 
Lifelong Tory Matthew Parris says he would consider voting Labour following 'dramatic' Brexit shift:  
*Brexiteers trying to make Brexit work*  
A large majority of leave voters voted for a Brexit they wont get because it was impossible to get, a pack of lies to get them to vote leave 
Surely no one is fooled by labour's hypocrisy on Brexit? They could have voted against Article 50. Should've protected EU nationals too! 
The Labour Party has not just shifted leftwards, it's run by hard left zealots. This is a game changer.Support @LibDems Oppose #Brexit 
Let’s crack on with it then. If correct, it would give Brexit super-majority mandate to legitimise such destructive constitutional change.  
KH: PeaceJC: Trident RenewalKH: InternationalismJC: BrexitKH: EqualityJC: Labour leave Glasgow bill of £500m for unequal pay claims  
To this day I maintain that the producers of #bbcqt are as responsible for #Brexit & the rise of far right bullshit as Kippers & rw press. 
We've had more than a year of self-destructive Brexit lunacy now. What'd make things better 
Well, the Brexit extremist said Brexit would create jobs, but what they didn't tell us is that they would be in Germany. Time to #StopBrexit 
Lifelong Tory who worked for Thatcher says Labour could win him over with new Brexit stance  
The SNP were the only major party in #Scotland that was unequivocally pro-EU and in favour of Remain in last year’s referendum. 
Peter Mandelson explains the political and economic logic behind Labour's Brexit shift  via @FT 
#UK : Theresa May confirms plan to STAND DOWN as Prime Minister. Later! | Your Brexit #fo2eu 
One of the major difficulties facing the LP over Brexit is that it's leader couldn't wait to implement Article 50 because he believes in it 
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: "Backlash over Labour's shift to soft Brexit" #skypapers 
If anyone claims that staying in the #SingleMarket doesn't respect referendum, remind them of what prominent Leave campaigners promised :  
Rather than fight a hard Brexit I would prefer you fought Brexit hard.  
IMO Starmer & JC have played a blinder on #Brexit not only on policy but also on timing !Theresa May et al are going to feel the pressure ! 
Brexit is about the survival of the British nation!Remain = surrendering the keys of the UK to a corrupt antidemocratic imperial EU  
BBC News peddling Brexit lies again saying EU Membership restricts ability to make trade deals. The EU has more FTA's than any other block. 
Hey Chuka - so you want us to permanently remain in the Single Market and Customs union after "Brexit"? You're a fraud - delete ur account. 
‘We have a LOT to lose’ German economist's bombshell warning to Merkel over Brexit talks  
'What happened to my Brexit vote?' BBC host savages Labour for 'deciding to stay in EU'  
55% of professionals with PhDs are planning to leave because of #Brexit#StopBrexit #Remain 
I think what you're trying to do here is avoid delivering Brexit. That's neither strong nor unifying. It's a dereliction of democratic duty  
If an exodus of 10k financial services staff will create 80k jobs in Frankfurt it will destroy 80k in the UK #Brexit 
To avoid Brexit (because it's all "too difficult") Labour wants an indefinite transition period that basically amounts to Remain.  
More on that bidding war as Tories respond to Labour's move to leave them holding the Brexit Baby.  
"Dr. Liam Fox, surely one of the most inadequate polticians to hold high office since 1945." (Will Hutton speaking truth to power.) #Brexit 
The Repeal Bill is a chance to take a wrecking ball to the extreme Brexit agenda being pursued by this government.   
BREAKING: Police reveal THOUSANDS of migrants have been caught trying to reach UK on ferries  via @Your Brexit 
Alastair Campbell boasts fight to overturn Brexit is 'far from over. If this arsehole wants to be an enemy of this country, then let him. 
The only people who know less about brexit than the average person is the government. Their dishonesty is matched only by their stupidity. 
The reason why Jeremy Corbyn can't win whatever position he takes on Brexit....   
Absolutely sick and tired of the broken promises over brexit. We have been conned rotten as we are with everything else. 
Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar is "confused and puzzled" by Britain's plans for Brexit  
IMPORTANT: We must campaign to stop Parliament giving the govt power to set 'exit day': See #StopBrexit #Brexit  
Japan to seek Brexit reassurances from Theresa May | World news | The Guardian  
There are no similar "general" Brexit documents on UK side. Just two speeches, a waffly Article 50 notification, and a flimsy white paper.  
*All* the official documents on the Brexit negotiations, as the Third Round is about to commence.Sorted, and collected in one place.  
Jim Murphy one of most inspiring, dedicated people I know. Labour's  frontline poorer without him. #ThankYouJim for the 2014 referendum win. pic.twitter.com/DkUtY27pzN 
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: "May under pressure from pro-EU Tories after Labour's Brexit U-turn" #skypapers 
Young Scots who supported SNP 2014 independence referendum are abandoning SNP for Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour...  
No mystery to Brexit divisions: some care most about the efficacy of laws & policies; others about the nationality of people who make them. 
‘It’s absurd’ Remainers celebrating Labour Brexit u-turn will NOT stop Britain leaving EU  
Corbyn and Starmer are the grown-ups over #BrexitThe Tories are squabbling kids. 
'What happened to my Brexit vote?' BBC host savages Labour for 'deciding to stay in EU'  @Keir_Starmer @jeremycorbyn 
Someone built a simulator to predict Brexit negotiations.Pretty sure they nailed it.Original:  
Andy Davey on Labour's shift on Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
1. A short thread about how maddeningly bureaucratic the EU is being about the Brexit negotiations.(Remainers look away now.) 
Anybody counted what brexit cost so far i.t.o. purely administrative cost, incl. legal fees,civil service,political time, Brexit Dept. etc.?  
Any MPs Who are trying to keep us in the EU Are committing treason We've had the referendum and the people have instructed you to get us out 
Labour's new Brexit policy in a nutshell   
EU 'increasingly doubtful' #Brexit talks will move to phase 2 in October. Crash out or rushed Norway solution likely  
No amount of Enforcement by Nigerian govt' can stop restoration of Biafra until they give #IPOB a date for referendum #support #BiafraExit 
I just think it's important that the weak self justifying arguments of Brexit enablers on the Left are exposed for what they are 
With third round of Brexit negotiations about to start, have collected *all* official links in one place. Don't think this is elsewhere.  
Lifelong Tory who worked for Thatcher says Labour could win him over with new Brexit stance  #StopBrexit 
Guys this is not a referendum on the value of prayer in general. But tweeting about your prayers is objectively of no value to anyone. 
A million skilled workers plan to leave the UK after Brexit  
Labour's big Brexit initiative now feeling a bit like a Xmas present that once the fancy wrapping paper is off you realise is pretty rubbish 
Maybe Mrs May would have given Sturgeon a bit of input into Brexit,if she had shown decent manners at Bute Hse instead of the flags insult. 
Tommy Sheppard is wrong : the independence referendum should be held before the May 2021 election -  #ScotRef 
Keir Starmer's new Brexit stance is a colossal gamble  
Broad appeal of Labour’s new stance on Brexit | Letter  
Lies, nothing but lies. No policies, no stance on Brexit, just lies that he hopes will win him votes.  
On every single vote that mattered, Labour have voted against the single market and for a hard Brexit.  
Shoppers set to save £40 a week in Brexit bonanza once Britain strikes trade deals with countries outside the EU  
Our FINAL mystery guest of #salmondunleashed - a Brexit bookend w/ Minister for UK Negotiations on Scotland's Place in Europe, Mike Russell  
With a confidence and supply deal they'd have forced a referendum on proportional representation. But they duffed it so had to settle for AV 
Brexit is nothing else that pack of lies, xenophobic propaganda and self-harming nationalism. #StopBrexit 
If the UK govt leaves one, just one, of the EU's controls over the UK in place after Brexit in March 2019, there'll be all hell to pay. 
Gosh, I LOVE @SebGorka   'You didn’t see Brexit coming!'  #Trump ex-aide #Gorka unleashes furious tirade at BBC host 
Come to Brighton on 24 Sept to tell @jeremycorbyn that we don't want *ANY* Brexit!#StopBrexitHour 
A 40 minute video breaking down Brexit!? What could be better than that? Check it out:  #Brexit  
After the announcement about their Brexit policy U-turn today, Do you back Labour's new stance on staying in the single market?  
Imagine there's no Brexit. It's easy if you try...  
I'm back from Berlin. I still think Brexit shouldn't be reversed. Sorry to disappoint.  
Sigh. Almost every time #corbyn talks #Brexit and N Ireland or scotland he makes a rudimentary error, which suggests lack of understanding  
759 treaties and international agreements Britain will lose after Brexit  via @FT - Yowch. 
If Miliband had won in 2015 the UK would be president of the Council of EU & we'd be watching Ed eat Belgian Waffles. Instead we have Brexit 
Keir Starmer absolutely, clearly, and unambiguously declares war on Brexit ambiguity. Sort of.  
Brexit is destroying UK, even before it has really begun.If Tory and Lab MPs make it happen, most will be dead before the country recovers. 
Many say UK has become less friendly and is becoming something they no longer recognise.Brexit parties messed up. 
Labour's EU Policy: It's Brexit, Jim, But Not As We Know It  via @HuffPostUKPol Significant step but keep going 
I’m struggling to find words for the delusion that is the left-wing ‘case’ for Brexit. Mind-numbing stuff. 
In reality, because Brexit means Brexit, the choice is Brexit or No Brexit. I choose no Brexit, I choose  #StopBrexit 
Or, falling to certain death from 40,000 ft instead of 30,000. Best not jump at all. No Brexit is better than any Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Foreign-owned firms are twice as productive as British companies, Bank of England says  
Despite what Keir Starmer says, no one in Cabinet has objected to a Brexit transition period, says @FraserNelson. 
This woman braves scorching temperatures in Erbil in support of Kurdistan's referendum. Husniya plans to walk everyday until the Sept 25.  
Everyone clear Russia, the far-right, alt-right, political right, alternative media and Trump and Brexit are the same beast? #AlternativeWar 
WATCH: YOUNG Brexiteer blasts EU’s ‘illegal’ divorce bill  via @Your Brexit 
'You didn’t see Brexit coming!' Trump ex aide Gorka unleashes furious tirade at BBC host  
When the UK gets to read the 50 Brexit impact assessments the government are hiding... Pic via >@Jimena_1976 
IT IS THE RIGHT OF THE PEOPLE OF BIAFRA TO DECIDE THROUGH REFERENDUM SELFDETERMINATION IS A UNIVERSAL LAW @antonioguterres #BiafraReferendum 
So @UKLabour Have you finally decided you are now against #Brexit?  
This. So many of my friends see Indie stories about Brexit voters with "buyers' remorse"/"Bregret" and think it's common. It isn't.  
On Brexit, Labour and the Tories are closer than either would like to admit. My take on @Keir_Starmer's latest: 
When people talk to me about politics, Brexit or whatever   
As reality bites over the chaos of Brexit - Labour pivot. It's one small step for Labour and one giant step towards a second EU referendum.  
This is a lie. Brexit won't happen.  
There is also the excellent Brexit Negotiations Simulator available from @AngryFlatCap here! 
I think most of these people are disingenuous to be honest. The Brexit "debate" is the absolute pits.  
But it's now impossible to discuss Brexit in any rational way. The debate is full of abuse and claims of ulterior motives. Sad, really. (9/) 
Furthermore, let me make this clear. My view on Brexit is my own, no-one else's. It's stayed exactly the same since the referendum. (8/) 
Anna Soubry 'threatens to quit the party' if the tories insist on "hard" brexit.  I can't see a downside? 
Jeremy Corbyn leaves Leith links &massive crowd of 65 dispersing.no to individual brexit deals  but defeating global capitalisation do-able  
A fabulous compendium for everything you always wanted to know about the #Brexit negotiations but were too afraid to ask. Thank you!  
I see Labour's approach of respecting the outcome of the EU referendum without destroying the economy is upsetting the establishment again. 
New at @JackofKent Resource pagesBefore Article 50 notification:Brexit negotiations: 
Scotland is repeating its threat to derail the Brexit repeal Bill-lets just hope they can!...  
Theresa May can get Brexit rolling again by knocking a few EU heads together  
I can't see Brexit being other than this century's Suez. Either Britain abandons Brexit in humiliation or it perseveres to humiliation. 
A large majority of Labour voters oppose Brexit: So, as usual, the liar here is you. 
Labour should never have supported Brexit, prevarication appears an attempt to keep Remain voters onside: time to be decisive  Stop Brexit  
The @jackofkent Brexit negotiations resource page: With links to all relevant official documents etc. 
The Government can crack the EU's fragile unity if it's clearer on what it wants from Brexit, says @DiaChakravarty 
On Brexit, I hope I have to see no more @Anna_Soubry/Margaret Beckett 'I think this is awful but I'm too scared not to vote for it' nonsense 
Brexit is evolving, yes, from "probably a terrible idea" towards "ever more clearly confirmed as a terrible idea." 
The third round of the Brexit negotiations are about to start.(thread >) 
The Repeal Bill is a chance to take a wrecking ball to the extreme Brexit agenda being pursued by this government.  
Pretty sure I like Labour's new Brexit policy more than Jeremy Corbyn does. 
.@TiceRichard: “We urge the Labour Party leadership to reconsider this ill-thought out plan on Brexit"  
Correct me if I'm wrong but Labour's "new" Brexit policy is exactly the same as their old Brexit policy but with a long transistion period? 
Brexit to deliver EU jobs boom with 80,000 new positions predicted in Frankfurt—banking exodus from London 
The EU is not the enemy of the state. Time to think again on Brexit  
Brexit the Musical: in Edinburgh, I understood how farce can be more persuasive than argument  
How Brexit is quietly killing science in the UKpic.twitter.com/nWjxxlxKud 
."The proportions & specific horrors of the catastrophe that will be Brexit become clearer by the day" 
Unemployment continues to fall in Wales. How embarrassing 4 EU supporters & predictions of post referendum doom  
Right after the referendum I met Andreoulis Evangelopoulos, a prolific artist and voice of a generation sacrificed to the Moloch of bailouts 
New #Labour position on #Brexit very unclear. Is destination In or out? Transition a way of ducking choices. 
Worth repeating some reminders of how Swedes in UK contribute - as #Brexit discussions on #citizensrights continue. 
Rupert Murdoch has Theresa May & Tories in palm of his hand. Brexit profits him, & the rich/powerful,at our expense! #]MurdochOut #ToriesOut 
UK's Labour backs staying in EU's single market after Brexit  
Remember that "soft Brexit" = Remain 
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
David Davis won't budge on the Brexit divorce bill until EU officials start to talk constructively about the future  
.@Nigel_Farage Perhaps it was simply a 'mistake' like your #Brexit campaign promise of 350 million/ week to NHS?  
Brexit is folly and only the Lib Dems seem to see this. Young Brits, switch your allegiance to Lib Dem, they understand your dreams  
Oxford and Cambridge are struggling to hire talented EU academics because of Brexit  
The capacity of some Remainers to delude themselves about Corbyn's Brexit intentions is staggering. 
Amount of energy expended on antics of Trump White House & Brexit is a tragic distraction frm serious domestic & internat probs US & UK face 
#BrexitLabour should be pushing for an EXTENSION not a TRANSITION  
Brexit campaigner Gina Miller demands tougher sentence over toff's online threat  
V: "Shall we Brexit?"E: "Yes, let's Brexit."[They do not move.] 
Hugely welcome development in @UKLabour Brexit policy. SM and CU membership only solution that works for UK and Ire.  
EXTENSION vs TRANSITIONEXTENSION occurs during the talks & allows us to stop Brexit.TRANSITION occurs after the talks once we've left EU 
Farage on the EU. “Their make-believe #Brexit bill has no legal basis whatsoever and the EU knows it.”  
2 years before a Hard Brexit or 4 years before a HBThis isn't a u turn by Labour. It's simply another fudge aimed at placating Corbyn  
*Cartoon on Brexit from French paper Liberation*  
Tory Matthew Parris says he would consider voting Labour following 'dramatic' Brexit shift  
No ‘constructive ambiguity’. Labour will avoid Brexit cliff edge for UK economy  
Labour is prepared to more directly challenge the prime minister, taking a stronger stand on issues such as Brexit  
"Confused and puzzled" is the last thing Irish PM Varadkar feels about #Brexit. A formidable opponent for the UK. 
Angela Merkel says there's no debate, Britain is obliged to pay its #Brexit divorce bill  
Kurdish diaspora and friends rally for referendum in Germany  
#honestpoll Which would you prefer? Pls RT for inclusivity. Debate encouraged.#brexit #labour #conservatives #uk #greatbritain 
Corbyn should be required by the Party to agree to stop "brexit - or to stand down as leader 
Lifelong Tory who worked for Thatcher says Labour could win him over with new Brexit stance  
I CANNOT UNDERSTAND GLOBAL BRITAIN as a trade economistHow would UK start to produce NEW PRODUCTS for INDIA because of #Brexit? #stopbrexit 
Both Tories & Lab believe next election won't be about Brexit. It will be over. Both trying to avoid blame from either side. See the game. 
We're learning a useful lesson from Brexit: never again will we allow lazy incompetent egotistical amateurs to take charge of our economy. 
Labour's sudden drastic change in #Brexit stance is nothing more than a blatant shameless political ploy. They never cared about economy 
How a soft Brexit transition could lead to Britain rejoining the EU - my column from last week:  
#BrexitDon't let Corbyn pull the wool over your eyes again  
Brexit Brain Drain. :/  
Single market & customs union best options in worst of all post Brexit worlds - vital we continue to seek membership to protect UKs future.  
In their haste to ram through a hard Brexit, Conservative ministers only hearing from those with the biggest pockets  
Brexiters : we're nice, it's the Remainers who are abusiveReported a Brexiter account for threatening Umunna with death over Brexit stance 
Will never give up fighting to Remain in EU. Do not "respect" Brexit or those who are hell bent on ruining this country for decades 
Something which unites most British politicos, regardless of Brexit position, is strange belief that Brexit will "end" on March 2019. 
Not only was the Single Market *not* on the ballot paper, but polls after Brexit vote showed only 26% expected to leave SM. #Revisionism 
Of course Farage is foaming at the mouth over Labour's Brexit shift. He's always known that his madness couldn't prevail indefinitely. 
I agree with Starmer except that I favour a Brexit transitional period at least equal to the expected remaining lifetime of the solar system 
Labour has moved in the right direction, let's keep up the pressure & help put a stop to #Brexit.#StopBrexit #Remain 
DEMAND: Angela Merkel insists UK should cough up even more money and hand over Brexit bill!  
Last thing Mrs May wants is for people to know about the mega rich Brexit puppet masters she's been entertaining  
Labour plot to force UK to REMAIN in single market & customs union after Brexit  
David Davis will warn the European Commission to stop "dragging its feet" over the Brexit talks this week  
AND - #Brexit hasn't happened yet !Tory Govt floundering - out of their depth.I fear there is worse to come.  
Short piece on Labour's new(ish) Brexit stance and why it could make a big difference:  
Labour are coming out in favour of a 'soft Brexit'  
Was #Strongandstable perhaps a poor choice of slogan for Theresa May - now announcing she will resign soon after sailing  into Brexit?  
Soft Brexit is ideal for those who are soft in the head. Ideal for Labour supporters then.  
Corbyn and Starmer are the grown-ups over #BrexitThe Tories are squabbling kids 
Important point in Andrew Rawnsley's column: new position could create majority *in this parliament* for soft Brexit  
Labour support Brexit in run up to #GE2017Labour now oppose Brexit by insisting we STAY in SM and CU.Lying anti-British shills. 
If Brexit had no disastrous side effect other than that we had to be best mates with Trump, decent people would have a duty to reject it. 
Almost 1 million of the young, highly- qualified & most talented are planning to leave the UK. #Brexit #braindrain 
Yes, saying you want to stay in SM isn't as easy as getting approval for it from Efta & EEA. Yes, Labour still ultimately backs hard Brexit. 
Corbyn's new position - let's drag EU exit process out for 5-10-15 yrs to eventually arrive at hard Brexit FFS You have a way out, Scotland 
Divorce has decree nisi, then decree absolute. Buy a house; it's subject to survey. And when we see Brexit deal we must be asked 'R U sure?' 
Labour's new policy: drag out the agony, the uncertainty, the damage. Unacceptable. Just stop Brexit. 
Labour's timed Brexit shift announcement to perfection!Softly softly,watch & wait......POUNCEjust before Repeal Bill vote!#JC4PM 
On every single vote that mattered, Labour have voted against the single market and for a hard Brexit.  
Do you support Theresa May to deliver #Brexit? RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Labour's new approach to #Brexit.  Why it happened, what it means.  
It's said @theresa_may will resign after Brexit. What is it about politicians who drop the country in it then flee from the consequences?  
No-one can now argue there's no difference between Labour and the Tories on Brexit >>  
i.e. HSBC & Goldman Sachs - Brexit: Big business and banks are dominating formation of Brexit warns report  
So while in many ways Labour's position is "a deep breath then hard Brexit", a lot can happen during a deep breath. 
"Constructive ambiguity" is a perfect descriptor of Labour's Brexit policy - and you know it.  
Never forget. It was him what got us into this mess. #Brexit  
'I don't recognise my country anymore': British citizens leaving UK because of #Brexit amid exodus of Europeans  
Labour's "new" "policy" on Brexit is neither new nor a policy. Staying in single market for an extra 2 years transition a mere bagatelle/ 
‘We have a LOT to lose’ German economist's bombshell warning to Merkel over Brexit talks  
My view on Brexit has remained *exactly and tediously the same since the referendum*: accept the result, get the softest possible Brexit. 
Reality is winning the #Brexit debate, both government & Labour now accept that we have to keep very close ties with the EU.#StopBrexit /1 
Labour switching to a 'soft Brexit' (there is no such thing) is yet another sign that Brexit is in retreat & dying. Keep up the fight. 
Read this. JUST READ Bogus immigration figures were responsible for epic act of national self harm #Brexit #ScotRef 
Wow Matthew Parris, lifelong Tory, says the Labour Brexit story has made him think about voting Labour #r4bh 
Oh so NOW you like Soft Brexit huh? Name three of their albums.@UKLabour 
Labour's shift from Hard to Soft Brexit is overrated and oversold. What matters: Labour is a Brexit party. Soft Brexit is still Brexit. 
Why I don't support a hard Brexit: here's what I wrote at the beginning of the month >>  
Labour is now going to have to talk up the virtues of the Single Market, which can only help our campaign to #Remain in the EU.#Brexit 
Brexit promises vs Brexit reality.#MayweathervMcGregor 
In Labour's new shift - they need to counter Brexiteers saying vote was clearly to leave SM. *This* poll was taken 1m after Brexit vote. pic.twitter.com/caI1QOdfg1 
A right wing Brexit has no majority. Brexit is dead. It's time to stop fudging and finish it off once and for all  
Singularly depressing, so unnecessary, self defeating and just plain stupid. Well done Brexit.....  
Uncontrolled immigration was the bedrock of the Brexit case. Turns out it was utterly bogus - a consensual con.  
Looks like Lab are starting a long game to reverse Brexit without having the courage to say openly that is what they want to do. 
So now you know, finally. Labour fully intend to ignore the referendum via @MailOnline 
Absolutely not good enough: sheer fudge. Nothing but stopping Brexit is acceptable.  
I'd almost bet money on Corbyn or McDonnell undermining Starmer's latest Brexit policy within the next few says. Wonder if they agreed it. 
Labour trying to do the Tory Brexit without looking like Tories. It is not acceptable. Brexit must & will be stopped.  
7 out of 10 Labour constituencies voted leave. Single Market membership is EU membership in all but name. Labour must honour the referendum. 
Should Theresa May set date she'll quit as PM but hopes to see Britain through Brexit? RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
It's about time that Labour made this move. It's now a party of opposition- no longer quietly acquiescing to government's Brexit direction.  
Corbyn sacked Labour frontbenchers who dared to vote against a hard Brexit in Parliament. Judge a party by its actions, not empty words 
Difference between Labour and Tory Brexit policy in a nutshell: instead of jumping off the cliff in 3 years, let's do it in 4  
On #Labour's momentous shift towards a slightly delayed #Brexit...#brexitshambles #StopBrexit #Corbyn #KierStarmer #EU #BritainStays 
Whatever else you think about it, please don't forget that main take away from @UKLabour "shift" is: the party is still supporting Brexit! 
UKIP worked with Labour Leave in the Referendum and we must cooperate with them on making sure BREXIT means EXIT.  
It is our job to fight a disastrous hard Brexit that will crash the economy, slash jobs and destroy living standards. Time to get to work  
As reality of the cost and chaos of Brexit dawns, both main parties can be made to shift their positions #KeepFighting #keepcampaigning 
The MSM have been telling you Corbyn favours a hard Brexit. What do they know? There's a huge difference now.  
#48% & rising. Labour move on Brexit welcome: about time! 
Labour makes dramatic shift on Brexit and single market  
Good explanation by @rachshabi on why Labour's plan to stay in the Single Market during Brexit transition makes sense versus Tory chaos  
Labour's U turn on Single Market, Customs Union, and Open Borders, a complete betrayal of Brexit. They betray Britain and their own voters. 
Labour backtrack on Brexit - want to keep UK in single market & customs union. Only @UKIP are 100% for full Brexit.  
Corbyn has no credibility as a political leader having betrayed all his major undertakings including on Brexit & student finances.  
Left wing elite's agenda is to subvert the referendum result  
The distance between Labour's position on Brexit & advocating a 2nd referendum on staying in the EU just got a whole lot smaller  
Farmers were big supporters of Brexit – but now they have been told their funding isn't assured  
Proud to support @laboursinglemkt fighting Tory hard #Brexit madness. Must protect jobs, & investment More info here  
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
Whisper it softly:Labour's Brexit policy looks more coherent than May government's  
Regarding #Brexit: I'm a Leave-orientated Remain-facing, free-movement-favouring anti-migration pro-EU Brussels-hater. I hope that's clear. 
This is not the country I grew up in The LIBLABCONS has turn this once great country into a SHITHOLE Then wonder why Brits are leaving 
The real significance of this move (IMO) is that it starts the bidding war between the parties to leave the other holding the Brexit baby.  
The EU is not the enemy of the State. Time to think again about Brexit  Today's Observer column 
"During transition" is crap. It basically just means, "Can we delay Brexit pls (because we know it's crap but we have to, because racists)?" 
'I don't recognise my country anymore': British citizens leaving UK because of Brexit amid exodus of Europeans  
Increasingly clear that we're moving towards a second referendum. The people are entitled to change their mind on biggest issue of the day 
This Keir Starmer story is a big deal, and about as sensible as things are nowadays. Certainly relative to Brexit folly.  
Expect even more apoplectic bot & foreign shill activity Labour makes dramatic shift on Brexit and single market  
Labour make dramatic intervention on Brexit with new promise  
Thank goodness one of two main parties has moved to halfway decent Brexit position-big tick from us at the Observer 
Brexiteer Pete North on how the Tories are setting us up for a walk out from #brexit talks and from our childrens future #brexitwontwork 
At last - #Labour has a #Brexit policy. Better late than never.  
Pathetic! They still back Brexit! They haven't got it. Useless is as useless does! #CrumblingBrexit  
A slight improvement in the right direction, but why not stay within the EU, Brexit is proving to be a catastrophic failure. 
Labour's new #Brexit stance: no new enthuasiasm from Corbyn but recognition that only Remainers can get him to No 10 
To fellow Lords: vital we debate Brexit & vote on this in Sept session. At present no full debate tabled on Brexit (Govt doesn't want one).  
"What, caller? @UKLabour voters who voted #Brexit actually trusted @jeremycorbyn when he said UK would leave Single Market & Customs Union?" 
One asset manager is calling Brexit a sideshow and says Britain has a bigger problem  
If Remain campaigners work together they can stop Brexit  
Drugs giant AstraZeneca to expand largest UK site in boost ahead of Brexit.  
I always liked Owen, championed his writing, stuck up for him on numerous occasions, but on Brexit he became partisan & deceitful 
Brexit doesn't worry the EU's fastest-shrinking nation  
I don't think for 1 minute Corbyn's let go of his 70's far left Brexit ideology.The shadow cabinet have told him & McDonnell the games up(5) 
BrexitChicago CubsDonald TrumpNew England PatriotsConnor McGregor 
Many voted 'Leave' as they thought the 'fascist EUSSR' was about to collapse and NHS would benefit. They were wrong. #Brexit is wrong 
Absolutely, Labour must do the right thing and stop Brexit; or both Labour and the UK will be irreparably damaged, which is a dreadful cost.  
Britain to urge EU to show 'imagination' in Brexit talks  
Brexit Is turning into a national humiliation.  
Conference is approaching and Corbyn  wants to take the sting out of the anti Brexit campaign.  He is not to be trusted: not a friend. 
Tories must decide if country or party comes first #Brexit  
Labour wants single market for Brexit transition  
(Brexit madness more obvious every day ...) A million skilled EU workers see their future outside Britain  
UK opposition Labour to offer alternative soft Brexit in policy shift  
THEY UNDERSTAND REFERENDUM AS WAR N SELF DETERMINATION AS HATE SPEECH NIGERIANS R SO DAFT N VERY UNCIVILIZED    
So there we are. Happy now, Brexit UK?  A million skilled EU workers see their future outside Britain.   
NIGERIA IS A CRIME AGAINST THE CHILDREN OF GOD ALMIGHTY @UN FREE BIAFRA #SUPPORT BIAFRA REFERENDUM #BIAFRAEXIT @EU 
Almost all Labour MPs and even more than half the tories hate brexit 
I reckon Brexit & the break up of the European Union could've been avoided if it wasn't for their unreasonable refusal to let China join. 
REVEALED: Labour plot to force UK to REMAIN in single market & customs union after Brexit  
Britains brexit negotiations seem limited to asking to be allowed to stay in the customs union, submit to EU law and its ludicrous. Leave. 
Irony: As a Remainer I'm reluctant to accept a Brexit that keeps Single Market membership because THAT would be a true loss of sovereignty  
I can promise 100% that the Venn Diagram of people who want Brexit and the people who care about science are two completely separate circles  
Brexit risks one of the most important scientific breakthroughs of the century, leading scientist warns  
Britain to urge EU to show 'imagination' in Brexit talks  
#Brexit is breaking up familiesMy daughter applying for jobs in Hong-Kong & many of her friends heading overseas. All big loss to UK. 
It looks like Theresa May will be gone after Brexit - Tories can't even work with eachother let alone 27 EU states. 
Brexit: Labour warned that under the Tories they'd ignore the interests of ordinary people. They were right...  
Flags being handed out at Southwest 4 festival. Couldn't hand them out quick enough. Brexit will fail as the young want remain. Demographics  
Is "Owen Jones Did Brexit" the best centrist conspiracy theory  
David Davis to demand more 'flexibility' from Brussels in Brexit talks - Bob Moran - political cartoon gallery  
Is this the beginning of the end for Brexit?  
Corbyn has played things wisely. It has been necessary to wait for the UK public to realise that the current Brexit trajectory is insane 
I'm not going to applaud this. I'm unimpressed until Labour has the guts and integrity to tell the people the truth about #brexit.. 
Labour sets out its stall as party of 'soft Brexit' in single market policy shift  
It isn't just that Labour has seen sense & has shifted to Brexit lite, all rational people know jumping from thr single market is suicide 
Do the right thing. Go the whole way. Stop Brexit. Nothing less will be acceptable.  
Not enough to please many Remainers, but Labour adopting a vastly more sensible #Brexit stance than the government  
This is a big moment in the politics of Brexit  
Brexit leading to exodus of whiny over-indulged children.  
Sigh. It's just SM and CU during "transition". Then back on your heads, presumably: hard brexit, socialist paradise. 
Blimey. Most Brexiters think significant damage to Britain's economy is acceptable for Brexit.And they think they're patriotic.  
'I don't recognise my country anymore': British citizens are fleeing the UK because of Brexit  
Brexiles flee a Britain that they feel has "returned to the Dark Ages of ignorance and hatred"  #Brexit #StopBrexit 
It's only one more step, @UKLabour, @jeremycorbyn, to support calling off Brexit altogether. Do it!  
Way to go. For sure. Fight this Brexit madness, the chaos and the cost    
Looking forward to 100% agreeing with whatever it is that Jeremy says about Labour's new Brexit position tomorrow. 
Labour continues to play a blinder on Brexit minefield, mainstream continues to play catch up.  
What's really remarkable is how Labour are so closely aligned to Tory views on Brexit that a slight change like this is 'dramatic'  
The water is absolutely fine. Take the plunge and stop #Brexit completely as per your voters' wishes.  
No ‘constructive ambiguity’. Labour will avoid Brexit cliff edge for UK economy  Sense, with more to follow, I hope 
It's only just starting to clamber out of its drugged stupor of supporting Brexit. It's one step in the right direction to STOPPING BREXIT.  
Brexit: Labour wants UK to stay in EU single market during transition period  
Not good enough. Brexit must be stopped, period. This is another useless fudge.  
Of course, an anti Brexit Labour Party would be assured of City & business vote. As a pro Brexit party, Tories destined only for obscurity. 
Labour change their position on Brexit again. How long are Labour going to keep to this position this time?  
#BrexitRT if you agree  
A prediction: Labour will rise in polls as a result of its new Brexit position. They must learn from that & go all the way & oppose Brexit. 
Sir @Keir_Starmer risks losing @UKLabour 37% of Labour voters who supported leave. Post Brexit we must leave Single Market. 
'Go jump' Fury as Angela Merkel orders Britain to pay Brexit bill   
There is now a clear parliamentary majority for single market/customs union membership during Brexit transition. 
Those of us in Labour who bravely fought to leave the EU will fight to ensure our Party honours the outcome of that referendum. 
Excellent Labour move. Most sensible way to manage Brexit without destroying the economy. Tories will split on this  
Labour's new Brexit position is the old one repackaged.They just want to take longer to get there.It is NOT soft Brexit.It is NOT Remain. 
We urge .@jeremycorbyn to reject calls for @UKLabour to press for the UK to remain in the Single Market. Labour must honour the referendum. 
The Government must act to maintain our fishing fleets and make sure they prosper after Brexit, says Ben Rochelle  
If we fall for this, we are a fools. A transition to a hard Brexit is NOT a soft Brexit. Corbyn is a liar.  
This will finish the Tories - As Labour becomes party of soft Brexit, hard battles lie ahead  
1. In the US it is #WomensEqualityDay, which is a good day to explain what US suffragists have to do with why people voted for Brexit. 
Theresa May sets date she'll quit as PM but hopes to see Britain through Brexit  
Doesn't the @observer realise that @UKLabour's Brexit positions have the shelf life of milk?  
It is of course a stance the SNP have championed since the referendum. I believe a majority can be achieved in the commons for single market  
So Corbyn favours a Hard Brexit does he? Yet another example of how clueless our commentariat are. 
The Observer reports Labour will announce support for staying in EU single market and customs union during transitional period after Brexit 
John Bruton, ex-Taoiseach says Brexit is a psychological exercise for UK, not economic... and we may want to drop it 
No ‘constructive ambiguity’. Labour will fight hard Brexit: my Observer article.  
Labour now has a strong and united purpose in fighting hard Brexit.   
If you are a Labour member, here's your opportunity to tell the leadership you want it to change its stance on Brexit. Please RT.  
This is smart, sensible stuff from Labour on Brexit. They really are the grown-ups in the room.  
significant. If @UKLabour supports being in the single market & an amendment is accepted to that effect v few Tory rebels needed. #Brexit  
It isn't just EU nationals leaving the Britain they used to call home. The British are fleeing Brexit Britain, too. 
Britain's economy may be even in worse shape than it looks  
As I've said all along,we need clear red water between the PM's job-destroying Brexit+our position -this is a welcome step in that direction  
EU nationals DESPERATE for UK citizenship as passport requests SOAR after Brexit vote  
Labour calls for lengthy transitional period post Brexit in policy rethink  
As Labour becomes party of soft Brexit, hard battles lie ahead  
I want to stay in the EU with all four freedoms and if the Labour party wanted the best for the UK so would they.  Stop #Brexit. 
To those who say things cannot get worse, I say they can and probably will #Brexit  
OBSERVER BREXIT LEAD by @tobyhelm #tomorrowspaperstoday p 
OBSERVER: Labour makes dramatic shift on Brexit and single market #tomorrowspaperstoday 
'I don't recognise my country anymore'Brexit parties are responsible for this self-destruction.  
We should be campaigning to stay in the EU.#Brexit #Remain 
WATCH: Wetherspoon’s boss Tim Martin DESTROYS every Remoaner in one interview  via @Your Brexit 
Katie Hopkins BLASTS Labour for SACKING councillor for speaking out over CHILD rape row  via @Your Brexit 
Just saw Brexit The Musical at The Fringe. Amazing. You wouldn't believe the story was true unless you lived it. Excellent #Brexit 
I'm afraid I will never forgive you are any other person who supports brexit if we leave the EU & we lose our EU rights and citizenship.  
Think the Tories are making a mess of Brexit? Labour needs to stand up to them. Join our campaign today:  
Stupid point your indulgence Brexit is costing £10's of billions a year already.  
If Remain campaigners work together they can stop Brexit  
A day without diversity - why no gestures like this for us in the run up to the Brexit vote?  
Does Moscow working hours #Brexit troll David Jones work in this Russian troll factory? 
."With Brexit, Greece might finally have the upper hand in the 200-year-old spat" 
.@UKLabour members should do this & make clear views on #Brexit - none of agenda deliverable with #Brexit disaster  
Johnson admits the UK will now pay Brexit divorce settlement. How about compensating 1400 Rotherham school children as well ? 
GERMANY |Kurds joining demo in #Cologne to support the independence referendum of Kurdistan.  
V good from my colleague @patmcfaddenmp on the Government's #Brexit cluelessness   
South West Four festival in London today. Nothing to do with politics, yet thousands of anti-democratic cry babies on display.#sw4 #brexit  
We're a grassroots campaign aiming to change Labour's Brexit position & to stay in the Please help if you can  
When the UK gets to read the 50 Brexit impact assessments the government are hiding.  
Attending rally in support of the September 25 @Kurdistan  independence referendum in Cologne, Germany. @KrgEuro 
On Brexit, the UK will still be a member of:CommonwealthG7G20OECDUNSCCouncil of EuropeInterpolWTO FSBNATOISOILOCodexFive Eyes 
Britain must pay its EU obligations as part of Brexit talks, Angela Merkel warns  
Commitments were made on the implicit assumption that we were remaining in the EU. They cannot and must not apply after Brexit.  
I imagine applicants for jobs in David Davis's Brexit dept have to be vetted first to make sure they have no history of common sense. 
20 months before Brexit. Enough time to agree bilateral free trade deals withUSACanadaAustraliaS KoreaMexicoSingaporeMalaysiaNZ 
Davis to refuse talks on Brexit bill until EU justifies it  via @MailOnline 
Once Brexit is defeated we have to upgrade our democracy. A fairer voting system, elected upper chamber, stronger local/regional government. 
Angela Merkel says Britain is obliged to pay its #Brexit divorce bill  
Person was arrested outside Buckingham palace lastnight He attacked police with a sword They will probably say Mental illness not religion 
GERMANY |Thousands join demonstration in #Cologne to support Kurdistan's independence referendum.  
Boris Johnson was right that Brexit will create thousands of new jobs, but it turns out they will be in Germany:  
Wow. You married a foreigner so fuck off. Brexit government.  
The arguments 4 #Brexit R eroded day by day; if they ever existed. Only the stubborn or misguided won't see it; the worst being the UK Govt! 
Bride says "I  shed tears" out of happiness as she takes part in rally for Kurdistan referendum in #Germany, national anthem played. 
IPOB: Don't even talk about re-arresting KANU,conduct Referendum to enable #Biafra IGBOs go Mbazulike Amaechi warns  
President @masoud_barzani #France FM @JY_LeDrian & DM @florence_parly discussed war on #ISIS #IDP situation #Erbil #Baghdad ties &Referendum  
Brussels has overplayed its hand on EU law after Brexit, says Professor Christopher Forsyth   
."The UK’s chaotic approach to Brexit has often resembled Dunkirk without the happy ending" 
Leading German economist predicts that the UK will go from strength to strength after Brexit  
Racism was never dead and buried, it was was simply sleeping.... #Brexit  & #Trump have revived it & given it oxygen. @StopBrexitMarch 
Looks clear to us that @jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour should oppose Brexit! @Labour4EU 
Sobering reflections on Brexit, populism and nationalism at Jackson Hole of @johnvanreenen (via @jesusalfar)  
From an English Gite owner about guests who voted #Brexit. All know they were lied to and would vote the other way if asked again.  
Applications from EU nationals to become British citizens up 80% post-Brexit (July 2016-June 2017) Majority from Poland, Italy, Romania 
Brexit pundits were 'universally wrong' Wetherspoons boss lashes out at Project Fear  
And don't forget @BorisJohnson was a serial liar during Brexit campaign, which May thought was a perfect qualification for a UK Foreign Sec!  
"Tasked with implementing #Brexit, the British civil service faces immense change and uncertainty":  
"No Brexit means No Brexit" Both Labour & Tories want to ruin YOUR future by supporting Brexit. YOU can change that!  
They meant 'they' would be fine. 
Find your Brexit Twitter name by translating your own name into Russian, translating it back, and then adding 8 random digits. 
Love the contrast of these two Brexit tweets. Hard facts vs. magical thinking.  
Would you date a Brexit voter? No, I don't suffer fools!  
#Germany: Sea of Kurdistani flags at Cologne festival, supporting the upcoming independence referendum.  
Brexit to create 80,000 jobs.  They're just in Frankfurt.  
When people tell you they support Brexit, it's basically them admitting they're thick! 
Those running the EU are elected by nobody this makes them nothing more then Dictators Sooner we leave the better off we shall be #Brexit 
When should we have another referendum?@TommySheppard @theSNP #ScotRef 
I will not be blamed for the tragedy that is Brexit. My rights are being taken from me and my voice silenced. I'm a victim, not a villain. 
A #Kurdistan #Kurdish rally in #Cologne #Germany in support of Kurdish independence referendum (among flags present is also Israeli flag)  
When future historians ask why a country went mad and chose Brexit, this will be produced as Exhibit A.  
Koln Germany now . Thousands of our people in diaspora rallied to support the Referendum for the independence of Kurdistan.  
HO chaos has wide implications. If EU knows civil service can't even handle Brexit now, we have even less leverage to negotiate bespoke deal  
Every day I hear ppl moan about Brexit.Every day I hear ppl whinge about Brexit Every day I hear ppl cry about BrexitEvery day I  Brexit 
The combination of Brexit and Jeremy Corbyn could lead to an exodus of capital and talent from Britain  
On Brexit: “The baby boomer is one of the few mammals that eats its own young” 
This Corbynista thinks the European Investment Bank is run by Tories. And its withdrawal from UK investment has nothing to do with Brexit.  
What's so good about trading alone? Brexit gov has admitted the EU is great this week, what's left for Brexit? 
Integrating immigrants starts with overcoming the poisonous legacy of the Brexit campaign  
Tony Blair accused of interfering with Brexit as it emerges he is to meet Juncker in Brussels ahead of crunch talks  
Friends! I'm puzzled!Given that, as we Remainers keep pointing out, "Brexit isn't going to happen", why are we so terribly upset about it?  
WATCH | Tim Martin: "[Since the vote] GDP is up 2%, sales are up, we've created 300k jobs and generally things are going very well." #Brexit  
Britain must pay its EU obligations as part of Brexit talks, Angela Merkel warns  
The most dynamic sectors of our economy depend on the supply of skilled labour. Curbing EU immigration can only harm them. #Brexit #Remain 
“I think Britain may come to the realization that Brexit, as they sold it to themselves, isn’t feasible”  
The Economist in January explaining what the govt is now discovering, that #Brexit means losing, not gaining control. #StopBrexit 
This Leave/Brexit account was discovered to be Russian Shillbot undermining British democracy this week.  
'The REVOLUTION must go through!' Ian Paisley Jr berates those fighting to 'THWART' Brexit  
.@Manuel_TSSA :Without EU migrants, our economy will buckle under the pressure of Brexit  
FTSE 100 is Europe's worst major index this year, when evaluating performance in euro terms  
Brexit will DESTROY Labour and keep Jeremy Corbyn out of power, warns professor  
If You Don’t Agree With Nnamdi Kanu, Prove Him Wrong With Referendum – Amaechi – Orsu 24 News  
No it won't. Brexit, renewal of Trident, continued austerity, coalitions with Tories in councils may.A tourist playing bagpipes is fun.  
Britain needs to reconsider Brexit.It takes strength of character to admit when you are wrong.  
WATCH: LBC host slams Remainer Baroness for threatening to QUIT Tories over 'hard' Brexit  
Compare your theory of "what's really going on" with Brexit and @MarinaHyde's excellent Jar-Jar theory  
Brexit will DESTROY Labour and keep Jeremy Corbyn out of power, warns professor  
Finally @DavidDavisMP shows some guts and says he'll halt #Brexit negotiations until EU justifies its ludicrous demand for £74b divorce bill 
Rubbish. We #Remainers are doing the hard work necessary to avert crazy cliff-edge hard Brexit as well as highlighting how 'no Brexit' best  
#Brexit tariffs and loss of skilled workers from the EU could cause Japanese companies to move to the EU #StopBrexit 
Brexit has failed our Six Labour tests @keir_starmer. If you disagree, please explain why.All the evidence says we are better off in #EU 
Indeed it is, mainly because it is is supportive of a Tory hard Brexit. Fascinating stuff here.  
what a perfect one-line description of #Brexit@CloughOlive @acgrayling 
Thanks - yes please don't tar all of us with  same brush. Vast maj of Lab members/supporters anti-Brexit, just leadership sadly misguided! 
Reasons for #Brexit: Tory, UKIP & DUP MEPs voted against EU tax avoidance proposals. #StopBrexitHour #Remain 
#Brexit means UK will lose its biggest funder of social housing.£1,000,000,000 in a year gone.Thanks Leavers 
1) UK had sovereignty throughout2) Businesses want to keep EU regulations3) EU citizens contribute more than take4) Brexit helps nothing 
EU denies Blair-Juncker meeting is conspiracy to undermine Brexit  
Over 80% of UK cars made are exported. Cars aren't made to stockpile in a field. This is a response to forward demand for our cars. £Brexit  
11) but let's not kid ourselves that the #Brexit vote was anything other than the bastard, ugly, distant cousin twice removedof Democracy 
The parallels with Brexit yet again  
Why is the government so afraid to publish its Brexit impact studies?  
Voters back Brexit.  
Holy crap. Hard evidence that Russia was at least trying to influence the EU referendum to engineer a vote for Brexit.  
Scottish voters are worried by Labours position on #Brexit & appreciate @theSNP @scotgov mitigation of Tory policies  
Brexit is going to deliver 80,000 new jobs - in Frankfurt  
If Brexit and Trump haven't confused you, here are Miss Piggy and Kermit visiting Mark Hamill and Yoda on the set of Empire Strikes Back.  
EU sees UK position on Ireland, mixing trade and border issues, as problem for Barnier-Davis #Brexit  talks next week.Financial Times:  
Good jobs news on Brexit ...for the Germans.  80,000 jobs, says report - in Frankfurt,  
It should be clear by now that Brexit is a hot mess. I am so disappointed that @UKLabour is not fighting this!!! 
#brexit is like a toxic turd wrapped in unicorn fluff and pixie glitter. Wash that imaginary stuff away and it’s still a toxic turd!  
Not enough progress has been made so far in Brexit talks, Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar says  
Great rallying call! Worth reading the whole thread ending with a plea to get out on the streets and make your voices heard. #Brexit  
The UK's glorious new version of the national anthem for a post-Brexit future!  
If you want proof that there is no such think as a Bankers Brexit - here it is - the banks are leaving.  
A bad election and terrible Brexit, the Tories are selling our environment & the planet down the river. #SaveOurPlanet #ToriesOut 
When people start to feel marginalised in their own countries, they tend to vote for Trump & Brexit  
The truth about Trump, Brexit, and Russia #AlternativeWarThe second edition is already at press after only one week 
'Remaniac-in-chief' Blair to visit Juncker during Brexit talks. Both most Hated, Birds of a Feather! 
He will never change. Always voted with Tories. His support for Brexit is a disaster for Labour and the country. #stopbrexitnow 
That's not Project Fear. That's £315m we are wasting every week because Brexit killed our currency and increased inflation.  
So UK should continue to influence EU regulation while Brussels must stop meddling in British affairs! #Brexit #eudk 
Numbers on which a whole policy was based on, and arguably lead to Brexit, turns out to be utter horseshit  
Nobody wanted #Brexit more than @RupertMurdoch. His British papers campaigned for UK exit for almost 40 years. Thank him at @NewsUK. 
Family in Frankfurt tell me house prices there are rocketing -Brexit boom will be in EU not the UK 
Do read this thread on how twitter bot & troll accounts were used to dupe unsuspecting Brits into supporting Brexit  
EU accuses UK of ‘magical thinking’ over Brexit  More #brexitshambles 
While Britain wants to discuss post-Brexit trade, European Union officials say other issues must be resolved first.  
Now the country is on it's way to being "fucked" the people who put the exit in "Brexit" should be officially known as the "Fucksiteers" 
Excellent set of papers. Latest from Van Reenen on Brexit in here.  
Britain heads back to the Brexit table, plans in hand, economy in decline via @politicususa 
Juncker to meet 'good friend' Tony Blair during Brexit talks next week. Do us all a favour Blair, stay in Europe. The UK is for patriots. 
 RT TDobisz: Spotted on Twitter. #Brexit#UKDisaster#NHSbreakingpoint NHSMillion 
And even worse, kept true figure secret in order to sway the referendum to leave the EU. Once again this Tory government lied to the people 
'Britain's economy is at, or near, the bottom of the Group of Seven. Britons wanted to take back control. This is what that looks like.' 
Brexit: "magical thinking" - the UK must make a sensible proposal ...  #Brexit.  
I have a horrible feeling that #Brexit is turning me into a snob.Really struggle to relate to some of the Brexiters spouting rubbish. 
Opinion: Could the Kurdish referendum derail statehood?  
Please Mrs May @theresa_may, I don't wish my taxes to pay for Brexit. Please therefore shut down your government. Thanks.  
Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit - Morten Morland - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
We now go live to Brexit:  
The EU is warning the UK to not use the Irish peace process as a 'bargaining chip' in the Brexit talks  
Commentators' inability to separate "is Brexit a good idea?" from "is the government doing Brexit well?" is continually exasperating. 
To understand Britain you need to get your head around the fact that half the population wants Brexit but no one wants it to change much 
Should Tony Blair visit Juncker during #Brexit talks? @JunckerEU RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
'Brexit means Brexit' says man who is delighted that their Croatian manager is set to bring a Portuguese man in to take and Englishman's job 
Farmers were big supporters of Brexit – but now they have been told their funding isn't assured  
BREXIT!  
*thick Scottish accent*"There's been a Brexit..."  
ANGER as police Deputy Commissioner suggests giving priority to NON-ENGLISH SPEAKING crime victims  via @Your Brexit 
The people who voted for Sarah are probably the same people who voted for Honey G and Brexit #CBBFinal #CBB 
BOMBSHELL Report!Veselnitskaya, Goldstone & Agalarova Traveled from NYC to UK For Brexit Then Back to NYC! 
You cant trust the public. First Brexit, then Trump now Sarah Harding #CBBFinal 
Sarah won. Just like Brexit, Donald Trump... #cbb #cbbuk #cbbfinal 
Brexit should be halted and reversed in order for the U.K. To thrive in the future.  
IPOB has said,it is not interested in restructuring of NGR but a well-organised referendum for Biafra independence 
SF Anti-Brexit team Spokespersons & policy leads in every institution across Ireland, EU & Westminster Standing up for the people of Ireland  
“I think Britain may come to the realization that Brexit, as they sold it to themselves, isn’t feasible”  
In @ScotNational tomorrow: How we win the next referendum ... we publish Tommy Sheppard's lecture on the state of independence in full  
What Brexit means is the two layers of bureaucracy.  
AND NOW WE GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Number of EU citizens applying for British citizenship nearly doubles in wake of Brexit referendum, new figures show  
Don’t expect police help if you’re healthy and speak good English 
Labour's policy on scrapping free movement after Brexit is under fire—from radically differing wings of the party  
It's interesting and frustrating watching everything you've predicted come to fruition. The world of Brexit and Trump is unraveling at pace. 
Abi Wilkinson: Don’t expect Labour to halt Brexit – it’s down to all of you  
What about the 17million who voted for #Brexit. Surely they'd be up for some hard graft?  
'Brexit may not happen' says Sir Vince Cable amid claims talks could be pushed back until December  
'the legacy of false accounting for immigration has delivered Brexit to our door'  
."With Brexit negotiations ramping up, how much longer can the UK government ignore the NATIONS of the UK?". 
Bam! 'Boris Johnson was right that Brexit will create thousands of new jobs, but it turns out they will be in Germany not the UK'  
More EU citizens from Poland, the Czech Republic and Hungary are staying away from Britain  
I'll ask the question again. Has any politician or journalist seriously asked why Theresa May rushed to see Murdoch in New York?#Brexit 
Why it's down to the grassroots movement to help change opinion on Brexit. Latest piece from @AbiWilks here:  
It'd be even better to pull on the brake & stop the Brexit wagon before it goes over the edge.Full stop better than any softer landing  
Ireland mustn't be used as a bargaining chip in Brexit trade talks, EU warns Britain  
Why would successful people put up with Jeremy Corbyn as prime minister, following on the heels of Brexit?  
Nigel, you look overjoyed to have sold Britain for a place at Trump's dinner table. #Brexit  
With curtailed freedom of movement & a tanking economy Brexit UK will have no one wanting to come... and no one able to leave. :0 
UK warned by EU officials not to use peace process as bargaining chip in Brexit talks (updated to incl DexEU quotes)  
Brits are an island people with global horizons and connections. We are not, and never shall be, mere Little Europeans. We'll Brexit. 2019.  
Brits never bought into the European desire for a US of Europe. Not in 1975 when we voted for free trade, or 2016 when we opted for Brexit. 
Reminder: Is Corbyn embarrassed by this praise from the #Brexit hard right? Probably not, but he should be. #StopBrexit #Remain 
."Brexit is like pulling a tooth with 10,000 roots." 
Thanks you to toxic Tony and Jean-Claude Juncker - a massive help to the Brexit cause. 
Read the economic stupidity of Trumpism and weep for America, then do same for Brexit fantasy  
Brexit to deliver EU jobs boom with 80,000 new positions predicted in Frankfurt 
Given the horrors inflicted by nationalism and the scapegoating of minorities/outsiders the #Brexit press hate campaigns were criminal.  
Still nobody has a clue what form #Brexit will take. The question has to be asked again. Do we really want to be outside the EU? My vote: No 
Slow day at work so I did a Venn of the #Brexit ministers defining features.  
This is just our new post-brexit anthem.  
UK accused of 'magical thinking' over Brexit plan for Irish border  
To Europe I am so sorry about #brexit and my insane government please let us back in the EU when my country comes to its  senses 
The Brexit Deflection.  
London losing status with financial firms as Brexit approaches | Financial Post  
The #Brexit press bosses don't seem to like paying taxes They won't like the EU anti-tax-avoidance directive. 
Brexit exodus from London 'to create 80,000 jobs'... in Frankfurt. The wheels are coming off.   
Fascinating thread about Russian attempts to manipulate social media over Brexit.  
If Remain campaigners work together they have a real chance of stopping Brexit  
Tony Blair will meet EU chief Jean Claude-Juncker in same week as next round of Brexit talks. is he selling us out @lbc from 7 
Bank of England is vindicated as growth deteriorates #Brexit realities! Wake up Britain B4 it's too late! via @bv 
Libyan band wonderfully captures the spirit of BoJo & the Big Brexit Bungle in this rendition of God Save the Queen:  
EU snubs @theresa_may Juncker to meet 'good friend' Liar,Quisling,Greedy> Tony Blair during Brexit talks next week  
The case for Brexit may be falling apart in the face of reality but decades of lies & propaganda leave their scar  
Life is like a hurricanehere in BrexitBus lies, jams and marmalade,It's aBrex-Blur.Might leave a trade blockOr realise we're fucked  
To truly understand the Brexit debacle, look to Star Wars | Marina Hyde  
Tony Blair really has NO shame !! 'Remainiac-in-chief' Blair to visit Juncker during Brexit talks' | via @telegraph 
The agenda for the third round of #Brexit negotiations @EU_Commission has been published on our website:  
These people make UK so much smaller ☞ Britain heads back to the Brexit table, plans in hand, economy in decline  
Brexit will create some 80,000 jobs, says report - in Frankfurt, not UK - Sky News  
Dear #Brexit fansI have $1 000 000 (ONE MILLION UK DOLLARS) I'm taking out of NigeriaPlease DM me your bank details so I can send it 
The Treasury must devise a bold new economic plan, not focus all its energy on "softening" Brexit | @AllisterHeath 
BoJo finally concedes that Britain will pay for #Brexit. Quelle Surprise. Was he under the impression that Mexico was to pay it instead? 
Knowledgeable Leavers now predicting a shower of shit set to rain down upon us, courtesy of #Brexit. Time to heed, time for a rethink!  
Top EU officials are 'increasingly doubtful' that Brexit negotiations will move to 2nd phase in October as planned 
Need to get a huge turn out for this to show the Govt and Labour that resistance to Brexit is growing not weakening.  
This will be Boris and Theresa on the sidelines of the 2018 Tory conference after Brexit's finally been buried.  
My 3-year-old asked me "As there was a clear mandate to Leave following a democratic EU referendum, why do Remoaners still whinge about it?" 
UK warned not to use NI peace process as Brexit bargaining chip  
It's worrying that ppl expressing honest views on Brexit are labelled 'anti-democratic' or 'undermining negotiations' @JoRichardsKent 
Tory peer threatens to leave party if government opts for a “hard Brexit” in this fiery interview with @IainDale  
.@LibDems: 'Boris Johnson was right that Brexit will create thousands of new jobs, but it turns out they will be in Germany not the UK'  
Brexit means no longer having to hide your incompetence or bias as these are now seen as assets to your career advancement in Government ...  
Henry Mance: The UK's strategy seems to be to let Brussels work out what Brexit means  
EU accuses UK of ‘magical thinking’ over Brexit  
Our place is at the heart of the EU, helping to make it work better for all. Instead of squandering all our resources on nonsensical #Brexit 
Even if I do say so myself, @Open_Britain's latest video is a cracker on the broken Brexit promise about red tape:  
A Soft Brexit or an EEA option would be the worst of all worlds, says Kent Matthews @Econs4FreeTrade 
The best thing you will read on Star Wars and the best thing you will read on Brexit - in one piece  
Lost interest in Black Mirror since @charltonbrooker became another predictable, safe space, M25 luvvie tantruming about Brexit & Trump.  
If Remain campaigners work together they have a real chance of stopping Brexit  
Britain heads back to the Brexit table, plans in hand, economy in decline  
'Labour Brexit position is deeply worrying’: Scottish @guardian readers on Corbyn 
John Kasich signed a bill (overturned by Ohio voter referendum) to revoke strike and collective bargaining rights for public sector workers  
Brexit: 80% rise in number of EU citizens seeking UK passport  
This is the brexit national anthem  
abandon that "keep calm and carry on" mantra. Now is the time to get louder. Now is the time to resist Brexit even more strongly. 28/28 
work: Brexit will trump absolutely everything else, from NHS to infrastructure developments, because it affects everything. So folks: 27/28 
And let's be clear too: there is no socialist utopia at the end of the tunnel. Nor does the line that not everything is about Brexit 26/28 
This is why we voted brexit, people like you, you are the reason it happened. You cannot see the wood for the trees. Living in a bubble  
A puzzled Taoiseach, a #Brexit fairy tale, and some UK Government papers. It's time for a Scotland in Europe update.  
This will happen in U.K. Q4/17 -  Tories already borrowing to reinforce failure/stagnation - soon the deficit will have to fund Brexit (1/2)  
#Brexit must happen? #RT and vote please! Make sure you give your opinion! #uk #GreatBritishBrunch #outmeansout #frexit #dexit #LeaveEU 
If Remain campaigners work together they have a real chance of stopping Brexit - The Independent  
MUST-WATCH: leading Leave campaigners promised a 'bonfire of red tape' if UK voted for Brexit. Now they're tangled up in red tape. Pls RT:  
Brexit has taught me one thing: it is possible to be at once utterly bored and entirely furious about something 
Brexit is going to deliver 80,000 new jobs - in Frankfurt  
The government has failed to release 50 studies on the impact of Brexit. What do you think the studies reveal?  
My bit on Brexit, The Phantom Menace, and fan theories about both  
soccer baseball referendum 
It's built on a deceit that's why. Corbyn is ideologically pro Brexit but to admit that would bring into question his judgement  
#LBCLIVE Turned on scaremonger plank Chuka Umunna back on again what is it with this idiot every day running Brexit down we're leaving EU  
#Brexit will finally deliver the jobs boom that has been promised – just not in the UK  
PRESS RELEASE - Just like with Brexit, we must trust the people. Please Retweet.#ukip17 #UKIPleadership #UKIP #BeTheGovernment 
Let's leave #Brexit  trade theory demagogy aside and look at the truth:No way that the UK can negotiate any of these by March 2019! #Remain 
Our international students officer @Yinbo_Yu  has had enough of students being unfairly blamed following #Brexit 
The UK will not let the EU 'salami-slice' it with 'overegged' Brexit bill demands until the EU looks to the future  
This man is the true face of Brexit - but he now recognises there's a limit to what even he can get away with.  
There is a real chance to stop Brexit  
Confused about #Brexit? No need! Our overview has all you need to know  
The root of Brexit is FREEDOM. You smear Brexiteers with the worst forms of Nationalism to put them off leaving the EU. Won't work ol' son..  
The young, educated, mobile, adaptable people that Britain needs for its future overwhelmingly voted to stay in the EU.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
#Brexit denies the reality that the most successful areas of Britain are built on migration both internal & external.#StopBrexit #Remain 
EU Freedom of Movement is a brilliant means for providing the best access to skilled labour needed by the most dynamic businesses. #Brexit 
I hope those #Brexit supporters - well the few still holding on desperately to their delusions - are keeping up with their research  
Don’t expect Labour to halt Brexit – it’s down to all of you. @AbiWilks on the importance of a grassroots movement.  
EU to UK: Don't use Northern Ireland as bargaining chip in Brexit talks  
2 weeks in Germany. Not a single word on Brexit. Other than family urging me to move back. Feels like an alternate universe 
“I don’t want to go to prison . . . but there is nothing they can do to me that will make me stop this referendum.” 
Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit  
Would have been nice if so many had paid attention to the incompetent authoritarianism of UK immigration policy before Brexit was a thing 
Sadly, that is my experience too. But I cannot give way on my principles to something fundamentally wrong, Brexit.  
Thanks for invitation to join Plymouth by Skype @LukePollard - Plymouth Brexit summit such a good idea: look forward to ideas coming from it  
Latest Brexit logic bomb:  citizens of Northern Ireland are also citizens of the Republic by default. Hence, EU citizens - even post-Brexit. 
I love seeing Corbyn supporters go crazy when I also blame Corbyn for Brexit. Their cognitive dissonance goes into overdrive!  
PROVOCATIVE: Blair and Juncker to meet in Brussels during Brexit negotiations. They deserve each other.  
Because it’s the only thing he knows how to do.Plus he’s trying to avoid Brexit discussion because he forced Labour MPs to back Tories.  
*Brexit Bus Explained*  
There are FIFTY reports on the impact of #Brexit, 1 has leaked. Why won't they share the conclusions of other 49?  
Christian Adams on Brexit style driverless lorries - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Yes, yes it is. Even more so as it was only 37% of a gerrymandered electorate in advisory ref (if not then why no supermajority) Brexit coup  
Brexit is a great opportunity for everyone except Britain, it will create some 80,000 jobs in Germany alone.  
The UK must leave the Customs Union with "speed and efficiency" after Brexit, insists Boris Johnson  
'Labour Brexit position is deeply worrying’: Scottish voters on Corbyn  
Labour leaders @COSLA oppose SNP amendment to work with @scotgov & others for best deal for Scottish communities from Brexit negotiations 
Hmm. Minford's claims about Brexit benefits for trade and investment undercut by reality.  
finally, some good Brexit news-....nevermind.  
Integrating immigrants starts with overcoming the poisonous legacy of the Brexit campaign, writes @ChukaUmunna  
At the root of much anti-Brexit rhetoric is petty snobbery, hostility to democracy and deep cultural ignorance.   
This is the perfect rendition of ‘God Save The Queen’ for Brexit Britain.   
Brexit will create some 80,000 jobs, says report - in Frankfurt, not UK - Sky News  
Frankfurt hopes to become 'little London' after Brexit: City official  
If the UK economy performs poorly, Remainers say it's because of Brexit. If it does well, they claim it's because we haven't left the EU yet 
Despite Brexit. No, I've got that wrong. Because of Brexit. 
At the root of Brexit-denial is the petty anti-democracy of the self-anointed elite, enraged that the demos should dissent from its own view  
16. Expect a torrent of Telegraph bluster painting Brussels as the stonewalling tyrant. The song of the Brexit taliban. 
15. This is all good red meat for the hard Brexit morons. They are rubbing their flaccid little members at the thought of it. 
Tories hide immigration reports ...Labour are no where to be seen ...Tories screw up Brexit ...Labour are no where to be seenPattern? 
Opportunist Boris Johnson waffles but hangs Theresa May out to dry on student migration data fiasco. #brexit 
Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit to EU, having previously said it could ‘go whistle’ 
People forget that Corbyn stabbed the #Remain campaign in the back with his remarks on immigration .#Brexit 
Nothing dumb, stupid or barking mad about this. Worth it for are sovrinty innit? Well no, Brexit is incredibly dumb, totally stupid, innit?  
Britain will have to pay Brexit bill, Boris Johnson admits – video  
Jeremy Corbyn lied as shamelessly as Theresa May when he campaigned for #Remain in order to keep his job as Labour leader.#Brexit 
Brexit: Farmers who backed Leave now regret vote over subsidy fears | The Independent  
The UK just lost its biggest social housing funder because of Brexit  
Integrating immigrants starts with overcoming the poisonous legacy of the Brexit campaign  
A Brexiteer invents a PhD so as to falsely assert that his doctoral colleagues support Brexit. What does that say? 
Britain heads back to the Brexit table, plans in hand, economy in decline  
Found on our windscreen on returning to the car at #Capbreton  #Brexit  
Why is the government so afraid to publish its Brexit impact studies?  via @politics_co_uk What possible reason? 
Boris Johnson: UK will pay Brexit bill 'as we see it'  
The penny is dropping on the UK's absurd, ill-formed and Pythonesque Brexit policy ideas, says @LesleyRiddoch. 
My *Brexit Is Cancelled* gif is ready...  
The Bank of England is vindicated as Britain's economic growth deteriorates  
#PlymBrexit powerful speech by Prof Melanie Austen how Brexit threatening university flagship Marine research and researchers 
Who'd have thought it? - Johnson was lying during the campaign?Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit  
'@davidkurten: To conflate pride in our nation with hatred is slanderous to vast majority who back Brexit.  
Three nominations so far for Leader of the Opposition to #Brexit@KenClarkeMP@acgrayling@DMiliband All serious nominations welcome. 
Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit  Who is whistling now? 
Boris Johnson concedes that Britain will have to pay to leave the EU  
'@davidkurten: @ChukaUmunna's outburst on Brexit is latest in a string of nonsensical rants.  
The #Brexit lunacy is going to be massively damaging to the UK: The government knows it, but won't tell the public.   
Boris #brexit Johnson has no respect for any principle, no loyalty to any person and no regard for decency.  
How 'poisonous Brexit campaign' fuelled demonisation of immigrants and split Yorkshire communities  
This is all just this week. Even Remainers are starting to question what is going on with the Guardian's Brexit coverage.  
"Students were found to be less likely to overstay their visas than tourists or employees".#Brexit is wrecking a major industry for nothing.  
Because of Brexit you idiot  
A question which kind of answers itself: Why is the government so afraid to publish its Brexit impact studies? 
Oops ...Brexit exodus from London 'to create 80,000 jobs'... in Frankfurt  
Scruffy fop concedes UK will have to pay for #Brexit More Project Reality coming home to roost 
The breakdown of Britain's relationship with the EU condensed into a conversation.#Brexit  
"UK may come to the realisation that Brexit, as they sold it to themselves, isn’t feasible" Irish ex-PM John Bruton. 
WATCH | @EmmaBarnett blasts sad @CoyleNeil for suggesting anti-Brexit campaigners are the true patriots.   
BRITONS WANT A HARD BREXIT WITH NO STRINGS ATTACHED  
Britons demand 'clear cut' Brexit and NO European court influence after March 2019  
Pound heads for its longest losing streak against dollar since January 2015  
Which bus was this on?! Referendum would almost certainly have gone to Remain if this had been known  
Brexit update today.Theresa May consistently lied about foreign students.Boris Johnson lied about our financial commitments to the EU. 
Boris Johnson concedes UK will have to pay for Brexit  
At the root of Brexit denial is an obsessive loathing of the moderate nation state - the most successful ever harnesser of social solidarity  
Incompetence; overwork; bias; no explanation is good. This is the ministry that will have to process 3 million EU citizens post-Brexit. 
Times cartoonist defines Brexit in six images  
The UK just lost its biggest social housing funder because of Brexit  
Great thread on Russian trolls & bots promoting Trump in US, Brexit in UK, separatists in Ukraine, etc... 
Report says Brexit will create some 80,000 jobs - in Frankfurt  
Just learned that a German school book publisher has new special for teaching Brexit (& Trump/post-truth world), and a piece I wrote on 1/  
When will we finally acknowledge Brexit as a racist ideology driving economic suicide and pointless isolationism?  
The Tory plan for Brexit will damage our economy. Pity it's backed up by @jeremycorbyn. 
UK #brexit negotiating position in a nutshell.  
kinda awkward for people in Scotland who don't want to admit the SNP position on the dangers of a hard brexit is bang on. 
UK #Brexit bill:Boris Johnson July: They can go whistleBoris Johnson August: We will meet obligations-Chaotic 
Ethics are like kryptonite to May. If I were Corbyn, I'd focus all the time on how unethical virtually every one of her Brexit policies are. 
In which this ridiculous bunch of hapless cowboys admit that everything they said in the run up to Brexit was a lie.  
The UKIP world view about immigration was the cold beating heart of the case for Brexit. Meet the consequences.  
Britain has revealed a lot about its Brexit strategy but has stayed silent on one huge issue  
David Davis set to go on the attack against 'stubborn' Brussels Brexit negotiators - Davis, a rubbish negotiator!  
Brexit exodus from London 'to create 80,000 jobs'... in Frankfurt | London Evening Standard  
Brexit set to bring 100,000 jobs! To Frankfurt.  
Ironically, thanks to "Good ol' Brexit", simply fucking off to the EU has suddenly become much more difficult.  
Exclusive: EFTA Court president Carl Baudenbacher writes for LSE Brexit about the 'EFTA option'  
Brexit won on slim majority, flawed franchise &pack of lies & false promises. Every day another becomes apparent. Migration stats the latest  
Uncannily similar to Farage's threats of rioting on the streets when Brexit is reversed. I say, ignore threats and do what's plainly right.  
Thread. Billionaires successfully manipulating angry idiots into supporting Trump, Brexit and associated causes. 21st century is hotting up.  
David Davis. Brexit Elite. Liar.  
*The SNP should apologise for not predicting the future**Cos you predicted Brexit right?**Inaudible mumble* 
Most economists say Brexit will hurt the economy—but one disagrees  
Don't worry, Kim Jong-Un. We already voted Brexit.  
Last month's prediction that "uncontrolled mass emigration" would be a big Brexit headline. Thought it would take longer, to be honest.  
LOADS of Twitter accounts are fake/troll/bots etc.If MPs don't realise this they prob, mistakenly, believe Brexit more popular than it is.  
labour created the monster not brexit  
Boris Johnson changes tack on @BBCr4today re Brexit bill “Of course we will meet our obligations, we are law-abiding, bill-paying people” 
Seems immigration stats were inaccurate; given #Immigration drove #Leave vote isn't the slim (52%) maj for #Brexit further undermined? 
Nobody wants to live here. Currency is worthless. Economy is tanking. #Brexit is working 
The UK just lost its biggest social housing funder because of Brexit  
There is NOTHING democratic about the #EURef.There is NOTHING beneficial about #Brexit.There is NO reason to persist with this madness. 
Brexit -  in 581 days, 15 hours, 58 minutes and 43 seconds! #EventCountdown  
Sometimes in life you have to stand up and be counted. Brexit is that moment and we need more Baroness Altmann's  
Theresa May, angrily swatting talented young people away from the UK on the basis of false data, Brexit personified 
Brexit in a flag  
i think we already have a winner for the most brexit story of the day  
Brexit terror study is pure Project Fear. My letter to The Times.   
READ | It's time for politicians to embrace the big opportunities of Brexit. Top economist Roger Bootle is so right! 
Not a surprise. The xenophobic, at times racist, tone of #Brexit campaign was a disgrace. Sadly, this is ongoing!  
When Theresa May was Home Sec. she erected a wall of visa restictions based on bogus data - same data used for Brexit #ShameOnYou #ToriesOut 
More Brexit parallels. Unacceptable to try defending the indefensible with threats like this.  
Another Tory Remainer threatening to quit the party over 'hard Brexit'  
We cannot allow the Brexit Elite's lies and shillbot demagoguery to undermine British democracy. GB is better than Brexit.  
DD-DAY David Davis set to go on the attack against ‘stubborn’ Brussels Brexit negotiators  
International Law Must Prevail For A Biafra Referendum. @Amaka_Ekwo @NkirukaNistoran @NkemdiMary 
Integration is a 2way street - is 'Anti-Brexit Chuka taking his message to the self-segregated, self-policed 'communities'?  
History will not be kind to the 'broken people' of Remain - The Commentator  
The best Brexit talks can do is limit the negative impact warns @peteraltmaier, Angela Merkel's chief of staff 
Investment at a standstill, worst data on record for household finances, manufacturing shrinks. And Brexit's barely getting started.  
Brexit campaign 'harmed integration,' MPs claim  
Why Amsterdam may prove a better EU hub than Frankfurt or Paris for Brexit traders  
Good luck employers. The May government is clearly happy for our economy to tank as long as they can retain the support of Brexit zealots.  
Poisonous tone of debate during EU referendum campaign has fuelled demonisation of immigrants, says @ChukaUmunna 
We really didn't need to wait 14 months to be told this. #StopBrexit Brexit campaign 'harmed integration,' MPs claim  
'Taking back control of OUR waters' Scottish former fisherman hails Brexit 'opportunity'  
We could learn a lot from the Uk.. Except for that whole Brexit thing. That was stupid.  
From a regular correspondent.Must read.  RT  This explains a lot.  #Charlottesville #Brexit #Trump 
Brexit campaign 'harmed integration,' MPs claim  
Without the referendum, special-needs kids remain priority. @GoldwaterInst would force them to get in line with everyone else. #pantsonfire 
Venezuela will hold referendum on new constitution, to be written by assembly packed with allies of President Maduro  
Good to see the Tories are consistent. Convoys of brainless vehicles following the leader. Bit like #Brexit really!  
CORBYNISTA: We want Brexit coz we follow Jeremy!REALITY: It'll harm the working class.CORBYNISTA: That's not our fault. Blame the Tories! 
11) there are literally no good reasons left for doing #Brexit, only head in the sand bravado & self delusionIt's bonkersEnd/ 
10) there may be resignation towards #Brexit in the UK but there's very little passion for it, and no wonder 
7) so genuinely, what was it for?  To the average person in the street, what was the point of #Brexit?How does it improve anyone's life? 
"No one outside of EU wants to trade with Brexit Britain."Why would they? UK looks more dysfunctional day by day.  
It's worth the UK conspiring to stop Brexit just to piss off Peter Bone, Nigel Farage a& Hatie Slopbins. Plus we'd avoid massive recession 
Are Cabinet members criminally liable for non-mandated Brexit? CL&J 181 27 Wolchover 5 final approved (1).pdf  
I studied gravity trade models and spatial econometrics in my Ph. D. a decade ago. No groundbreaking change since then to my knowledge. 
How bizarre. It's almost like destabilising EU-America ties by encouraging Brexit aids Russian superiority. 
Big Poll, should Labour go pro EU & a real change to force general election before #Brexit? #labour #JeremyCorbynRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Sadly accurate reflection of how Brexit will impact on our world, worse we will lose the best and brightest born in the UK to other nations.  
Consumer spending and investment have stalled, raising the spectre of recession in 2018 #StopBrexit #Brexit 
If this were put to a referendum, almost all European countries would vote for it. Too late now for western Europe.  
Boris's best shot at being PM: say Brexit was a great idea (lie) but my colleagues have made such a mess of it all we can do now is reverse. 
The time has come for GB patriots to stand against Brexit.  
(Corbyn's "plan" = slavish support for a Conservative Brexit that will kill jobs and force immigrants out.)  
The ECJ will have influence over the UK whether we are in the Single Market or not.  by @MaryCreaghMP#Brexit 
New @daily_politics anchor:Mummy's a proEU Lab peer who tried to give MPs chance to block BrexitDaddy was Lab leader  
Beginning to think government slipped out these Brexit "relationship papers" in recess not to avoid scrutiny by Remainers but by Brexiteers. 
#ScotnightCorbyn is waffling about EnglandAnd BritainTake your Vow and your Federalism and shove up your Brexit Jeremy 
Morten Morland on the surge in the number of EU nationals leaving the UK since Brexit vote -political cartoon gallery  
Meanwhile, @BBCNews has been accused of "shameful" pro-#Brexit bias by a top professor. Hold. The. Front. Page... 
Read this tragic thread. Brexit based on false facts about foreign students - one of the greatest glories of recent British history  
The UK just lost its biggest social housing funder because of Brexit  
Lying, ignorant, conceited Brexiters said the EU was collapsing. They should look at what's happening now. #Brexit 
Excl: Brexit heats up - David Davis to attack Brussels negotiators for being “stubborn and unreasonable”; 
Centrists: We think Labour should oppose Tories on Brexit.Leftists: Why don’t you f**k off and join Tories?Centrists: Interesting logic.  
Brussels’ negotiators to REJECT Britain’s customs proposals moving closer to a ‘No Deal’  via @Your Brexit 
Mayor of Venice warns anyone heard shouting ‘Allah Akbar’ in city will be SHOT INSTANTLY  via @Your Brexit 
May's Brexit team is turning wishful thinking into an art form. 
Every seat taken in our Perth Brexit debate. Real interest and concern in this impending disaster.  
Imagine if the Victorians had said "we can't build more homes and infrastructure". Take inspiration from them not the Brexit Luddites 
Strangely they are not impressed with us.EU ‘increasingly doubtful’ Brexit talks will move to phase 2 in October   
*Brexit Explained*  
Spotted on Twitter. #Brexit#UKDisaster#NHSbreakingpoint@NHSMillion 
Brexit is going tits up, big time. Alarm bells are sounding from the most informed quarters within the Leave fraternity, time to listen!  
The position papers have reinforced what government was told from the start: the terms in which Brexit was sold are impossible to deliver.  
Makes you thank God we voted to Brexit   
British designers present their latest post brexit clothing ranges.  
#Brexit: We’re leaving? No. They’re leaving. (We’ll miss them when they’ve gone). Share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
Irish Taoiseach Leo Varadkar beautifully clear on:1) Where UK not made Brexit progress2) Why UK has best deal now 
...Which is down to the Brexit vote?  
.@migrationwatch UK chairman says drop in net migration to UK isn't just down to Brexit vote, but also fall in pound's exchange rate #SNT 
Every claim of the Brexit-mongers was either wrong, a blatant lie or grounded in xenophobia. If they were selling cars they'd be jailed 
UK will accept ECJ rulingsImmigration will continueUK will pay EU divorce billUK needs new trade dealWhat's the pointCancel #Brexit 
Talk  to your partners, friends, neighbours, colleagues. Not just to people who agree with you. Together we can defeat Brexit! 
"'We would be unable to feed the nation:' Food industry warns Brexit could leave a third of its firms unviable". 
The Brexit exodus has begun: European workers have started to leave Britain  
The UK has the highest employment in the World, thats because everyone has 3 jobs trying to make ends meet in this bankrupt country #brexit  
Brexit: UK faces 'severe loss' from leaving EU, warns Angela Merkel's chief of staff | The Independent  
They keep denying it, but dig a little and this always reveals itself as the root cause. #Brexit  
The Pound is now so under  valued that it is fast becoming a 3rd World Currency, thanks to the #brexit idiots  
."Brexit vote led to a big fall in the £, which has pushed up inflation, gnawing at consumers' disposable income". 
."The tragedy is that the entirely self-inflicted damage that Brexit will cause could well push us over the edge". 
Biggest news today: EU people abandoning Brexit BritainAny comment from Leader of Opposition, @jeremycorbyn? Nah. Too busy with his flock. 
Net migration to the UK has fallen to the lowest level in three years following last year’s Brexit vote  
When you are in a hole, stop diggingThere needs to be a second referendum to reverse BrexitUK is causing untold self-harm 
."International markets are increasingly looking to Ireland for potential opportunities due to Brexit.". 
Corbyn's position on Brexit has effectively stymied a possible cross Party approach to dumping Brexit in the bin where it belongs 
The immigration stats blunder shows how far perception is from the truth. #Brexit sold on the back of yrs of lies  
IF This government or any government really wanted to stop illegal immigrants entering the UK They could easy But sadly They don't want too 
Brexiteers complain #EU judges may still have some have "indirect control" after #Brexit.  
Will Brexit happen? The (not especially deep) market is far from convinced.  
Jeremy Corbyn is intent on delivering the same hard Brexit as the Tories.  
Our finest days are directly ahead of us. We'll re-invent ourselves as a nation post-BrexitWhat China could do as a nation, so can Britain 
This on EFTA and Brexit is well argued. You may find it persuasive.  
The UK succeeds in global markets because of the inventiveness and grit of Brits. Not because of the EU. We'll progress faster on Brexit. 
After Brexit half-British student Estelle applied to become a permanent resident in the UK. But her application was rejected.  
EU scoffs at UK's Brexit customs proposal: it's just a fairy tale#BrexitMeansExit#ExitMeansOut 
Stay in the loop about our campaign to deselect the Brexit saboteurs by following @DeselectHammond and @DeselectRudd. Letters arriving soon! 
Frankfurt has banks. Paris has culture. But this city may be better for traders after Brexit  
You Brexit enablers are even worse. The Tories had no choice once Cameron got them into this mess. You chose to back this fascistic shitshow 
As Sam Neill recently posted, "BREXIT simplified".  
UK govt announces Brexit goal is to have own cake, eat it, shit it out, eat it all over again, ad infinitum.  
Asda 10" pizzas are no longer 2 for £4.50, just individually priced. That's brexit for ye. That's what ye voted for 
Matt on surge in the number of EU nationals leaving the UK since last June's Brexit vote - political cartoon gallery  
Results Day and skills shortage due to forthcoming Brexit by Patrick Blower - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Can anyone name one thing we can do after Brexit that we are unable to do now?We already have sovereignty and trade with RoW. 
Spoke to @BBCNews about Corbyn's visit to Scotland. How is his hard Brexit stance is any different from Theresa May?  
How many more examples like this does this government need to grasp that the solution is to stay in the EU?#Brexit 
How about tackling the scandal of removing long held international rights from UK citizens? #Labour's #Brexit stance is indefensible.  
the UK just lost its biggest funder of social housing, the European Investment Bank. #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
The number of EU citizens emigrating from Britain has increased by a third in the wake of the EU referendum  
The truth is that no professor seems to know the truth about Brexit's economic impact  
#brexit drama? Yes. Car exports up. Food exports up. Tourism up. Deficit down. OMG!  
A jaw-dropping detail in the Tories’ latest Brexit plan reveals exactly what ‘deal’ they’re after  
.@arizona_sos rallies in support of school-voucher referendum at school @dougducey visiting in downtown, Goldwater Institute sues over sigs. 
 congratulations @conservatives, @ScotTories and @theresa_may #Brexit #BrexitShambles get us out of here #ScotRef 
I've been to the launch of every one of the Government's Brexit position papers. So I wrote this.  
Its hard not to say we told you so as Brexit unravels exactly as Scotgov & indy supporters predicted...  
.@jeremycorbyn is intent on delivering the same hard #Brexit as the Tories. That's not what Scotland voted for.  
Kurdistan election commission launched website for diaspora electronic vote for the referendum.From 1-7/9/2017 registration & filling form.  
It seems the main political parties believe national suicide to be popular with the voters.#brexit 
Likely that such an 'adequacy deal' would be necessary for coop btw @Europol and UK after Brexit. But UK data standards relatively high  
This either takes genius spinning it as a positive, along with all the other disasters, or brain dead acceptance. 
Soft Brexit, for example joining EFTA, is totally pointless. It is like trashing your seat on the bus, then remaining but standing & shaky. 
Excellent piece: Brexit made me an immigrant in the country I was born in—I can't just "let it go"  via @prospect_uk 
Bad news for many Scottish companies ...Big net migration fall since Brexit vote, latest estimates show - BBC News  
A post-Brexit decline in UK net migration is driven by the departures of EU citizens from central and eastern Europe  
Active measures alert: this will be an important Russian propaganda theme is the UK moves towards brexit. You'll see more of this.  
Al Gore says Brexit was caused by… climate changeAlt Left Media- It's Al Gore who has the mental issues  
As part of the process of recovery from "brexit", the Courts must now take politician's hate crimes very seriously  
1. In my book #AlternativeWar, I tackle Russian interference in the UK's Brexit and the US election of Trump head-on, 
Your occasional reminder that Jason Kenny and Andrew Sheer think that Brexit is a good idea. #cdnpoli 
So #Brexit is just a massive mistake based on a huge error. Cancel it now.  
At the root of Brexit is petty nationalism - a false & divisive ideology dependent on xenophobia & real or induced ignorance of history. 
Thanks Labour. Because of your support for Brexit, the European Investment Bank just pulled out of UK social housing  
Mrs May must urgently address the exodus of UK citizens or risk undermining Brexit's potential #Premium 
Brexit voters have demanded a “clear cut” exit from the European Union  
Some common sense at last from the Brexit Department. Main message to the EU is: 'We're no longer the EU's mugs'.   
The UK is officially one of the worst performing economies in the world  Nothing to do with Brexit, of course! 
Well done Tories.Well done #BrexitUK soon to be 'poor man of Europe' again just like the time before we joined EU. 
Despite Brexit, innit  
It is absurd to claim that the UK must keep ECJ jurisdiction to maintain close trade links with the EU   #Brexit 
Easy to shout at Tories for Brexit. But remember, some Tories are as anti-Brexit as Corbyn is pro-Brexit.Saints & sinners in both parties.  
With respect to data exchange and protection, we are clear that Brexit offers vast opportunities to change as little as possible. 
Wow through 8000 Followers today. V. proud to have so many followers interested in what I have to say about the world, London &partic Brexit 
This will go well Brexit: Britain says it should still be able to influence EU regulations after leaving.  
Ask Abrexa: our new digital assistant on Brexit  
Met with @EUAmbIraq today, spoke of the latest political developments and esp. the referendum 
Loss of EU workers threatens a loss of vital skills for British business #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The way the pound is depreciating and cost of living going up due to Brexit, people will need a lot more that £10ph.Fight Brexit, man! 
The two most significant tweets on my timeline today. BREXIT was, as we all really new, utter bollox.  
'It's Brexit or nothing' UK must sever ties with EU courts or voters will feel BETRAYED  @theresa_may 
The Customs 'solution' proposed by the UK Government is a 'fairy tale' according to senior sources. #Brexit  
Brexit is such an unbelievable shitshow. 
Tories: ARGH ID CARDS ARE EVILAlso Tories: ARGH IMMIGRATION IS OUT OF CONTROLTories after Brexit: ARGH WHY DON'T WE KNOW WHO GETS IN/OUT? 
This is very good by @knightinawig on today's government Brexit data protection position paper  
David Davis right to challenge EU demands for a large ‘Brexit Bill’. Nothing is agreed until everything is agreed  
"They only come to claim our generous benefits, not to work" another myth on which Brexit was built busted  
UK economy performing the worst of the G7 as a result of the damage done by the #Brexit vote.  
Many EU citizens aren't waiting for Brexit to leave the UK. 
#UN #Biafra If marriage is by force according to Nigerian Gov' I wonder why #EU offer Britain a referendum to break out from European Union,  
Brexit is a battle in a larger war about whether Britain becomes European or American  
Turkish nationalist leader says Iraqi Kurdish referendum a potential reason for war  
She's lived in the UK since 6 yrs old & has a British mother but denied permanent residency in Brexit Britain  
*Brexit Explained*  
Brexit: UK retail sales growth plunges at fastest rate in over a year, shows survey - The Independent  
Was told day after referendum by a Brixiteer that fall in pound was irrelevant and it would soon rise in value.  Wishful thinking.  
Brexit was never about truth but how people "feel". Anti immigration rhetoric from RW & most recently Corbyn, lay the ground work for it.  
* @patmcfaddenmp asserting that we must argue for international cooperation against self-harming nationalism #Brexit  
Brussels has overplayed its hand on EU law after Brexit  
Another reason why anti-Brexit campaigners are the real patriots; Brexit will damage jobs, incomes & opportunities:  
Racism unleashed by Brexit went from being conversation one could only hold in men's toilets to your front room to national news on #Radio4 
#Brexit 'divorce bill' technically zero. Let's see EU's trade deal then we can price it up and make an offer.   
Brexit broke it."UK economy grew at half the rate of the eurozone’s in second quarter of 2017".#FoolBritannia  
Not just them. We non-EU immigrants don't want to live in post-Brexit Britain either. We admired the openness, tolerance, & EU relationship. 
1/ Time for the daily thread on the government's latest Brexit paper. If it's Thursday, it must be data protection (links below).  
An interesting thread from people who actually want to Brexit.  Not wrong.  
In Feb MPs were warned re Brexit problems for EU nationals. Tabled amendment to protect. But Tory MPs defeated it  
#Brexit thread. URGENT. 1. So we are playing guessing games about the possibility of Efta or shadow Efta. Why are we having to guess? 
Thoughts UK net migration dropping lowest in 3 years? Big net migration fall since Brexit vote latest estimates show  
England voted for Brexit over an immigration "crisis" that never even existed. Economic suicide on the back of paranoia fuelled xenophobia.  
Only another referendum "can legitimise the shift in opinion many of them detect" argues @campbellclaret 
There should be sackings and resignations over this, but I doubt it. Brexit Britain is going to be a mean, nasty little place.  
If the £ reaches parity with the Euro, the Euro might as well become the currency of the UK post #brexit. Make holidaying simpler for all. 
Let's say in June 2016, your weekly food shop was £80. In Aug 2016, that same shop now costs £100. Why isn't this common knowledge? #BREXIT 
This by @MikeH_PR shows Moscow-time tweeter DavidJo52951945 has a phone number which is a UKIP contact number in Northern Ireland#Brexit  
When mayors rule the world.  Given Brexit, Trumpism & reactionary populism, we are moving into a world of localized welfare states ...  
President Barzani met EU, German &British Ambassadors.Reiterated,no turning back on Referendum, continue dialogue w/Baghdad on independence  
India has committed grave human rights violations in Kashmir. Time for Referendum coz#PlebisciteIsMyRight 
Those sunny Brexit uplands we were promised look more & more like a distant dream don't they. #brexitshambles 
Scottish independence truly is the ONLY way to save our economy. Brexit will destroy Scotland.  
The EU anti-tax-avoidance measures will apply to members of the Single Market, so no wonder the Tories want out of it. #Brexit 
Free data flow and data protection harmonisation is another mine field in Brexit process. Critical for business.   
Alan Partridge BBC return confirmed: 'He would have voted Brexit for sure. Hard Brexit'  via @TeleTVRadio 
The UK government has published a paper on "The exchange and protection of personal data” after Brexit:  1/ 
In years to come history will report that 2016 was the year that people on both sides of the pond took leave of their senses. #brexit #trump 
This won't stop the tabloids making up things to foam at the mouth about. They pollute the public debate & foster toxins like Brexit.  
Either we ask again or our sovereign Parlt stops Brexit.  
Why Amsterdam may prove a better EU hub than Frankfurt or Paris for Brexit traders  
That *popping* noise you hear was the whole Brexit argument exploding in a puff of xenophobia.  
Flashbacks to a chat with my g'dad, in which he is genuinely astounded that applications for EU citizenship have risen since the referendum.  
I find it shocking & dismaying that thousands of our fellow EU citizens are leaving the UK because of Brexit - what has my country become!? 
More Brexit chaos. But Scotland has a choice. We don't have to jump off the Brexit cliff. #ScotlandinEurope 
Simples pre #Brexit tories losing votes to UKIP. They feared a split base keeping them out for a generation. Sacrifice country, save party!  
Complete scandal: the whole immigration narrative for the last 10 years driven by entirely false data.  #Brexit  
Great irony of Brexit would be if it left ministers scrabbling to attract immigrants to under-staffed industries.  
The govt finally showing some realism about Brexit (@IanDunt) Which just makes #Brexit look all the more pointless 
But this was what Brexit was about - poorer but purer: identity politics at expense of prosperity  
Britons demand 'clear cut' Brexit and NO European court influence after March 2019  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
And people say they weren't 'misled' by all the #brexit bullcrap. What a disaster.  
Conor we demand an appolgy for calling unarmed #Biafra #Referendum Insurgent and lying against @amnesty report  
Years of inaccurate student data driving policy.Deportation letters sent in error to EU nationals.But "innovative IT" will sort out Brexit 
VSO expects to cut UK workforce by one quarter due to #Brexit - such a shame!  
UK govt Brexit euphemism of the day. Reporter: Do you see any upsides in [x policy field]? "We are not looking for any additionality." 
Racists are targeting mosques across Spain with flares, graffiti and abuse  via @MetroUK 
So! He's a supporter of Brexit - think it's actually quite a clever way of getting our agenda out there against the REMAINSTREAM media bias  
Today's @EveningStandard: the Grenfell student who got an A in GCSE she sat after the fire & @peterfrankopan on Brexit threat to academics  
Russia was very keen on #Brexit. Follow the money. MSNBC did a brilliant expose on @maddow in March. Farage up to his neck in Roubles. 
Yay! Referendum on Trump 2020! POLL: AZ Sen. Jeff Flake Trailing GOP Primary Challenger Kelli Ward By Double Digits  
Britain's consumers are putting the brakes on spending  
People are so BORED with Brexit.But that doesn't mean it's going away. 
A third of UK food firms won't be able to operate properly without EU workers after #Brexit, the industry warns  
I have no doubt Russian money funded the #Brexit lies. They want the EU to fail. Farage is up to his neck in Roubles. 
... except the recognition by Govt that after #Brexit the EU WILL have unavoidable influence over the UK but the UK will have NO say in EU.  
It's official: just planning for #Brexit has damaged the economy. Impacts will be far worse if we actually leave EU 
BREXODUS: 122,000 EU citizens leave UK, net migration falls after Brexit vote. But it's still got a long way to go. 
Is anyone surprised? Honestly?The bile ridden Brexit doctrine shamed our nation. Who the fuck would come here now? 
-Consumer spending weak-Falling £-No trade boost-Growth slowest in G7Welcome to #Brexit 
I want a list of those companies that campaigned for or supported Brexit. Then I can decide where I spend my money. Or not.  
This incredible statistical inaccuracy begs huge questions of how UK gov functions and decisions made. Bodes *very* ill for #Brexit  
Women only carriages: daftBut I am in favour of Brexit segregation. Brexiters get smelly 1970s pre-EU trains & Remainers get nice new ones  
Home Office error perhaps foreshadows Brexit future and reveals real incompetence  
Huge excitement with the Position Papers this week.But boss has decided that our 50 papers on Brexit impact would be just TOO exciting... 
thread on the network of twitter accounts that have supported Russian invasion of Ukraine/Brexit/Trump. Now they want Merkel out...  
Calls for "Brexit audits in every constituency, to explain at a local level what Brexit entail"  
The Brexit effect: how EU migrants are already leaving the UK.  
Immigration Down, EU Citizens Leaving in Greater Numbers Since Brexit Vote  
The government's paper on the ECJ is proof that Theresa May's thinking on Brexit has changed, says James Kirkup  
Ur right...the pound is impacting us ex pats but i would rather struggle financially than come back to a country that voted for Brexit! 
Britain will boom once free from the EU’s destructive policies, says leading economist  #Brexit 
Brexit: John's firm supplies farm workers, he says they've had 'the worst shortfall in years because of the value of pound and xenophobia'  
Southampton airport offering just 0.872 euros to £1 #Brexit - making Britons poorer. 
We have irreparably damaged brand UK. Brexit is our Ratners moment.  
I've been lucky enough to be granted a rare interview with Sir Humphrey Appleby, who gives me his thoughts on Brexit.  
The Brexit effect ? More than half today's fall in net migration caused by EU citizens going home  
1/3 of companies in Britain’s food & drink sector could be left unviable due to #Brexit-fuelled workforce shortages 
Great pity wasnt published in Jun '16. Yet another reason why EU referendum was called too early by PM Cameron. Tragic as history will judge  
Evening Standard: The pound is now worth less than the euro at UK airports Well done #Brexit! 
Net migration falls to 246,000 in lead-up to Brexit as thousands of EU citizens leave  
I think it was Martin Luther King Jr who said'All lies wash away in the end'We are at that stage now with Brexit. 
Referendum is on time. Turkey won't close border after Kurdistan referendum: FM  
The EU Keeps going on about a divorce settlement As we were never asked if we wanted to be married This marriage is legally annulled 
Who would want to come to work in the UK now? Brexit insanity, xenophobia, failing currency and a bunch of idiots/liars running the country.  
.@brightonargus can U stop naming our bike rental scheme after a man with no connection to it or our city other than damaging it via Brexit! pic.twitter.com/zOmSh3BIBN 
The #brexit government admits1. we always had sovereignty2. immigration never was a problemSo why, exactly, are we wrecking our country?  
Another Leave account suggests that survival is the best we can hope for in Brexit Britain. I want GB to own the future. To thrive. #Remain  
Net migration falls, driven by rise in EU citizens leaving UK -  at least in part reflects impact of Brexit vote:  
Our very own Best for Britain champion Ruth Cadbury calling on Corbyn to resist Brexit! No Brexit MUST be an option on the table #champion 
Daily Briefing- Macron's protective EU mission- UK's Brexit data protection plans- Holland makes concert arrest 
Theresa May's obsession with student immigration numbers now shown to have been based on false statistics, as many had thought.#Brexit  
Shocking & completely unacceptable.  Government is turning lives upside down by incompetence & callously playing hard ball over #Brexit  
Steve Bell on the UK’s Brexit negotiations – cartoon  
#Brexit was built on #lies and #hatred. 
As the UK posts its first surplus for 15 years we ask whether it should start a post #Brexit sovereign wealth fund:  
We are being dragged over a cliff by 37% of the electorate who chose an option on an advisory referendum. 63% don't want this.  
Turkey's nationalist opposition leader Bahçeli says Turkey should treat KRG's independence referendum as a casus belli 
Borderline Insanity: What Does Brexit Mean for Northern Ireland?  
“Economic sanctions against itself” is such a sharp description of brexit  
After Brexit half-British student Estelle applied to become a permanent resident in the UK. But her application was rejected.  
I fucking hate every bastard thing about Brexit. The whole mental cess pit of fear and ignorance, unthinking and unimaginative nullity of it 
Today's print edition of @guardian contains the latest #Brexit-watch assessment by @D_Blanchflower and myself: 
Lots of good sense in this by @DenisMacShane. Especially like the idea of a Brexit audit for every constituency  
Agriculture will be badly affected by Brexit anyway, but Minford plan wd be catastrophic. (First time I've tweeted a link to 'Pig World')  
Channel 4 presenter Jon Snow admits he was WRONG on Brexit and is an out-of-touch 'elite'  So True! 
Govt mismanaged migration, could not count, did not control - leading to misplaced moral panic and damaging #Brexit 
I was always proud to be British—but after Brexit, I barely recognise my country  
Project Fear report on post-Brexit security leaked. In fact we will be much safer after Brexit. My letter in today's Times. @VeteransBritain 
Are Brexit negotiations a cunning EU strategy – to bore us into submission? | Suzanne Moore  
If @UKLabour had fought Brexit this wouldn't have happened.  
Every person who ticked the Leave box in the rigged referendum is partly responsible for the #Brexit crisis & shd be ashamed of themselves  
Sultan has right for his own opinion but we must respect Biafra opinion too allow them to decide through Referendum 
The Brexit parallels -  
When even the Telegraph is saying (I paraphrase) the government couldn't organise a piss up in a Brexit brewery ... #juststay 
Get your report clear @amnesty report 150 #Biafra killed not 60.Biafra call for Referendum is not insurgency http:// 
Banner in Erbil reads "YES is a national duty. No is a national treason." Post-referendum 'll be a witch-hunting era where criticism=treason  
Mountains of bad news are being buried under brexit coverage. Here's Peter Wilby on the Learndirect scandal in the @NewStatesman 
I do wonder where peoples loyalties lay. Have you not a job, wife, children, a home, friends, a life in the UK? Yes? Time to bin Brexit.  
Opinion is changing. That change can accelerate if pro-Europeans focus on telling communities what Brexit real means  
Frankfurt has banks. Paris has culture. But this city may be better for traders after Brexit  
BREXIT:UK food industry warns that workforce shortage could leave third of its businesses unviable.There are 1.6 million unemployed in UK.  
More evidence Brexit was based on mythology. "It had been thought". Why would govt think that's how so many international students behave?  
Corbyn voted Brexit, corbyn wants nuclear weapons in Scotland, don't be sucked in, he is establishment, not a nice guy. 
The only reason Brexit is continuing is because the protagonists are prioritising saving face over the national interest. 
This city may be the most attractive to trading firms looking for a post-Brexit home   
Brexit: Employers' confidence in UK economy slumps, raising 'red flag' for government | The Independent  
Half of the UK's Food Industry Might Bail Because of Brexit |  
According to the Brexiteers the EU & the Euro are failing. Tragically it's the UK & the Pound which are falling off the Brexit cliff.  
UK launches an aircraft carrier but can't afford the planes. Says a lot about Brexit. Brilliant from @philipstephens 
TY @AbelaCarmelo for hosting @BorisJohnson for great evening. #brexit, #commonwealth, #libya & more. Minds nicely met. Here's to friends. 
They obvs didn't carry out studies on this prior to Ref either!Food industry warns of Brexit workforce shortage -  
If you like that, then you'll LOVE this:Enjoy your destructive Brexit aftermath you gleefully voted for.  
Ireland is preparing for a 30% fall in exports to the UK and a GDP fall by -3% in the decade after Brexit.This is grim.  
Iran and Turkey set redlines on Kurdistan referendum ; all options are on the table  via @AlMonitor 
This city may be the most attractive to trading firms looking for a post-Brexit home   
Brexit and M&A  
Daddy, what were Trump and Brexit?No one can remember, son. Now shut up and finish that rat and what's left of your sister. 
A year on from Brexit  
Today we joined w/ AZ parents & others to challenge signatures on #ESA referendum. Students deserve options.    
.@GoldwaterInst files suit against anti-voucher referendum, says @arizona_sos filed "thousands of extremely questionable signatures" 
I am a proud #Biafran. My priority & goal is to ensure that #Biafra is restored. #Support #Referendum (#BiafrExit) for #Biafra. 
THIS: The anatomy of a Russian bot net that has changed its mission numerous time since 2013 fm Brexit to Trump #TrumpRussia 
Turkish Foreign Minister in his meeting with the Turkmen delegation confirms Turkish rejection of the Kurdish referendum in the region  
Nicola Sturgeon just put a giant spanner in the works of Theresa May’s Brexit plans  via @thecanarysays 
Love the govt's Brexit strategy, EU to give everything demanded otherwise there will be problems and it's all the EU's fault Davis grin 
Trump, Brexit, Russia, Big Data, Dark Money, the Alt-right. It's the same roll of pennies. And we need to start seeing it as such again. 
I have a career and a life to get on with. But it's all been put on hold coz of Brexit. Like so many others. What a monumental waste of time 
What is going on? @jameschappers was taking on everyone on #Brexit for a heady week. And now silence for 6 days. What’s up? Is all ok James? 
Food industry warns of Brexit workforce shortage  
Corbyn is a mix between Tories and UKIP with his Brexit/Trident views. SNP are without a doubt more socialist thn Lab is and I was 40yrs Lab  
Sorry @johnmcdonnellMP but you aren't exactly covering yourselves in glory right now especially how you are supporting Tory Brexit.  
British data protection laws to stay 'aligned' with the EU's after Brexit  
Did we have a referendum on PR, in 2011? No. Did MPs explicitly reject an amendment giving voters a PR option? Yes. 
‘Migration figures far lower than thought’Might have been a good idea to work this out before the EU referendum. 
I'll happily say it again: You cannot be pro-European and pro-Corbyn. He supports Brexit wholeheartedly. 
Spending an afternoon in a hospital you realise two things:1) @NHSEngland is amazing 2) Brexit is insane @MinistryBrexit 
Martina Anderson attempting to pontificate about risks to tourism re. Brexit despite being in prison for conspiring to bomb seaside resorts. 
What thoroughly unpleasant people  #Brexit  
I took this photo in Dublin after the Irish marriage equality referendum. Get on it, Australia: enrol and say YES.  
Don't bin them - TWEET THEM! Don't let them brush this under the carpet. Expose the shame! #Brexit  
UK finance sector proposes "ambitious" post-Brexit trade pact  
Employers' confidence in UK economy slumps as Brexit concerns mount  
12 yo is in love with Newry. We went up again today as pre-secondary school treat. Will break hearts if we ever see a border ..... #Brexit 
\ @DanielJHannan getting desperate with this exercise in wacky logic. Either that or he's enjoying herbal cigarettes.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
The EU is implementing an anti-tax avoidance directive applying to all Single Market members starting on Jan 1 2019.#Brexit  
The Pound has now totally collapsed against the Euro thanks to the Thick Racist #brexit morons, we are now a bankrupt nation Wake Up idiots 
Three reasons remainers should stop calling for a second referendum on Brexit | Denis MacShane  
The funders of the Leave campaigns don't seem to like paying taxes, by @JolyonMaugham #StopBrexit #Brexit /1 
If true David Cameron was much closer to his tens of thousands of target and the referendum was fought on a false premise.  #brexitreality 
Hm. Trump voters not changing their minds.. Brexit voters not changing their minds.. weird.  
So what was the point of Brexit?Most of my career by the way was spent working for immigrants or people domiciled overseas for tax purposes  
£ fell through the floor now at an all time low DUP ignore democracy &call us remoaners 4 rejecting Brexit disaster #designatedspecialstatus 
Are you satisfied Theresa May has insisted the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice in the UK will come to an end with Brexit? 
By this stage of Brexit, nothing in this article will change anybody's mind.  But it will affirm views already held.  
Brexit has consumed the airwaves with so much political flatulence and diverted attention from other key priorities.  
It's not the unknown outcome of Brexit that has caused the pound's collapse. It is the known outcome. 
Corbyn and Labour have helped the Tories all along in Brexit leading to this from @GuyVerhofstadt 
Pound slumps to eight-year low against the Euro on Brexit uncertainty  
Here's a prescient remark by philosopher Richard Rorty in 1998 anticipating the rise of Trump/#Brexit style populist politics.#StopBrexit 
Brexit is not a football match. Not about who won on the day. It's about what's best for UK, its people & the world, for generations to come 
@BrexitBin Brexit explained @solange_lebourg @JolyonMaugham 
First thing my daughter told me after referendum was "Daddy, does it mean we have to leave". Truth comes from the children's mouth.  
Brexit: Frankfurt and Dublin set to sweep bank jobs away from UK 
We need to take back control from this incompetent, failing, minority @Conservatives Brexit government...  
3 reasons remainers should stop calling for a 2nd ref on Brexit>Read the article NOT the headline. Excellent article  
The weakness of SNP response today shows that idea of a 2nd referendum is dead. Beyond trying to discredit facts they're not even trying. 
Post-Brexit, UK now worried they'll be forced to embrace US-style mega farms–chlorine-washed chicken…unlabeled genetically modified products  
If even a fraction voted Brexit for racism then - as Brexit was won by a fraction - Brexit was won because of racism. So morally invalid. 
Tomorrow @ScotNational @LesleyRiddoch on how others are finally coming round to what we've been saying all along about Brexit  
So EU cits have every right to worry - and demand ECJ. Nothing to stop them being treated as shoddily as ppl from rest of world after Brexit  
Govt finally understanding that #Brexit Britain will have to accept either EU or US standards (by @IanDunt) #Remain 
I wish it was okay to say that a lot of  people voted for Brexit for racist reasons. Because they did. 
Absolutely disgraceful. This clueless Tory Brexit turning callous and vindictive.  
The #ECJ ruled that the #ECB could not insist on Euro clearing houses being based in eurozone. London benefited. #Brexit zealots are daft. 
Brexit has made a mess out of the UK. 
Britain's economy may be struggling more than it appears, bank warns  
Why #Britain needs to reconsider #Brexit. Please read and share @Jon_Danzig’s report. Link:  
The damage already caused by the #Brexit farce will take years to repair. All those responsible should hang their heads in shame. #NoBrexit 
Gov't could be willing to compromise in Brexit talks, possibly in return for single market access, writes @joncraig 
Only if you swallow the line that Brexit supporters don't like foreigners. Many want to be global rather than inward looking Europeans. 
SIGN PETITION: Naz Shah MP to be SACKED for ‘abused girls should shut their mouths’ retweet  via @Your Brexit 
."Brexit has influenced the influx of talent TO Ireland – particularly FROM London.". 
President Barzani told Turkish Foreign minister that we lost hope & trust in Iraq,federalism & partnership failed. Referendum is our right  
The terms on which Brexit was sold are impossible to deliver, and today's position paper is just one more example.  
The failure of pro-EU politicians to unite is one of the most utterly pathetic spectacles of modern political history.#StopBrexit #Brexit 
Demand is surging for goods made in the euro area  
"1 of Canada's largest banks ditched plans to exit Ireland after Brexit persuaded it to RAMP UP operations instead" 
#Brexit/#Trump troll with 1000s of followers claims to be English, but tweets in Moscow working hours Good thread 
The Guardian view on UK Brexit policy: this time the lady is for turning | Editorial  
I'm on CNN talking about today's UK govt Brexit ECJ paper about 8.15pm UK time  
The unintended consequences of #Brexit continue to be exposed every time a position paper is published. It really is a disastrous mess 
Brexit has changed things  
Tomorrow night. Debating Brexit with a Scottish Tory MP. I think it might be fun. Come along.  
."One by one, the brittle positions on Brexit set out by the PM over the past year are crumbling". 
#channel4news Chuka Umunna bore still on talking bollocks non stop every bloody day trying to derail Brexit idiot 17 million voted leave 
.@ChukaUmunna is doing a better job of opposing the government's cackhanded Brexit than the entire Labour Party. 
David Allen Green: The role of the European Court of Justice after Brexit is complicated. The UK lacks an answer.  
This will help speed things up David Davis to avoid putting Brexit payment on table in Brussels   
A moment in time in the Brexit induced slide of the pound!  
'Owen, if you bang on about the trains again, it might distract everyone from our frankly embarrassing position on Brexit'  
Trump and Putin are fascists at war with our democracy. This is a time for European democratic solidarity not #Brexit#StopBrexit #Remain 
I'm well off Corbyn and his Brexit Bunch these days. Independence all the way. 
In years to come history will report that 2016 was the year that people on both sides of the pond took leave of their senses. #brexit #trump 
Pound hitting 8 year low nothing to do with Brexit Professor at University of Life assures public 
Something else has been puzzling me for a while about Brexit, sovereignty & taking back control of our laws [thread] 1/16 
Wait a minute. The lawyers will be richer. And the billionaire backers of Brexit, who will chuck away their workers’ EU-protected rights…  
The only difference now between Trump and Brexit is that the rigor mortis is a bit more obvious in the case of the former. 
Big Ben is deid £ hits 8 year low against Euro 'Colonel' @RuthDavidsonMSP 's gone AWOL & #Brexit Britain heads for cliff edge. Unionism eh?  
Our public warnings to  re Brexit eco-disaster were censored by @Ofcom. I predict  will need IMF money before Big Ben bongs again. 
I call upon Jeremy Corbyn to keep his unionist nose out of Scotland's business and concentrate on the mess of England and his Brexit madness  
Great initiative by @PaddyMulroe in podcasts on the border. Was a pleasure to discuss all things Brexit with him for this one.  
A disgraceful, innuendo ridden piece of xenophobia from so called socialists - who are also of course keen on #Brexit...  
Brexit wants to take back control from Europe - they've given us terrible things like better rights for workers, cleaner air & safer food 
Are we, the media, the worst people in the world? Is Trump making America great again? Is Brexit making Britain great again? #EdTVFest 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Britain has softened its stance on new legal rules for Brexit  
Who will enforce environmental laws after #Brexit?  
Brexit: consuming the airwaves with so much political flatulence. How much time had we devoted to social housing in this year? #EdTVFest 
I firmly believe that if another EUref took place today that Remain would winSo why are Labour/Corbyn hell bent on a hard Brexit? 
Local areas need £8.4 billion of EU funding replaced after Brexit☟ 
Brexit is a devaluing and demoralising journey into dark isolation for all - time to reverse.  
Fantastic day with vibrant MP @gildernewm whose personality is embraced by all she meets -serious #Brexit discussions and support uplifting  
Govt buried report showing terrorism, crime & illegal migration will increase after #Brexit.  
The Supreme Court will be the ultimate arbiter of law in the UK after Brexit, Prime Minister Theresa May has said  
Didn’t give a toss about #TrainGate then & don’t give a toss about it nowWhat I do give a toss about is Corbyn supporting Tory hard Brexit 
Theresa May says the UK will leave the ECJ after Brexit. But it's not that simple. Our @FactCheck team investigates. 
All this reading is hurting my head. Can't we just stop Brexit on humanitarian grounds? 
Big shout out to those who voted #Brexit to stop the pound replacing the Euro.  =  
We so desperately wanted to believe in her hard brexit but should have known her globalist controllers would be too strong  
"Leo Varadkar is emerging as a most skilled participant" in talks on Ireland's #Brexit border, writes Bruce Clark. 
From the infamous £350m bus, to pledges on EU judges, the government is admitting the terms that Brexit was sold are impossible to deliver.  
Should anything which allows the European Court of Justice to maintain its hold over Britain be resisted? #brexitRETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
On the Brexit dispute resolution paper: 15 mentions EEA, 14 of EFTA, including court & surveillance authority 1/10  
Remember when Remainers told us all the airlines would leave the UK after voting Brexit? - Part II  
Today the disaster that is Brexit just keeps on giving ...  
Brexit: Civil servants are finally fighting back against unrealistic ministers  
Lakini wacha niwaulize, si hata any referendum ya ku secede will be conducted by IEBC?  
Brexit - It's just fraud. The people responsible for crashing the £ are criminals.  
#Brexit was wake-up call. Europe is more popular now than before. People have seen the alternative is mad chaos.  
The EU wants to set the Brexit agenda, but Britain is fighting back says @asabenn 
Brexit is like cutting off your legs because you don't like your shoes. I remain convinced that it still won't happen beyond cosmetic change 
There is no delay for the Referendum. It was reiterated in today's mtg it will be held on time.Talks w/ Baghdad continue on post referendum.  
I see the UK has finally joined the Euro #Brexit #BreakingNews 
At what point does HMG's aim of creating a shadow EU membership begin to make people wonder whether Brexit is really worth it? 
#Brexit lie after brexit lie is being exposed. In this case, the myth that EU law won't impact UK law after a brexit:  
A pound for a euro, what a great idea #Brexit was. 
The position papers have reinforced what government was told from the start: the terms in which Brexit was sold are impossible to deliver.  
Almost every complaint Continuity Remain folk hv abt govt Brexit policy seems to me to arise from never having understood what Leave wanted. 
Britain under #TheresaMay and #AmberRudd. #HomeOffice #EUcitizens #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit #brexitshambles #Bresistance #EU #Tories 
Remainers should continue to campaign for Remain. The concessions in the ever-weakening Brexit position is evidence that Brexit is dying.  
Remember when £500 got you €600 in holiday money at the Post Office? Not any more.The cost of #Brexit. And this is just the start.  
'It's inconceivable!' @PeterBoneUK rubbishes idea of no flights from UK to EU after Brexit  
There never was any point to Brexit, but if anything could make pointlessness more pointless, this is it.  
They way to Independence is not via Westminster. It is by a UN monitored Scottish Referendum, called by SG. If 'Yes', progress UDI via UN. 
Good exchange with @RogMull of @theSNP on areas of cooperation, political developments, institutional ties, capacity building & #Referendum.  
Disgraceful xenophobic rag, The Express, view @jeremycorbyn as a Brexit ally.Does that make you proud, @UKLabour? 
Oxford Economics raise the chances of no Brexit deal from 30% to 40% - say UK's position papers have deepened the negotiations stand off. 
U.K. Economy Even Weaker Than It Looks - Heading for near stagnation, thanks Brexit!  
I see the Corbyn 'left' are yet again in hysterics over a train but not in hysterics about the impending disaster of Brexit. Priorities eh 
Majority opposes Brexit, overall unionist majority gone. NI politics in completely new construct - By Brian Rowan.  
"There's nothing the Gov can do to gloss over that"WATCH: @ChrisLeslieMP slams Leave campaign on lies during referendum after Gov climbdown  
Constructive talks b/w #PresidentBarzani & #SecDef @DeptofDefense on #KRG #US ties, war on #ISIS, role of #Peshmerga & upcoming #Referendum.  
An unpublished Home Office report showed that Britons could be more at risk of terrorism and crime after Brexit. 
Here's the thing: I don't care if #Brexit makes us all rich. The social & cultural damage alone is enough to stop it  
A clip of my BBC Breakfast interview this morning on the UK and ECJ post-Brexit - ICYMI - ta @mpc_1968 
@Nkirukanistoran @amaka_ekwo @emekaGift #UNSC Avert looming WAR in #Nigeria West Africa;Give us a date for Biafra Referendum @NLatUN @AU @EU 
Britain sets out plans to break free of European Court after Brexit  
The clock is ticking, and if we are going to stop a hard job-destroying Brexit, we have to oppose it now.  
We are pathetically..incompetent. Brexit pissing people off. We are making such fools of ourselves! #CrumblingBrexit  
Why is #Brexit being allowed to proceed?  
And another one. Leading historian facing deportation in 'absurd' Brexit ruling  
Theresa May's Home Office hid a study warning that Brexit could leave Britons at greater risk of crime and terrorism 
Where are we going first?StornowayAnything I shud know?Ah... Stornoway Black pudding will lose its protection under your Brexit plans Jez  
The day we'll have a referendum to scrap the women rep, senators and revert back our constituencies to 210, I'll be the happiest Kenyan. 
The Times claims one such study says we may be at risk of more crime & terrorism after Brexit but shush let's not tell the electorate 
If Project Fear is a terrible figment of the Remainer's  imagination then why is the Gov refusing to publish 50 Brexit impact studies? 
With the EU any other trade relation than WTO rules would mean UK taking on board decisions of ECJ.Then why #Brexit? #remain 
15. Second, paper is a Heath Robinson contraption designed so there is no ("direct") ECJ jurisdiction post-Brexit, even on EU law issues. 
11.  This is an options papers, but none of the options seem consistent with "hardest" Brexit of ending the ECJ's influence completely, 
BREXIT: Pound hits 8yr low against the Euro. “We don’t care” say Mail readers “we just want the foreigners gone.”  
Our new policy paper, which is published today, reinforces the message that after #Brexit the #UK will take back control of its laws. 
British Tories continue to play fast & loose with the Good Friday Agreement in Brexit Negotiations - @davidcullinane  
BREXIT REALITYis toTHERESA MAYwhatHOUNDSare toFOXESNeither has a place in today's UK 
Why? Does #Brexit mean we can no longer remember & acknowledge those who gave the ultimate sacrifice? #BattleofBritain #London 
It's not so much that reality is "catching up" on our Brexit government now. It's doing a full scale ambush on them from all sides! 
Today, we have published a new policy paper which reinforces the message that after Brexit, the UK will take back control of its laws;  
Yet more evidence of negative effects of BrexitMore MPs need to join @vincecable in calling for an #ExitfromBrexit 
EU28: Few political parties in Europe have widespread appeal (Pew poll). #btw17 #Brexit #nrw17 
Brexit doesn't mean the union is unsustainable. It means it comes at a price.  
Brexit economy: outlook positive but rocky negotiations could bring instability  
Only poll that counts was the referendum result June last year so any other polls You care to throw at us You know where you can stick them 
As will Brexit. So, a price for which you get the powers to recoup it. Or a price for which you get nothing.  
Brexit puts future of tourism industry at risk - @M_AndersonSF 
What sense is there in opting to lose our representation in the European Court of Justice? #Brexit  
*Brexit Shambles Explained*  
If you've blocked a Twitter account ending with 8 digits, you've almost certainly blocked a Kremlin bot #Brexit 
In Phoenix, Trump revealed his strategy: turn 2018 elections into a national referendum on most unpopular first-term POTUS in US history. 
Trump & Brexit represent the worst of us. Both are about division and hatred. Both should be consigned to the dustbin of history. 
All Lib Dems who want policy to be NO BREXIT:Crucial motion at Bournemouth Conf'ce Sat 16 Sept 9 a.m. Pls RT & ATTEND TO VOTE Help save UK 
Now. The Referandum committee starts its fourth meeting to assess negotiations w/ Baghdad, way forward ,technical preps 4 referendum on time  
EU accuses Britain of not having worked-out Brexit position months after triggering Article 50  
1/ Some quick thoughts on the UK government paper. The first part is basically "no, no, no" (copyright Mrs Thatcher) to the ECJ post Brexit. 
Nicola Sturgeon just put a giant spanner in the works of Theresa May’s Brexit plans  #Brexit #Scotland 
Backing a  2nd referendum gives Labour a chance to escape  self-inflicted bind. If party doesn't go for it, voters will assume malevolence. 
Britain retreats from its strong stance on EU laws, as the clock ticks on Brexit talks  
What a load of nonsense about Brexit on #LBC We are leaving the EU nobody has changed their minds except a couple of plant remoaner callers 
I'll say one thing about Brexit. There's no satisfaction to be had in being right when everything about that wretched policy is going wrong. 
Jeremy Paxman finally gets to say what he thinks of David Cameron and Brexit… and it’s not pretty  via @thecanarysays 
The Prime Minister Theresa May says that the Sun will be the "main source" of UK's heat after Brexit. 
The pound is taking another beating  
Another Home Office Brexit snafu: a leading Finnish historian has been threatened with detention and deportation  
The @LibDems will be joining us! 'Brexit is the battle of our lives'#Manchester 1/10/17 
But millions believe he's right, Brexit will be PAINFUL, and UK Brexit parties ARE making a terrible mistake.  
Corbyn is advocating Britain leaves the Single Market ergo Hard Brexit. You might not like the truth but hey ho.  
Big UK firms face 2018 slowdown amid Brexit uncertainty, study finds  
So Brexit UK, I think it's time for you to be honest with us @The3Million Stop the "all will be fine" BS when in actual fact you're 1/ 
PM insists UK will be leaving "jurisdiction of European Court of Justice" as government sets out more Brexit aims  
I do not understand why I am seeing supposedly soft-Brexit MPs on TV attacking the Government for doing exactly what they wanted it to. 
Striking how people who oppose Brexit are happy to identify themselves on Twitter, whereas people who're still for it tend to be anonymous. 
Brexit: Theresa May set for U-turn over EU's ability to influence British laws  
Man who belongs to a party that doesn't know its own position on Brexit attempts to lecture other parties on the future of Scotland.  
"The terms under which you were sold Brexit are impossible for the Gov't to deliver," Labour MP @ChukaUmunna tells @colinbraziersky 
#Brexit is the politics of frightened people giving government control in the hope it will protect them from what they fear#StopBrexit. 
Brexit, trump & Bartemeu. Im beginning to think that the decent people are becoming the minority.  
Education is one of the best means of giving people control over their lives. Leave voters tend to have poor educations. #Brexit #Remain 
.@VinceCable launches a ferocious attack on desperate Brexit fanatics whose zealotry is igniting a new McCarthyism  
Operation retreat continues today with paper on role of ECJ. The pompousness from lead Brexiteers seems to have evaporated. #Brexit 
"We will take back control of our laws," PM says UK will end jurisdiction of European Court of Justice after Brexit  
As it is already, before Brexit.  
The Prime Minister Theresa May says the Supreme Court will be the "ultimate arbiter " of UK law after Brexit 
Trade unions that supported Brexit share the blame for this.  
PwC to launch scale-up series to help UK start-ups post-Brexit:  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard has his view on Brexit & the ECJ  
Labour disagrees with @jeremycorbyn on nuclear disarmament and he respects the party decision.The same could apply to #Brexit .  
These figures show that Scotland would now be bankrupt if the SNP had won the independence referendum in 2014.  
Awful news. We're 3m ctzns worried about our post Brexit future. This isn't #britishfairplay and it's infuriating, we've done nothing wrong! 
#TheresaMay emerging as one of the main villains of #Brexit. Hiding key security data, not applying EU migration restrictions ... 
Germans are worried a ‘no-deal Brexit’ will wreck their economy  
Britain cannot escape 'profound' influence of European Court after Brexit, former Attorney General says #premium 
This report by @VeteransBritain explains why the leaked Home Office report on post Brexit security is pure fiction.  
"In reality, there'll be only 2 options for Labour to contemplate: the government’s version of Brexit, or no Brexit"  
Hey Brexit UK, you're sure making a name for yourself: Helsingin Sanomat, Finnland's biggest newspaper, featuring story of Home Office 1/  
Shameful. Govt hides report saying Brexit makes UK less secure from “terrorism, criminality and illegal migration.” 
#Brexit: Bankers are calling Frankfurt's international schools in large numbers to get places for their kids #Remain 
I do remember in the 1970's how the UK would look at German success enviously. Welcome back to those days thanks to #Brexit 
May's Home Office hid report on #Brexit security concerns in #EUref. Officials say all their fears were justified. 
Bad news: "Because of Brexit!"Good news: "Brexit hasn't happened yet!"It must be draining to be so angry and morose all the time. 
Dear @TracyBrabin MP#Brexit was bought with lies and so is not the clear will of the people. Please defend Batley and Spen and #StopBrexit 
Project Fear was some of the tackiest propaganda ever to have appeared in Britain’s public debate  #Brexit 
Picked up the papers after landing in London. Filled with Brexit anguish, as usual.  
Dear Andrew Bowie MP @Conservatives Why do you support #Brexit when it will damage your constituency of West Aberdeenshire & Kincardine ?  
No this cannot be correct. Will enquire. She's an EU citizen with the same rights as before the referendum.  
It looks like the fake-onomics used in the referendum to make the case for independence has been exposed by reality #GERS 
Brexit leaves Britons at risk from crime and terror.  
What we need right now is another economic shock, a new currency and reverse Brexit negotiations with our largest market.Common sense. 
On Sky News in a bit talking about whether the government has a Brexit plan (they don't really). 
Varadkar accuses the UK of wanting benefits of EU membership without bearing any costs or responsibilities #Brexit 
Our Brexit government would love this to be true. I'm getting angrier by the day!  
Brexit Explained  
Why did Corbyn pick on a bad feature of Freedom of Movement not a good one? He is using the same bigot's logic as the far-right. #Brexit 
It seems EU law will have a role in Britain long after Brexit after all  
Leo Varadkar went to Canada for days to tell us the US border isn't suitable for Brexit. Couldn't he have just Googled it? #Insta-Taoiseach 
This is appalling. Every day, I am more ashamed of this government and of Corbyn's collusion in the tragedy that is Brexit. #NotInMyName 
Students must be a #Brexit priority #WeAreInternational 
I'm *almost* at the stage when I'm more bored by Brexit than angry about it. Suspect lots of people got there some time ago. 
Let's get out campaigning in Lab MP constituencies. Less than 2k votes would return 4 seats from hard Brexit Lab MPs  
Pound falls to lowest since June against dollar as Theresa May softens her Brexit stance  
A new centrist party cannot come quick enough. Labour & the Tories are two parties caught in a death struggle over Brexit. #WeDeserveBetter 
The past year has been an education. We all knew the media were morally bankrupt, but we didn’t realise how bad it was until Brexit & Trump. 
Dear @Conservatives Is this what you call making a success of #Brexit ?(£ to € since May)  
Theresa May's pledge to remove Britain from EU courts was one Brexit promise she could never keep 
The best way to 'take your waters back' is to piss into the wind - which would appear to be this nation's Brexit strategy.  
Pre-Brexit Home Office study warned of terror risks after Brexit. It was wrong Brexit will reduce terrorism threat.  
The reality of a 'no deal' Brexit: Abducted children at greater risk and families plunged into uncertainty. 
I wonder why the government doesn’t want the rights of EU citizens in post Brexit Britain overseen by the ECJ?  
I'm not sure in what universe it made sense to withhold this powerful and accurate contribution to the referendum debate.  
Brexit means sort of Brexit as far as possible within realistic bounds as PM may u turn on ECJ  
Remainers: when May & co. backtrack on Brexit, let’s not gloat about U-turns / ‘climbdowns’ – let’s support the right decision being made >> 
Leaked document: Home Office 2016 assessment of post-Brexit terror risks shows what minister must renegotiate   
IF a Super Injunction has been taken out to prevent @jameschappers @James08209590 spilling the beans on #brexit shouldn't we all be worried?  
*Brexit Britain Explained*  
Quarter of Brexit voters now say they were misled, poll shows  
"We are not an island" says Dominic Raab. He is a MP and he wants you to believe he is right on #Brexit. God help us. 
Conduct Referendum,Let Biafra Go,Arewa Youths Tells @MBuhari #TyrantBuhariIsAThreat 2 #WorldPeace #BiafraReferendum 
This has got to be one of the most ridiculous Tweets, regarding Brexit, yet.    
Home Office hid Brexit terror study  
George Osborne Says Britain Is 'Poorer' Following The Brexit Vote, And Pound To Euro Rate Shows It  
Why is BBC not revealing that Govt refuses to allow ministers to appear on Brexit issues if there is any opposing view? @BBCr4today 
'The BBC should never have bigged up a ridiculous study saying a hard Brexit would be good for the UK economy'   
Don't know what was worse, the arrogance of Dominic Raab or just how clueless he's on Brexit.  #r4today 
So Brexit won't cut migration, will take years longer than expected and will leave the EU courts in control.Why are we leaving, again? 
The same #Brexit zealots who reject #ECJ & advocate #UK court supremacy called Supreme Court judges enemies of the people. #hypocrites 
Wow, Dominic Raab really won't have anyone blaspheme against his precious church of Brexit. Deluded, arrogant and rude. #r4today 
This outlines exactly what is at stake..FMs of Scotland & Wales unite against Tory Brexit power grab - Daily Record  
Just checking on how Brexit is going...  
Brexit-supporting politicians have issued their own threats that if the EU doesn’t like it they can lump it.  
'No Brexit' protests at Tory AND Labour conferences need to be MASSIVE - and prolonged. No let up! They must get the message! #Brexitprotest 
#Brexit Trek: boldly going down the toilet at Warp Factor 9 ...#brexitshambles #Corbyn #StopBrexit #Brexit #LeaveEU #StarTrek #ReesMogg 
BBC daily crusade to find something negative to say about Brexit.  
Don't meddle in our courts after Brexit, Euro judges are warned  via @MailOnline 
Another one of May’s u-turns. She will cancel #Brexit in the end. 
Tell us Theresa, HOW MANY BILLIONS IS THIS BREXIT FARCE GOING TO COST? (Frit to say? You bet!) #CrumblingBrexit 
Top American officials urge Iraq's Kurds to put off an independence referendum. So far, the answer is no.  
Is there nothing that Brexit's touch of death can't ruin? This means social housing and big infra development is slowed or stopped. #remain 
Nicola Sturgeon and Carwyn Jones join forces to amend Brexit Bill after meeting in Edinburgh  
Theresa May set for another Brexit u-turn  
Mattis, on a trip to Erbil, asks the Kurds to postpone their independence referendum; they say it will proceed.  
Opinion: Why Brexit Britain has become a United Kingdom of hate and denial  
Europe threatened by unchecked migrants  aren't you glad we voted #Brexit 
Theresa May's Home Office hid a study warning that Brexit could leave Britons at greater risk of crime and terrorism  
Quarter of Brexit voters now say they were misled, poll shows  
A must read regarding brexit. Stop the madness. @neweuropeansUK @MadameMerteuil @mikegalsworthy @GuyVerhofstadt @emmyzen @rogercasale 
#Barzani to Mattis: Referendum will go ahead if 'stronger alternative’ not offered  #KurdistanVotes 
It's not just me is it? I'm no economist but this is absolute bollocks; mindless drivel aimed at childlike people. 
Talking Brexit in a mo on @GMB and how "taking back control" may now mean following the European Court of Justice. Happy days 
Do you love Brexit more than you love the UK?If not...please...keep an open mind....#WednesdayWisdom 
Britain softens Brexit stance on EU court  
Brexit explained:Drug and alcohol misuse among baby boomers a 'rapidly growing problem', warn experts  
Despite Brexit bluster, close relationship with EU will require continuing ECJ jurisdiction but loss of influence 
do leave eu voters think they were miss lead and now want to reverse brexit only leave voters in the referendum please 
May accused of Brexit climbdown over role of European Court of Justice  
Huge farmer support for @FAR referendum vote. 90% arable; 78% maize; 66% cereal silage. We’ll keep adding value to the business of cropping.  
is it just me or are brexit negotiations goingUK: I want all the thingsEU: NoUK: *announces they will get all the things*EU: No 
Britain outlines plans for post-Brexit break away from European Court of Justice  
Theresa May's Home Office hid a study warning that Brexit could leave Britons at greater risk of crime and terrorism  
Will leavers ever consider the real, emerging #Brexit issues rather than hiding behind "you lost, get over it"?Perhaps a bit of humility?  
Stuck on Brexit island ... a distinct possibility.  Airports call for urgent post-Brexit deal on UK-EU flights  
Twitter at its best @JolyonMaugham #brexit #BBCBias 
Brexit: 'Billions' in regional aid needed to replace EU funding, councils warn | The Independent  
This makes me so angry - young people are the future & they will have to live with the consequences of Brexit voted for by the elderly :-(  
Not sure if the @Conservatives are just deluded or stupid. They still expect to have their cake and eat it Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Poverty of thought or unintentional negligence to lead us so blindly to Brexit cliffs and over same cliffs into dark, spiralling isolation?  
Die Welt expresses confusion over Britain's Brexit papers: "more like an application for membership than departure".  
If it was the 'will of the people' and the 'majority' voted for brexit, why then are leavers against a 2nd referendum on final deal? Losing!  
Amazed constantly meeting people who've changed from leave to 'OMG the country is being destroyed' and ' how can we stop Brexit!#ref 2 uk 
POLL: Is resistance against Brexit... Please RT after your vote! #StopBrexit #brexitshambles #BrexitRejection 
Time now surely for all pro-EU politicians to show their true feelings and 'unite' to oppose Brexit bill.  
When you're about the drop the hardest Brexit team of Vardy, Drinkwater and Cahill at the Bernabeu  
Brexit implications for the ecomomy in Scotland, 80k job losses, £11billion detrimental impact & the news doesn't mention it? 
The ECJ has served Britain well. Brexit hysterics say we must now look elsewhere for justice. May's red line is UK's black future 
Did you vote Brexit because: Hey! We've had a couple decades of peace in Ireland. Time to shake things up#WhyBrexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg for PM? Bookies SLASH odds on Brexit campaigner replacing May at No10  
Did you vote Brexit because you were told that you don't have a say in the EU? That it was undemocratic?#WhyBrexit 
759 international treaties and agreements will need to be renegotiated by UK after Brexit—or it will be left outpic.twitter.com/e20q8wC383 
The UK is going to soften its stance on the EU court as part of Brexit negotiations. Here's what that means:  
Theresa May accused of U-turn over EU court’s role after Brexit  
Bill Chilwell is a nancy boy but Josh Knight has Hard Brexit potential. Models his game on John Terry with tough blocks. Play with Maguire 
Quarter of Brexit voters now say they were misled, poll shows  
How's #Brexit going one year on? Helpful background summary from Prof Michael Dougan  18 mins long. In brief:not well 
The blatant lying by #Brexit politicians is new and must not be accepted as a normal part of our politics #Remain 
Opportunity today to reinforce Irish concerns re Brexit and to discuss working together to get NI Assembly back in place with @JBrokenshire 
You think there can be no flimsier or more hollow line on Brexit than govt position paper and then you see Labour's official response. 
Ireland is doing its homework on hard borders. Make no mistake, Brexit will be a hard UK-EU border.  
Anyone noticed leavers disparage the '75 referendum on the premise that people were duped & didn't understand what they were voting for... 
Set your alarms!I'm due on BBC Breakfast at 6.40am tomorrow talking about the UK govt's paper on Brexit and the ECJ/dispute settlement. pic.twitter.com/xAmU9Tq8WD 
Deplorable!“Project Fear was some of tackiest propaganda ever to have appeared in Britain’s public debate”#Brexit 
Claim: Tories Will Allow Foreign Judges to Apply Rulings to People and Businesses After Brexit  
If Britain adopts lower product standards than the EU as proposed by Rees-Mogg then checks on British exports will be needed. #Brexit  
From the Economist: #Brexit Britain won't 'take back control' but it will lose power and influence over its trade. #StopBrexit #Remain 
Just in: Barzani to Mattis: Referendum will go ahead if 'stronger alternative’ not offered 
The BBC should never have bigged up a ridiculous study saying a hard Brexit would be good for the UK economy  
Birmingham-based Somali gang jailed for 60 years for rape and torture of woman  via @Your Brexit 
Official Brexit documents should just be published to the public as and when available.  No privileged prior 'embargoed' access to media. 
Will not, on principle, report or comment on any official Brexit publication on the basis of privileged prior access. 
So: commissioned to write on tomorrow's Brexit position paper.  Will not, on principle, look at any embargoed copy.  This will be fun... 
Quarter of Brexit voters feel ‘misled’ by Leave campaign, poll finds.  
Brexit is happening,.  
Seokjin: the snob- probably goes to Cambridge or Oxford uni- his dad works in the house of parliament- voted leave brexit- plays golf  
Is Minford's Brexit model good for British people, or just UK plc.'s GDP?  
Voting for Brexit is like buying a house without seeing it and ending up with a huge mortgage, rising damp and missing the old neighbours. 
BloggedCross-border civil litigation after BrexitAnalysis of the UK government's new proposals:  
Brexit talks likely to be delayed until end of year due to German elections, still at their beck & call to the end, Merkel rules Europe. 
GRAPHIC: European political-economic structure (before Brexit)  
Brilliant. Makes me proud to be in the Lords.  John Kerr: Brexit is about foreign policy. Why is Britain so silent?  
What is it about Brexit and Twitter that a mild observation sets off multitudinous nutters in an orgy of mutual abuse? 
People here in Germany feel badly let down by someone they thought was a true friend. They see no rhyme or reason behind #Brexit. Self-harm.  
Spot on! Through Brexit we lose one of key funding routes for major infrastructure projects we'd need to mitigate economic hit of Brexit.  
It's not innovative jams, alas, but Brexit has launched an industry!Us -> @Mcr4EU ->  
WATCH: Retired special forces sergeant says DEPORT ALL TERRORISTS AND THEIR FAMILIES  via @Your Brexit 
.May's Brexit "has been a rejection of principle of devolution & sharing of decision making across these islands" 
Freedom of is Very important in a Democracy 
A Canadian bank picks Dublin for its new EU trading hub after Brexit  
Yet more warnings from UK airlines and airports about desperate need for agreement from Brexit negotiations -  
It stretches credibility beyond breaking point that most MPs and most ministers are not acutely aware that Brexit is catastrophic.ACT!!! 
WW2 brought together a strong, confident and forceful alliance of democratic liberalism and patriotism, utterly broken in #Brexit Britain. 
Britain's £19.1bn services surplus with the EU is the component of trade most vulnerable to the UK leaving the Single Market.#Brexit  
Cancel Brexit. Split (£100bn) divorce bill 50% NHS & 50% UK households. UK consumers spend, jobs created, economy & £ improve. People happy. 
I’ve not seen UK paper on Brexit courts, due tomorrow. But we’ve got loads of v loud clues. 1/7. 
Britain has been rather innovative in Brexit negotiations, whatever the Remainers say  
President Barzani received Sec of Defense Matthias. Exchanged views & positions on fighting ISIS & referendum.Dialougue w/ Baghdad continue.  
Airports call for urgent post-Brexit deal on UK-EU flights  
Stocks are flashing a bigger warning sign than they did for Brexit and the US election:  
#TeamPatriot can we hashtag this #Lisin so I don't miss any of it? Specifically looking to connect his funds, bitcoin, to Trump / Brexit 
#TeamPatriot as we #COSINT Vladimir Lisin let's concentrate on #Scot24 - find connections to Brexit, Cambridge Ana, Trump, Rohrabacher pic.twitter.com/oL0XFb3uoJ 
#BREAKING: Kurdish President Masoud Barzani tells U.S. Secretary of Defense the referendum on independence will not be delayed.  
Brexit gives us the chance, for the first time in 44 years, to reconnect with our true friends in the Commonwealth, without EU constraints. 
Brexit offers the chance to import cheaper and often better products from outside the EU, thus improving our lifestyles, lowering our costs. 
Brexit offers us the opportunity to free the UK of cumbersome, bureaucratic, growth-inhibiting EU legislation and make ourselves competitive 
#TeamPatriot call for help who can connect Vladimir Lisin to bots for Trump, Brexit and money laundering  #COSINT pic.twitter.com/GyomvKQ1Fx 
WATCH: Irish PM ‘confused and puzzled’ by UK Brexit plans  via @PoliticsHome 
MP Naz Shah attacks Sarah Champion for speaking out against Muslim Grooming Gangs  via @Your Brexit 
Furious Polish PM URGES EU elite to stop political correctness and FIGHT terrorism  via @Your Brexit 
My position on Brexit is very simple.Don't fucking bother. It's shit.I'll have it on Juncker's desk first thing tomorrow morning.  
Claim: Tories Will Allow Foreign Judges to Apply Rulings to People and Businesses After Brexit 
The German government is very worried about what Brexit means for the German economy. 
Wales voted for Brexit...Wales voted for Brexit...Wales voted for Brexit...Wales voted for Brexit...Wales voted for Brexit...  
The Government's working "round the clock" to distract people with #BigBen rather than have them focus on the utter disaster that is #Brexit 
Remember this? Sturgeon's words before the election - on the back of whose result she claimed a mandate for a referendum.  
Good meeting with @fmwales as we strengthen co-operation to protect our respective parliaments from a Westminster power grab. #brexit  
Cancel brexit. Give 50% divorce bill to NHS, 50% to UK households. Sterling rallies. UK consumers spend, economy strengthens. People happy. 
And now, a Brexit update.   
Schedule for next round of Brexit talks revealed:  
I repeatedly asked Tory Welsh Secretary where funds for Wales would come from instead of the EIB after #Brexit. He couldn't answer  
Give me a benefit of Brexit. A sound argument for it. And if it's genuinely good, I promise to RT it without comment. 
George Osborne says the international markets have shown that the UK is poorer post Brexit vote  
Yes, when you convince me that Brexit is right. Done a piss poor job so far. "We won, you lost", "We're leaving !" Isn't doing it for me.  
The Government ran a surplus in July for 1st time since 2002. Sign of economy's strength as fresh Brexit talks near  
Officials have admitted it will become harder to recover abducted children if no Brexit deal is struck. 
Tories are goading Labour saying we don't have a Brexit plan Are the filthy bastards confused who is Prime Minister here? Tory incompetence! 
First budget surplus since 2002. When's the Brexit disaster narrative over? My guess is never. 
The pound is now down to its lowest value against the euro since the EU referendum.  
Today's column: Now Jeremy Corbyn must say no to Brexit: the time for evasion is over | Steve Richards  
Good news. I met TD in Toronto y'day to discuss this expansion in Dublin. Proof there can be upsides to #Brexit for Ireland  
David Davis said the Brexit process was going "incredibly well".Incredibly may be correct.Well is surely less so. 
Tim Tim Tim, will you ever accept that Brexit is ultimately going to fail mate, because it will ruin the country. So the answer is no. X 
Developing an all-Ireland health service makes sense, north and south - it doesn't make sense to put it at risk through Brexit  
The innovative thinking on Brexit is all coming from Britain says @mattlynnwriter 
The BBC's shoddy Brexit economics coverage betrays its audience. My @IndyVoices column:  
Pro-EU campaigners should help make Brexit a success and not seek to weaken our hand in Brexit negotiations  
Everything we do is controlled. Everything we say is being ignored. And all the time Brexit is drowning under the hapless mirth of our MP's 
Really is amazing. After months of demanding hard Brexit they wake up one morning and go: "Hey" That Efta court looks like a great idea!"  
Scottish and Welsh leaders meet to discuss opposition to Brexit  
Looks like Leave voters are becoming increasingly annoyed at all those broken Brexit promises: 
Another bank chooses Ireland in response to Brexit. A welcome decision from TD Securities. @IDAIRELAND 
It's amazing how Corbyn has literally a view on everything but Tory Brexit  
One In Four Brits Believe They Were Misled Over Brexit, Opinium Poll Reveals  
Unfortunately there is not one political party, not even the @LibDems, seriously exposing the democratic failings of the #Brexit process. 
The two leaders pledge to work together to stop a #Brexit power grab by the Tories. 
Welsh Labour currently refuse to back the Tory Brexit bill. Wonder what Scottish Labour's stance is?  
The Brexit bad news just keeps piling... oh, wait, hang on.  
Andrea Leadsom tweets an article criticising key planks of the Government's #Brexit strategy  
This has to be one of the most disgusting attempts at #Brexit scaremongering I've seen yet.  
On the day I learn that one of  my favourite UCL colleagues is moving to Germany as a result of #Brexit, the Times says this.  
I was always proud to be British—but after Brexit, I barely recognise my country  
After the referendum dialogue with Iraq is necessary to negotiate terms through peaceful means. Iraq's position will determine how/when... 
The BBC should never have bigged up a ridiculous study saying a hard #Brexit would be good for the UK economy  
'Political Editor' of The S*n doesn't like it when you remind him that his rag sold the 'Brexit Lie' to an awful lot of people.  
The pro-Brexit media should not expect Remainers to help Brexit work if their legitimate wishes aren't even acknowledged to exist 12/ 
Do the expat! #brexit billionaires actually want to crash economy so they can use offshore billions 2 snap up national assets 4 peanuts 
But it hasn't. 84% voted for #Brexit manifestos in genelxn. Repeat after me, Remainers: "Corbyn is a eurosceptic..."  
My fear is that if Brexit happens, this happens:1) UK ruined2) Govt blames EU3) Discontent stoked4) Far-right calls for military action. 
'If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy,' said Brexit minister David Davis when debating the EU  
Will leavers ever accept that because they cheated in an advisory Referendum, we don't have to ? 
So Owen why aren't you campaigning for a 2nd ref rather than passively accepting a #Brexit that works against Labour goals? 
Very serious. #Brexit impact on Scotland who voted 62% remain. A democratic deficit consequence of being in UK.  
It isn't just evasion by Corbyn. He sees Brexit as an opportunity. His supporters know this but they're afraid to call him out on it.  
The EU wants to set the Brexit agenda, but Britain is fighting back, writes @asabenn #Premium 
If you just think about the logic of Brexit. You're trying to get better terms by leaving Europe than you had as a member of it. 
That's looks about as long as it'll take for a coherent Brexit plan. 
UK air traffic faces slump without Brexit deal, airports warn  
Encouraging that China’s ambassador has called for closer post-Brexit ties between our two countries #GlobalBritain 
Do you know what'd be interesting? The full guest list to this event last year.And how much each made out of Brexit. 
*Brexit Explained*  
It's wrong to postpone the referendum. The people of Kurdistan - not others, must determine the right time- MB.  
Brexit's like playing pass the parcel with a hand grenade. Labour must try to explode it now.They don't want to end up with it in their lap. 
1 Some thoughts on UK govt paper on Brexit & civil cooperation with EU, just published here. Blog version soon.  
As the facts emerge it is becoming clear that not only is government incompetent, but it's impossible to Brexit on the terms they set out.  
37% of a gerrymandered electorate is not a mandate. There is no legitimacy to Brexit. It can & will be stopped. 
Voters are turning against Brexit but the Lib Dems aren't benefiting   
Brexit has got to be got out of the way before the country can move on. Just stop it. Or plan B: second referendum. - We're in an emergency.  
Update: the FT's Brexit boiler has already broken down and has been replaced with a transitional unit that doesn't fit our coffee cups  
Now President Barzani metg with Prominant Kurdistan community figures in Erbil. Reiterated that there is no Referendum postponement.  
Our 650 MP's are charging into the jaws of Brexit, into the mouth of hell though they knew someone had blundered #stopbrexit #Leavebrigade 
Unless someone invents teleportation, Europe will always be the UK’s most important market. Brexit completely ignores that fact. Dumb.  
#BREAKING: The PKK says they are against #Kurdish referendum.  
Agreed, You either follow @jeremycorbyn and Brexit or you follow @UKLabour The full article here: 
Good to see the Welsh and Scottish governments working together on concerns about Brexit and Westminster power grab #Brexit  
The BBC should never have promoted a ridiculous study saying a hard Brexit would be good for the economy  
Seems very sad to me that the Indigenous recognition referendum has been pushed off the agenda #auspol 
I for one am looking forward to post-Brexit Britain.  
The BBC's shoddy Brexit economics coverage betrays its audience. My @IndyVoices column:  
No, a hard Brexit will increase poverty, accelerate inequality and ruin our economy. Let’s not tell lies. 
Detail and realism should be the hallmarks of the big Brexit speech that Theresa May plans to give next month  
me everytime something happens that makes me think maybe brexit has not been thought through  
That akward moment when the only economist Brexit supporting MPs listen to is considered to be an idiot by all other econonomists.  
Not one Tory target seat in Scotland! What a disgrace. Labour Party still Pro-Trident Pro-Austerity Anti-Independence & Hard-Brexit @theSNP 
No deal *IS* better than a bad deal - @LiamHalligan on Britain, #Brexit and championing global free trade  
So-called 'Soft Brexit' or an EEA option would be the worst of all worlds  
Don't believe the Remainer narrative. The UK is the side coming up with innovative ideas in Brexit negotiations  
Brexit reality bites again  
"We won you lost" is not a persuasive argument, you have won nothing. I am not won over by "we are leaving". I will fight Brexit all the way  
'There is nothing noble in defending an exercise in democracy that was as deeply flawed as the EU referendum'  
Not so rapidly considering that since the referendum we have the slowest growth in the entire EU + G7. It seems WE are crumbling not them 
The UK is as divided as ever. If Brexit is so great, why is there no effort being made to win the hearts & minds of millions of Remainers? 
I admit I may have got Brexit all wrong. Suddenly it’s clear we’re doing the EU a massive favour by leaving.  
Tory MPs warn David Davis that UK must make a clean break from European Court of Justice after Brexit #premium 
Gov't must urgently ensure funding for schools, hospitals and housing does not drop off a cliff edge after Brexit >  
*Brexit doesn't happen like*  
Weeks off on summer hols & then postponing Brexit meeting with EU because it falls on a bank holiday.Tories are a #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Last one I promise, but we now go live to Brexit  
UK exports in 2016: ($bn)India 4.5Australia 5.4Japan 6.6Canada 6.3China 18.3US 62.3EU 203.2Spot the problem. #Brexit 
David Davis said the Brexit process was going "incredibly well". Incredibly may be correct; well is surely less so  
'The BBC should never have bigged up a ridiculous study saying a hard Brexit would be good for the UK economy'  
A quarter of Leave voters believe they were misled during the #Brexit campaign, a poll has found #LeaveLies #Remain 
How soon before the Daily Express claims it never never ever supported Brexit? 
Seriously. How many more Brexit promises can this government break before public realise Brexit doesn't mean "Brexit"? @BBCNews 
Brexidiots tell us to respect the result of the referendum. We do, now you lot respect the terms of the referendum.  
Great report (from Germany, but in English) on changing attitudes to the EU since the Brexit vote:  
Canada's largest lender by assets chooses Dublin for post-Brexit EU base  
Corbyn picked one bad effect of Free Movement to say it should end. Why didn't he pick a good effect to say it should continue?#Brexit /1 
In response to U.S. concerns over #ISIS, Kurdish President Barzani says referendum will not have an impact on the fight against ISIS.  
The UK wants to keep its close co-operation with civil courts in the EU after #Brexit, the Government says  
UK demands Single Market benefits even while not being in it or paying for it. #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
"We will decide whether the UK has made sufficient progress." Ireland's PM talks tough on #Brexit negotiations. 
NEWS! Fiendish new Remoaner plan to prevent Brexit is to let Brexit supporters try to implement Brexit  
With no cash for downloads and people reverting to cassettes, this will be a common sight on the public transport post Brexit.  
Crowdfund the #StopBrexit March on Conservative Party Conference! #Remain #Brexit 
Looking forward to welcoming @fmwales to Bute House later today to discuss our shared concerns about #Brexit  
Hi @ChukaUmunnaIf you know this, don’t you think the Brexit result is a farce, not the ‘will of the people’?If so, fight to remain in EU  
£50billion invested in the UK and 44,000 new jobs since the Brexit vote.  
Starting to regret Brexit Nige?It was always a shit idea let's face it 
If gov 'continues to apply its anti-CJEU stance too rigidly it will severely limit its post-Brexit options' for adequate alter. arrangements  
This is a blatant lie. You have no agreement to this whatsoever. You won the Referendum based on lies...but then a leopard... #StopBrexit 
Now Jeremy Corbyn must say no to Brexit: the time for evasion is over | Steve Richards  
This is a fantastic explainer of open skies, and why RyanAir won't be able to fly domestic UK flights post Brexit  
1/ 3 convinced Brexit would mean £350m for NHS.We care about #OurNHSbut since Brexit Tories have devastated it! 
“Brexit is terrible” says man whose policies led to people voting for Brexit.#GeorgeOsborne 
I'm increasingly coming to the view that EU27 politicians are being far too polite about the incompetence of UK's approach to Brexit.  
After a further 2 years of EEA having stabilised our economy we should hold a further referendum to see if people wanted to leave that. 
If we really wanted to Brexit we should have told the public it would take 2 years of planning before we triggered Article 50. 
Hard Brexit would boost the incomes of 19 million UK households by £5,000 a year, say 16-strong Economists for Free Trade. Herald Scotland. 
“This is terrible. Brexit has made the country poorer” says man who made most of the country poorer. #GeorgeOsborne 
Germans are worried Brexit will wreck their economy as China welcomes closer ties with UK.  
A hard Brexit will reduce poverty and inequality  via @CapX 
Denying 16-17 year olds Brexit vote was clearly an appeasement to Tory right. No other rational reason when debated in Parliament.  
Quarter of Brexit voters now say they were misled, poll shows  
Cars made in the U.K. may struggle to be British enough after Brexit  
Two options for @UKLabour: Tory version of #Brexit or no #Brexit.Time for evasion over. @steverichards14 on top form 
The whole Brexit idea is so staggeringly stupid that the gov's zombie-like continuation towards the cliff-edge feels like a Russian plot. 
'Racism, Crisis, Brexit' - a new article co-written with Satnam Virdee, published this morning. #openaccess 
All you need to know about Professor Patrick Minford, who claimed Brexit would boost UK economy by £135bn (apart from the flawed analysis)  
Today's column-Now Jeremy Corbyn must say no to Brexit: the time for evasion is over | Steve Richards  
The clock is ticking. When the final vote comes, Labour MPs must not choose a Tory Brexit on the harshest terms:  
The #Brexit nearly nobody wants. Let's #StopBrexit 
In my view the UK economy will grow after Brexit because the economy is a shared delusion mainly sustained by the fantasies of old white men 
For the next election (or referendum) I might just print a million postcards with this one quote. 
Not enough progress has been made so far in Brexit talks, Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar says  
Tory MPs warn David Davis that UK must make a clean break from European Court of Justice post-Brexit - The Telegraph  
Ireland's PM Leo Varadkar is "confused and puzzled" by Britain's plans for Brexit  
For what it's worth, plenty of us Brits can't figure it out either. And plenty of us agree completely that Brexit diminishes us 
'End the evasion. Corbyn must say no to Brexit' @steverichards14 @guardian 
Superb thread which should act as a wake up call to anyone who trusts David Davis and this reckless government #Brexit   
Opinion: The rise of xenophobia and Islamophobia in Brexit Britain  by @AlastairSloan 
There's Trump, there's terrorism and there's Brexit – but what Theresa May decided to take a stand on was Big Ben  
Referendum on the independence of the Kurdish region from Iraq is to take place on its set date  
Brexit free-trade illusions from the 19th century  via @FT 
Kenyans who are tired of Uthamaki Have a right to self determination .We can have a referendum as well to exit shackles of Central Kenya 
With a referendum, secession is provided for by law. Other Kenyans must have a right to self determination @njihiakelvin . 
Go read the right to self determination. South Sudan left after referendum.  
Graham Co certifies all 12 signatures randomly selected by @SecretaryReagan for @arizona_sos referendum @azcentral 
Scottish, Welsh government heads aim to stop 'blatant power grab' after Brexit  
A year on from Brexit  
A quarter of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign   
Boris Johnson should be prosecuted for Brexit lies  via @LondonEconomic 
Brexit has damaged the name Nigel forever. Please drop the charge now.  
If Brexit happens, all but a few will lose. If Brexit doesn't happen, all but a few will win.No Brexit. For the many, Not the few 
14 months after the referendum and UK politicians still haven't grappled with the fact that Irish politicians can block any EU-UK trade deal  
Nicola Sturgeon and Carwyn Jones hold Brexit talks  
Maddie fi work and pay fi her own discovery, wi nuh have it. Soon lef her after Brexit. 
Islamic radicals to be treated by mental illness specialists  POLITICAL CORRECTNESS STRIKES AGAIN 
The Brits have gone bananas since that Brexit referendum.  
It's an interesting situation. I think he sees Brexit as a Tory problem. Sadly, it's also a national problem. 
If @UKLabour don't oppose #Brexit I will - with a passion - advocate voting tactically against Labour at the next election. #StopBrexit 
Same here. @UKLabour have lost 2 votes in this house until it stopposes a) #Brexit b) This Tory Government. #StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow 
I don't think Govt does want to sabotage Brexit; they're in genuine denial. But worth considering what a govt so minded would do differently 
If Govt knew Brexit was impossible and wanted to sabotage it, they would act like this Govt & after 2 yrs say 'we tried; it can't be done' 
They've committed to unworkable red lines that make successful Brexit impossible; they have delayed & stalled at every turn. 
Britain will be great again following brexit providing a weak, incompetent government haven't cocked everythng up. We hold the cards. 
Then there's those like me who won't vote labour again unless they change their brexit position 
I like this hard nosed & articulate Leo a lot. He's been super strong on Brexit so far.  
Leo very politely decimates the British Brexit demands  
Do not know 1 remainer that backs Brexit 
Fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck Brexit fuck 
Now Jeremy Corbyn must say no to Brexit: the time for evasion is over | Steve Richards  
Scotland's looking forward to hearing why Corbyn supports a Tory hard Brexit of leaving the single market for & ending freedom of movement.. 
Couldn't resist. New CC post, sticking the boot into Economists for Brexit. Tariffs, trade and money illusion:  
If only some MPs were as exercised by the Brexit shambles as they are by Big Ben, our democracy might be in a better place 
Dublin and Frankfurt will be winners on Brexit jobs, says Bundesbank member  
#Brexit threatens each and every one of us (well, apart from the richest). If you want to #StopBrexit please donate  
Merkel's NIGHTMARE: Brexit could WRECK Germany's economy, Berlin officials warn  
McCluskey's fury over bosses trying to use Brexit to cut workers' pay  
Hi I'm in the US. Can't figure this out it's just a Clock. I think Brexit did more to diminish your voice. 
No longer damage limitation but also now hiding the U-turns!May's Brexit Govt is heading beyond what's possible in crisis management.  
Big Ben falling silent feels symbolic of a minutes silence for the death of UK influence in Europe and the world since Brexit. 
Tory MPs warn David Davis that UK must make a clean break from European Court of Justice after Brexit #Premium 
."Scotland facing prospect of £3.7bn public spending black hole as the financial shocks of Brexit take their toll" 
Britain does not want a second vote on Brexit, but that won't stop Remainers from demanding one  via @telegraphnews 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar discusses Brexit negotiations and says he is "puzzled" by the U.K.'s trade demands  
Scots last yr tried to break up the UK via a referendumThis is how civilised societies workDiscussions, referendums and agreements...  
Irish PM Leo Varadkar says he's working to cut taxes and sees Ireland as an ideal  European base for corporations  
Support and opposition of a Hard Brexit aren’t just philosophical positions, they are ACTIONS, says @MitchBenn 
Thanks to Brexit it is becoming an embarrassment to be an Englishman abroad. Let's get our respect back and #StopBrexit 
DISGRACE: Labour MP Naz Shah RETWEETS: ‘Abused girls in Rotherham need to shut their mouths’  via @Your Brexit 
New poll suggests a THIRD of Brits convinced by Vote Leave's claim Brexit would mean £350 million for the N...  
Brexit: increasingly like the charge of the light brigade:.miscommunication and tactical errors turned into disaster  
Dear God, if you want us to stop Brexit, give us a sign. Like stopping Big Ben bonging. Thanks, Britain.  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  
Brexit in 4 words: Rich old men lied.  
Pound will take Brexit beating, warns US bank  
Excellent piece - there are 'in reality' two options for Labour: the 'government's Brexit or no Brexit'  
"There's Trump, there's terrorism and there's Brexit – but what Theresa May decided to take a stand on was Big Ben"  
Britain has seen £50billion invested in the UK and 44,000 new jobs since the Brexit vote  
Germans are worried Brexit will wreck their economy as China welcomes closer ties with UK  
Economist claiming £135bn Brexit boost for UK guilty of 'violence to basic economic facts'  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Tick,tock...UK hopes of EU trade talks this autumn 'will be dashed'-We are heading for an economic disaster #Brexit  
The Brexit Rose looking very confident ahead of her entrance into (and hard exit out of) the dome. #Roseoftralee 
“There are a lot of benefits which won’t go away with Brexit.”  
& they say Brexit'll cause food standards 2 slip? Remind me again EU caused Egg contamination, horse meat scandal, halal meat, HepE sausages  
Respecting Brexit lies means disrespecting the future of the NHS @UKLabour. Brexit means less Govt money, not more. 
Breakfast is breakfast.Dinner is dinner.But when May said 'Brexit means Brexit' what did SHE mean by it? We know what WE mean: OUT. 
Brexit is only one of the urgent challenges facing Europe's leaders  
Brexit blotted the sun out of the British sky quite some time ago.  
THIS WEEK'S POLITICAL POLLShould those who blatantly lied pushing brexitMake good brexit related costsEven after we remain. 
Some say this might be a good answer to offer on October 2, after independence referendum#BuenoPuesMoltBéPuesAdiós#WellThenFineThenGoodbye 
UKGOV says 'EU regulations are wonderful!' Part 2 of our review on Brexit position paper on 'continuity of goods'  
Kim cut most of the entire video and lied. Taylor was honest about it. Taylor still wins cause you're pressed  worry about Brexit instead.  
First you have no plan. Second Brexit is wholly your mess. You clean it up. 
Did I miss something? We have a Conservative government so that's kind of what we expect? Labour aren't accountable for delivering Brexit... 
'A terrible betrayal' Gove fights Hammond over use of fishing as a Brexit bargaining chip  
CEO of Siemens breaks with his post-referendum diplomacy to say what he really thinks about a claimed Brexit economic boost...  
We are publishing a series of papers setting out our plan to deliver a successful Brexit that works for everyone. Labour don’t have a plan.  
Boris is saying, by the way, that he's still fully committed to Brexit. And we all know he never tells lies. Except when his lips move. 
A #UnitedIreland is the only practical solution to Brexit  
Both #BigBen and Brexit show us how the British establishment prefer to worship symbols rather than provide for people. 
Remember before Trump and Brexit when life seemed fun, positive, hopeful? Me neither... 
If he fails to oppose Brexit, he will go down in history as the man who did as much harm to the country as the conservatives.  
Time to choose the destiny of the @UKLabour party and our future Jeremy @jeremycorbyn. Say no to Brexit.  
."Frankfurt and Dublin are emerging as the winners of the race race to snap up the post-Brexit banking spoils.". 
MPs hope the sacrifice of our economy to the Brexit gods will result in a strong harvest of Big Ben Bong Bongs next gathering season. pic.twitter.com/3y6mWfStyZ 
May facing scrutiny over Brexit trade efforts as Japan trip looms  
It feels so embarrassing to be an Englishman abroad after Brexit  Those of us living in EU do a lot of apologising! 
Pound Stirling & the value of United Kingdom going down on a daily basis. Soon mortgage rates will rise. Brexit the gift that keeps giving 
."DUP could find 47 members of Sinn Féin, SDLP & Alliance lined up AGAINST it on Brexit in a 90-member Assembly". 
.Yes! It is time for Labour to stand up & oppose Brexit. 
3rd round of #Brexit negotiations with #UK begins next week. Focus on orderly withdrawal. #EU positions clear and transparent since day one. 
Economist claiming £135bn Brexit boost for UK guilty of 'violence to basic economic facts'  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Conspiracy theorists must be going wild over Barcelona. All suspects dead, Catalonian independence referendum one month away. 
There's Trump, there's terrorism and there's Brexit – but Theresa May has decided to take a stand on Big Ben  
Dear @BobBlackman MPSince it's now clear #Brexit will damage all UK inc Harrow East, please will you vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill?  
Out of time. US banks planning for hard Brexit as no transition deal will be done by end Q1 '18 @FinancialNews 
BBC's uncritical reporting of Patrick Minford's economic views is a gift of credibility to the #Brexit cause. 
>Big Ben will stop bongingHow will Britbongs know the time now? And will this affect #Brexit?  
Brexit: Patrick Minford still isn't helping, and why the WTO option is a terrible idea:  
A ‘cliff-edge’ Brexit is just another name for Project Fear says @RogerBootle 
Dear Clive Betts MP @UKLabour Please defend the people against a #Brexit bought with £s and lies. Vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill.  
I REALLY WANT TO SCREAM OUT LOUD WHEN I SEE SO MUCH FAFF ABOUT A CLOCK!!!! foodbanks? NHS? Education Cuts? Pensions? Brexit? The economy?  
Agree with @SteveRichards14. #Labour should pull out of #Brexit. #EU27 is eating UK's lunch . #LabourOutOfBrexit 
Nobody said that voting for #Brexit would lead to #BigBen being silenced! Why were we not warned! 
Awww yeah!!! Thank you to everyone that has pushed our Brexit war chest to £40K today!!  
2. KDP suggested to Change movement, we need all parties to support the reform process, support for the Referendum on September 25/2017. 
Only the Conservative party has a clear plan for Brexit. We will publish more position papers this week.  
Great News from Arizona! Supporters of Public Schools Collect Enough Signatures to Put Vouchers to a Referendum  
Remember the predicted #Brexit "domino effect"? It didn't happen! But we still must reform the EU together! 
Cruise missile riposte by Alan Winters (who is a trade expert) to Minford and EfFT deceit about Brexit gains.   
Who needs who more? Part 1 of our review on today's Brexit Position Papers  
This is why we must hold Brexiteers in government to account for the promises they made during the referendum campaign. @VoteLeaveWatch 
Isolated students means an isolated future ☞ UK students may be barred from Erasmus after Brexit  via @timeshighered 
'A terrible betrayal' @michaelgove fights @PhilipHammondUK over use of fishing as a Brexit bargaining chip  
Dear Paul Beresford MP @Conservatives Now it's clear #Brexit will damage Mole Valley, please vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept.  
New poll suggests a THIRD of Brits convinced by Vote Leave's claim Brexit would mean £350 million for the NHS 
Dear @hilarybennmp Since #Brexit based on lies is not the people's will, please would you vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill next month?  
We can't let the Government hide the 50 studies on #BrexitImpact - need to be properly informed before we make our final decision on #Brexit  
A politician worrying about Big Ben when there are food banks and Brexit is like a nurse cleaning a patient's teeth at a cardiac arrest. 
Big Ben may have fallen silent but the clock on the Brexit talks is still ticking. Read more from @thomasbrake: 
No Brits ever worked in a European country before Brexit. In the same way no Brits work in the US today.Oh, hang on ....  
...he said, while disagreeing with his own party over its Brexit position.  
Latest Brexit news. Government must get real instead of producing fantasy wishlists. #freetrade #brexit  
3) there is one thing keeping Brexit alive and thats our media & politicians not being straight with the public on the risks 
Breaks my heart that Brexit will rob young Britons of this opportunity. I was Erasmus student @EdinburghUni >> roots of my research there. 
Reality starts to dawn, UK is slowly moving towards accepting harsh and inconvenient truths about Brexit 
More to the point, Labour MPs must say no to Brexit. If Corbyn doesn’t agree, break-away the for sake of our country 
We'll challenge & expose bad bosses | McCluskey’s fury over bosses trying to use #Brexit to cut  pay  via @labourlist 
In addition to these, also recommend @JeremyCliffe and @AlbertoNardelli. All worth following for Brexit news affecting UK.  
Barzani: Baghdad says referendum not included in constitution. Does constitution include cutting #Kurdistan's budget, Peshmerga weapons? 
EU need us! Britain tells Brussels it must bend on trade to secure beneficial Brexit deal  
Dear Kevin Barron MP @UKLabour Since the people were misled by lies, please will you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept?  
And with manufacturing- Minford has said his de-reg Brexit would largely obliterate manufacturing from UK. 
.@peterkyle – Single Market membership is the best way of ensuring continuity of goods after Brexit  
And it would have been enough to swing the Referendum. Let's face it: Leave won on lies. #StopBrexit 
Anti-Brexit campaigners planning wave of mass protests in 'autumn of discontent'  
Dear John Baron MP @Conservatives Now the economic damage of #Brexit is clear, please will you vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept?  
My thread on how UK government is misdirecting itself on Brexit by thinking primarily in Westminster/Whitehall lobby terms.  
Anyway, I'm sticking to the facts we all need to hear. Brexit and Trump were Russian jobs. You should read #AlternativeWar and see. 
Pro-EU campaigners should stop agitating for a 2nd referendum and help make Brexit a success #RespectTheResult 
Economist claiming £135bn Brexit boost for UK guilty of 'violence to basic economic facts'  
The message is getting through - ECJ jurisdiction post-Brexit wld be unacceptable judicial imperialism. EU rights do not 'follow the flag'.  
It is the EU - not Britain - that looks shackled to a rigid, out-dated structure in Brexit negotiations: 
UK calls on EU to prevent sensitive Brexit information leaking.For 'sensitive' substitute 'embarrassing'#brexit 
Government Brexit papers a masterclass in myopia and arrogance. We can't demand all EU advantages while obeying none of the rules. End of 
4 Govt Brexit papers in last week all saying things should continue as before (customs,NI, confidentiality,goods). No hint of how. 
Dear Victoria Atkins MP Now it's clear that #Brexit Leave campaign lied, why not vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill in September?  
Now Jeremy Corbyn must say no to Brexit: the time for evasions is over | Steve Richards | Opinion | The Guardian  
The @BBCr4today treatment of the new Economists For Brexit "£135bn GDP boost" report disgraceful....:  
As an economist, I CANNOT understand WHY WOULD UK defy trade theory and START TO EXPORT TO DISTANT MARKETS after #Brexit? Any help? #remain 
Another day another demand.UK demands British goods be sold in EU at no extra cost after Brexit  
The brightest scientist in the world also slammed the Brexit ideology you share with the Tories. He called it a 'disaster' #Corbyn 
Because normally you'd expect a reasonable, balanced, measured, disdain-free and totally hinged editorial from Osborne on Brexit...  
Someone claiming to be @jameschappers - the anti-Brexit, ex Davis aide - says he was assaulted and silenced by Greek police  
Osborne's editorial on Brexit position papers just dripping with disdain  
Govt papers on Brexit seem tto say we want to retain all benefits, to ignore rules, pay nothing, yet tell 27 how to run negs and go whistle. 
Brexit mucks You Up!@No10Vigil#Unite #Rethink #RejectSo, we bring our flags and our voices together again @peoplesmarch4eu London, 9/9! 
I was a remainer at the time of the referendum but since doing actual research and learning more about the EU I am so glad we voted leave 
It feels so embarrassing to be an Englishman abroad after Brexit  
IT'S A SODDING CLOCK!!!Nuclear threats; Brexit chaos; an idiot in the White House; terrorism... Haven't you all got better things to do?  
While @PeterBoneUK complains about a clock being repaired, citizens are trying to remind him of more important priorities. #Brexit  
UK Chief Trade Negotiator: Post-Brexit trade deals can help global security. 
Brexit is the biggest risk to the housing market says the UK's biggest estate agent. Or you still listening to ukip?  
There's Trump, there's terrorism and there's Brexit - but what Theresa May decided to take a stand on was Big Ben  
Today I'm working on getting ready for #repealthe8th cmte & referendum. Voter registration big problem in #dubw. #Register2Repeal important 
Great to see on the front page of @Telegraph today that post-Brexit trade deals will make Britain and the world safer.  
Absolutely; shameful lack of due diligence & scrutiny. Won't forgive Corbyn 4 his failure to stand up for the 63% who did not vote 4 #Brexit  
Don’t be hard on MP Stephen Pound who’s so hurt by the silencing of Big Ben. He’s only worth about 80% of what he was before the referendum. 
More good economic news post-Brexit!   
Why would anyone with pride, in their right mind & who was a patriot want to be governed by another country? In short, they don't ! Brexit ! 
Big Ben symbolism? It's fallen silent in dismay at Brexit; not wanting to ring the UK's knell. It'll chime when our EU membership is secure. 
The City must prepare for an £135bn per year Brexit boost  
What metaphor. Britain is shutting down until it understands #Brexit was utter bollocks.  
Christian Adams on the ticking clock in the Brexit negotiations - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Latest from me: review in @NewStatesman of Anthony Barnett's v good new book abt Brexit, England, Trump, everything  
Brian Cox independence referendum klaxon.  
#BREAKING: President @Masoud_Barzani reiterates that referendum on independence will not be delayed, says all efforts failed with Baghdad.  
It's true - I do have a binder of all the official #Brexit documents. It's my pride and joy.  
This idiocy must soon be brought to an end. Brexit is undeliverable, as is patently obvious. Time to start organising criminal charges  
One reason we cherish UNITED Kingdom: it let Scotland hold referendum on secession. Senator, if you want us to cherish Nigeria, do likewise.  
And Brexit  
Slovenian PM says EU will block Brexit trade talks this autumn after failing to make sufficient progress | City A.M  
Government is proving it can't deliver Brexit on the terms it promised to. It should be honest with the public and put the economy first.  
Brexit is looking more and more expensive, pointless, damaging, and ridiculous by the day. 
For those of you concerned or interested in the Health implications of Brexit which is bad for your health join us tomorrow at Catalyst Inc  
Dear Stuart Andrew MP @StuartAndrewNow it's clear voters were misled over #Brexit, please would you vote against Sept EU Withdrawal Bill?  
Super glad everybody is talking about this stupid bell now instead of Brexit, Trump & the associated general downfall of civilisation. 
Our editorial @EveningStandard on the real reason for the frenetic Brexit activity by the government this week  
LSE BREXIT – All of a sudden Britain has become the slowest growing of the major western economies  
One in four Brexit voters believe they were misled by the Leave campaign  
We have Nazis marching in US, Brexit chaos, Trump & North Korea at odds & our MPs are mourning a fucking bell? Get back to work. #BigBen 
Dear rest of the world,Yes, post-Brexit Britain has completely lost the plot. It’s not your imagination.  
BREAKING: post Brexit, Big Ben to be renamed Mediocre Michael. #bellend 
These hard right governments don't come cheap. Still, the money Trump's wasting each day is a drop in the ocean compared to Brexit.  
Saint George will be denied entry visa under proposed post Brexit immigration rules 
Forget Brexit, poverty, NHS, terror, Trump & N Korea. I'm off to cover the world's biggest story: Big Ben's bongs & a mass demo by a few MPs 
1/4 Brexit voters say they were misled by the Leave campaign according to poll suggesting Remain would now win.  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard on the ticking clock in the Brexit negotiations  
Every Brexit story today has the UK doing a lot of 'urging' of the EU..begging might be a better word. 
Trump: the eclipse of America. Temporary, though: he will transit. Here we must ensure that the Brexit madness is temporary too. 
My old friend Minford has a record of being right: a hard #Brexit will boost UK economy.  
Stephen Hawking is right: the Brexit Labour supports is going to wreck the economy, and it's time we did something about it.  
It’s time to ditch Project Fear for Project Prosperity and embrace the Brexit boom  
Dear Debbie Abrahams MP @Debbie_abrahams Now it's clear voters were misled over #Brexit please wd you vote against the EU Withdrawal Bill ?  
Post-Brexit US deal will be dead-in-water if Trump gets impeached... Anyone think we'll be ripped off either way? #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Brexit Britain should adopt the unilateral free trade policies of Hong Kong, Singapore and New Zealand 
Let's get the Brexit War Chest up to £40K today! So close! @Scientists4EU, @HealthierIn, @Euromove, @_Britain4Europe 
1. You're running scared of a vote on the reality of a final deal.2. You called for a replay 2nd ref if #Remain narrowly won.#Brexit  
It's a total mess, how long can Tory government & Labour continue with this farce?Brexit's an undeliverable folly and an act of self-harm.  
#Brexit will only make this worse with no EU propping up our economy.  
The problem in the referendum is that the Out campaign started, at the latest, in 1994, and the In one, at the earliest, in 2014. 
Have you heard #TNEpodcast? All the #Brexit news, plus how quitting #EU could impact mental health provision  pls RT 
London's property sellers lower their expectations as the slowdown shows few signs of easing  
IDEA: as Big Ben is silenced we should install a Cuckoo instead as a respectful reference to the Government's Brexit strategy. 
Minford's plan for Brexit has so many flaws it's really hard to stay on top of them all...  
A QUARTER of people who voted Brexit believe they were duped by Leave campaign  via @LondonEconomic 
Not that #BigBen no longer bonging is symbolic phallic impotence of the Brexit negotiation era or anything. The era of the bell end. 
Daily Briefing- Macron's European tour- UK publishes Brexit position paper- Markets start week with relative calm 
Labour must remember what 'Conference' stated last autumn: No appropriate deal means NO BREXIT.   
Britain will have to abide by EU rules in nearly 50% of our trade, hard Brexit or not - @EdwardJDavey 
#Brexit negotiations led by .@MichelBarnier: All EU27 positions published at . Note paper on governance. 
Trump the Racist Bigot might not last long enough to save the Tory Brexit by giving Britain a trade deal. It's time to #StopBrexit 
Hong Kong property investors go trophy hunting in London despite Brexit  
Brexit is less believable than fairies at the bottom of the garden, the Loch Ness monster, etc, and in addition has no endearing qualities.  
If the EU right now found a way to keep Big Ben ringing during renovations that could pretty much swing the whole nation against Brexit. 
That's really what Brexit is - the triumph of sentiment over reason. And this Big Ben dogshit seems to have thrown it into sharp relief. 
A ‘cliff-edge’ Brexit is just another name for Project Fear, writes @RogerBootle 
One-in-four Brexit voters believe they were misled by the Leave campaign 
Latest Brexit BS:•UK £135bn better off•Will make world safer placeWhat next? Brexit will save the universe? 
Brexit explained  
New post: Brexit remains an exercise in deception   
President Barzani: We will not postpone Referendum under any pressure. 4 those who say it is not timing,then when & what better alternative?  
President Barzani : Our delegation in Baghdad is not 4renegotiating federalism or budget issues,they r there 2negotiate on post referendum  
It's when the fantasies of the disaster of this clueless Brexit meet the realities that the fan will be overwhelmed with the brown stuff.  
Why Britain’s voters must have a second referendum on Brexit | Vernon Bogdanor  
DELAY: Brexit talks taking longer than expected according to Slovenian PM. If EU stalls, UK should walk out!  
Polls suggest:1. British people think the Govt is handling Brexit negotiations badly; but2. Don't want a referendum on the deal.We're odd 
Crawford Falconer: Brexit Britain can drive the world towards freer trade, and with it peace and prosperity  
Again, if - in the midst of Brexit - you are worried about *Scottish* nationalism, you may not be paying attention. 
The reality of "taking back control" in Brexit Britain: PM of country 1/50th size of UK says no trade talks in 2017  
As the facts emerge it is becoming clear that not only is government incompetent, but it's impossible to Brexit on the terms they set out.  
What is your personal opinion #Brexit from the EU OR Remain in the EU? @theresa_may @EU_Commission @DavidDavisMP RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
BREAKING: new @dexeugov position paper from Davis reveals Brexit talks progress in full to date, with way forward now also spelled out.  
Reminders:1) It will be for EU27 to decide if "sufficient progress" in Brexit talks2) EU27 all agree on Brexit content AND process 
Chuka Umunna calls for 'clear red water' between Labour and Tories on Brexit 
I woke up all motivated to educate myself on #Brexit and  #MondayMotivation 
Opinion: Brexit Britain has become a United Kingdom of hate and denial  
Chuka Umunna says Labour should distance itself from Tories on Brexit. So is told to "join the Tories where you belong".  
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna on @LBC this morning on how the Gov have wasted over a year before they have outlined their #Brexit position. Please RT:  
WATCH: Retired special forces sergeant says DEPORT ALL TERRORISTS AND THEIR FAMILIES  via @Your Brexit 
We will know, in a world threatened by climate change, Brexit, Trump, North Korea, and terrorism, who has right priorities for Parliament.  
I would be amazed if more than a tiny handful turn up. What with Brexit and Barcelona there are more important things to fret about.  
Chuka Umunna: Labour must distance itself from Tories on Brexit  
The poll tax had support till people got their bills. Brexit will be defeated once people realise their personal, actual cost.  
Chuka Umunna says the government is incompetent and can't even agree with itself over how to pursue Brexit  
Undeterred, BBC just puts Minford on @BBCr4today. They really are the propaganda arm of Hard Brexit now.  
READ | Brexit betrayal could leave us under the European Court of Justice until 2027. Not what we voted for! 
BREXIT BASICS EU Freedom of Movement allows these FOUR things to move anywhere within the Single Market.》Goods》Capital》Sevices》Workers 
Theresa May's Brexit plans ridiculed as 'foolish' by former government legal chief   
Taoiseach says he wants referendum on 8th Amendment in first half of next year #repealthe8th 
#R4Today 2 economists putting opposing case on #Brexit trade: #JohnHumphrys only contradicts & challenges 1 of them! More bias. Time to go! 
Woke up to leery old man outside with a can of Special Brew shouting incoherently about Brexit. Oh, hang on, it's John Humphrys #r4today 
#Brexit "..undeniably created an environment where abuse of anyone that looks "foreign" is increasingly normal.." 
Remainers moaning on twitter that the Gov is clueless has NO impact on success of Brexit.Gov actually having no clue on the other hand  
#Brexit "is a once-in-a-generation opportunity to raise living standards and create new employment opportunities"  
#BBCbias How dare BBC have this headline. Story has realistic numbers in small text, #brexit means 20-30% decline  
.@ChukaUmunna: is Govt able to deliver Brexit in way it was sold to the public? Not being poorer, £350m for NHS, same trading relation @LBC 
Humphrys uses "a lot of people are saying" as cover to reduce a complex Brexit issue to party political tittle tattle. #r4today 
Bail is right of an accused provided he dosent flee/tampers with evidence during trial not referendum on his guilt or innocence #ColPurohit 
The British people who voted to return this Government must ask why it's delaying over Brexit & the Great Repeal Bill is not passed as Act?  
Lol. So I guess IPOB isn't getting that referendum. Meanwhile, shout out to @MrAyeDee for stating it would be a recorded broadcast. 
Positively my last #Brexit tweet before I Leave London tomorrow. A commentary I wrote recently for @EveningStandard. 
May and Corbyn will go down in history as the only two opposing party leaders to have ever committed simultaneous political suicide. #Brexit 
Pardon Me, Britain, Your Brexit Schizophrenia Is Showing  
The hard truth about terrorism is that there isn't a lot more we can do to stop it   via @telegraphnews WE CAN DEPORT 
A short history of the UK'S relationship with the EU #brexit  
1. Just back from hols in Greece.Locals tentatively asking our views on Brexit. They think UK has gone mad and have only pity in their eyes 
Theresa May's Brexit plans ridiculed as 'foolish' by former government legal chief  
The U.K. says it's stepping up pressure on the EU over Brexit talks  
I suggest that second #brexit referendum will be good for brexiteers. It will allow them to solidify their hopes with fact. @LeaveEUOfficial 
"London’s New Subway Symbolized the Future. Then Came Brexit". 
Brian Cox: Brexit means indyref2 is inevitable ... but timing will be crucial  
Coming to #agquip2017 this week? Come to the North West Alliance site & cast your vote in the People's Referendum on #coal and #gas 
UK to obey EU's court rulings until 2027 - 12 YEARS after Brexit . When we leave the bloody EU it can get stuffed  
The worst thing that could happen for YES campaigners if people think it's a fait accompli and don't vote, a la Brexit and Hillary. 
Brexit and abortion among key topics as Taoiseach meets with Justin Trudeau in Canada   
Brexit: it ain't going to be boring... little tele-slebs will have to wake up. We're about to be shafted.  #Brexit.  
Despite David Davis's breezy cheeriness, the British government's approach to Brexit still lacks substance  
The only "getting on with it" I am getting on with is No Brexit. No Brexit of any kind, neither May's nor Corbyn's version, nothing less. 
It's time #Labour put country B4 Party. They know #Brexit's bad 4 UK & failure 2 give Ppl a rethink B4 we crash out = as bad as #Tories 
You called for a second referendum if the result was close. Why so frit?We all know why  
Britain's government has hinted at a new, more sober approach to Brexit  
Britain flourishes after Brexit as nation revels in £50bn investment and 44,000 new jobs  
He reminded me that I had supported Trump by being sympathetic to the idea of Brexit.He must believe the European Commssion is competent...  
A united Ireland is the only practical solution to Brexit  
To all my followers, please participate-> #ReparationsForPoland! #GermanDeathCamps #Poland #Trump #Brexit  
47% of Britons disapprove of #TheresaMay's handling of #Brexit. Just 28% approve.PM cannot ignore us any longer.(opinium/britainelects)  
Good point. Would you care to answer the question @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour @Keir_Starmer @Labour4EU How will our lives be better? #Brexit  
The Tories once had a reputation for managing the economy. And yet they threaten the UK with #Brexit to keep their right wingers happy. 
Taoiseach wants #repealthe8th referendum early next year.   
Shame then that Brexit is going to cut scientific research & funding in the UK though. Advances like this will not be ours. @Scientists4EU 
EU causing its own demise as it spends millions to stop Brexit-like breaks, MEP blasts  
Once the terms of negotiation are known, there [X] be a second EU referendum:Should: 37%Should not: 49%via @OpiniumResearch 
47% of Britons now disapprove of Theresa May's handling of Brexit:via @OpiniumResearch, 15 - 18 Aug 
We're only a few weeks away from the UK press saying everyone will get a pony after Brexit.  
DAILY TELEGRAPH FRONT PAGE: "Trade deals after Brexit 'will make world safer'"#skypapers 
Spotted on Facebook.The human cost of Brexit.Shameful! @DExEUgov @Conservatives @UKLabour 
Brexit could boost UK economy by  £135 billion, say top economists  
A 2nd referendum is inevitable if the folly of Brexit is not stopped sooner - which it should be: it's doing so much damage already.  
Mini thread/rant here about what Brexit does and doesn't mean for refugee protection in the UK.  
Continuity Remainers are so determined to hate Brexit that they've become detached from reality, says @DanielJHannan 
If - before UK voted #Brexit - another EU country’d proposed an expensive replication of what EU already had, UK would have screamed WASTE!  
This level of ignorance about basic EU facts highlights the piss poor media's guilt for Brexit farce & how Ill equipped folk were to vote   
Brexit:Privileged politicians convincing the disadvantaged to further disadvantage themselves then saying "Well, if it's what they want..." 
Theresa May's Brexit plans ridiculed as 'foolish' by former government legal chief  
Minford's claims that Britain will gain from #Brexit has already been debunked #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit 
More I look at the Economists for Brexit paper, the more amazed I am that anyone takes it seriously. 
What a silly fuss the Andrew Gilligan affair now seems -  - when you think of the lies the BBC puts out about Brexit. 
Various scare stories concerning a “cliff-edge” Brexit are really Project Fear in disguise   
Nissan needs car part suppliers to be set up in UK post Brexit or they can't function. Where are all the guys telling me I don't get it now? 
Brexit: Nissan says the UK car industry needs £100 million of government support  
Just complained to BBC re their coverage of "economists" vaunting Brexit's benefits when they really mean Minford. Vain but necessary effort 
Brexit for the Bewildered We don't have a planWe don't know the rulesWe don't understand the processWe ask for the impossible We fail 
Economists for Brexit's arguments were ably debunked by Professor Winters in April this year.  Yet they still repeat them.  
Dear God. A professor of philosophy thinks free trade is alt-right?So unhinged by Brexit, he overlooks the alt-right favours protectionism  
Hard Brexit Harry Maguire, like a cross between Bobby Moore & George Best. He's walloping the league with fellow Sheffieldite Vardy  
Brexit shows politics is now a game detached from reality among manyMPs on Left & Right. Like Monopoly,only real people will lose real money 
They were successful with Brexit. They won with Trump. It's time to hold these people to account.   
Hard Brexit would give every British household a £5,000 a year boost, say pro-exit economists  
Excellent - spot on - why are TV reports of this blatant Brexit propaganda not equally armed with a decent analysis  ...  
Brexit must be stopped. End of. 
how very Brexit UK how very fucked up that the clock renovation animates politicians more than any number of recent humanitarian crises 
Most comments on the BBC 3 Brexit video I was in were ignorant. But this rebuttal from a young ethnic minority Leave voter gives me strength  
Extraordinary how long it is taking both the Tory and Labour parties to understand that Brexit will mean the end of them. 
Economists for Brexit. But not for you (). 
The UK is piling pressure on the EU to shift the focus of Brexit negotiations away from the terms of divorce  
Paralysed like rabbits by the Brexit headlights but they're going to wank on forever about Big Ben, an old clock on a building. 
Without EU migrants, our economy will buckle under the pressure of #Brexit.  
We're on the deck of the Titanic, heading for an iceberg called Brexit, and MPs are arguing over what the band should play… on a big bell. 
Some interesting details from the FT's story on the upcoming Brexit paper on UK/EU dispute settlement. pic.twitter.com/DgWLFUf9qU 
Very good book of >100 testimonials of what Brexit has meant for non-Brit EU citizens in UK. I'm reading it now. Half way through.  
At least we can rely on MPs to have enough wisdom and sense of proportion to get us out of this Brexit mess.Oh. 
Tory, UKIP & DUP MEPs voted against EU tax avoidance proposals. #Brexit - for the 1%.#StopBrexitHour #StopBrexit 
Brexit is fuelling extremism and race hate. We must be on our guard against all forms extremism that threaten our country. #StopBrexit 
UK to propose new post-Brexit court to oversee relations with EU  
In an hour @ChrisLeslieMP asked a number of Brexit questions. In 15 months there are no answers, it's a terrible idea.#StopBrexitHour 
It wasn't just Farage who was calling for a 2nd referendum if Leave lost - some Tory Brexiters were doing the same. #StopBrexitHour #Brexit  
I'm sorry if that's their priority then they're deluded misguided or in need of a different job. Brexit destroying UK and they're Bonging!  
Boris' lies of the leave campaign exposed as gov admits no free trade deals until after Brexit transition, which could not be until 2022  
An amazing detail from Minford's "Economists for Brexit" paper - they believe there are border checks on the Northern Ireland/Irish border.  
It's weird how when I talk about and debate Brexit in public talks and LBC phone-ins people debate reasonably but don't on Twitter  
Hey @Keir_Starmer surely it's untenable to still 'accept' Brexit if tests not met? When's @UKLabour going to make clear? #StopBrexitHour 
So for #StopBrexitHour this evening, I'm going to look at the impact of brexit on the tech sector, which currently contributes £97bn to GDP. 
Only a Brexiter wants to make the best of Brexit Owen @OwenJones84. I want nothing to do with Brexit & will not rest until we #StopBrexit 
Is Brexit a National Embarrassment or a Global Embarrassment? 
There should be an inquiry into how this happened. BBC seems to have a policy of pushing Brexit propaganda as far as it can.  
A pro EU , lawyer who spent a lifetime in favour of the ECJ is against Brexit .. wow   
V depressed. Youngish relative today: not worried now re Brexit as heard on news that 'some profs had found solution'. Meaning Minford et al 
Sorry to bring up again but the fact that BBC blacked out our 290 economists against Brexit letter still rankles next to this rubbish.  
Coz Corbyn's muted Labour's best and brightest in his fanatical drive for Brexit.  
Trying to explain what people don't get about decentralization, why I loved Brexit!  
Martin Schulz: "I refuse to imagine a Europe where lorries and hedge funds are free to cross borders but citizens cannot"#Remain #Brexit  
A BRIEF HISTORY OF BREXIT1. Hawking criticises Tories on NHS.2. Corbyn quotes him.3. Hawking criticises Brexit.4. Corbyn ignores him.  
Some Leavers say the EU is a dictatorship. The reality is that it has stronger democratic safeguards than the UK#StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Some say Brexit is going badly, but if you take the time to trawl Twitter threads & Guardian comments you'll find all the answers are there…  
Spot on /-Why Britain’s voters must have a second referendum on Brexit | Vernon Bogdanor  
Tories know Brexit will be a disasterThey are positioning themselves for the blame gameIt will obvs be the fault of foreigners & Corbyn.. 
Accurately Reported.#Biafra The Message Is Clear: No Referendum No Election In Biafran Land | Premium Reporters  
"Economists for Brexit" appears to confuse fiscal savings with GDP boost. Undergraduate level error. Laughable stuff 
"Hard Brexit is economically much superior to soft" argues Prof Minford, lead of report in Economists for Free Trade  
Quote of Sunday - Irish MEP Mairead McGuinness: UK's Brexit proposal for Northern Ireland "is an attempt to have its cake and eat ours". 
Varadkar says he and Trudeau discussed abortion referendum with Taoiseach saying it will be held in first part of next year if possible 
Given some #brexit media coverage: good to remind ourselves that this is not simply @EU_Commission preference but in #EUCO April guidelines 
Europe will still require Britain to abide by their rules in nearly 50% of our trade, hard Brexit or not. 
Jamie did you not get the memo from Tory HQ that you've now to pretend you've got other policies beside No Referendum?  Oh dear  
Dear @RachaelMaskell MPYour seat York Central voted Remain.Please would you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in September?  
Boris' lies of the leave campaign exposed as Gov admits no free trade deals until after Brexit transition, which may not be until 2022  
Dear @MikeKaneMP Your seat Wythenshawe & Sale East voted Remain.Please would you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept?  
I voted Labour to keep the tories out. Won't be voting labour again unless they unambiguously oppose brexit. 
Dear @MGreenwoodWW  MPYour constituency Wirral West voted Remain.Please wd you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in September?  
The Irish countryside is more popular than ever, thanks to Brexit  
manufacturing order books at a 29 year high, exports up by 16, inward investment plans on the rise. Brexit = Armageddon...NOT! 
So we can't call them Remoaners anymore?Theyr anti-Brexit resistance fighters"!Whatever they style themselves perhaps they cd explain UK' 
.@Nigel_Farage "What they'll say is that Brexit... led directly to Trump. If they said I would be only too pleased."  
Why Britain’s voters must have a second referendum on Brexit | Vernon Bogdanor  
KRG president Massoud Barzani says PKK & PYD are not terrorists, and they support our referendum decision. 
UK Government is withholding a report which shows Scotland will be one of the areas worst-hit by Brexit.  
Why I'm a Remain voter who isn't calling for a second EU referendum. Please hear me out here!:  
Please take note of what he said about Brexit, if you value his opinion so highly.  
Tory Government ‘seeking to use Ireland as hostage in Brexit negotiations’ – @davidcullinane  
The Nazis polled 43.9% of the vote in 1933. Higher than the % voting for Brexit.Popular and right. Different words with different meanings  
Britain will not exclude possible EU oversight of UK borders after Brexit  
That's strange. I'm a former academic and many of my friends have PhDs, like me. Not a single one of them is in favour of Brexit.  
I'd never considered the European community before Brexit. It was just quietly helpful. But since it became a "thing" I've thought more, (1) 
Here's an idea: if the country can "survive" Brexit, it stands to reason it can surely "survive" a second referendum.Minds blown, huh? 
Excellent & blunt analysis of fatally flawed approach to #Brexit by @GOVUK : today's Brexit Jack of Kent blog  
Head of German Association of the Automative Industry: Hard #Brexit will cause business to move to central and SE Europe #StopBrexit 
But Nigel himself was Demanding a second referendum right up to the moment he realised he'd been unlucky enough to win the first one 
Dear @KateHoeyMP Your Vauxhall constituency voted Remain.Please would you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept?  
UK govt has started cribbing from Nicola Sturgeon's hymn-sheet on Brexit. Excellent fm @iainmacwhirter 
Britain could strike a post Brexit free trade deal without getting the approval of Scottish and Welsh governments  
Your EU shitehawks' current stance during Brexit negotiations. pic.twitter.com/szj4PwL4KG 
Cost of Brexit is huge. TY @Labour4EU & good luck with your campaign to convince @UKLabour to stop supporting #Brexit  
A crucial point on Brexit & UK/EU dispute settlement: Davis seems willing to accept EFTA Court. I'll blog on this when govt paper comes out.  
Brexit boosts the coffers of the mega-rich while everyone else faces low GBP, low wage, rising inflation & austerity  
The pound is vulnerable as the U.K. prepares to provide details for its Brexit plan  
Observer front page headline: "Man no one has ever heard of warns Brexit will fail". Well, it is August, I suppose. 
Poll: Controlling Immigration Is the Public’s Top Brexit Talk Priority 
David Davis is warning the EU that 'the clock is ticking over Brexit negotiations'.  Worrying signs he has forgotten which side he is on 
2) at the moment it appears the Gov is "negotiating" #Brexit withA) the Tory partyB) the papersNot with the EU  
Vernon Bogdanor is right, voters must have final say on Brexit deal with a chance to stay in EU 
Wow. Powerful words from an informed source..#Brexit  
Let's have the referendum then, .@Nigel_Farage!If you're so certain what have you got to lose?Bring on the 2nd Ref, now we know more! 
12. Percival lost Singapore because things were pointed in the wrong direction.  Brexit ministers risk making a similar mistake./ends 
11. UK may still get its Brexit act together, but ministers need to stop thinking only in Westminster/Whitehall/lobby terms.  Not central. 
9.  UK government still thinks domestic media are the most important audience. Ministers are approaching Brexit with a "lobby" mentality. 
7. The Brussels desks of most news organisiations are now better guides to how Brexit will affect the UK than anyone with lobby passes. 
5.  Brexit simply does not suit the lobby model of political news reporting.  Hence disproportionate space given to empty off-record stuff. 
Dear @GeraintDaviesMP Your Swansea West constituency voted Remain.Please would you vote against the #Brexit EU Withdrawal Bill in Sept?  
4. The thing about Brexit is that little useful information is currently in Whitehall/Westminster - there is bluff and bluster instead. 
Leavers on Twitter have, for the main part, to be among the most stupid and ignorant people the human species has ever produced.#Brexit 
A 2nd referendum? Why, what an excellent idea Nigel.Go on, fight for a 2nd ref and put your money where your mouth is. I dare you.  
How Brexit is quietly killing science  
Mr Hammond, resign. Nobody with an ounce of patriotism wants you and you have enough money to give up your job. Brexit means Brexit !!! 
Given extent to which Westminster is prepared to jeopardise UK economy for #Brexit their mismanagement of oil industry is hardly surprising 
Davis says 'clock is running out' on Brexit negotiations. UK is most at risk from 'no deal' -has Davis realised yet?  
Second EU referendum, yay or nay? I'm on @LBC now, on 0345 60 60 973. LISTEN LIVE: 
My autocorrect changes Breitbart to "Brexit art". Not sure if there's a hidden message in there? 
Siemens UK CEO isn't onboard with predictions of a £135bn Brexit windfall for British economy...  
Almost every economic assessment shows Brexit is not positive for UK economy. Reality now starting to bite the Leave slogans. 
David Davis: The UK-EU Brexit talks must take a big leap forward. And Britain is ready to do it  
An uplifting read for pro #Brexit voters. Enjoy.  
Oh and here's an actual Brexit minister from the actual Brexit dept praising a report which would unilaterally lower UK tariffs.  
Observer poll finds nearly half of those asked believe there should be no second referendum on departure terms  
Can see the chat in the Beeb now. 'We've covered all the reports saying there'll be damage to economy from hard Brexit so we need balance.' 
Once again BBC gives huge coverage to hard #Brexit Minford  Here (again) is why it's nonsense 
'Today, Brexit looks increasingly less like Dunkirk and more like the Charge of the Light Brigade'  
It's worrying that the same thoroughly debunked #brexit study can be re-released every few months & gets uncritical @BBCNews headlines 
Check out these Worker Protections from the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights. This what Brexit supporters voted to give up.  
On @LBC from 12pm I'm asking?:12: 2nd EU referendum? 1: Tackling homelessness? 2: Abolish the monarchy? Call me on 0345 60 60 973 
Brexit Britain's unemployment level less than half that of the Eurozone and at its lowest since 1975. And some still think we NEED the EU...  
utter tosh which fuels Brexit sunlit uplands dreams. If UK unilaterally went 0 tariffs what would it have to offer 3rd countries for FTAs?  
Dear Siobhain McDonagh MP @Siobhain_MP Your Mitcham & Morden voted Remain. Please would you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
You supported a Referendum, supported Brexit, opposed Brexit, accepted the outcome and are now suggesting a 2nd ref. Zero credibility!  
Regulatory standards are set by the EU, USA & China. If Britain wants any regulatory sovereignty it has to stay in the EU. #Brexit #Remain 
How about a first referendum on what's actually possible rather than getting people to vote on a series of undeliverable promises. 
Never a dull moment! Yesterday's interesting river traffic was William B hosting Anti Brexit group @No10Vigil's party on the River Thames 
Maybe that's because Remainers don't find anything funny about the risk of families being ripped apart by #Brexit.  
The #BBC , anxious to please #Brexit supporters, gives top spot to view of a single discredited #UKIP economist 
Our lives, our future. Out now. The reward for hard Brexit: Economy to swell by £135bn EVERY YEAR, experts calculate  
Given today's @BBCNews on #Brexit, it's good to read this by @BenChu_ if you had missed it:  @Independent 
A hard Brexit could boost the UK's economy by £135bn a year, according to a report by Economists for Free Trade.  
Why Britain’s voters must have a second referendum on Brexit | Vernon Bogdanor  
Brexit is making the UK a lying, bigoted, nasty little backwater with the Union about to splinter.Time for decent folk to stand up 4 Britain  
Labour: oppose Brexit, save the country, the NHS, our sanity.  
Corbyn and the Labour Leavers are legitimising the #Brexit press campaign of hate & lies which secured the narrow Leave majority. #Remain 
Is he also right about Brexit?  
Millions of us don't attend rallies at all, but we are the silent majority of millions who sensibly vote at the polling booth! Brexit/Trump! 
Back presenting on @LBC at 10 so join us for Brexit, Royals & Hunting. Not Hunting Brexit Royals though I see the appeal of that 
Those who want the EU to fail are those who want a poor, squabbling, divided Europe, prey to outside powers. #Remain #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Sir Vince Cable has got Brexit voters wrong. We are the true liberals now, writes @DiaChakravarty 
His pre EU referendum forecast had no sterling depreciation, no rise in inflation and no economic slowdown. 
There is no such thing as a “hard Brexit” - this is a bogus term. There is only a COMPLETE Brexit and we want it.  
Strange @BBCNews did not check the accuracy of Minford's past Brexit forecasts before leading its news site with this  
When I hear a story about hard Brexit a bit of me dies inside. And I hit my head against a wall. I have little wall left and a bad head. 
A beautifully written short piece on the UK's economic vulnerability to May's Brexit plans - well worth a read.  
Hard Brexit Is Best For UK Says Trade Expert 
Disgusting. The xenophobic madness in the UK won't end with Brexit; the extremists will keep demanding more...  
Nicola Sturgeon has repeatedly quoted the Fraser of Allander's analysis of Brexit threat. But blinkered when it comes to Indy  
#TheresaMay wrong on yet another aspect of #Brexit :   
Cliff Taylor: The UK's Brexit plan is more Blackadder than Machiavelli  
Will the September independence referendum in Kurdish region of Iraq usher into yet another conflict in the region?  
The Government chooses to chase better headlines rather than being straight about what Brexit means. But that conduct has consequences. 
How commuters and graduates are paying the price for Brexit  
Especially when her party's biggest donor is a massive homophobe who funded his own referendum on Section 28.  
I'm a 'Continuity Remainer'! I despise Brexit. Can anyone explain a single benefit from Brexit? Anyone??  
The Brexit Elite said we'd "take back control"They propose we use EU food rules and remove GB's power to make those rules. #bendoverBrexit 
Theresa May about to reveal more Brexit thinking but doubts cast by snr legal officials over her Brexit red-line.#BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Astonishing claim that 'Hard Brexit 'offers £135bn annual boost' to economy'. Based on flawed assumptions...(1/3)  
Being very honest. I think Corbyns #brexit stance will be his downfall. I agree with him on many things, but this is appeasement. 
"It's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled" - Mark Twain #Brexit  
@BBCNews site today promoting Hard Brexit line of Patrick Minford. Here's the LSE debunking his insane theories.  
President Barzani: We the people of Kurdistan know better than any one when is a good time for ourselves to hold referendum. It is in time. 
Households will be £40 a week richer post-Brexit, top economists predict  
Important to complain to BBC re Brexit article by Patrick Minford to prevent more such propaganda:Here are the facts  
Support holding national referendum on EU membership: 65% 61% 58% 57% 53% 51% 50% 44% 42% 
President @Masoud_Barzani says he told U.S. officials that compromise will not be made on the upcoming independence referendum.  
#BREAKING: Kurdish President @Masoud_Barzani speaks to #Saudi newspaper, says delaying referendum date out of the question.  
Didn't Minford also say that Brexit would 'mostly eliminate' UK manufacturing? That's 2.6 million jobs. Thanks. 
"BBC" & "Brexit" and I thought that was an oxymoron! Hard Brexit 'offers £135bn annual boost' to economy  
One asset manager is calling Brexit a sideshow and says Britain has a bigger problem  
What a hypocrite. Stephen Hawkng also says Brexit will leave us inward looking & isolated but it's ok as long as it's a Bennite isolation  
Both major populist victories of 2016 - those of Trump and Brexit - were demonstrably based on lies. The abuse of democracy was flagrant. 
Theresa May to publish five new Brexit papers amid fears of trade talks delay  
Twitter, I've had a night out & quite a few drinksFeeling mellow & chilledI have to say though that #Brexit is still a fucking stupid idea 
MPs are not bound by a referendum result or by the party whip, only by their conscience. Unfortunately most of them don't have one. 
Brexit: the plot thickens - another Ultra playing silly games ...  #Brexit.  
Hard Brexit 'offers £135bn annual boost' to economy  
Putting it all in perspective. Why I will never accept Brexit   
Pressure on European Union as the Government presents viable Brexit deal  
If you really thought Remain would lose again, you should be saying 'bring it on' to another referendum. Oddly, you're....not.  
No one knows what the final deal will look like.It's over a year since the referendum. It's not looking good.Vote when we know the deal.  
This is the kind of British supremacist that Brexit panders to  
Why Britain’s voters must have a second referendum on Brexit | Vernon Bogdanor  
UK to release tranche of Brexit position papers  
Britain is slowly moving towards accepting harsh truths about Brexit 
Makes you wonder if Brexit was just some kind of prototype or test for something much much bigger.What's he planning to do?!#Bannon 
So why are you so worried about a second referendum? Bring it on! #SecondRef #StopBrexit 
Key Brexit question for May and DD now is: if s market and c. union are overall good for UK, why we leaving them, to have no say on rules? 
'Manchester is where the party will have to face up to the reality of Brexit'Not half. 
At last, the outlines of a quick and clean Brexit are emerging  via @FT 
Brexit parties don't listen to all of the electorate: the future success of the NHS and of the UK are inextricably linked to EU membership.  
So in summary of tonight's postings... Brexit is destroying the UK tech industry- one of the many jewels in the crown. Well done Brexiters. 
UK Gvt oil tax fiasco, corporate giveaways and referendum lies.  
More proof that we won't be free of the European Court of Justice if we leave the EU. There is no point to Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Our political commentator @iainmacwhirter says 'As the UK drowns in a Brexit quagmire, Scotland points the way back to Europe'A must read 
Post Brexit let's limit migration from other parts of the country to London. The wholesale import of labour drives down London's wages. 
Brexit row: Britain demands free trade talks start by October despite EU resistance  
Love how Noble brexit'd himself  
Exactly. Hawkins thinks Brexit is a ridiculous thing turning the UK into an academic backwater  
Dear @Keir_Starmer, I would just like to add that a Corbyn Brexit is no more acceptable than a Tory one. Do the right thing. #StopBrexit 
How do you think brexit will impact the #NHS? You know the rules , retweet if you vote :) many thanks . 
Do you think #Brexit will have a good or a bad effect on the #NHS, or will it make no difference? RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
Of course, it's worth mentioning that the brightest economists in the world have made it clear what a disaster any form of Brexit will be.  
Brexit is on track, despite the sniping from former government insiders, writes @LiamHalligan 
Leftists, all you do is whinge. Every day since Brexit, every day since Trump. Just take a happy pill or top yourself  
Good article by @tobyhelm on the ECJ and Brexit - with comments from me and @sirpauljenkins - 
Hearing you're a centrist remoaner who hasn't retweeted this poll because you can't say "Jeremy's Brexit policy is costing him support" 
Everyone's dumping the pound, and they're only just getting started  
Opinion: At last, the outlines of a quick and clean Brexit are emerging  
German banks warn of DANGEROUS Brexit deals with UK fearing BRITAIN will punish nation  
Opinium finds Remain  3% ahead If another EURef referendum were to be heldRemain 47%Leave 44%DK 9% 
Wow you lot have really lost 2 light skinned couples to look up to in one week wow this post brexit era is mad 
And what did Professor Hawking say about #Brexit, Mr Corbyn? He said it would be "a step backwards". Why not listen to him on that too?  
Boris Johnson has gone quiet over Brexit  
Brexit could leave Irish peace programme at risk, campaigners warn  
#Brexit : better never than late!  @stopbrexit17 @stopbrexitmarch  
Because Brexit will make all these issues you claim to care about, far, far worse and that will keep us all up at night, for far, far longer  
Trump, like Brexit, has given permission for public airing of far-right views which once would rightly have been spurned.  
Do you want an exit from Brexit? Yes? Then join our campaign for a referendum on the deal today:  #Brexit 
EU migrants barred from claiming benefits after Brexit Theresa May pledge. Say It & Mean IT!  
Spain (Catalonia): Independence Referendum:Yes: 46% (-2)No: 54% (+2) 
Larger majority than UK EU referendum which was only advisory. History does not support idea that referendum results should be implemented.  
It doesn't take much explaining. Racism is at the heart of Brexit. I don't even need to use all the limited digits of Twitter. Tum te Tum...  
British public believes transition period necessary for Brexit  
Ireland’s prime minister is positioning his country to make the most out of Brexit  
Let them know we're on their side!If they speak out about Brexit, they have our support.March to Tory conference,  #Manchester 1/10/17. 
Another example of the threat #Brexit poses to the devolved administrations. @scotgov will continue to resist any UK government power grab. 
Here's the thing your leadership has given license to Theresa's nation destructing Brexit. You are part of the problem.  
Some Tory politicians feel they cannot be open & honest about Brexit because they will be vilified.  
Without EU migrants, our economy will buckle under the pressure of Brexit  It's all going so well! #StopBrexit 
The EU has treated us as a cash cow for far too long – and Brexit must finally put a stop to this, says @JCS_Hackett 
Stephen Hawking also says Brexit would leave us “isolated and inward-looking”. Are you listening to that very, very carefully @jeremycorbyn? 
Me for tomorrow's @Telegraph: Brexit for me is about a liberal future, not an imperial past where I never belonged. 
It's this sort of logic which means we have the #Brexit situation. Too many assumptions about how being in EU affects our lives. #StopBrexit 
Detail and realism should be the hallmarks of the big Brexit speech that Theresa May plans to give next month  
I’m unlucky enough to have @jeremycorbyn as my MP. We voted 75.22% remain. He has ignored us completely. He’s a Brexit ideologue. 
Dear @UKLabour - if you don't change position on #Brexit lots of your new voters will desert you, and even if you win, you inherit car crash  
Many folk complaining about infrastructure in Highlands, rightly. But a lot of new infrastructure is built with EU money. Post Brexit, nope. 
I hate polls, but...If you voted Labour to avoid Brexit Mayhem, will you vote Labour again if they don’t change Brexit position? 
Nigel Farage forced to admit that the EU referendum was only 'advisory' #CrumblingBrexit 
Many expressed doubts that #Brexit will happen. Others told of their (English) children making plans to leave UK because of Brexit concerns.  
Thanks to everyone who spoke to us on today's street stall in #Leeds & signed our petition to cancel #Brexit  
'Brexit effect' sees biggest boom in US tourists visiting the UK since the 1980s.  
There are vicious attacks by remainers on older voters for voting Brexit.They know what the UK was like when it was Great before EU rule  
Fox heading for Brexit showdown with Nicola Sturgeon in plan to BLOCK Scotland interfering  
Dismissing Scotland's GM crops ban sets a dangerous precedent  #Brexit 
So when Cage returns the skull, Brexit and Trump vanish and the cosmic balance is restored? Yeh? 
Flags going up ahead of #Gibraltar's National Day + 50th anniversary of 1967 referendum.  
Why have so few people changed their minds about Trump or Brexit? My Sunday article for @IndyVoices 
Brexit talks pic.twitter.com/qjCKsa64M4 
Rest of Europeans are more likely than before Brexit to see EU membership as an advantage for their country pic.twitter.com/FvyQsOKZBy 
Me for @TheSun: #TakeBackControl was the #Brexit slogan. Where's the planning for doing so and resetting Britain?  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Those in favour of Brexit should have worked very hard to win me over by now. They haven't. Is it because they can't? #StopBrexit 
Precisely because Brexit - especially in its most extreme form - will make these things even harder to tackle.  
BREXIT TOURISM BOOM- Record number of visitors- Surge in US tourists to UK  
Hey @BBCNews @SkyUK @itvnews @Channel4News can we get these guys covering Brexit?  
Brexit can be stopped.#StopBrexit 
Dear Diane Abbott @HackneyAbbott Your Hackney N. & Stoke Newington voted Remain. So pls wd you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
What do you personally want to happen with #Brexit?RETWEET & VOTE #yourvoice 
But Brexit was supposed to make us all richer!  
Europe has done soo much to improve our lives so why are we sabotaging our great relationship with Europe? 
I hear a lot of "I voted Brexit but I'm not a racist" or "Concern about immigration isn't racism". Sorry but if that's you, you're in denial 
Without EU migrants, our economy will buckle under the pressure of Brexit  
The many international treaties and agreements that will need to be renegotiated after Brexit – 759, to be exact  
So he is backing Brexit, whose Indian trade will increase Indian immigration into the UK, so he can pay British born Indians to leave?  
Significant Brexit news should be released either directly to public (as EU does) or to parliament.  Not at midnight, with media trailing. 
Will not break an embargo but to let you know DExEU releasing Brexit news at midnight.  For benefit and convenience of Sunday press. 
Whether to remove Trump shdn't be a referendum btw T & Pence & wdn't be a redo of T vs Hillary but wd be about T v democracy & rule of law  
If Corbyn stands for a Hard Brexit that will cripple the NHS, hurt the poor, costs jobs, then I am no friend of Corbyn. You are right  
It's clear our Brexit position is ask for the impossible and blame the EU when we don't get it 
37% of a rigged electorate in an advisory referendum voted for a 4 word slogan backed up by right-wing press hate and lies.#Brexit 
EU has put Brexit talks on hold until December to give the UK time to decide what it wants.  
."I can say with confidence that if Brexit hadn’t happened, it is unlikely I would be packing my bags today." 
#euloudandproud #notinmyname #StopBrexit brexit will ultimately fail  
Exactly what @ScotGov has been saying for months: Liam Fox to bypass Scots and Welsh in Brexit trade deals | News  
And I say that as someone who fell for those lies & voted leave.We need more politicians to show leadership & courage to stop #brexit  
Where tech meets politics. #Brexit  
Dear @SteveReedMP Your constituency Croydon North voted Remain. So please would you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
A year on from Brexit  
this 11pm 29/3/19 Big Ben Brexit Bye Bye Bongs blueprint might become known as "End Bells", which could be counterproductive 
I know both Brexit and Trump have knocked us for six. But Russia are balls deep in all of this. Take the time and read #AlternativeWar 
Agree with every word Steve.Weve had a rfndum & looked into #brexit. It's now clear its bad 4 everyone & was sold on lies.It must be stopped 
Quite a thread on Brexit.  
'We demand a big bell bongs the announcement of Brexit' is absolutely peak brexit. We're going to Twee ourselves to death. 
Big Ben's Brexit bongs, if they happen, will surely have to be at midnight CET, under Article 50, EU law, so 11pm British Summer Time  
A Tory Brexit will be negotiated in the interests of bosses, it is workers that will suffer.  
Over 23,000 votes and it's now the same result as the last one - before #brexit chappie deleted it. 78% Remain. 
Dear Naz Shah @NazShahBfd Your constituency Bradford West voted Remain so please would you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
We don't need a 2nd Referendum, but if there was one on the Leave or Remain question, Leave would win by a much bigger majority now. 
Voting Brexit -- the equivalent of buying a holiday in a hotel that only ever existed as an artist's impression  
To all those saying that the peaceful Scottish independence movement is ugly nationalism. Brexit exposed a nationalism so ugly, people died. 
Preet Gill - first Lab MP to tell us she will vote against Tory #Brexit . Full story here.  
Also desperate for a Labour Govt, one inside the EU so we can afford our manifesto. Forecasts & indeed reality shows Brexit means Austerity.  
Brexit/Big Ben repairs both neatly sum up British politics. Non-experts loudly exclaiming, "it'll take *how* long? It can't be *that* hard". 
It's the standard media mantra now. UK successes are 'despite Brexit'. Failings are 'because of Brexit'. Other possibilities are discarded.  
Everyone I ask re the economic rationale for Brexit says they can't be bothered to explain. And then bother to repeatedly tell me I 'lost'. 
Thanks to @Philpaulbert for passing on this EXCELLENT speech on the economic damage of  Brexit! It's a MUST SEE! ☞   
For crying aloud! The Times headlines good news about our food & drink exports as'Britain's food exports up by £10bn despite Brexit fears' 
Destructive Brexit will create no winners, only a divided, poorer UK  
Trump/Brexit shows one thing very clearly. The terrifying alt right,when it takes power,acts like a big fat rabbit caught in the headlights. 
Brilliant. I can safely say I don't give a monkeys about the bell. Brexit on the other hand keeps me up at night.  
Labour has to wake up on Brexit. Now. 
More evidence of Tories using #Brexit to undermine the devolved settlement. Cue deafening silence from @ScotTories  
Well, at least we can now say in terms of alt right,Trump & soon Brexit:been there, done that, got the T-shirt & never putting it on again. 
Brexit in a nutshell  
I can't put it any simpler than this.  @jameschappers @RichardDawkins @acgrayling @vincecable @LibDems #Brexit #Brexitshambles #euref19 
This thread is 100% accurate. If political leaders don't start actively campaigning against Brexit then we are heading for very hard Brexit!  
Excellent well-written overview from Brendan Donnelly: The Brexit transition deal debate in an exercise in futility  
Spot on thread about Brexit, I will wait for a decent counter to convince me otherwise, please no 'just get over it's' 
Brexit will bring us closer to the antipodean cousins we wrongly cold-shouldered' | via @telegraph 
Good thread. Brexit is cancer.  
This, on class, snobbery & education, is one of the best & most moving things on #Brexit I have read:  H/t @_paullay 
‘I’m packing my bags today’: The Irish leaving Brexit Britain  
Forget Brexit, people. We’ve got to get Big Ben sorted  
Instead of wasting countless billions on a fruitless, economically suicidal #brexit, let's fund the NHS instead. 
Unions estimated they needed to collect at least 100,000 signatures to call a referendum on the Missouri RTW law. They've collected 300,000. 
If you're feeling frustrated about Brexit & want our MPs to rethink, come along to the PEOPLES' MARCH FOR EUROPE in LONDON on 9 September RT  
A breathtaking article on #Brexit and the impact on the creative industries. Well done @Cable_mag  
JUST IN: 108,224 referendum signatures pass @SecretaryReagan review, proceed to AZ county recorders. BIG WIN 4 THE PEOPLE OF AZ! #LetAZvote 
election was referendum on globalism vs nationalism & nationalism won. took just 9 mos for globalists to drive out nationalists from power 
Do you think #Brexit will have a good or a bad effect on the #NHS, or will it make no difference?  
Watch support for Brexit tumble when Sky News & others start reporting the Brexit cuasing negative data excellent Faisal is tweeting.  
A new special relationship? Brexit Britain and Donald Trump embrace ‘shared vision’  
Short thread on Brexit. It removes rights & reduces prospects, is an economic catastrophe, ruins UK's reputation & is based on lies 1/ 
Love this vid. A pro-Brexit channel goes to Norway to ask about Brexit & everyone, except a UK family, say bad idea. 
Should #borders be kept open to EU after #Brexit? Commonwealth nations furious with Theresa May for keeping borders open to #EU after Brexit 
Brexit: Public support continued EU freedom of movement in exchange for access to Single Market, research finds  
.“DUP’s support for Brexit & its customs & immigration restrictions – AGAINST public opinion in NI"....Means....! 
When you spend day studying customs union, Brexit, Irish Border & question doesn't get asked #bbcaq (the thing my A levels prepared me for) 
"We now go live to Brexit Britain"  
Dear @ShabanaMahmood Your constituency Birmingham Ladywood voted Remain so please would you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
(1) The sad Maily fantasies of Brexit in a tweet(2) Britain leaves at midnight Brussels time - 11pm UK time(3) Britain leaves on 29 March  
Bannon spent his adult life dreaming of pulling the strings in the White House. He got there, but wasn't up to the job. Same goes for Brexit 
If Labour cared about the people who are struggling they would be anti Brexit, rather than waiting to see which way the wind blows. 
That's nothing compared to the £Billions being spent on his vanity Brexit!   
Ingram Pinn’s illustration of the week: The road to Brexit  
"Brexit will bring us closer to the antipodean cousins we wrongly cold-shouldered" #premium 
So opposing Brexit is bad because something something neoliberalism but also let's kick immigrants under the bus to appease the 'kippers. 
"Overturn the ref" is Brexit blackmail-speak. We simply ask: how the hell is 37% of a gerrymandered electorate in an advisory ref a MANDATE? 
The process for importing food form a third country to EU that will apply to UK after Brexit pic.twitter.com/rsfNSZKJjF 
VIDEO: Hard or soft Brexit is NONSENSE, we are leaving the EU’ Jacob Rees–Mogg:  
How many hours of instrumental arrangements of La Bamba do I have to dance through for no Brexit and Donald in jail? 
A year on from Brexit, most Britons think their country is heading in the wrong direction 
Erm, Brexit would not be at midnight on 31st March 2019: it'd be at 11pm UK time, midnight CET. As with the negotiations, EU rules apply. 
In tomorrow's Mail, Tory MPs demand Big Ben is used to bong us out of EU at midnight on 31 March 2019 #Brexit  
FOR THE RECORD: There are NO known benefits for brexit. The downside is too colossal to describe in a single tweet.  
Only the people of Kurdistan have right to discuss referendum, said Peshmerga hitting back at Iran's 'intervention'   
Another good #Brexit thread. This time from Brexiteers who (rightly) think project has been hijacked by dogmatic Tory right  
Leanne Wood 'staggered' by backlash after calling Barcelona attack 'far-right' terrorism STUPID WOMAN 
Don't worry Farage, your position as the chief Trump apologist remains unaffected. 
IEA: Brexit Britain Should Commit to Unilateral Free Trade  
The Brexit referendum has unleashed prejudice against not just Europeans but anyone who looks foreign says @vincecable 
Good evening, our coup is now complete, you are now living under Brexit Law. Do not adjust your set. #Newsnight 
British nationalists in Scotland (Tories/Lab/LibDems) going on abt nationalism being evil! What was your empire all about then? Oh & Brexit! 
Hear intriguing rumours that @BorisJohnson is about to admit Brexit was a bad idea. Good story, if true, as we used to say in my old trade. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg MP destroys Europhile Ken Clarke MP on #Brexit#MoggMentum 
Ireland’s prime minister is positioning his country to make the most out of Brexit  
Tonight's topics. 1. European jihad. War without end. 2. Visa free Brexit 3. Trump.  
He's not fighting hard Brexit because he wants hard Brexit.  It's really very simpleRant over/ 
Awful, though, that people only feel safe to say this anonymously. This is what the Brexit 'patriots' have done to our country. 
As has been widely remarked: those who want Brexit don't have the expertise to deliver it and those who have the expertise don't want Brexit 
Just 'No Brexit'  
What happened to the land of milk and honey? It's been a year since I heard anything positive about Brexit now it's just damage limitation!  
The Labour leadership is absolutely on board with the kind of extreme Brexit favoured by Theresa May says @vincecable 
If only all TV interviewers knew all the facts and confronted interviewees with them like this, we wouldn't be up Brexit creek right now  
Trade deal with EU following Brexit is "desirable but not essential", according to leading free-market think-tank  
The pound is now lower against the Euro than it was after the financial crash of 2008. Your Holiday costs more thanks to Brexit. 
Where are the Labour front bench? The Tories are literally falling apart and they are no where to be seen. What madness is this? #Brexit  
'Brexit effect' sees biggest boom in US tourists visiting the UK since the 1980s  
Their plans for Trump--and for a white-nationalist/populist take-over of the GOP--were years in the making (also, cf. Brexit):  
."Brexit [has] changed ALL the rules & provided opportunity to push Irish unity to very top of political agenda". 
It's not the Indy movement that wants hard brexit and blames foreigners for low wages 
Brexit leader mourns the #BannonExit 
Labour should be holding the incompetentcy of the Tories to account over Brexit. It's an open goal. Not holding rallies for Corbyn.  
Dear @PreetKGillMP Your constituency Birmingham Edgbaston voted Remain so please would you vote against the Tory #Brexit Bill on 7 Sept?  
Disturbing to see Brexit minister applaud this amateur and incompetent report - see @SamuelMarcLowe and @LeaveHQ time lines for debunks 
Have you noticed the ones that believe in Brexit and taking back control are ones most against Scot. Indy. Difficult circle to square 
Alt right now collapsing. Mark my words:if the Monster Raving Loony Party now offered an anti-Brexit manifesto,it could redraw our politics. 
A year on from Brexit  
Odd how those who said in 2014 that indy would cause chaos on the 95 mile Scottish border now say Brexit is fine for 310 mile Irish border 
SO ready to kick some #Brexit butt tomorrow!!!  Je suis une pirate saboteuse!! #StopBrexitNow #BrexitShambles #Resistance #remain pic.twitter.com/KFA1xKKXzI 
Dude, your Scottish party leader stood on top of a tank with a Union Jack fluttering behind her, and your London leader is Queen Brexit.  
Trying hard to think of a Brexit strategy..  
Scottish Nationalism is about inclusion. You know that cos EU citizens voted in #indyref You Brits didn't allow them to vote in Brexit. # 
Proud to be a centrists, proud to have helped change the uk,proud of 13 years in government but proudest of all to resolutely oppose Brexit. 
Those politicians look down on us like we're something nasty they've trodden onWithout us little people to defend you you're screwed 
A surveillance state is no fix for Brexit’s Irish border issue  
Happy now? May could waive rights to 95 per cent of British waters after Brexit, fishermen fear  via @telegraphnews 
From a good thread reacting to today's odd IEA report on post-Brexit UK trade - authored by a finance prof with no trade publications...  
After Brexit we must have a fair immigration system that does not discriminate between EU and non-EU nationals  
#Gibraltar well done youth service great paint job for #50th anniversary of our 1st referendum photo courtesy of M Garcia  
Detail and realism should be the hallmarks of the big Brexit speech that Theresa May plans to give next month  
14. The mandate for Brexit was to leave the EU - not to run away with Tory free trade fantasies. Especially without consent. 
I was in London yesterday and the taxi drivers I spoke with said it had been their busiest year for many years. All said Brexit helped.  
HMG must reassure all EU security & police intelligence data exchange will not be stopped by Brexit or ECJ redlines. Terror knows no borders  
Shame to see260 job losses in this early Brexit casualty-may be first but, sadly, unlikely to be last. #Brexit is destructive  
Is the U.K. part of Europe? I'm a bit confused over the whole Brexit thing.  
Brexit will bring us closer to the antipodean cousins we wrongly cold-shouldered, writes @TiceRichard 
Wonk Watch: @IEAlondon Says Brexit Britain Should Commit to Unilateral Free Trade  
I would like all MPs asked (preferably whilst on a lie detector) Do you believe the UK will be a better place for our children Post Brexit? 
Telegraph: We've just published the most stupid thing on the web.IEA: Hold my beer...#Brexit 
‘Eurocrats look after THEMSELVES’ John Cleese praises Brexit NO vote | UK | News |  #fo2eu 
British comedy legend @JohnCleese is speaking huge sense on Brexit. RT if you don't want to be ruled over by greedy Eurocrats!   
No alternative to referendum, goal is independence, says Kurdistan delegate visiting Baghdad  
We have a serious workforce problem already in NHS. Not enough nurses, not enough doctors, demographic retirement timebomb looming. #Brexit 
Brexit: Global broadcasters with bases in UK look to Amsterdam as EU divorce talks stall  
Dear God, the IEA's new Brexit paper is worse than I thought. Issue-illiterate and tariff-obsessed, starts going downhill in the summary... 
It is Government's duty to act in the best interests of the Country. Pursuing #brexit conflicts with that duty. 
decision ،of the Iraqi judiciary to illegitimate raising the flag of the province in Kirkuk means the illegality of the Kurdish referendum 
This is the reality of #brexit and those that retired years ago to the EU have seen the value of their pensions slashed by 25% since last yr 
Is Nick Clegg our anti-Brexit hero – or just a wind-up merchant? | Matt Forde  
Love it! #brexit #EU 
Hundreds of jobs lost as company goes bust solely as a result of sterling's crash after #Brexit vote. 260 jobs lost  
Tonight's 8pm . 1. Spanish terror 24 hours on. 2. Visa Free Brexit. 3. Trump triggers the feral Left. Do JOIN IN the chat later. 
Commonwealth citizens should have equal rights to Europeans after Brexit, Australian minister says #premium 
You moron -  I'm talking about raped+ abused kids and you use it as an excuse to have a dig at me over Brexit.Shame on you - you creep!  
.@IanDunt is producing some of the best writing on Brexit. Somehow - I don't know how - it must be stopped.  
Surprised the Barcelona event has not yet been blamed on BREXIT or the Right wing 
Your Scotland in Europe update is here, covering the #Brexit stories you might have missed. 
This strange episode has reflected many of the underlying incoherent self-deceptions of the Brexit project  
Britons saying Barcelona and Cambrils attacks prove Brexit is good are fools. We MUST stand with our friends & Spaniards ARE our friends 
How's that "frictionless border" looking? Process for importing food form 3rd country to EU is not a simple task- @instituteforgov #brexit  
Of course they are. Brexit has raised problems that no-one voted for and is a complete waste of time and money. The UK must exit Brexit.  
one thing is for sure if the economy & £ tank the net migration figures will inevitably fall too. In that respect only Brexit may succeed  
The West is in a downward spiral of self-destruction. Our leaders betray us. Brexit was the voice of the downtrodden. It must happen. 
Brexit forces Kent company to fold, with 260 job losses   
‘Eurocrats look after THEMSELVES’ John Cleese savages Brussels and praises Brexit vote   
Dear diary. 421 days since the referendum and not even a sniff of a Brexit benefit, not a fucking one. Maintaining my #StopBrexit stance. 
Get your Remainiacs on. This week Peter & I sit in baffled silence as people talk about Brexit's impact on football  
So @SamuelMarcLowe is dissecting the loopy IEA report on Brexit trade policy so no one else has to (*buys virtual drink*) BTW who funds IEA?  
Also parts for UK cars are in many cases imported from EU or outside EU for assembly in UK & then exported to EU This will end with #Brexit  
EU migrants barred from claiming benefits after Brexit as Theresa May revives David Cameron pledge. Really?  
"Taking back control" (Brexit) is a euphemism for "evading international requirements for financial transparency". A scam, in other words. 
It matters not how many times you post this poll Mr Brexit it will ALWAYS COME OUT THE SAME REMAIN, REMAIN, REMAIN, REMAIN, REMAIN, REMAIN  
‘I was a passionate Leaver but I believe we were sold a lie’Lies & deception ran deep. So many were tricked into Brexit.@TheNewEuropean 
John Cleese has backed Brexit saying he does not want to see Britain ruled by Eurocrats  
The UK’s inability to manage Brexit does not mean it won’t happen. It will just be a disaster - as many of us have said for many months.  
The Libdems are marching as an anti brexit group on the 9th Sep in London. Join the march and say #notinmyname 
A surveillance state is no fix for Brexit’s Irish border issue  
No deal? No problem! New IEA report on trade, post-Brexit, features in @CityAM  
Brexit means the UK will have to recreate 759 treaties - on its own. The brexiters' 'cakeism' philosophy won't stack up to this  
The many international treaties and agreements that will need to be renegotiated after Brexit – 759, to be exact  
Brexit may well end up rebalancing the UK economy between its richer and poorer regions, writes @mattlynnwriter 
The Brexit vote in the UK and the victory of Trump in the US were both taken by racists as permission to speak and act openly. 
Just in time to make your holiday in the sun 30% more expensive. Av Brit spends £1000+ on European holidays pa. Brexit just cost you £300.  
Frankfurt and Dublin make bankers feel wanted in battle for Brexit jobs   
Mr @OwenJones84 spot on here: only the neoliberal centre wd go into a meltdown against the left at the moment Trump & Brexit self-destruct  
Pound heads for third weekly decline against dollar and euro after underwhelming data  
‘Eurocrats look after THEMSELVES’ John Cleese savages Brussels and praises Brexit vote  
May has hijacked our country. She has no mandate for #Brexit and must be topped. @GuyVerhofstadt  
Will the displaced, exiled Kashmiri Pandits also participate in the referendum?  
Oops ...Revealed: the tangle of red tape that awaits British travellers post-Brexit  
Hard Brexit or No Brexit - this speech from @eucopresident @donaldtusk from October last year warrants (re-)reading:  
14 months on & the govt issues position papers explaining what #brexit means. How could the public have made an informed decision last year? 
I've wrecked the UK Economy, Lost AAA Rating, caused race hatred, and now off to live in France #brexit  ... Thanks Idiots  
The idea that we just need a @UKLabour government and all else good flows from that is untenable. Brexit will destroy our economy. 
Further amended headline:"UK politicians admit Brexit was a huge mistake and seek return to the inner circle"  
'A united Ireland is the only practical solution to Brexit'  
Hundreds of jobs lost at a supermarket salads supplier after the firm fails to cope with the #Brexit devaluation 
I do miss this guys stupid rants, the Euro will totally collapse in 6 months German Banks are closing..... What a Idiot #brexit  
What a total unmitigated disaster Brexit is, before UK has even arrived at cliff edge.Stop, look, listen, reverse!  
Crazy that Jess Phillips has to talk to a bunch of Brexit twats.  
It's gonna be a much bigger struggle due to Brexit which you support.  
Took two years for public mood to swing 180 degrees on Iraq. Four years on, barely any support. Reality is an unforgiving teacher. #Brexit  
17) if you follow the Labour Leadership in being aligned with the government on #Brexit & say "but what can we do? It's inevitable" 
Oh dear. Looks like the "remoaners" have infiltrated #brexit chappie's poll AGAIN.  
Brief thread on the contribution of immigrants to the British economy #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Guess you didn't know that the OBR forecasts that reducing immigration will increase the government debt. #Brexit  
My comments on the latest Brexit papers:#Papering over the cracks:  via @TheEconomist 
Brexit is already impacting on workers and key sectors of the UK economy. @ChiOnwurah and I in @HuffPostUK today.  
Meanwhile in Brexit Britain...  
#Kurds are forcing Assyrian areas to vote in "#Kurdistan" referendum at gun point.  
While the whole of the UK has been diverted by a Brexit smokescreen - the nation sinks beneath rising problems on all fronts. What a sham.  
Yes, why also not the same #Brexit type referendum on the final settlement : Independence or Pakistan? A third party mediation is a must.  
Bloody EU! None of this would be happening if the EU hadn't imposed a referendum on us then imposed us having to leave.  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Just a thought , The same ruling elite that brought you an aircraft carrier with no planes are negotiating Brexit 
EU migrants barred from claiming benefits after Brexit as Theresa May revives David Cameron pledge  via @telegraphnew 
"The U.K. is adopting so many Brexit positions it might do well to start a yoga class" #brexityoga @simonjkennedy  
Incredible: Brexit threatens existing soft border in Ireland and @telegraph says it is EU that is "imposing" a hard border #brexitmadness 
Surprise, surprise! The news stories showing 29% of remainers were now in favour of Brexit were completely wrong. Like, who'd have guessed?  
"viable strategy" is to have second referendum now we know what's actually at stake  
'The BBC is institutionally left wing!' Widdecombe blasts Beeb for 'bleak' Brexit outlook  
Leave voters made the right decision – Brexit is helping to rebalance the UK economy.  
Since the EU referendum, sterling has lost around 13% of its value against major currencies - with biggest falls against euro & Aussie $  
This week LWA's Ed Hamer presented our post-brexit policy document to Environment secretary Michael Gove  @DefraGovUK 
Frankfurt and Dublin make bankers feel wanted in battle for Brexit jobs  
EU migrants barred from claiming benefits after Brexit as Theresa May revives David Cameron pledge 
Britain warned its lack of boardroom diversity could make trade deals harder after Brexit  
This was neither up-to-date nor a poll. And not a single participant voiced their support for Hard Brexit  
Theresa May is understood to be outlining a more detailed Brexit vision next week  
Vince Cable still thinks there is a 'significant possibility' that Brexit won't happen  
EU did not expect this #Brexit chaos in UK. EU is bemused but determined to protect its own interests. UK govt is oblivious to EU standpoint  
Seems to me the best, cheapest and safest option is to not Brexit at all. #StopBrexit RT if you agree. 
#Brexit Trek: To boldly go where no-one has a clue what they're doing ...#brexitshambles #StarTrek #Boris #Corbyn #ReesMogg #StopBrexit 
Have your say on Brexit  
Net migration from the Continent rose in the twelve months following the referendum, official figures reveal.  
From the archives: The UK will have to renegotiate at least 759 agreements with 168 countries after Brexit  
Both EU nationals and UK citizens worry more about their jobs with Brexit. What sort of a Pyrrhic victory is this?  
Brexit Apathy, the death of Democracy  
Trade talks could be put off until 2018.Incompetent David Davis published fantasy Brexit papers,laughed off table #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Why can't we #Brexit like refrundum on #Article35A to know the views of people in all the three regions rather than listening to few people 
I think many received RU $$$ for campaigns, either knowingly or not. Now they are stuck. Think Murdoch maybe worked w/RU on Brexit/Trump. 
David Davis said the Brexit process was going "incredibly well". Incredibly may be correct; well is surely less so  
So Home Office Brexit proposal is that EU citizens will move to the U.K. to visit and look for jobs without restrictions. #takebackcontrol ? 
Ready for #blockchain + 9 others #FinServ opportunities in 2017? @MikeQuindazzi {#ai #fintech #cybersecurity #brexit #rpa} #defstar5 
It's important not to overlook the fact that there are deep parallels between the Trump & Brexit phenomena.  
To many Radical Islamists in EU !They immigrants ?NO,Elites love Power & Votes mean Power ! Brexit Won't happen! People No Guns no power   
Bill Shorten renews push for Australian republic, vows to hold referendum within first term of Labor govt #QandA 
Brexit Explained... *Stronger Alone*  
Brexit: another fine mess - waiting for the punch-line everyone knows must be coming ...  #Brexit .  
UK : We brought our Brexit proposalsEU : They're so good we're putting them right on the fridge, right next to your macaroni unicorn 
Christian Adams on the latest state of the Brexit negotiations on A Level results day - political cartoon gallery  
Of course the EU don't want Brexit. it damages the EU, including the UK. They're not stupid.  
Morten Morland on Brexit negotiations - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
We are being colonized..No Go Zones: 'No Whites Allowed After 8 PM' Grafitti Appears in #Birmingham.#MAGA #Brexit  
Very nice but after #brexit, parents will struggle even harder to feed their children.  
Catalan gov declairs 3 days mourning for #Barcelona #islamic attack. Nobody dare declare #IslamIsTheProblem,that's not allowed#MAGA #Brexit 
Euro PLUNGES as fears for eurozone's economy revealed by European Central Bank 
@jameschappers It is self-evident that there are no advantages at all to "brexit" . It must now be stopped for the sake of British democracy 
An explanation of the "new" LSE "70% now back hard Brexit" study. It was actually data from April.Full video:  
EU migrants barred from claiming benefits after Brexit as Theresa May revives David Cameron pledge #Premium 
This  is what a Tory Brexit is all about. The rich being fed by the workers with less & less workers rights.  
Ready for #blockchain + 9 others #FinServ opportunities in 2017? {#ai #fintech #cybersecurity #brexit #rpa}  
I notice BBC talking about #Brexit transitional period as if it's Britain's choice! Independent Ireland can veto!  
I've said previously that these MP's on both sides of the House of Commons are cowards. The majority of MP's don't want #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Need mindset change on Brexit? UK has had special deal from EU but is imposing Brexit on them. Better to be magnanimous rt demanding? 
Brexit, the "deal like no other in history" @DavidDavisMP. Never will such lies be demolished by plain truth #Remain 
Labour MP says her constituents are crying themselves to sleep over Brexit uncertainty.  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Brexit fanatic Nick Ferrari whose idea of democracy is to shut down debate about EU ref is presenting Newsnight #FFS 
Good! EU migrants will be barred from claiming benefits after #Brexit... 
"After Brexit, we thought the US would do the right thing in their elections. We were wrong. Democracy was a huge tree & they pissed on it".  
*Brexit Explained*  
"There is no #Brexit outcome which adds up to a status quo. It is all worse" @IanDunt on Britain's myopic strategy  
It's looking like #brexit will be a replication of the current arrangements but without the UK having any say so; and paying the equivalent 
Brexit can transform our ties with India and set the stage for a truly 21st Century Commonwealth, says @manojladwa 
This is the Brexit moment in 2016 when Jeremy Corbyn stabbed the majority of his own party in the back  
“It is very hard for politicians to be honest and say ‘Brexit looks like a disaster'. You get vilified & threatened" 
Leavers rant on about Germany's car exports. Here are the top 10 destinations for the UK's car exports & the EU is by far number 1. #Brexit  
It speaks to quality of Labour movement, that they need centrist tag to launder Brexit, stigmatise opponents, and mask lack of vision/ideas. 
Their Tory MP was a Remainer ☞ Brexit blamed for 260 job losses as Southern Salads collapses into administration  
The UK will be absolutely desperate to get out of Brexit when we're months/weeks away from all goods being held at ports & tariffs on goods. 
Brexit: Employment Hits Record High – And Fifth of Unemployed Are Migrants  via @BreitbartNews @JackBMontgomery 
Leave.EU are rattled. No list of benefits, only paranoia about how 'remoaners' will 'block' brexit  
Lord Bilimoria: The voters can change their minds based on reality when given another chance. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
I am so ashamed that I voted for this woman in the vein hope we'd get a hard Brexit. My apologies to UKIP 
People are quoting this saying "omg how relatable" completely unaware that this was referring to Joe Hard Brexit Hart 
British politicians like to threaten devolved nations that discuss self-determination. Brexit & the Irish border issue reveals  hypocrisy  
Farage & the #Leave campaigns' transatlantic links with Trump, Mercer, Bannon and Cambridge Analytica - diagram by @carolecadwalla#Brexit  
When both sides in the negotiations are only engaged in damage limitation, cancelling Brexit is clearly the best option.  
The transatlantic network climate denial network linking Farage, Fox, Davis & Hannan & the #Leave campaigns.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
I am shocked, yes, shocked, I thought it was pro Trump pro Brexit Nazis  
I think the effect on the island of Ireland is the biggest disgrace of #Brexit, even though I weep too for England, Scotland & Wales  
Sicilian Mafia Declares War On Islam: Mob Kicking Off All Muslims From Italian Island 
"A united Ireland is the only practical solution to Brexit"  
Why are we going ahead with this Brexit farce @TomTugendhat?The ref was advisory. It's a dereliction of duty. 
Campaign to stop BREXIT #LikeAGirl because that's the only way we're going to MAKE BRITAIN GREAT AGAIN! #StopBrexitNow #Remain  
The so-called left-wing argument for #Brexit doesn't stand up:  
When 260 local jobs go due to Brexit @TomTugendhat, time to #StopBrexit for your constituents & national interest. 
I, for one, will never forget that the people of our country, by a convincing majority, voted in a democratic poll to leave the EU. #Brexit 
Despite David Davis's breezy cheeriness, the British government's approach to Brexit still lacks substance  
PS1) many will say "Labour's in an impossible position, it can't oppose Brexit"To be honest, to that I say bullshit 
On Brexit, business chiefs have more confidence in Mark Carney than the PM, according to a Thomson Reuters survey.  
Owen Jones. The man who insists we must not challenge an advisory referendum but make time to undermine democratically elected MPs. 
As there are clearly no benefits to the UK from Brexit, let's list the many Brexit benefits that can be realised by the rest of the EU. 
14) & worse, if he actively wants hard brexit, but hasn't the honesty or integrity to say so, then why is he different from any politician? 
WATCH: Nigel Farage urges Ireland to LEAVE the EU which could see it COLLAPSE  via @Your Brexit 
Government Confirms Visa-Free Travel To Continue For EU Citizens Post-Brexit. Not what we voted for! Change signs!  
."Brexit is a game of two halves. If at last we leave the EU, however, it is ‘Game Over’ forever.". 
5. (May 2017) H/T to @TrickFreee for figuring out Rebel Media was using NationBuilder - the same software used by Trump & Brexit campaign.  
."Since the Brexit vote, the unity question has been very quietly, very tentatively, reopened, ". 
A largely ignored #Brexit fact: Areas that voted to #Leave were most affected by the Chinese import shock #Remain 
That time Brexit unleashed Britain's great-again-ness... #ManySidesWeek 
Catch-up. Brilliantly clear explanation by @BenChu_ of confusing LSE/YouGov Brexit survey published last week  
Handy graphic to illustrate the immigration nonsense spouted by #Brexit supporters...UK Govts to blame not EU! Hands of my right to FOM!  
Leave Director admits that the Brexit referendum was won by lying to the public.  
Britain's government has hinted at a new, more sober approach to Brexit  
Virginia's gubernatorial race is shaping up to be a referendum of sorts on Confederate monuments  
This is my take on Brexit, Trump & other nationalists.The neoliberal road to autocracy  via @ips_journal 
Poland, or collectively Visegrád (Poland, Czechia, Hungary, Slovakia), if they exit the EU, COULD seal a free trade deal with post-Brexit UK pic.twitter.com/KAFMyExLRl 
Not a good @owenjones84 to name and shame the favourite target of internet bile in Brexit Britain - a foreigner woman who's a remainer.  
Kent-based salad business goes bust, blames brexit damage to GBP.  
Public opinion is moving her way. Much as it moved towards Brexit. She writes well and this is worth reading. 
Labour MP says her constituents are crying themselves to sleep over Brexit uncertainty.  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Who’d have thought voting Brexit would make a UK PM so desperate she can’t criticise a Nazi-sympathising US leader? Unintended consequences.  
No. It's bullshit. Brexit isn't about being right or wrong. It's about forcing through constitutional change based on a questionable mandate  
Leavers are running scared of a vote on the final #Brexit deal, rather than a pack of lies & fantasy promises.#StopBrexit #Remain 
Reminder to Leavers; Farage wanted a 2nd referendum if #Leave lost by a narrow majority.#Remain #Brexit #StopBrexit 
'Send them a very loud message... ...Brexit is an extremely bad idea'March on the Tory party conference, 1/10/17. 
Brexit would be absurd if it wasn't so abhorrent.  
We cannot change the government at this time. But we can embrace the huge opportunities Brexit presents and pressure the govt to deliver it. 
Discussion of the LSE/Oxford Brexit study says that the misreports "erroneously shifted understandings and will damage debate for months"  
Britain's reputation for competence, reliability, moderation, & thus influence, shattered by Brexit, as I wrote here  
WTF? Free movement for #EU migrants to continue after Brexit?  Did we vote for THIS?Westmonster        #fo2eu 
#Brexit is going to be a game of two halves; if it happens it is game over!! I have written for @TheNewEuropean 
#Calexit has a new president, new independence referendum ballot measure, and no embassy in Russia  
So true, Brexit remains the greatest political misjudgement on so many different levels, and was, in effect, an appeasement to buy power.  
Sometime soon it is going to dawn on British politicians that Brexit can't be done. I stress, 'can't'. And the brave will admit it 
They'd have a hard job enforcing that after accepting a referendum on 51.9% for the power grab of brexit 
"Brexit may not happen at all–when what we need R leaders,not followers, 2 win this battle" Been saying this 4 ages! 
Fellow #Remainers please grow your social media networks so we can unite as many as possible to fight #Brexit. Every tweet helps.@LibDems 
“Brexit is a game of two halves.”  
There is no upside for the EU from Brexit  
#KRG1.Postpone the referendum2.Reactivate parliament3.Get your house in order4.Worry less about Ankara/Tehran & more about #Kurds. 
10) Ironically, we're banking on 27 nations being far less selfish & insular that we are for our "success" - but then, that's Brexitend/ 
My bit about the Bad Boys of Brexit and their "major US TV drama series"  
Exclusive: Michel Barnier to offer EU funding for Northern Ireland to soften impact of Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
Top UK economist at German lender Commerzbank said Brexit could be worse for the UK economy than most people expect  
Labour's @ChiOnwurah says some of her constituents are crying themselves to sleep at night due to Brexit worries.  
Ministers must use Brexit opportunity to 'free' councils by slashing bureaucracy, LGA says  
If Brexit goes ahead UK propose to harmonize food standards with EU. Proposal is-leave, then take all EU rules that we've no say in making. 
This is the last straw. @OwenJones84 just like Theresa May has jumped on the Brexit bandwagon and is now hounding Remain MPs.  
He is one of the truest honest people in politics today! He knows more about EU, than whole Brexit Team!  
@theSNP @scotgov say if you choose to live in Scotland you are Scottish. Unlike UK Gov. who refused EU nationals a vote in EU referendum. 
Government plans to keep visa-free travel to the UK for EU visitors after Brexit. What's the point in leaving?  
Was interviewing people in longford today about Brexit. Striking how many irish people use 'england' as a synonym for UK/GB. 
As an Italian in Scotland I had the vote in the Indyref but I was denied one in Eu referendum- by UK government 
#CostaConversations"What on earth is @Theresa_May doing? Tories started Brexit but they're all on holiday except Boris' idiot brother"  
Foreign-owned firms are twice as productive as British companies, Bank of England says  
True. But the more he seizes the topic, the more he makes the issue a referendum on him -- which might not be favorable terrain  
Peace in Northern Ireland was hard-won. The EU must help Britain maintain it after Brexit, says @AWMurrison 
Have you seen the stars of a new film about #Brexit, it's called "Spivs"  
… I thought I was mainly left-leaning. But because I object to insanity of Brexit, anti-Semitism in Labour & Putin apologists like Milne... 
That will never happen. They're one of us and welcome - just like the European nationals denied an EU referendum vote by Westminster.  
Is MacAskill actually arguing "silence on drug policy is killing people but, you know, that was understandable during the referendum"?  
I am fundamentally against Brexit. No rational argument economic,moral or political has been presented when requested. Just sound bites. 
#Biafrans IPOB Are Calling For a Referendum Not War, #Support republic of Biafra, self determination is universal #support #BiafraExit 
Brilliant takedown by constitutional expert @RCorbettMEP with backup data on UK govt Brexit proposals on Customs 
Hi all! I'll be chatting #SarahChampion 'resignation' and Brexit free Brexit with @jongaunt @talk2meradiouk at 5.30pm! Do tune in!!  
at airport. exchange offered £1 for 0.97 euro. game on brexit. hope you're pleased with yourself johson, gove, davis,  et al 
3rd 'Brexit Can Be Stopped' article in Daily Express in 5 days. Quite extraordinary  
I'll be in Lewes chatting Brexit on September 22  
Nigel Farage has supported Trump after Trump supported far-right scum. If you voted Brexit because of Farage, think about this for a bit 
Tonight's 8pm . 1. Corbyn defends Muslim rape gangs. 2. Erasing U.S history and 3. Brexit free Brexit! Join me and follow me there 
Delay to Brexit trade talks a "humiliating climbdown" for David Davis:  
Losing EU research funding & student fee income after #brexit would be very painful for some institutions #HEfinance  
French naval officers hoped Brexit would stop EU military merger.UK consent to the merger scraps that opportunity. 
Are you someone who wants to 'Stop Brexit'? Here's my thoughts!  
BREAKING: Erbil prepared to postpone referendum if Baghdad agrees to a later date  
The Brexit no-one's "accepted"  via @tony_nog 
@ProfOsinbajo @UN @hrw Enough is enough -#Referendum #SelfDetermination is not #war#FreeBiafra #BiafraReferendum #BiafraExit #Biafra 
Tory government want the talks to fail. They know Brexit is a disaster and need a scapegoat: The EU.Criminal.  
Brexit trade talks may be reduced to as little as 10 months  
Brexit is Brexit is hard border. Anything else is clearly not Brexit.   
Owen Jones has recently had to condemn his own party members for anti-semitism and worshipping Putin. But opposing Brexit is "extremist".  
UK plans to keep visa-free travel for EU nationals after Brexit  
Brexit department officials insist trade talks will still start on time despite stalling tactics from the EU  
Meeting with @BillofRightsNI on impact of Brexit on Human Rights & Equality GFA commitments - A  Bill of Rights would protect us all  
Theresa May reveals UK may STILL fund EU programmes after Brexit. Gosh, how utterly surprising. . . . .  
we should absolutely have a referendum in which new jersey residents try to rename new jersey  
The more absurd & dangerous @realDonaldTrump's far-right appeasing experiment gets in the US, the further the UK will move from hard Brexit 
Excellent piece on why democracy does not mean having to accept referendum result.  
People keep telling me Brexit will be fine because other countries manage outside of EU. Thing is they didn't start inside the EU for 40yrs. 
Company forced to fold because of Brexit, leaving 260 people jobless  
UK universities hugely dependent on overseas students. Massive risks around immigration policy & #Brexit  #HEfinance 
Please share. The Govt has run 50 studies on the impact of Brexit across society - & are refusing to show to public: 
To surreptitiously push through a Bennite Brexit & still plan to deliver these things  is deluded, far left, politics. 
We need a full-blooded assault on the bogus democratic legitimacy of the #Brexit mandate. For example reference to this:  
This is the kind of thing we need from @vincecable and the @LibDems, not wibble about preventing a hard #Brexit.  
Brexit plan threatens to increase obstacles to trade. Business faces GREATER red tape under new proposals.  
Outstanding take on the overarching insularity and incompetence of these 'negotiations'. *This* is what Brexit really means....  
I was happy to set out for @NaomiOhReally our experience @IrelandEmbGB of the increased demand for Irish passorts caused by #brexit.  
If your kid is disappointed with their A level grades remind them that because of Brexit the country and their prospects are fucked anyway. 
If it looks like a duck, swims like a duck, and quacks like a duck.... 
I've seen better democratic exercises in fledgling democracies. It was a referendum controlled by right wing media based on disinformation.  
"That silence may have been understandable when the referendum was ongoing, now it’s simply cowardly as tragedy unfolds. "  
So let me get this straight. "Control of our borders" means, between the UK & the EU, not having one. Clever.#Brexit: Now almost #Remain 
Real incomes rise just a little to June 2017.  So much for Brexit job loss prophets of doom. 
We need to cease the"unstoppable" & "Will Of The People tropes. It's crap.  UK can call a halt...the EU27 can agree, and that's it#Brexit  
We've just been through a referendum where residents were refused a vote based on their birthplace. It was an appalling way to treat the...  
Sadly, it's become clear this week that the Government is making it up as it goes along with Brexit  
The Government is abdicating responsibility for the Irish border after Brexit. Important piece by @ConorMcGinn  
'What the death of an Irishman in the First World War can tell us about the stupidity of Brexit' | Robert Fisk  
If #Brexit goes through, it will be a sign in written in bold that the politics of threats and intimidation works in Britain. 
This insistence by remainiacs that Brexit negotiations are going badly & UK ministers incompetent verges on the psychologically disordered.  
Best take #Alevels2017 #Brexit  
Our @Adamstoon1 @EveningStandard: the latest state of the Brexit negotiations on A Level results day  
Isn't this the understatement of the decade? Senior Brexiters now saying (anonymously,of course) it'll take 20-30yrs to recover from #Brexit  
One of the finest #Brexit commentators around, @fotoole, on the UK’s border proposals for Ireland: "absurd".  
Good luck to all those mainly youngsters receiving their A level results today. Im sorry Brexit will deny you the EU FOM I had as a teenager 
.@JLongworthLML flattened allegations Brexit would have a negative effect on the British farming industry  
Disgracefully misleading from the Telegraph. #Brexit Britain is imposing its problem on Ireland. #StopBrexit 
With such healthy employment growth why did the Treasury forecast big job losses following a pro Brexit vote and an Article 50 letter? 
Spoke to @jumanaaltamimi from @gulf_news about upcoming #Kurdistan #Referendum, #Erbil & #Baghdad Relations & latest political developments. 
honouring the Good Friday Agreement is of far greater importance than enforcing the deluded chaos of brexit 
I am not a "self-described" centrist, for the record. But I oppose Brexit, so I'm not allowed to be left any more. 
Brexit: Vince Cable says there is a 'significant possibility' it still won't happen  
Good news: closely tied to EU in regulation/borders. Bad news: harming economy while at the same time making Brexit substantively pointless  
Here's last nights grt @cathynewman i/v discussing #Brexit concerns and politicians role in being honest abt it  
This weekend @BZephaniah explores living in Brexit capital Boston, Lincs through poetry. It's a @MIMProductions Radio 4 ting. Check it out. 
'Let's talk about a bloody bell instead of criminal incompetence of my gov which is sucking up to Nazi sympathisers & dictators for #brexit'  
Will be talking about #Brexit today on Galaxy 102.5 FM at 13:00 (London)Looking forward to your questions on air 
Faced with Trump and Brexit, Australia raises the bar.  
Brexit has legitimised xenophobia and made it an embarrassment to be British. 
Brexit bites as the Eurozone economy grows twice as fast as the UK in the second quarter of 2017.€: +0.6%£: +0.3% pic.twitter.com/fsVqzYHCSA 
Let us defeat Brexit & be a leading partner in the greatest project for a civilised future that the world has ever seen. 
Brexit is bad for your Health says bomber Anderson, while Sinn Fein continue to block the Health budget and vital Health reform.  
Things that are "right":Holding hands with a Nazi sympathiserHard Brexit Persecuting the poor and disabledPersecuting immigrantsThe DUP  
Calling all Brexit friends & supporters !  
The UK commits to an open border with Ireland and upholding the Good Friday Agreement after Brexit  
This identity crisis seems pretty Anglo to me. Maybe a referendum on English independence would help.   
No-one other than a fascist would try so shamelessly to divert attention away from the real fascists. #Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
When a satire site has a better grip of Brexit than a nuclear power...  
I do hope that @rosaltmann doesn't get intimidated by brexiteer thugs. After all, it's clearer every day that  brexit won't happen  
But since the Brexit vote, The @Telegraph has collapsed into a tabloid, pushing strident pro-Brexit propaganda with disregard for fact. 2/2 
On Brexit – @WilliamJHague to Peter Hennessy: "You can take back control of a gun but it doesn’t mean you use it to shoot your foot off." 
If you didn't get the A Level results you wanted, don't worry: after Brexit there won't be any jobs even for the students who excelled. 
Yes. During the referendum debate the @Telegraph's soul was torn by loyalties. The pieces were intellectually searching & fascinating. (1/2) 
*Brexit Shambles Explained*  
Personal vilification of @jameschappers been horrid. I feel for him&his family. He worked so closely on Brexit& seen what's happening 
What major politician  will be brave enough to  call time on #Brexit? It is costing the nation time; money, angst... and prestige abroad.  
Daily Briefing- French jobless - signs of movement- Media reports delay to Brexit talks- Buoyancy in stock market 
Calling on Labour Leader Jeremy Corbyn to debate the glaring inconsistencies in his party's stance on #Brexit as he visits north Wales.  
Blind animosity to ECJ risks undermining basic judicial co-operation & recognition post-Brexit, says @politicoharry  
260 jobs lost at Southern Salads. A sad case study of Brexit.   
we already had a good control of who came here....DO read last telling sentence! #brexit #Immigration 
I wonder what Owen would do if @UKLabour decided to oppose Brexit? Would he side with the Brexiteers and say the ref had to be 'respected'?  
Britain confident of making progress in Brexit talks by October  
If "lippy" Taoiseach Leo Varadkar didn't bend to UK's whims on Brexit. The piece got picked up by Irish press and caused huge backlash 
Yesterday's post: What does respecting the referendum result mean?   
Brexit: UK looks to keep visa-free for UK citizens but EU citizens need to ask permission.Not so #britishfairplay.. 
Number of non-EU workers in  the UK did not really increase over a decade!What was xenophobe #Brexit propaganda about? #remain #StopBrexit 
EU citizens will not need visas to visit UK after Brexit, say sources  
Brexit: UK looks to keep visa-free travel from EU  
The more Brexit "policy" papers emerge, the more clear it becomes that there's still a complete lack of practical policies. 
If a tradesman conned an old lady out of £50 they'd be prosecuted... These conmen have robbed the British people of £220,000,000,000 #Brexit pic.twitter.com/Wo2q590WL6 
"Admits" here meaning "this was always explicitly the policy from the start & advocated by Leave campaigners during the EU referendum."  
From the archives: The UK will have to renegotiate at least 759 agreements with 168 countries after Brexit  
We've reached another milestone.#eResidency #Brexit  
BETRAYAL: EU migrants still have free movement in UK after Brexit. We didn't vote for this. 
18 year olds; if you screwed up your A levels, just remember your parents' generation gave you debt, no housing & Brexit so they can shut up 
Finally, Ohanaeze Ndi-Igbo petition UN, Demands Referendum for Biafra  
No more Brexit talks, tell the EU we are off WTO tariffs are minute and would have far more cost to the EU than they would to us 
Boris’s BS:Scrapping Bendy BusesGarden BridgeWater CannonsEstuary Airport£350m Brexit BusAnd so much more... 
So, if FOM is going to continue and we'll still be in SM and CU (albeit for a "transition"), what is the point of Brexit? #StopBrexit 
#EU citizens will be free to travel to Britain and live here after #Brexit under immigration plans being drawn up by the Home Office. 
WALKING AWAY IS LOOKING TO BE THE ONLY WAY .      Brexit talks 'could be delayed until December'.    
Whole NHS having a problem post referendum with patients telling staff they will be "sent home" soon.  How will NHS run without EU staff?! 
Brexit means trump #BrexitMeansTrump #NotInMyName it's the same movement. 
Brexit: Vince Cable says there is a 'significant possibility' it still won't happen - The Independent  
Brexit: UK looks to keep visa-free travel from EU  
.@vincecable has challenged David Davis to answer six questions over plans set out on future customs arrangements after Brexit.  
Brexit newsletter: - UK proposes customs deal- Transition period desirable for BoE- Leave voters sense betrayal  
Interesting new CFO survey from @Reuters - #Brexit hasn't affected strategic plans of most businesses #despiteBrexit  
Yes, more lies, fraud and treachery,The Brexit delay is choreographed by the EU and the British remainers who have been bought by the EU.  
“Ireland will be fair and realistic but also stubborn” - Irish Foreign Minister @simoncoveney on Brexit negotiations with the UK  
Britain considers letting EU citizens travel freely to the country, even after Brexit  
We are still in the EU and, as @Jacob_Rees_Mogg should know, unemployment is a lagging indicator. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Corbyn isn't with Tories on #Brexit at all. He gave 123 appearances to Remain, but he's a democrat. He will fight for workers 24/7 now! Q 
Brexit will lead to a worse customs deal for Britain than it has now, study warns  
BREXIT BOOST: Unemployment at 42-year low. Wages rising. What must George Osborne and Project Fear be thinking?! 
Theresa May is terrified about the symbolism of Big Ben falling silent as we move into the #Brexit period.  
Smears, hacking claims & now the disappearance of James Chapman from Twitter are intriguing. But he's shown how to rattle the Brexit brigade 
EU migrants will STILL have free movement in UK post-Brexit, secret Home Office plans show. Not what we voted for!  
Can smart tech really solve Brexit’s UK-Ireland border problem?  
Brexit update. 1. Stay in Customs Union. 2. Open border with EU. 3. Visa free travel for all EU citizens. In other words, REMAIN. 
."This is a staggering revelation by someone who was at the very heart of department responsible for [Brexit]". 
The UK to offer visa free travel to ALL Eu citizens coming to the UK post Brexit. Yet another major betrayal. 
The world looks at the US in disbelief at choosing Trump. The world looks at the UK in disbelief at choosing #Brexit 
Scots and Welsh environment ministers meet over Brexit - BBC News  
Yet again, @guardian papering over the cracks of a fragmenting UK. Brexit is part of a strengthening of English identity. 
The Economy Explained - Brexit, Scotland - My View. Please RT  
Belgian brewers aren't going to let Brexit prevent them selling beer to Britain  
Britain's EU Exit Will Lead to a Worse Customs Deal: #Brexit Report  
One of the rare joys of Brexit, for me, has been the discovery of @fotoole. Here he is, as usual on top form. 
EU migrants will be allowed to live in Britain after Brexit under new Home Office plans  
PRESS RELEASE: A customs deal is necessary but not sufficient for frictionless trade - our latest #brexit report  
Our @trtworld interview with Turkish FM @MevlutCavusoglu on Iraq, Iran, #AdilOEksuez and KRG referendum  
If saying #Brexit is ridiculous & impossible means you're crazy then I'm batshitmental and proud of it  #NotInMyName 
"They're all leaving." "They've stopped coming here since the Brexit vote." "The xenophobic hatred is driving them away."  
EU is living a fantasy! NO ONE knows how much Brexit divorce bill is, former PM aide says  
'We're taking back control!' Villiers clashes with BBC host over Brexit Irish border  
If #Indonesia was a democracy, they would respect the right of West Papuans to have a referendum. #LetWestPapuaVote pic.twitter.com/vilESOJzXM 
I bet Brexit wouldn't have happened if you told English football fans it would make transfers more difficult  
BREAKING: Brexit talks pushed back to DECEMBER as Merkel holds up negotiations  
Brexit Britain has become a place where such behaviour seemed to be condoned - very depressing, and worrying. 
Mays work is almost complete, put in as PM for her role to delay & derail Brexit. her first meetings as PM was with H.Kissinger & R.Branson  
I do not support Labours plan to unseat Anna Soubry. Her anti brexit credentials are sound  
She opposes Hard Brexit, which is more than most Tories & Lab leadership. She voted for A50 for her own reasons:  
As the Government is mostly spineless, for Brexit to happen it will ultimately require the EU to force us out so as to protect their empire. 
Why did Switzerland's referendum about basic income proponents propose actual amounts?  #referendum 
They'll probably have a 3 way referendum between Milk, Obama and Governor Moonbeam for the honor  
I'm not complaining - but procedures in place for me (& other nationalities) can surely be extended to EU citizens after #Brexit. 
Coming from a guy who promised Brexit voters the world then walked away after vote knowing he sold them a bill of goods. #BRITISHTOOL 
If anyone of capability supported brexit, maybe it could turn out better than it will. You should ask yourself why they don't though. 
You will find that public interest trumps ( if you will pardon the pun ) client confidentialty , especially re the brexit bulldog ... 
I hope the Constitution is respected & any changes go to a referendum.Fiddling around the edges open to political interference 
Not so much 'Negotiation Positions', as Bucket List. @TheNewEuropean @BrexitDebateUK @Brexit @brexit_sham @BrexitBin @BrexitResist #brexit  
After seeing the utter calamity created by brexidiots and their sidekicks? I doubt it. Torygraph continues to print garbage. 
No. You were offered hard Brexit, soft Brexit, clean Brexit & now false Brexit Yes, a sort of Brexit but not really Brexit. Where's Nigel? 
LIKE ... 1) it's just some gin are u rly making this abt Brexit and 2) at least Germany owns up to shit things in their past unlike us 
Most businesses have not changed strategic planning due to Brexit - Thomson Reuters CFO survey  
#brexit is done. Just watch. 
Nothing. You appear to have a fully functional brain & ability to think critically which is why you can't follow Brexit 'logic'. 
Spin alert "bold move on Irish border" means #brexit has been partially suspended in Ireland. 
If you're going to tell a lie make it a big one & keep repeating it. #Brexit #austerity 
Lack of diversity in UK's top firms could hamper post-Brexit trade deals •  • 
Belgium's brewers aren't waiting for Brexit before taking on the U.K. market  
Never been concerned about EU citizens living working in UK ...They're  great ..It's the sovereignty & £9bn that swayed my vote #brexit 
The consequences of a faithful brexit will be disastrous. We need an organic brexit! 
Brexit is 14159 hours away. #brexit 
so brexit is like the silliest thing ever. 
brexit on toast 

